<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8557</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (11): Marcos crony bounces back -
Profile of Eduardo 'Danding' Cojuangco
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THEY call him Ferdinand Marcos's 'super-crony' an 'unrepentant
protectionist' and the 'Pac-man' after the omnivorous computer game monster
that eats everything in its path.
He became extremely rich by controlling the coconut industry, the kind of
monopoly that undermined the Philippines economy for years under President
Marcos. Yet six years after fleeing into exile, Eduardo 'Danding' Cojuangco,
the most accomplished of the Marcos business cronies, is back and a serious
contender for the presidency.
The fact that Mr Cojuangco - and Mrs Imelda Marcos, the former president's
widow - should be given the time of day says something about the
unpredictable twists of Philippines politics. Incredible though it might
seem, Mr Cojuangco is an opposition front-runner.
Through his effective control of the coconut industry, Mr Cojuangco had
influence in virtually every village in the country and is believed to be
able to call in political debts. It is not immediately apparent why.
After Mr Marcos declared martial law in 1972, coconut farmers had to sell
their produce to an authority Mr Cojuangco effectively controlled; he
imposed a levy on them with which he built the United Coconut Planters Bank
that took control of almost all the country's coconut oil mills. And his
control of the supply of seedlings rounded out a monopoly that stretched
throughout the coconut industry, the country's largest export earner.
Nevertheless, he was considered by many in the countryside to be a good
patron. 'Ferdinand Marcos controlled everything in Manila,' says one of Mr
Cojuangco's army of campaign helpers. 'But in the countryside, poor people
earned money. They know Cojuangco as a true friend.'
Should he be elected, Mr Cojuangco would most likely regain control of the
United Coconut Planters Bank and a sizeable shareholding in San Miguel, the
country's largest private employer. These assets and some 400 other
companies - Mr Cojuangco says he is unclear how many - are still frozen by a
government body looking into the billions of dollars allegedly stolen by
Marcos and his business associates.
Mr Cojuangco denies the charge that he is a crony - the description of those
who are believed to have benefitted financially during the Marcos era -
because, he says, he did not receive government loans and he never invested
abroad.
More worrying to local and foreign businessmen are Mr Cojuangco's economic
policy ideas.
Many question whether he really had the super-business brain of the Marcos
era. Who would not make money if granted a monopoly protected by the
president, they ask?
Moreover, while Mr Cojuangco is careful to adopt the rhetoric of economic
liberalisation, businessmen suspect he is still an avid believer in what he
knows best - monopoly capitalism.
He says he would 'design programmes which would double the income of rural
households' and government would develop local industries for the larger
domestic market that would emerge.
They fear it suggests an end to the withdrawal of government from business
and the more export-oriented policies that the rest of south-east Asia has
successfully followed. It would 'make the business sector lie low',
according to one Filipino banker.
Given Mr Cojuangco's record there is something chilling in his definition of
a president's duties: 'chief executive for all the sectors of the economy.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV Photograph Oppositon front-runner Cojuangco, businessmen
suspect he is still an avid believer in monopoly capitalism (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8558</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (8): Belated attempt to remedy
matters - Investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE low level of domestic savings and of local and foreign investment in the
Philippines is one of the fundamental causes of the country's poor economic
performance in relation to its south east Asian neighbours over the past
decade.
In a belated attempt to remedy matters, new foreign investment legislation
was brought into force last year, but even its supporters acknowledge that
it is only a first step towards improving the whole investment climate.
Between 1981 and 1990, gross domestic investment averaged 20 per cent of
gross domestic product, compared to 42 per cent for Singapore, 27 per cent
for Thailand and more than 30 per cent for Indonesia and Malaysia, according
to the Asian Development Bank.
The Philippines has also been lagging well behind its rivals in attracting
foreign investments. 'The Philippines was left behind by Thailand,' says Mr
Enrique Esteban of the Centre for Research and Communication, an economic
think-tank. 'It remained protectionist; anti-investment. We were very
inward-looking in practically everything. We continued with an import
substitution philosophy and we relied on American goodwill.'
Even the most alluring investment regulations would not have been enough to
inspire cautious foreign companies during the 1980s. The overthrow of
President Ferdinand Marcos and the coming to power of President Corazon
Aquino in 1986 were followed by a series of right-wing coup attempts. In the
1989 attempt, the most recent and most damaging, more than 100 people were
killed.
The kidnapping of Mr Michael Barnes, the American vice-president of
Philippine Geothermal Inc, on January 17 this year, is hardly likely to
encourage western investors already contemplating the election campaign with
trepidation. It was not known at the time of writing whether he was seized
by left-wingers, right-wingers or criminals.
Americans, furthermore, have been discouraged by the Philippine Senate's
rejection of the 10-year bases treaty negotiated by the US and Filipino
governments.
Although existing investors, particularly Filipino Chinese, have learned to
make the best of the arduous local conditions, potential newcomers are
understandably deterred by the poor state of the country's infrastructure -
electricity, for example, is sometimes in short supply because of delays in
building new power stations - by the litigious nature of the society, and by
bureaucracy which can condemn even the most respectable bankers to a
nine-month wait for their work permits.
Unhealthy rivalry between different islands or different regions has been
known to delay a new project, but the inadequacies of the central government
have, on the other hand, prompted some local authorities - in Cebu and
Cavite, for example - to promote themselves to Japanese, American,
Taiwanese, Korean and other investors with considerable success.
Regardless of the laws in place, the crucial question is whether Filipino
governments will put aside their nationalistic distrust of foreign
participation in the economy and actually greet foreign investment with
enthusiasm. One congressman went so far as to challenge the new foreign
investment act as unconstitutional, although he lost his case in the Supreme
Court.
The new law allows investors not seeking special incentives to take a 100
per cent stake in any business, provided it does not appear on a 'negative
list' of restricted activities. Broadly, the law simplifies investment
procedures and means that foreign investors seeking full ownership of a
company need not necessarily be located in an export processing zone or
engaged in a 'pioneer' priority industry.
Stockbrokers, however, say they are unclear as to how the law applies to
listed companies - shares are divided into A and B shares, and only the B
shares, making up a maximum of 40 per cent of the company, can be bought by
foreigners.
A more important aspect of the legislation is that it demonstrates a change
in the government's investment philosophy. Before, it was assumed that
foreign investment was banned or restricted unless certain conditions were
met. Today, it is assumed that the investment is acceptable, provided it
falls within official guidelines.
Mr Margarito Teves, chairman of the House of Representatives committee on
economic affairs and a prominent supporter of economic liberalisation, says
the law 'will not be the panacea to our problems', and he is proposing a
number of complementary measures.
'This is merely the starting point,' he says. 'The others address important
concerns that are of interest to investors.'
He is backing proposals to allow accelerated depreciation of assets for tax
purposes, to improve security of land tenure for foreign investors, and to
make it easier for foreign banks to operate.
Another concern is the existing labour legislation, which discourages
foreign investors by setting minimum wages without substantially helping the
workers, who are often underpaid by local employers in any case.
'We have to rely less on foreign loans and more on foreign direct
investment,' says Mr Teves. 'If we encourage and convince our bureaucracy to
be more responsive, and find ways to cut the process to the barest minimum,
maybe we can attract more investment to the Philippines.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8559</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (7): Dogged by legal challenges -
Privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE YEARS after it began, the Philippines' privatisation programme can be
counted neither as a rip-roaring success nor as an abject failure.
Dogged by legal challenges and the hesitancy of local and foreign investors,
the government agencies responsible for privatisation have limped along
through a series of failed auctions, but have eventually succeeded in
selling many of the state-controlled companies and assets in their charge.
The so-called 'big ticket' items have been particularly hard to dispose of,
although the 67 per cent of Philippine Airlines (PAL) offered by the
government was snapped up at auction last month for Dollars 368m by a
consortium of local business groups.
Part of the problem is that the privatisation programme was created more to
clear up the mess left by the regime of the late Ferdinand Marcos than to
satisfy any ideological craving for free enterprise. In 1986, the same year
she came to power, President Corazon Aquino created the Committee on
Privatisation (COP) and the Asset Privatisation Trust (APT), two bodies
whose mandates have recently been extended because of the
slower-than-expected pace of disposals.
Privatisation was among the tools used to rescue the Philippine National
Bank (PNB) and the Development Bank of the Philippines, two government-owned
institutions abused and exploited by Marcos and his cronies.
The government has taken over some 140bn pesos in problem loans and other
assets, and made the APT responsible primarily for selling these
non-performing assets, both financial and physical. It is against this
background that the APT's achievement in grossing 26.3bn pesos by disposing
of 266 out of the 399 non-performing assets in its portfolio must be
measured. In all, the privatisation programme has netted 41.1bn pesos.
With the APT's remaining non-performing assets either completely
deteriorated or hard to sell because of legal impediments, the focus is now
shifting to the 50 or so unsold state companies out of the 123 corporations
which were earmarked for sale by the APT and a number of state parent
organisations such as the Government Service Insurance System.
The process has been slowed both by the reluctance of the Commission on
Audit to accept the low market values of some of the assets and by the
doubts of potential investors in an economic climate affected by natural
disasters and the Gulf crisis.
'I think in the experience of other countries, five years is really too
short,' says Ms Crisanta Legaspi, executive officer of the Committee on
Privatisation.
The government is keen to rid itself of loss-making corporations, but its
various agencies are sometimes less than wholehearted in their commitment to
the principles of privatisation. 'They would not like to lose whatever they
have now by disposing of it,' says Mr Jose Sison, associate executive
trustee of the APT.
The GSIS, for example, is supposed to sell 40 per cent of the Manila Hotel
this year, but senior officials, citing the historical and sentimental value
of the former headquarters of Gen Douglas MacArthur, are in no hurry to
dispose of a profitable company without debts.
Furthermore, assets sold by the state often fall into the hands of the
oligarchy of wealthy families which has always run the country.
'I think that's one of the flaws of the privatisation programme,' says Mr
Sison. 'What's happening here is that we're transferring from one monopoly
to another.'
Mr Jose Cuisia, governor of the central bank, expresses his satisfaction
that 'more than 50 per cent of what was targeted has already been
privatised', although he acknowledges that the sale of big-ticket items will
take time.
Thirty per cent of the now profitable PNB has already been sold on the stock
market, a further 21 per cent is expected to be offered soon, and President
Aquino has approved the eventual sale of 100 per cent.
The Philippine Plaza hotel was finally sold last year to Allied Kajima, a
Hong Kong-Japanese joint venture. But an agreement on financing for the
Dollars 325m sale of Nonoc Mining and Industrial Corporation to Philippine
Nickel Corporation has yet to be finalised, and other large companies,
including the National Steel Corporation and the Paper Industries
Corporation of the Philippines, are still waiting for buyers.
The government's efforts to sell two thirds of PAL were boosted by
higher-than-expected profits in recent months - after a decade of losses -
and by the government's decision to assume the airline's foreign debt of
Dollars 519m. 'There is an economic need to infuse new money into PAL,' says
Mr Feliciano Belmonte, president of PAL and GSIS. 'And GSIS, which is a
pension fund for government employees, is not the right kind of sourcing.'
The winning consortium in last month's three-cornered bidding was a group
led by AB Capital and Investment Corporation and linked to Korean Air. Its
bid of Dollars 368m, including a local currency cash component worth Dollars
150m, was well above the confidential Dollars 317m 'hurdle price' set by the
authorities and appeared sufficiently high to disarm critics of the sale,
even if last-minute obstacles to the deal could not be ruled out.
Mr Belmonte, although accepting the necessity of private sector investment
in PAL, is noticeably ambivalent about the ideological merits of
privatisation.
In the absence of widespread official determination to push ahead the
privatisation programme under the new government to be elected in May, the
disposal of state companies is likely to continue as slowly as before.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8560</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (6): US withdrawal raises
questions - Foreign Relations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'WE won't stay where we're not wanted, and if they want us out, we're gone.'
So said Mr Dick Cheney, US Defence Secretary, after the Philippines Senate
voted in September against a new 10-year treaty which would have allowed the
US continued use of the Subic Bay naval base.
The Senate's momentous decision means that the last US personnel should have
left Subic by December 31 this year, ending nearly a century of American
occupation of the deep-water harbour some 80km north-west of Manila.
The nearby Clark air base was abandoned in the middle of the treaty
negotiations after Mount Pinatubo erupted and smothered the facilities in
ash. Many Filipinos, even those who opposed US bases on their soil because
of genuine feelings of nationalism or a desire to score political points,
have yet to grasp that the Americans are really leaving.
But the Americans, who took control of the Philippines by defeating the
Spanish in 1898 and established the Subic base three years later, are no
longer so anxious to keep a costly military presence on the islands now that
the Soviet Union has collapsed and their own budget deficit has grown so
large.
The economic and social impact of the American withdrawal from Subic, the
supply base and repair yard for the 7th Fleet, will be substantial. Some
40,000 Filipinos stand to lose their jobs and direct US aid to the military
and to civilian programmes is certain to fall from the current annual level
of about Pounds 400m.
The indirect effects are harder to quantify, but the Subic Bay town of
Olongapo, its streets crammed with bars and prostitutes, is already feeling
the pinch as the US servicemen depart. One western diplomat estimates that
the US bases were putting Dollars 1bn into the economy every year, while the
country's annual exports amount to only about Dollars 8bn. 'That's a lot of
foreign exchange to let go in 18 months,' he says.
But Mr Jose Cuisia, the central bank governor, remains sanguine. 'It's
significant,' he says. 'But it's not going to mean the end of the
Philippines either.'
According to one school of thought, the Filipinos bungled the negotiations
with the Americans by dithering for too long and demanding too high a price.
But they could hardly have foreseen the eruption of Mt Pinatubo - which took
Clark out of the equation - and even if a deal had been struck before the
volcanic disaster successive US administrations would have been hard pressed
to secure funds from Congress each year in exchange for a defunct air base
covered in ash.
In any case, the political confusion over the bases in the Philippines had
as much to do with the country's schizophrenic attitude towards its former
colonial masters as with greed.
Filipino commentators are apt to criticise US involvement in the country (on
nationalist grounds) in the same breath as asking for more assistance (on
the basis of the longstanding ties between the two peoples).
The close relationship, albeit weakened by the rejection of the new treaty,
will certainly continue. A mutual defence pact dating from 1952 and
providing for joint military exercises remains in force.
American culture has permeated the Philippine islands; about 1m Filipinos
live in the US and thousands of Americans are resident in the Philippines.
For the workers at Subic and the towns around the bay, the most immediate
concern is the future of the port and the 5,800 hectares which make up the
base. Here too the government was slow to react, suggesting at first that
the issue could be addressed by the new administration due to take over
after the May elections.
Local residents, and the Americans who are packing up their movable
equipment and leaving, convinced President Corazon Aquino's outgoing
government to start dealing with the problem before the voters went to the
polls.
Clark air base, after all, was handed over to the military and looted after
the Americans left.
Spurred on by the energetic mayor of Olongapo, Mr Richard Gordon, officials
are airing proposals for a free port and talking hopefully of 'a new Hong
Kong', but it remains to be seen whether such ideas will ever come to
fruition.
Residents are furious not only because the Senate rejected the 10-year
treaty, but also because the Americans were told to leave within one year
instead of three.
'Our mission is first to preserve, conserve and maintain the resources we
have on base,' says Mrs Boots Ligsay, a training supervisor at Subic and
spokeswoman for a movement promoting the 'Autonomous Region of Greater
Olongapo' (Argo).
'It's a good one, and we don't want it to become another Clark. Subic Bay
can be a free port and the base workers are willing to invest their
hard-earned savings.'
Mr Gordon, citing the sentimental value of American 'work experience and
sexual experience' in Olongapo, believes he, rather than the unsympathetic
officials in Manila, can persuade the Americans to leave some of their more
valuable pieces of equipment behind. He is adamant about the need for the
conversion of the base to commercial use.
'I think if the base leaves and there is nothing, you're going to see some
social unrest,' he says.
Unfortunately, the Americans seem inclined to take away the valuable
floating dry-docks used for ship repair. And although the Subic workers have
many of the necessary skills for commercial shipyard operations, they will
be competing with established yards in neighbouring countries.
Subic, western diplomats say, was ideal for the US Navy because it was a
'one-stop shop' allowing for replenishment, training in conjunction with
Clark, rest and recreation, and repairs. Commercial ship repair alone might
not be viable.
In the meantime, the US departure from the Philippines will leave the
country in a weak position with regard to its Asian neighbours. The armed
forces are poorly equipped, often unprofessional and preoccupied with
politics, while the economy is lagging behind those of the other south-east
Asian countries. Slowly but surely the influence of the Japanese, who
occupied the country with notable cruelty during the Second World War before
they were driven out by the Americans, is making itself felt.
Japan is the country's largest aid donor and the source of much foreign
investment. Young Filipinos are largely unaffected by their parents'
memories of the war. No longer can the foreign policy of the Philippines be
concerned almost exclusively with the US.
'The Filipinos are going to have to take some very significant foreign
policy decisions,' says one diplomat in Manila. 'What is their relationship
with Asean? To what extent to they want to maintain a US defence
relationship? How are they going to deal with the Japanese?'
Already, in between the brothels and the American hamburger joints in
downtown Manila, the Karaoke bars are spreading as the US sailors head home
from Subic.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Photograph The American flag is lowered for the last time as
the base is abandoned (Omitted). Photograph A huge mushroom cloud over Clark
air base after Mount Pinatubo erupted (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8561</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (5): Doubts over democracy - The
Military
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIX YEARS ago a failed military coup triggered the popular uprising that
brought President Corazon Aquino to power, ending 14 years of army-backed
Marcos dictatorship. Seven attempted coups later it is clear that
disgruntled sections of the army have not lost their taste for intervening
in civilian government.
While none of the coups has succeeded, the durability of the democratic
institutions which President Aquino restored is still in doubt as national
elections loom in May. Mrs Aquino has constantly had to look over her
shoulder at a section of her military that sneers at civilian supremacy.
Many of the officers with political ambitions look longingly at Thailand
where the generals rule. But apart from their shared taste for intervention,
similarities between the two countries are minimal.
Thai generals go out of their way not to disrupt business. The Philippines
rebels in the 1989 coup, however, seized and shot up hotels and offices in
Manila's business district, stopping the country's faltering economic
recovery dead in its tracks.
There are some signs that the dissenters in the army are becoming less
influential under General Lisandro Abadia, Chief of Staff of the armed
forces. But it could take years before the military can be guaranteed to
stay in their barracks at times of political tension. 'Marcos established a
constitutional coup with the support of the military,' says General Rafael
Ileto, National Security Adviser to the President, referring to the
declaration of Martial Law in 1972. Then Mrs Aquino came to power in the
aftermath of a bungled military coup against Marcos.
'The military have got used to coups,' says Gen Ileto.
Perhaps the most important change since the 1989 coup is that financial and
political support for the leading renegade officer, Colonel Gregorio
'Gringo' Honasan, appears to have dwindled. The army believes that a dozen
rebel officers, including Honasan, and 100 enlisted men who took part still
remain at large.
Honasan's organisation - the Reform the Army Movement (RAM) - has also lost
much of the credibility it once enjoyed. During the 1989 coup, this junior
officers' pressure group that claimed to campaign for professionalism in the
army, openly linked with right-wing Marcos rebels in a crude grab for power.
To outsiders, the army's leaders still show an astonishing degree of
tolerance towards these renegades. Gen Abadia, for example, feels able to
describe Honasan as a 'gentleman officer' with whom he can sit and discuss
surrender terms, even though the Colonel's troops bombed Mrs Aquino's palace
during the last coup.
It is only the latest display of army ambivalence towards its rebels. After
right-wing Marcos loyalists launched a bizarre coup attempt in 1986 by
taking over the Manila Hotel and swearing in a new president, General Fidel
Ramos, then chief of staff, ordered the rebels to do press-ups as a
punishment.
Such is the residual distrust of the army that some observers believe the
army might take over if the next president, competing against several other
candidates, is elected with only a small minority of the vote.
Gen Abadia says intervention is unlikely. Only if there is 'massive fraud or
disorder' would the army 'restore order as mandated by the constitution', he
says.
Ironically, just as military unity appears to be returning, the departure of
the US bases from the Philippines might rekindle dissent among the ranks.
The issue is money. As part of the bases compensation package, the US pays
about Dollars 200m in military assistance for helicopters, signals
equipment, weapons and training.
As part of the defence cuts as much as the ending of the bases agreement,
the US military aid programme is likely to be cut by at least half. This
will put enormous additional strains on an already creaking national budget.
While the Philippines will continue to receive equipment for several years
under this programme, Gen Abadia has said he will be requesting an
additional 3bn pesos to fill the gap left by cuts in US aid.
If the military does not get the funds, there is a good chance that leaders
will claim the army does not have the tools to tackle the Communist-led New
People's Army. In fact, the Communist challenge is already dwindling thanks
to the collapse of Communist models in eastern Europe and internal divisions
among the Communist party leadership.
The army reckons numbers under arms have fallen to 11,000 from 16,000 a few
years ago. And Gen Abadia is forecasting that by 1993 the army will have
crushed the political backbone of the movement and the insurgency will be no
more than a policing problem.
This might be optimistic. Undoubtedly, current military tactics of combining
military and propaganda offensives, are reducing NPA influence, even though
the army is still too often linked to killing and torturing of innocent
civilians. But the government is still not building enough rural roads,
health clinics and local industry to encourage the kind of economic growth
on which lasting victory over the NPA must be based.
The generals in Manila are critical of the way civilian officials have
failed many rural areas and made the army's task more difficult; it is the
most convincing of their complaints against Mrs Aquino s administration. But
as a result of luck (the collapse of European Communism), restored democracy
and Mrs Aquino's residual popularity, the Communists are facing their most
testing time.
It is a far cry from the last days of martial law when US intelligence
reports said Marcos had let the political situation deteriorate so much that
'ultimate defeat and Communist takeover' were on the cards.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Photograph Gen Fidel Ramos, ordered the rebels to do
press-ups after right-wing Marcos loyalists launched a bizarre coup attempt
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8562</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (3): Important issues still need
to be tackled - The Economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANGUISHED Filipinos often ask themselves why their country, which was once
among the most prosperous in Asia, has been left behind by its rapidly
developing south-east Asian neighbours.
Several explanations spring to mind. The late President Ferdinand Marcos,
overthrown in 1986, bequeathed a burdensome legacy of foreign debt and
corruption and his supporters have undermined economic confidence by trying
repeatedly to unseat President Corazon Aquino with a series of botched coup
attempts.
Mrs Aquino herself has failed to reduce the glaring inequalities between the
mass of the Filipino people and the oligarchy of ruling families which
dominates agriculture and business and which likes to protect local
industrial ventures behind high tariff barriers.
Above all, her government and the Congress have fallen prey to the
temptation to bow to popular pressure at moments of crisis, first taking
necessary decisions and then watering them down so much that they hardly do
anything to address the original problem.
Such tendencies are not new; earlier this century the flamboyant Filipino
politician Manuel Quezon criticised his rival Sergio Osmena for taking
politics too seriously. 'Our people do not understand that,' he said. 'They
do not want it. All they want is to have the present problem solved, and
solved with the least pain. That is all.'
Given the Aquino administration's early failure to fulfil the hopes of its
supporters, the reformist economic record of 1991 and early 1992 is somewhat
surprising. Whereas most politicians use their 'honeymoon period' at the
start of a term of office to give their citizens unpleasant economic
medicine - and hope to reap the benefits of a healthy economy at election
time - the Aquino Administration has done the opposite, letting the economy
drift for the first few years and suddenly imposing necessary but unpopular
measures shortly before the elections due in May.
Part of the reason for this change of attitude was the realisation by the
formidable economic team of Mr Jesus Estanislao, the ascetic finance
minister, and Mr Jose Cuisia, the central bank governor, that the budget
deficit, the trade deficit and inflation were threatening to run out of
control in 1990.
At the same time the International Monetary Fund has been withholding its
seal of approval until financial discipline is restored. By the beginning of
this year, it was clear that the IMF's 1991 targets were going to be met,
and the Senate's approval this month of a number of tax reform measures
appears to have paved the way for an IMF endorsement of the Philippines, a
move which would release IMF and other donor money and pave the way for a
rescheduling of Dollars 5.3bn of foreign debt.
The total public sector deficit fell from 5.8 per cent of gross domestic
product in 1990 to about 2.7 per cent last year, and it is expected to
remain under 3 per cent in 1992. Economists agree that the 1991 figures were
in line with IMF demands but they caution against reading too much into the
numbers; state spending was low because the budget was not approved until
well into the year and capital expenditure, boosted again this year by
road-building programmes, bore the brunt of the 1991 cuts.
'Last year can't be used as a test of political will for lowering the
deficit,' says one economist.
Nevertheless, the government did inflict a certain amount of pain to meet
its targets. A special import levy of 9 per cent was in force, although it
has now been lowered to 5 per cent and is to be abolished by June. Imports
were stagnant, while exports rose about 6 per cent. The economy as a whole
registered zero real growth, which meant falling living standards for the
burgeoning population. This year real growth is expected to reach 2-3 per
cent, approximately in line with the population growth rate.
Some good news has lightened the gloom. Inflation has dipped to around 17
per cent and is expected to fall further. Textile exports and tourist
arrivals are buoyant, the remittances of Filipino migrant workers in the
Gulf and elsewhere are higher than expected, and oil has been found off
Palawan. Gross international reserves rose to more than Dollars 4bn at the
end of last year.
Now in a relatively confident mood, the administration has embarked on
several important economic reforms. Exporters are now permitted to retain 40
per cent of their foreign exchange earnings, instead of 2 per cent. Indeed,
the ready availability of dollars - because of restricted demand for
imports, and electoral campaigns financed by overseas dollar holdings - has
all but eliminated the currency black market and strengthened the peso,
leading to fears that the competitiveness of exports will be affected.
A new local government law gives local authorities expanded powers to raise
taxes, which may encourage further regional development as pursued with
notable success by the island of Cebu and the region of Cavite south of
Manila. A new foreign investment law has been enacted to attract foreign
capital.
On the negative side, a shortage of electricity is threatening industries in
the southern island of Mindanao and there are fears that the main island of
Luzon may also be affected. And while Filipinos hope for a consumer-led
economic recovery boosted by election spending, the public sector deficit
has helped to stifle productive investment by sucking savings into
high-yielding treasury bills.
Attempts to cut the overall public sector deficit have been stymied partly
by the problems of a central bank plagued by liabilities dating from the
Marcos era and costing some 30bn pesos a year to service.
The bank's problems are not fully understood either in the cabinet or in the
press, where it has been accused of inefficiency for making losses.
'In the early 1980s the central bank was ordered by President Marcos to
provide forward cover for the oil companies,' says Mr Cuisia, who wants the
government to take over the liabilities and leave the bank to handle
monetary policy unhindered. 'Now we have enough dollars we may unwind these
swaps,' he says.
Under Marcos, says Mr Cuisia, the bank was also ordered to acquire the
obligations of state companies and to pay national subscriptions to bodies
such as the IMF and the World Bank (for which a presidential decree forbade
the bank to charge interest).
Nature has not been kind to the Philippines these past few years, inflicting
an earthquake, a volcanic eruption, a typhoon and a catastrophic landslide
on the islands. But economic recovery in 1992 and 1993 depends largely on
whether the present government can hold its nerve up to the election and on
whether the new administration will build on the reforms of the preceding
year.
Several important issues still need to be tackled, including the state of
the environment and the conservation of remaining natural resources in a
country still heavily dependent on agriculture, fishing and forestry. Mr
Enrique Esteban of the Centre for Research and Communication says he is
'excited about the future' because he believes the recent economic reforms
will help the Philippines catch up with its partners in the Association of
South East Asian Nations (Asean).
'The Philippines is part of the Japanese plan, so the Philippines has to be
helped to develop by Japan,' he says. 'Japanese money is no longer going
into Indonesia and Thailand because they are at maximum absorption. The
Philippines is the last game in the Asean town."
Others are less optimistic that the Philippines can emerge from the economic
doldrums of the past decade without decisive actions by its own governments.
As Mr Estanislao put it in a speech last month: 'The region around us has
taught the rest of the world how to develop through exports. We have coined
the appropriate slogans, but ask our exporters. All they ask is to be put on
an equal footing with others. What has been our response until very
recently? A clear preferential treatment for importers and industrialists
who cannot see beyond the confines of our internal market; and a strong bias
against exporters and agriculturists who have been manfully scouring world
markets for foreign exchange.
'Isn't it time we moved beyond slogans, and put substantive actions behind
grand words?'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Marcos (left) bequeathed a
legacy of foreign debt and corruption. Finance minister Jesus Estanislao
(right), realised that inflation was threatening to run out of control
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8563</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (4): Power crisis bites -
Electricity Supply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOT FOR the first time, parts of the Philippines are suffering from a
shortage of electricity. The southern island of Mindanao has been worst hit
and consumers have endured blackouts - or 'brownouts' as they are known
locally - for up to 12 hours a day.
Businesses - from cement factories to fish canneries, some of them lured to
the island by the prospect of cheap hydro-electric power - have been forced
to reduce their output or use their costly standby generators for extended
periods. Prices of the affected products are expected to rise.
Further north, the grid for the island of Luzon and its capital Metro Manila
has barely enough electricity to cope with demand, which will mean more
power cuts if part of the ageing and overstretched generating system fails.
Had the economy been growing rapidly instead of stagnating, the shortages
would be even worse.
The single most important cause of the power crisis - which, besides the
elections, has become the country' hottest topic of conversation and
controversy - is the lack of decisive action by the government to build new
power stations. The government has not been helped, it must be said, by the
popular tendency to complain about the financial losses and inadequacies of
the state-owned National Power Corporation (Napocor) at the same time as
protesting about modest increases in the price of electricity.
'Whereas in other countries with fast economic growth the price of oil and
electricity is accepted as an economic fact of life,' said an exasperated Mr
Jesus Estanislao, finance minister, last month, 'here it has remained a
subject of endless debate and fruitless discussion.' A drought affecting
hydro-electric dams on Mindanao, a dispute between Napocor and the local
community over the island's Agus I dam, and a range of environmental
concerns have exacerbated the crisis.
Deforestation has speeded up soil erosion and silted up dams. Power stations
on Luzon belching pollutants from poor-quality local coal have alienated
nearby communities and are said to have reduced agricultural output.
The Japanese-funded Calaca project shows how badly things can go wrong. The
first 300MW unit was designed to burn local coal shipped from Semirara
island but the coal turned out to be of worse quality than expected and had
to be mixed with Australian coal. The local coal was also inclined to catch
fire spontaneously in the yard, causing further pollution and raising a
storm of local opposition to the second 300MW unit.
A contractor was chosen three years ago, but the Department of Environment
and Natural Resources (DENR) has declined to issue the environmental
clearance certificate which would allow work to begin.
Meanwhile, a 600MW project to be funded by the Asian Development Bank at
Masinloc has been stalled - apparently because the mayor has relatives in
Calaca - although it has been designed to use higher-quality imported coal.
Environmental and administrative delays have also afflicted geothermal
energy projects and all the while the existing plant becomes older and more
prone to breakdowns.
The authorities, although able to use the International Monetary Fund as a
scapegoat for electricity price rises, are now learning the hard way that it
might be worth facing a mild outcry today in order to avert power cuts and
the inevitable anger of the public in the future.
But their response to the mounting power crisis has been to adopt expensive,
quick-fix solutions, including the purchase of barge-mounted diesel
generators. Such increases in generating capacity as there have been in the
past five years have come from these mobile barges and from the 200MW gas
turbine project implemented by Hopewell of Hong Kong (the turbines were
supposed to be used occasionally to top up supplies at times of peak demand,
but their continued running is now essential simply to maintain the base
load.)
In Mindanao, Napocor is hoping for rain and negotiating to start operating
the Agus I dam. 'We really have a very, very serious crisis in Mindanao at
the moment,' says Mr Pablo Malixi, Napocor's chief executive officer. He
admits contritely that the corporation has failed to explain itself properly
to local communities affected by power projects.
President Corazon Aquino, bowing to public pressure, has ordered a shake-up
of Napocor's management and demanded that the DENR issue environmental
licences to new power plants. There has also been desultory talk of reviving
a 620MW nuclear power station in Bataan, built by Westinghouse of the US but
abandoned before it was commissioned by the Aquino government after the
overthrow of the late President Ferdinand Marcos.
Even if the government launches a decisive energy strategy now, it will take
several years before the country sees the results. The current power
shortages are profitable for the foreign manufacturers of generators and
power barges, but not for the Philippines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Photograph The 620MW nuclear power station in Bataan,
abandoned before it was commissioned (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8564</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (2): An appetite for tittle-tattle
 -Politics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOBODY could accuse Filipinos of not taking their politics seriously. Every
morning in the coffee shops of any hotel worth its salt, politicians,
pundits and the press spend hours raking over the embers of the previous
day's political intrigues. More often than not the talk is of personalities
and parties; rarely, it seems, of policy.
For the next three months even the coffee-shop cognoscenti's appetite for
political tittle-tattle may be tested. On May 11, the country votes for a
new president to replace Corazon Cojuangco Aquino. Barring a hitch, the
election will be the first time in the country's history that an incumbent
has not stood for a second term and the first time since 1969 that elections
have been held according to a timetable laid down by the constitution.
The scale of the exercise, as much as the event, has set the country alight.
When registration closed, the voters had choice of 78 presidential
candidates - or 'Presidentiables' as they are locally called - eight of whom
were considered 'serious' contenders. As if this were not confusing enough,
voters will also elect 24 senators - from 286 hopefuls - and 17,000 local
officials.
Not surprisingly, politicians fear that voters will be somewhat confused.
Accustomed as they are to violence during elections, the politicians are
also ominously warning that the elections could be marred by bloodshed.
With three months to go before polling, the serious contenders were
splitting into two fields. Emerging as front-runner was Mr Ramon Mitra,
Speaker of the House of Representatives and a leading member of the LDP, the
largest party in the ruling coalition. Mr Mitra held pole position by dint
of the strong party machinery he has developed nationwide rather than a
strong personal following. (See profile, Page 4)
Rapidly gaining credibility was Mr Eduardo Cojuangco, the estranged cousin
of Mrs Aquino and the late President Ferdinand Marcos's most accomplished
business associate during 14 years of martial law. (See profile, Page 4).
Sounding less overtly in favour of the monopolistic capitalism he helped
perfect under Mr Marcos, he was trying to harness the support of Filipinos
disenchanted with a perceived lack of clear leadership.
Also in the first field was retired General Fidel Ramos. He is a contender,
largely because he received the personal support of Mrs Aquino who,
confusingly, chose not to back Mr Mitra, the head of her ruling coalition.
Some way behind these three were Mrs Miriam Defensor Santiago, an anti-graft
campaigner who scored highly in opinion polls but had almost no party
machinery; Mr Joseph Estrada, a movie matinee idol; Mr Jovita Salonga, the
former President of the Senate and leader of the Liberal party; Mr Salvador
Laurel, the Vice-President who fell out with Mrs Aquino almost as soon as
she came to power when the position of Prime Minister he was to have filled
was abolished; and Mrs Imelda Marcos, widow of the late president who is
facing a score of corruption charges and whose greatest asset in the
presidential race is said to be access to large amounts of cash.
Some in this field will wither and others will come from behind. The only
certainty is that any successful candidate will need the support of the
Roman Catholic church, or at least its neutrality.
In the predominantly Roman Catholic country, the most powerful spiritual
voice is that of Cardinal Jaime Sin, Manila's turbulent prelate. Although he
sometimes limits himself to utterances of Delphic obscurity - he says he
lives in a 'House of Sin' - it is almost inconceivable that he will not come
down in one candidate's favour. After all, he too, regularly holds political
breakfasts for journalists.
Equally important is the support of the Iglesia ni Kristo, a conservative
Christian sect founded in the Philippines. Unlike the Roman Catholic
Church's influence over its flock, which is strong but not binding,
Iglesia's four million voters have tended to vote as their leader says they
should vote, potentially giving one candidate a crucial block vote.
Mrs Aquino's own influence on the election has been limited. Mr Ramos's
campaign has been slow to take off despite her endorsement and she has also
failed to lure her influential brother, Mr Jose Cojuangco, from the Mitra
camp. This is a notable breakdown of the kinship on which much local
political power is based.
Her limited impact stems partly from her lack of interest in the pragmatic
art of party building - a quality many Filipinos admire. In her last months
in power, she has channelled her energies into so-called non-governmental
organisations which by-pass the government machinery to deliver services and
livelihood programmes directly to poor communities.
But it is also a fault of a flawed constitution. By allowing a president
only one six-year term, it has transformed Mrs Aquino from the supremely
powerful patron early in her term, to something of a lame duck.
Politicians are already talking of revising the constitution after the next
elections to rectify this. They are considering reverting to a maximum of
two four-year terms.
They are also considering replacing the congressional legislature with a
parliamentary system. When Filipinos changed from the parliamentary form in
1986, they were throwing out an institution whose main purpose had been to
rubber stamp decrees issued by Marcos during martial law.
Some politicians now believe that a parliamentary system, incorporating
elements of the French presidential system, might swing the balance of power
back towards the executive without unduly weakening the checks and balances.
Few pundits suggest a parliamentary system is the immediate panacea for all
the country's ills or the chronicly fragmented political scene so vividly
demonstrated by the plethora of presidential candidates. It would, however,
provide plenty of opportunity for lengthy coffee shop debate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Photograph Corazon Aquino, a lack of interest in the pragmatic
art of party building (Omitted). Photograph Cardinal Sin, turbulent prelate
with a powerful spiritual voice (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8565</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of the Philippines (1): Rocky road to transition - As
the Philippines moves towards a democratic transfer of power, many Filipinos
approach this milestone disappointed and impatient at what they believe is a
lack of progress towards both economic and social stability. Yet a new
president will take over amid signs of renewed optimism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIX years after President Ferdinand Marcos's 20-year grip on power was
broken in a popular rebellion, the Philippines is again approaching a
turbulent transition.
Despite seven coup attempts, President Corazon Aquino has confounded her
detractors by surviving and is steering the country towards that rare
south-east Asian event, a democratic transfer of power.
Judged by the yardstick of democracy, a peaceful handover after the May
elections will be viewed as a significant achievement for Mrs Aquino. Yet
the restoration of elected institutions has been fraught with difficulties
and has yet to provide the foundations for the kind of economic growth
enjoyed by most of the country's neighbours.
Swept along by understandable but unrealistic optimism immediately after
Marcos fled in 1986, many Filipinos approach this milestone disappointed and
impatient at what they say is a lack of progress towards economic and social
stability.
The path to a more predictable future has been complicated by the sudden
departure of US bases from the Philippines by November this year. Triggered
by the Senate's refusal to ratify Mrs Aquino's new treaty with Washington,
the closing of the bases heralds fundamental changes in the often emotional
relationship between Filipinos and their former colonial rulers. The
importance of the Philippines to US projection of power in the Pacific was
bound to diminish with the collapse of the Soviet Union and Washington's
budget problems. Yet the abrupt end to the historic relationship and the
imminence of the withdrawal have yet to be fully appreciated. Quite suddenly
the Philippines will have to strengthen its ties with Asian neighbours and
come to terms with the growing regional importance of the old adversary,
Japan.
The looming elections have so far provided few pointers as to how the
Philippines will emerge from this transition. In an atmosphere somewhere
between high drama and farce, eight serious candidates have lined up to
succeed Mrs Aquino, including Mrs Imelda Marcos, the former First Lady
accused of looting millions of dollars from her country.
Mrs Marcos faces more than 100 charges ranging from money smuggling to
theft, and probably stands little chance of winning the election. But she is
well enough financed not be written off as a nuisance candidate.
Against this background of uncertainty investors are once again intoning the
familiar refrain - 'wait-and-see'. This is exactly what the Philippines
could do without as the country emerges from a year of negative per capita
economic growth.
Yet despite the destabilising effect of the elections, the gloom that hung
over the economy for much of last year is beginning to lift. Foreign
exchange reserves are at an all time high as migrant workers, driven abroad
by the eruption of the Mount Pinatubo volcano, remit more dollars. A
revenue-raising levy has slashed imports. Money already pouring back into
the country to fund election campaigns is also expected to fuel a
consumer-led mini-boom which optimists hope will tide the country over until
investment can lead recovery after the elections.
This recovery could, however, be substantially diminished if the main
opposition candidate is elected. Mr Eduardo Cojuangco, the most accomplished
of Mr Marcos's business cronies before he fled with the dictator in 1986, is
still widely suspected of favouring the protected, monopoly-dominated form
of capitalism nurtured by his former boss to the lasting detriment of the
country. If he wins, investors could well go to ground. Manila's businessmen
fear that a similar cocktail of inward-looking economic nationalism could be
ushered in by Senator Jovita Salonga, the Liberal candidate.
On the other hand, should either of the ruling LDP party's two candidates
win, there is likely to be a continuation of recent movement towards
economic liberalisation. The LDP's chances have been weakened, however, by
Mrs Aquino's endorsement of retired General Fidel Ramos as her preferred
successor, rather than Mr Ramon Mitra, the Speaker, who won the nomination
of his party's delegates.
It is an example of the sort of decision made by Mrs Aquino that has bemused
observers and lost her much of her early rapturous support at home and
abroad. Despite an enviable mandate for change, she is now widely criticised
as having led a government of missed opportunities. Most damaging has been
the administrations's inability to control the nationalist-dominated Senate,
even though Mrs Aquino hand-picked most of the incumbents.
The Senate's refusal to endorse her decision to prolong the US bases
agreement was one of its more notable acts of rebellion.
Yet at the eleventh hour, the Senate fell into line with the administration
on the equally crucial question of economic management. By passing new
revenue-raising measures during its last hours in session, the Senate has
given the new administration a chance to tame the burgeoning domestic debt
which has kept local interest rates high and discouraged investment.
The new measures also appear to have persuaded the International Monetary
Fund to approve a new austerity programme which clears the way for new
foreign aid and an important rescheduling of Dollars 5.3bn of commercial
debt.
In any case, to lay all blame at Mrs Aquino's feet, as her critics are
doing, is simplistic. Many of the problems she has confronted were inherited
and would have been passed onto the next president whoever replaced Marcos.
Foreign debt, now standing at Dollars 29bn, has been a running sore. And the
army, for so long the policeman of martial law, has steadfastly refused to
accept that it should be subservient to civilian government. Few observers
will put money on the military remaining in their barracks.
More reasonable Filipinos, while welcoming the likelihood that almost any
new president will provide more decisive leadership, nevertheless point out
that Mrs Aquino leaves some solid foundations on which to build.
The communist-led insurgency, for example, has been badly damaged not only
by the collapse of role models in eastern Europe but also by Mrs Aquino's
commitment to democracy. Delivery of some basic services such as roads,
schools and healthcare to remote areas might be the clinching final blow
against the guerrillas as it was against Thailand's insurgents in 1984.
On the economic front, the dismantling of the big Marcos monopolies and
crony capitalism, while not complete, has liberated local entrepreneurial
flair, particularly in the important Filipino Chinese community. All they
would seek from a new president is a continuation of the process that is
slowly edging government out of business. Last month's privatisation of
Philippine Airlines was the latest successful move along this path.
If the government supplies the stability and better infrastructure - the
country is facing a serious power shortage - business will resume investing,
the argument goes. Already in Cebu island and Cavite province where the
local political leadership is strongly pro-business, pockets of dynamic
investment-led growth have sprung up as an example of what could happen
elsewhere.
In recent months, the government has also adopted important economic
reforms. It has relaxed foreign exchange rules, greatly increasing
exporters' flexibility and reducing red tape. And it has begun to undo
damage done to foreign investor sentiment by Supreme Court interference in a
Taiwanese company's plans for a Dollars 250m petrochemical plant. After the
court's ruling, the investor packed his bags and went home.
The new investment code now explicitly presumes projects are acceptable
unless specifically excluded, reversing the previous rules that said most
investments needed regulatory approval.
These reforms remain, however, humble beginnings compared to what Thailand,
Malaysia and even Indonesia have already achieved. But as the country moves
chaotically out of the gloom of the Marcos years, Filipinos who can look
beyond the clamour of the forthcoming elections are nevertheless teetering
on the verge of optimism.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Photograph Manila, money which is already pouring into the
country to fund election campaigns is expected to fuel a consumer-led upturn
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8566</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Monday Interview: A thinker as well as a doer - Professor
Stephen Littlechild, electricity industry regulator
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One year after the UK privatised its electricity industry, much of the
debate about its future takes place in a large, 15th-floor office
overlooking central Birmingham.
It is occupied by a lightly built man with a russet, gnome-like beard who
seldom smiles, and whose every word sounds so carefully chosen that it might
have been uttered by a judge. And, in a way, a judge he is.
Professor Stephen Littlechild is the director-general of electricity supply
 -the man charged with the statutory duty of promoting competition in the
electricity industry. The grand set of titles is no accident. He is both a
regulator and an academic: a thinker and a doer.
Anyone requesting a copy of his curriculum vitae is asked whether they want
the long version or the short one. The long one consists of 11 pages packed
with details of his degrees, fellowships, appointments, consultancies and
publications. The latter range from a weighty Elements of Telecommunications
Economics (in Japanese) to treatises on aircraft landing fees, smoking and
daffodil prices.
But the short version contains the central points. Since 1975, as Professor
of Commerce at Birmingham University (from which he is currently on leave of
absence), Prof Littlechild has been one of the leading academics on
regulation issues. He advised the UK government on the regulatory regime for
British Telecom and the water industry, and was a member of the Monopolies
and Mergers Commission for six years. Most significantly, he invented the
formula that governs the amount by which the electricity industry can raise
its prices each year. His credentials for the electricity supply job were
impeccable.
What this version does not say is that Prof Littlechild is also a great
believer in market forces, and as such was in tune with the 1980s when he
was appointed. But he resents any suggestion that he is a product of the
Thatcher years.
'The belief in the advantages of competition in satisfying the needs of
customers and making companies work efficiently is centuries old,' he says.
'In many respects this is a fundamental part of our civilisation.'
So what influenced his views? 'I've always had a belief in freedom of
choice, in a free society.'
Some people might see a contradiction between this philosophy and the
wielding of regulatory power over one of the UK's largest and most complex
industries. But Prof Littlechild sees a clear role for himself.
Electricity was not privatised without flaws: there is insufficient
competition in power generation; all sorts of barriers still prevent free
competition among suppliers; and the prices of power sources like coal and
nuclear are wildly distorted. The regulator has to maintain the momentum of
change by opening the floodgates of competition, while ensuring the lights
stay on.
Since last autumn, Prof Littlechild has issued a string of pronouncements
and decisions, many of them dozens of pages long. He criticised the two
companies that dominate the generating business for playing games with
electricity prices, and threatened them with a monopoly referral if they did
not mend their ways. He reduced some of the barriers holding back
competition, and he ensured that householders had rebates after being
overcharged by local electricity companies.
'I believe in market forces, but it is too simplistic to say that they will
solve all the problems,' he admits. One of his worries is that the socially
disadvantaged can become the victims rather than the beneficiaries of
competition. So he has been tough with the electricity suppliers over
disconnections, for example, when bills are not paid.
He also has his doubts whether market disciplines will push the power
industry into caring for the environment; this led him to pen another
lengthy paper proposing a new regime to encourage energy efficiency - by
adding what he calls an 'e' factor to the price formula.
This flurry of activity has not made him popular with the industry. This may
be the natural lot of the regulator. But electricity executives also
complain about the torrent of paper that streams out of Birmingham. They
accuse Prof Littlechild of academic remoteness, of being more interested in
producing learned treatises than in addressing the hard realities of the
business world.
He looks slightly offended at this. 'I don't think that I'm unduly academic.
I try to lay out what the issues are. I try to explain my thinking and get a
response. I think I have a good dialogue with the industry.'
His biggest immediate challenge will be to decide what to do about the
generating industry in England and Wales, where the two descendants of the
old Central Electricity Generating Board, National Power and PowerGen, have
three quarters of the market between them. In spite of his monopoly referral
threat, Prof Littlechild is keen not to cause upheaval at this early stage,
because 'I want to see if I can work with the industry I have inherited'. He
also studiously avoids accusing the generators outright of price gouging,
presumably to prevent bringing the monopoly issue to a head just yet.
But he also wants to give his price formula time to work. It was designed to
force electricity companies to keep price rises below the rate of inflation,
and therefore cut costs. The companies will only do this if they know the
formula will apply for several years, he argues. The first price review is
not due to get under way until 1994. In this respect, Prof Littlechild has
been much less aggressive than his colleagues regulating the gas and water
industries, who have provoked vigorous clashes with the companies in their
charge.
Further ahead, Prof Littlechild is already planning the introduction of
competition down to the grass roots of the UK electricity market - the
private home. He has a vision of each household buying its electricity not
just from its local distributor, but from any company it chooses.
'I do believe it is both possible and desirable for competition at the
domestic level. I look forward to a situation where the domestic customer
can look in the Yellow Pages for a supplier of electricity like a supplier
of oil.'
Power companies would compete not just on price but on levels of service,
availability of credit, types of billing and so on. Electricity would be
sold using sophisticated tariffs giving householders all sorts of options as
to how and when they draw their power.
This brave new world would be based on new-fangled metering technology which
Prof Littlechild has closely researched. For about Pounds 50-Pounds 60, he
believes, people will be able to buy a device to measure how much
electricity is used and apportion it to the various suppliers chosen by the
household. It will probably be linked by radio to the supplier, which will
then know exactly how much power it is supplying at any given moment.
His ideas about metering, laid out in a recent paper, have aroused interest
in consumer organisations, but attracted a scornful response from much of
the industry which doubts that ordinary householders want such a
sophisticated level of service. But Prof Littlechild argues that the
industry will have to go down this route as competition spreads. 'The future
is going to be different, and this is what people want,' he says. 'The UK
would be pioneering in providing this service. A sensible timescale would be
to look for full competition by the year 1998.'
Prof Littlechild was greatly encouraged by the recent energy directive from
Brussels which will throw open national electricity and gas markets to
competition from the rest of the European Community. It closely parallels
what he is trying to do with UK electricity and will therefore fit
comfortably with the future as he sees it. Continental countries, many of
them still dominated by state-owned power monopolies, will have a far
tougher time.
But Prof Littlechild's musings about the future could be rudely interrupted
in a few weeks' time if a UK election produces a change of government.
Although technically an independent regulator, the director of electricity
supply is appointed by the energy secretary, and there has been some
speculation that Prof Littlechild's free market leanings could cost him his
job under a Labour administration.
He views the prospect calmly. 'A change of government shouldn't have any
effect,' he says. 'I don't anticipate a major problem.'
PERSONAL FILE
1943 Born August 27. Educated Wisbech Grammar School.
1964 Graduated as Bachelor of Commerce, University of Birmingham.
1969 PhD, University of Texas.
1975 Professor of Commerce and head of department, University of
Birmingham.
1983-89 Member of the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
1989 Director-general of electricity supply.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32 Photograph 'I don't think that I'm unduly academic'
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8567</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Chinks of light on the economy: America
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Talk of 'pervasive gloom' about the US economy has never been quite
justified. For three years, professional forecasters have been consistently
complacent. In the summer of 1990, most expected the US to avoid recession.
In the spring of last year, most were confident of sustained economic
growth. Last week, a rebound in department store and car sales was
triumphantly seized upon as convincing evidence that recovery, at last, is
at hand. Is it time to join the bulls and declare the recession history?
My initial reaction is to call for better US statistics. The preliminary
figures that send ripples through global financial markets are often deeply
misleading. According to last week's figures, retail sales jumped 0.6 per
cent in January. Revisions to prior figures indicated that sales were flat
in nominal terms in November and December, instead of down by 0.5 per cent
and 0.4 per cent as previously reported. The news that sales did not, in
fact, fall sharply before Christmas is welcome. But how reliable is the
claim of a rebound in January? The figure for November was first reported as
a gain of 0.3 per cent, then as a fall of 0.5 per cent and, finally, as a
zero change.
The zing in car sales in the first 10 days of February seems more solid
evidence of recovery. But it is nothing to write home about. An estimated
annual rate of sales of 6.4m units was encouraging compared with dismal
expectations of only 5.8m and a 6.1m rate at the end of January. But in
better times, an annual sales rate of 6.4m units would be seen as evidence
of near recessionary conditions. And, as with the retail sector, the figures
are notoriously volatile.
Bulls, however, will reach for the third arrow in their quiver: the recent
revival of monetary growth. Bank reserves - the base for lending - have
registered annual rates of growth of 20 per cent or more since last
September. M1, a narrow measure of money, has grown at a double digit rate.
Even M2, the targeted measure of broad money, is staging a lacklustre
revival, having grown at an annual rate of about 3.5 per cent in recent
months.
Federal Reserve officials - at most half-hearted monetarists - are well
aware that a similar revival of monetary growth this time last year fizzled
out. The figures, nonetheless, help justify the Fed's 'wait and see' stance
on interest rates. In his Humphrey-Hawkins testimony next week, Mr Alan
Greenspan, the Fed chairman, seems certain to repeat his favourite mantra:
that the monetary easing already in the pipeline will be sufficient to
revive the economy.
So far the nation's factories are paying scant attention. On Friday, the
lift from retail sales was largely countered by far worse than expected
production figures. Industrial production fell 0.9 per cent last month; and
revisions - nearly as large as those for retail sales - showed falls of 0.3
per cent and 0.4 per cent in November and December. The decline was led by
cars but affected every sector, from consumer goods and business equipment
to utilities. The feared 'double dip' recession is thus a reality for much
of corporate America. It has already caused the loss of some 300,000 payroll
jobs since the autumn.
Optimists are unmoved. They insist the fall in production is old news
because it was a response to the weakening of demand in the final months of
last year. Now that demand is rebounding, business confidence will revive
and output will start growing. After a weak first quarter, the economy is
thus poised for recovery in the spring. The logic is fine. But bear in mind
two important caveats. In the first place, the evidence for a rebound in
demand is still tentative. More importantly, consumer fundamentals remain
weak - savings rates are low, employment prospects are dicey and real
incomes are subdued. Any revival in spending could easily prove to be
shortlived.
In economic if not political terms, the precise timing of recovery is less
significant that the medium-term outlook for growth. On this, opinions
differ markedly. If you seek reassurance, the best place to look is exports.
The combination of cost-cutting in manufacturing and the weak dollar has
transformed the outlook for US exporters, which have been gaining market
share since the mid-1980s. On some measures, German wage costs are now 50
per cent higher than America's. Far from losing competitiveness, some
economists claim, US industry is actually in better shape than at any time
since the 1960s. Gloom about the long-term outlook is thus badly misplaced.
Those focusing on the public sector cannot swallow this optimism. Given
rapidly falling inflation, they say sharp rises in bond yields - back almost
to 8 per cent - reflect growing alarm about fiscal trends. Even if
congressional Democrats' plans for middle-income tax cuts are fully funded
by higher marginal rates on the rich (still a big if), the outlook is for
another decade of huge deficits.
These lakes of red ink represent negative public savings. The long-term
consequences of low saving and investment are dire. At a recent seminar,
economists at the Brookings Institute, a Washington think tank, argued that
the US economy's sustainable growth rate may now be only a miserable 1.7 per
cent a year. Yet the chances that politicians of either party will take
serious steps to improve productivity growth remain depressingly slim. In my
book, therefore, the bears still have the best of an increasingly complex
argument.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8568</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / A world of mad plumbing: Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Some years ago, my family and I, together with another family of close
friends, spent a summer holiday in a rented villa in southern Italy. It was
a wonderful place - right at the top of a steep hill, quite private, very
slightly breezy and much cooler than the baking beaches far below.
There was just one drawback. Since the month was August, there was too
little water, and almost none of that little reached the top of our hill.
Down below, near the baking beaches, the Neapolitan masses splashed
themselves and even their cars with reckless abandon; whereas we, in our
superior eyrie, remained hot, bothered and dirty.
A desperate situation called for desperate efforts. So when the womenfolk
set off down the hill with the children to enjoy the baking beaches and the
company of the Neapolitan masses, we menfolk climbed to the attic with
lengths of plastic piping in the hope of improving the water supply. We
laboured at this task for several days, but of course we did not make any
difference at all.
Nothing has reminded me so much of those long and fruitless sessions with
the hosepipe as the strange spectacle of the general election campaign now
on view in Britain. The deadlock in the opinion polls suggests an electorate
divided between black cynicism and weary incredulity. But the politicians,
enclosed in their world of mad electoral plumbing, continue to tout their
frenzied schemes for tinkering with the structures of state.
This one proposes to insert a pipe at the higher tax bracket and connect it
to the family allowances lower down. That one promises to disconnect the
filter on National Insurance contributions and lay a pipeline across to the
National Health Service. A third, with a T-join at the petrol tax, would
make a diversion into road building. All this, of course, in the belief that
a few lengths of electoral piping will turn a trickle of votes into a flood.
The performance is absurd and, worse, dated. Some will cringe at the
manifest intention to bribe the electorate. The day Mr John Major's office
promised there would be no electioneering Budget was also the day it spoke
about a cut in income tax. We may regret that politicians make their way by
siphoning money out of the pockets of their adversaries into the pockets of
their friends, but that is their trade.
But it is the intellectual self-deception which is most discouraging, as if
the politicians' mad plumbing could increase the total flow of economic
resources. Everybody knows that Britain's macro-economic policy is now
largely defined by the objectives of the European Monetary System. This
should mean the beginning of a greater political consensus. Yet British
politicians continue to offer their patent economic nostrums, like
throwbacks to a Keynesian time-warp of 30 years ago.
In this respect, as in so many others, Britain and France seem to exist in
different periods of history. In 1984, France moved over to an
anti-inflation policy of monetary and budgetary restraint, in explicit
acceptance of the logic of the EMS, and since then there has been no serious
argument over macro-economic policy by the mainstream parties on either the
left or the right.
The most controversial issue used to be the debate over whether to privatise
state-owned companies; but even this ideological argument has lost its
excitement, since the Socialists now admit the principle of partial
privatisation.
Naturally, the Socialists are unhappy about the level of unemployment; as
well they might be, because it will lose them the next election. But no
mainstream politician of any weight promises to perform a macro-economic
conjuring trick with a couple of yards of electoral tubing. Nor do they
propose a significantly different macro-economic policy, to get faster
economic growth and lower unemployment, because they all accept the
over-riding logic of the EMS.
Perhaps they are wrong. Perhaps politicians have a public duty to challenge
the logic of the EMS as it is currently operating - that is to say, as a
machine for low growth and high unemployment.
To be sure, the international environment is going through a recessive
phase, with a corresponding knock-on in Europe; but the passive logic of the
evolving EMS, as it is run by the Bundesbank, has a recessionary effect of
its own.
In the final phase of European Monetary Union, the management of a single
monetary policy can be set in a broad European fiscal context, which member
governments can influence through Community institutions. By acting
collectively, governments will recover a degree of control over their
economies, which they have lost at the national level. During the
preparatory transition, by contrast, they are fiscal prisoners of a foreign
central bank whose independence can also be described, literally, as
irresponsibility.
The phasing of Emu, as fixed in the Treaty of Maastricht, means that the
transition to a single currency will take at least another five years. Well
before then, there may be some spontaneous recovery in Europe; but there
seems no prospect of the kind of growth which would bring a steady fall in
unemployment.
The problem facing Europe's politicians is this: are they prepared to accept
for another five years the consequences of a machine that produces high
unemployment? The French Socialist party is about to pay a heavy price for
eight years of conservative, pro-European economic policy. The big winners
in next month's regional elections will not be the conservatives, but the
protest parties: the National Front, the ecologists and the Communists, who
will probably share 35-40 per cent of the total vote.
There are only three logical choices: to opt out of Emu, to accelerate the
process, or to grin and bear it. The one option which is self-delusion is
mad electioneering plumbing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8569</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Money Markets: Watchful eyes on Pounds
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TO cut or not to cut
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
that will be the big question occupying the Bank of England as it watches
the fate of sterling in the foreign exchanges and as political pressures for
a reduction grow more intense.
Sterling's shining performance last week - when it ignored virtually every
piece of bad news the economists could throw at it - may well strengthen the
case for an interest rate cut.
Certainly, if the dollar continues to rise at the expense of the D-Mark, one
of the heaviest pressures on the UK currency could be eased just enough to
allow a reduction in interest rates.
Dr Mark Austin, economist with HongKong Bank, suggests that the authorities
could 'get away with just a small cut', in a such a case. The market is
becoming increasingly attuned to the idea of a  1/4 point reduction.
A strong dollar appears to be on the cards this week, with few events
scheduled which would have an adverse impact.
Mr Alan Greenspan, chairman of the Federal Reserve, is set to give his
biannual report to Congress on Wednesday, known as the Humphrey Hawkins
speech. Most economists expect him to say the same old thing - enough has
been done, but if necessary we will do more.
The market is also looking for a pick up in housing starts, due out the same
day.
Even if the statisticians come up with depressing numbers, 'the market is in
the mood to ignore the bad news and trade on the good,' says Mr Nigel
Newman, senior economist with Barclays.
In Germany, good producer price figures are not expected to put off the
D-Mark bears. The continuing difficulty of wage negotiations and the
Bundesbank's stated policy of holding firm on rates are likely to weaken the
D-Mark, say economists.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8570</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RESULTS DUE
BRITISH Aerospace will report on Wednesday its preliminary results for the
year to December 1991, which the City expects will show a pre-tax loss of
about Pounds 85m against a pre-tax profit of Pounds 376m a year earlier. The
loss will include heavy exceptional costs to cover the defence, commercial
aircraft, motor vehicles and property group's restructuring programme.
The company said at the time of its flopped Pounds 432m rights issue last
autumn that it expected pre-tax profits before exceptional items of at least
Pounds 150m. The exceptional items which will lead to an overall loss
include a charge of about Pounds 250m to cover rationalisation costs, a
Pounds 45m extraordinary charge to cover the withdrawal of its Rover car
subsidiary from the US last year, and a gain of Pounds 15m on the sale of
the company's shareholding in SD-Scicon.
The company is expected to maintain its final dividend.
Dalgety kicks off the reporting season in food manufacturing today. The
sector's results will be scrutinised particularly closely this time for
signs of how far weaker demand and price-cutting at retail level are being
passed on to suppliers.
Extensive rationalisation and cost-cutting in the past two years have done
much to improve Dalgety's competitive position. However, this week's interim
figures are expected to show only a modest increase. Analysts are looking to
between Pounds 52m and Pounds 55m at the pre-tax level, compared with Pounds
51.7m last time.
Glaxo's interim results on Thursday will also be watched closely. They are
the first to include sales of several new drugs that will determine whether
the company's phenomenal growth during the 1980s is to continue.
The potential blockbusters are Zofran, to control sickness during cancer
chemotherapy, and Imigran, a migraine drug. If first half sales of Imigran
are close to the Pounds 50m predicted by BZW, it will be on the way to
becoming one of the world's handful of Pounds 1bn-a-year megadrugs. BZW is
forecasting a top-of-the-range Pounds 730m pre-tax profit for the first
half, against Pounds 617m last year. Smith New Court is among the lowest
forecasts, at Pounds 680m.
Owners Abroad, the UK's second largest package holiday company, is expected
to report on Wednesday full-year pre-tax profits of Pounds 30m, compared
with Pounds 15.3m in 1990. Of particular interest will be any statement on
the current year's trading and whether February bookings for the summer are
maintaining January's high volumes.
UK COMPANIES
TODAY
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Thornton (G W) Hldgs., Bridge House, Bridge Street, Sheffield, 10.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Union Discount
Interims:
FII Group
Second Alliance Trust
TOMORROW
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Daily Mail &amp; General Trust, Royal Garden Hotel, Kensington High Street, W,
10.30
Hardys &amp; Hansons, Kimberley Brewery, Nottingham, 11.30
LPA Inds., Saffron Hotel, High Street, Saffron Walden, Essex, 12.00
Stakis, Stakis Normandy Hotel, Inchinnan Road, Renfrew, 12.00
Titon Hldgs., International House, Peartree Road, Stanway, Colchester,
Essex, 10.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Scottish Eastern Inv. Tst.
TR Pacific Inv. Trust
Temple Bar Inv. Trust
Interims:
Ashtead
Howard Hldgs.
Norex
WEDNESDAY FEBRUARY 19
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Abbey Panels Invs., Sheraton Skyline Hotel, Bath Road, Hayes, Middlesex,
12.00
Acatos &amp; Hutcheson, Brands Hatch Thistle Hotel, Brands Hatch, Dartford,
Kent, 11.15
Group Development Capital Trust, 125 High Holborn, WC, 12.00
Sage, Sage House, Benton Park Road,
Newcastle upon Tyne, 9.30
Turkey Trust, The Sharaton Belgravia, 20 Chesham Place, SW, 12.30
Widney, Plume St, Aston, Birmingham, 11.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
British Aerospace
Leslie Wise
Lloyds Abbey Life
Owners Abroad
Interims:
Alumasc
Fleming High Income Inv.
Jos Hldgs.
New Zealand Inv. Trust
THURSDAY FEBRUARY 20
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Burndene Invs., 22 Hanover Street, Edinburgh, 10.30
Countryside Properties, The Brewery, Chiswell Street, EC, 12.00
Neotronics Technology, Pearse House, Parsonage Lane, Bishops Stortford,
Hertfordshire, 10.30
Selective Assets Trust, 1 Charlotte Square, Edinburgh, 12.30
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Bensons Crisps
Foreign &amp; Colonial Enterprise Trust
Provident Financial
Shell Transport &amp; Trading
Tribune Inv. Trust
Ward Hldgs.
Yorkshire Chemicals
Interims:
Colorgen
El Oro Mining &amp; Expln.
Fleming Enterprise Inv.
Glaxo
SWP
FRIDAY FEBRUARY 21
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Bankers Inv. Trust,
Mermaid House, 2 Puddle Dock, EC, 12.30
Grainger Trust, Chaucer Buildings, 57 Grainger Street, Newcastle upon Tyne,
12.30
Hunterprint, 15 Saxon Way East, Oakley Hay Indl. Park, Corby, 2.00
Southern Business, Queens House, Ullswater Crescent, Coulsdon, 11.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Brooke Tool Eng.
Fairway (London)
Lloyds Bank
Interims:
BBB Design
de Morgan
SUNDAY FEBRUARY 23
COMPANY MEETINGS:
NFC, The Harrogate Conference Centre, Kings Road, 11.00
Company meetings are AGMs unless otherwise stated.
DIVIDEND &amp; INTEREST PAYMENTS
TODAY
Amdahl 2.5cts.
Anglian Water 6.3p
Britannia Bldg. Soc. Fltg.
Rate Nts. 1995 Pounds 270.64
Druck 3.4p
Electra Inv. Tst. 3.2p
Elga 0.6p
MY 0.5p
National Westminster Bank Und.
Var. Rate Nts. Pounds 288.12
North West Water 6.54p
Telefonica de Espana Pta25
Westland 2.75p
TOMORROW
Airtours 5.25p
Aon 40cts.
Archimedes Inv. Tst. 14.5p
Chase Manhattan Fltg. Rate Sub.
Nts. 2000 Dollars 136.89
Credit Foncier de France 10 1/4 % Gtd. Ser. Ln. 2011/12/13/14 (Reg.) 5.25pc.
Flash Sec. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1993 Dollars 1352.05
Flogas 2.94p
Marsh &amp; McLennan 65cts.
Midland Bank Sub. Fltg. Rate
Nts. 2001 Pounds 137.13
Treasury 8 1/4 % 1993 4.125pc.
Wells Fargo Fltg. Rate Sub. Cap. Nts. 1998 Dollars 138.54
Woolwich Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate
Nts. May 1994 Pounds 267.08
WEDNESDAY FEBRUARY 19
BP Capital BV 14 1/8 % Gtd.
Nts. 1992 7.0625pc.
Hadleigh Inds. 1.25p
Hasbro 6cts.
Homestake Mining 5cts.
LPA Inds. 1.87p
Pilkington 2.93p
THURSDAY FEBRUARY 20
Bankers Tst. Intl. Capital NV Gtd.
Fltg. Rate Sub. Nts. 1996 Dollars 134.17
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Fltg. Rate Sub. Cap. Debs. 2085 Dollars
306.67
Caterpillar 15cts.
Hongkong &amp; Shanghai Banking Prim. Cap. Und. Fltg. Rate Nts. Dollars 156.53
M &amp; G Recovery Fd. 0.38p
Oriflame Intl. SA (Reg.) 4p
Wagon Indl. 6.325p
Wells Fargo Fltg. Rate Sub.
Nts. Feb. 1997 Dollars 134.17
FRIDAY FEBRUARY 21
Allied Colloids 0.88p
Allied Irish Banks Und.
Var. Rate Nts. Dollars 161.32
Beales Hunter 2.3p
Bespak 3.5p
Britannia Bldg. Soc. Fltg.
Rate Nts. 1995 Pounds 270.64
Daily Mail &amp; General Tst. 90p
Do. A NV 90p
Exchequer 10 1/2 % 1997 5.25pc.
JS Pathology 1.8p
Leeds Permanent Bldg. Soc.
Fltg. Rate Nts. 1997 Pounds 268.02
Lee (Arthur) 4.25p
MBL Finance (Curacao) NV 8 5/8 % Gtd. Bds. 2001 4.3125pc.
Northern Foods 6.85p
Northumbrian Fine Foods 0.75p
Oil &amp; Natural Gas Commission Gtd.
Fltg. Rate Nts. 1997 Dollars 306.67
Power Corp. 2p
Sea Containers 17.5cts.
Security Pacific Fltg. Rate
Sub. Cap. Nts. 1997 Dollars 128.82
Smith New Court 1p
Stanley Leisure 1.9p
Titon 2.22p
Treasury 10% 1992 5pc.
Turkey Trust 5p
Wespac Banking Sub. Fltg.
Rate Nts. 1997 Dollars 313.06
SATURDAY FEBRUARY 22
Exchequer 12 1/2 % 1994 6.25pc.
M &amp; G General Tst. Fd. 1.022p
TSB Offshore Inv. Fd. Ptg. Red. Prf.
(Gilt &amp; Fxd. Int. class) 1p
Do. (Sterling Deposit class) 2.62p
Trustco Finance 11 1/2 % Sev.
Deb. 2016 5.75pc.
SUNDAY FEBRUARY 23
Treasury 2 1/2 % IL 2011 Pounds 2.24
PARLIAMENTARY DIARY
TODAY
Commons: Debate on the European Economic Area Agreement between the EC and
European Free Trade Association. Timetable motion on Local Government Bill.
Debate on agreements between the EC and Poland, Hungary and Czechoslovakia.
Lords: Local Government Finance Bill, Report. Community Care (Residential
Accommodation) Bill, Second Reading.
Select Committee: Social Security - subject, operation of pension funds.
Witness: Tony Newton MP, social security secretary (Room 15, 4.30pm).
TOMORROW
Commons: Debate on industrial relations. Motion on the Additional Grant
Report (England).
Lords: Bingo Bill, Report. Local Government Finance Bill, Report. Charities
Bill, Report.
Select Committees: Social Security - subject, operation of pension funds.
Witnesses: Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte; Nicholson Graham and Jones (Room 21,
10.30am).
Trade and Industry - subject, trade with Hong Kong, China and Taiwan.
Witnesses: Ian Hay Davison, Storehouse; Timothy O'Brien, chief executive,
UK, Hong Kong Bank; Lord Young, chairman, and Mike Gale, Cable and Wireless
(Room 15, 10.30am).
Cardiff Bay Barrage Bill (Room 6, 10.30am).
Opposed Private Bill: Mersey Docks and Harbour Bill (Room 5, 10.30).
WEDNESDAY
Commons: Opposition debate on the recession and unemployment.
Lords: Debate on research and development and the National Health Service.
Debate on the public library system. Question to government on children's
homes and after-care.
Select Committees: Environment - subject, coastal zone protection.
Witnesses: Institution of Civil Engineers (Room 21, 10.30am).
Trade and Industry - subject, exports to Iraq (Room 15, 10.30am).
Welsh Affairs - subject, community care and the elderly. Witnesses: General
managers at Mid-Glamorgan, South Glamorgan and Powys Health Authorities; and
general managers of Gwent, West Glamorgan and Powys Family Health Service
Authorities (Room 18, 10.30am).
Agriculture - subject, the trade gap in food and drink. Witnesses: Food and
Drink Federation; Scotch Whisky Association; Home Grown Fruits (Room 20,
10.45am).
Energy - subject, electricity privatisation. Witness: Malcolm Edwards,
British Coal (Room 8, 11am).
Employment - subject, Skills Training Agency sale. Witnesses: National Union
of Civil and Public Servants; Department of Employment (Room 20, 4.15pm).
Foreign Affairs - subject, Europe after Maastricht. Witnesses: Phil Allott,
Trinity College, Cambridge; Prof Trevor Hartley, LSE; Jeremy Lever, All
Souls, Oxford; Prof John Usher, Exeter University (Room 16, 4.15pm).
Health - subject, NHS Trusts. Witnesses: Mind; Mencap; Values into Action;
Association of Community Health Councils for England and Wales (Room 21,
4.15).
Public Accounts - subject, job creation in Wales. Witnesses: officials from
the Welsh Office and the Welsh Development Agency (Room 15, 4.15pm).
Treasury and Civil Service - subject, economic and monetary union. Witness:
Norman Lamont MP, chancellor of the exchequer (Room 8, 4,30pm).
Procedure - subject, public petitions. Witnesses: Sir Clifford Boulton,
Clerk of the Commons; A. J. Hastings, Clerk of the Journals (Room 7,
4.30pm).
Cardiff Bay Barrage Bill (Room 6, 10.30am).
Opposed Private Bill: Mersey Docks and Harbour Bill (Room 5, 10.30am).
THURSDAY
Commons: Remaining stages of the Transport and Works Bill, and the Nurses,
Midwives and Health Visitors Bill.
Lords: Local Government Finance Bill, Report. Tourism (Overseas Promotion)
(Wales) Bill.
Select Committee: Trade and Industry - subject, exports to Iraq. Witnesses:
Sheffield Forgemasters (Room 15, 4.30pm).
Opposed Private Bill: Mersey Docks and Harbour Bill (Room 5, 10.30am).
FRIDAY
Commons: Private Members Bills.
Lords: Further and Higher Education (Scotland) Bill, Second Reading. Civil
Rights (Disabled Persons) (No 2) Bill, Second Reading.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8571</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Economics: UK data set to confirm depth of recession
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FINANCIAL markets in the UK will focus on Thursday's fourth quarter GDP
figures, which are expected to show non-oil output falling for a sixth
successive quarter.
This would make the recession the longest since the second world war.
Little cheer is expected from January's retail sales figures, which are
expected to show only a slight rise despite heavier than usual discounting
in the post-Christmas sales.
With the economy showing few signs of recovery, the Confederation of British
Industry's industrial trends survey on Friday will be studied closely for
signs of improved manufacturing confidence.
Highlights of the week ahead, with the median of City forecasts in brackets,
from MMS International, a financial information company, include:
Today: US, President's Day holiday, all markets closed; UK, January CBI
distributive trades survey; Japan, revised figures for December's industrial
production; Canada, December wage settlement increases; Finland, consumer
price index.
Tomorrow: UK, January PSBR (Pounds 3.7bn surplus); US, New Hampshire
presidential primary; France, December industrial production (down 0.4 per
cent); Germany, December trade balance (DM3bn), December current account
(DM1bn).
Wednesday: UK, January retail sales (up 0.2 per cent on month, up 0.8 per
cent on year), chancellor Norman Lamont appears before Treasury select
committee; US, January consumer price index, (up 0.2 per cent), excluding
food and energy (up 0.3 per cent), January housing starts (1.13m), January
building permits, January real earnings, Federal Reserve chairman Alan
Greenspan gives Humphrey-Hawkins testimony to House Banking Committee.
Thursday: UK, preliminary figures for fourth quarter GDP (flat), January M0
(flat on the month, up 2.4 per cent on the year), January M4 (up 0.5 per
cent on month, up 6.2 per cent on year), January M4 Bank lending (Pounds
2bn); US, December merchandise trade balance (-Dollars 4.9bn), December
merchandise exports (Dollars 36.7bn) and imports (Dollars 41.6bn), for week
ended February 10 M1 (Dollars 3.7bn), M2 (Dollars 1.3bn), and M3 (Dollars
2bn), initial claims for week ended February 8 (440,000); Canada, December
merchandise trade balance, December merchandise exports and imports;
Germany, regular Bundesbank council meeting; Japan, January money supply (up
2 per cent on year); Sweden, January consumer price index (down 0.3 per cent
on month, up 5.3 per cent on year).
Friday: UK, February CBI industrial trends survey; Germany, IG Metall
manufacturing/engineering union sets wage demands for engineering industry
in Baden-Wuerttemburg; Canada, January consumer price index and CPI
excluding food and energy; Australia, housing finance for December (up 2 per
cent), December export price index.
During the week: Germany, January wholesale price index, December capital
account, long term capital account, January producer prices index (up 0.2
per cent on month, up 1.9 per cent on year), final figures for January cost
of living (up 4 per cent on year); Italy, December wholesale price index
(down 0.3 per cent on month, up 2.4 per cent on year), December producer
prices index, January industrial production; Denmark, January consumer
prices index (up 0.1 per cent on month, up 2.4 per cent on year);
Switzerland, January trade balance (-SFr425m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23 Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8572</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Appointments: Aiming for quality of life
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Equity &amp; Law's new direct salesforce is headed by a man who thinks he can
bring 'quality' to the business of selling life insurance
Bob Bullivant, 41, formerly sales and marketing director of Target Group,
has been named general manager of Equity &amp; Law Personal Financial Planning.
This is a new venture by the life insurer to establish its own distribution
channels. Equity &amp; Law has hitherto relied heavily on independent financial
advisers to sell its products, but acquired the distribution arm of Target,
which was strong on the direct sales side, from TSB last year.
Bullivant's job is to build a team of 'a smallish number of high-producing
individuals bringing in high quality business in tune with the Equity &amp; Law
image'.
This involves an emphasis on training - with salesmen having to complete a
three-month programme before they can be let loose with a full licence on
potential customers. PFP starts with 120 people, more than half from the old
Target team, and is scheduled to rise to 500 by 1995.
Before his spell at the recently troubled Target, Bullivant says he had
accumulated wide experience of sales management in 'quality' areas of the
market, including GRE and Leslie &amp; Godwin, the insurance broker. His
principal aim in his new role is 'to preserve the good name of Equity &amp;
Law'.
*****
Paul Fisher, an Inland Revenue veteran with a few years subsequently at
Price Waterhouse, is joining Cotswold-based share valuation specialists
Bruce Sutherland.
Sutherland is one of the few outfits, aside from the big accountancy firms,
which will value the shares of private companies in cases ranging from
matrimonial disputes to major corporate transactions. It counts some of the
country's largest private companies among its clients.
Bruce Sutherland himself, in his late 60s, is still actively involved in the
business, but wishes to devote more time to finishing a book on aspects of
share valuation.
Fisher, who is 41, joins as a principal. He was chief examiner in the shares
valuation division of the Revenue, before 'seeing the light' and moving to
PW. He is now glad to be out of the hothouse of a big firm and London life.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8573</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Appointments: More insurance
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Paul Blakeley is appointed a director of NICHOLSON CHAMBERLAIN COLLS
AVIATION.
*****
Margaret Smith is appointed md of LEGAL &amp; GENERAL's new business unit,
Information Systems &amp; Services, and Peter Hickling is appointed operations
director (financial consultancy) in the life and pensions division.
*****
Charles Tankard is appointed a director of LLOYD-ROBERTS &amp; GILKES.
*****
Lillian Boyle is appointed company secretary of SCOTTISH MUTUAL.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8574</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Appointments: Combating the black mark
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Laurentian Life, the life assurance group, has promoted Iain Tweeddale to
managing director.
This is one of the last moves in a wide-scale restructuring of Laurentian's
operations into four units; the others are Laurentian Milldon, a firm of
tied agents, Laurentian Fund Management, and Laurentian Financial Advisers.
Tweeddale, 45, joined the company in 1979, when it was known as Imperial
Life, on the investment side. Before this he was a stockbroker, spending
nine years with McAnally Montgomery; he was also in banking briefly
immediately after graduating from Oxford.
Tweeddale considers his main task is to make Laurentian's business more
consumer-led: 'We have got to improve our position in the eyes of our
clients. Otherwise we are not going to be one of the players at the end of
the decade.'
He is also aiming to take a much more multidisciplinary approach to
management, and criticises the more hierarchical and divisional structures
used elsewhere in the industry.
He thinks this should help in combating the problem of early lapse rates on
long-term pol-icies, which he regards as 'the greatest black mark against
the industry at the moment'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8575</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Syndicated Loans: Potential offered by social housing shift
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TRANSFER of houses owned by local government authorities in the UK to
housing associations over the next decade could be bigger than any of the
high-profile industrial privatisations of the 1980s - and it would be
financed entirely in the loans market.
Tunbridge Wells &amp; District Housing Association recently signed a Pounds 105m
funding package, comprising a syndicated bank facility provided by National
Westminster Bank and the Halifax Building Society, and additional funding
from Bank of Scotland and the Nationwide Building Society
Co-ordinated by UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, the deal brings the number of block
transfers of housing from local authority control to 17. The amount raised
from banks now stands at Pounds 1.1bn.
But this is only a small proportion of the potential market. If the
Conservatives win the next election, between 150 and 250 councils may sell
their council houses to housing associations. The associations would need to
raise around Pounds 2bn debt finance every year.
Lending margins in this area are healthy. The core 25-year term loan for
Tunbridge Wells carries a margin of 130 basis points over the London
interbank offered rate.
Also, the loans are secured on residential property bought at a discount to
open market value. The average price in Tunbridge Wells was Pounds 10,000
per property, a fraction of the open market price. This contrasts with 95
per cent mortgage loans made to individuals.
Also, the loans carry a 50 per cent risk weighting, which means banks have
to set aside only half the capital needed for a normal commercial loan.
However, the four institutions which backed the Tunbridge Wells deal are the
only regular providers of large-scale primary funding. Other banks
participate in the syndicated loans, but the number of big, primary lenders
is limited.
One problem is that housing associations require complex, long-term finance.
For example, a housing association's rental income is low in the early years
after transfer and maintenance costs can be high.
The Tunbridge Wells transaction comprises a 25-year Pounds 55m term loan
backed by shorter-dated revolving credit facilities. These cover the
shortfall between rental income and interest payments in the early years.
The debt will roll up to a maximum of Pounds 105m after 15 years, only then
starting to decline.
An additional problem is that building societies cannot syndicate their loan
commitments.
To satisfy British law, building societies require separate security and are
bound to the deal by a web of floating and second charges over the housing
stock as a whole. There are substantial legal expenses involved in setting
up such a structure.
The Building Societies Commission, the regulator, may loosen these
restrictions and encourage more societies to participate in transfer deals.
But existing lenders and associations agree that more bank lenders are
needed if the 'privatisation' of social housing in the UK is to proceed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8576</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Bonds: Euromarket challenged by regulatory
convergence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE development of inter-national regulations for the securities industry is
forcing Eurobond market participants to ask a searching question of
themselves: what exactly defines the international bond market?
The most challenging piece of legislation hanging over the market is the
draft European Community investment services directive, which lays down
rules for the conduct of investment business.
As currently drafted, the directive would force securities trading to take
place on 'regulated markets'. The Eurobond market would not count as a
regulated market - primarily because it has no formal listing and no trade
publication requirements.
It is unlikely that the current text of the directive will be adopted.
However, the debate has underlined that many of the structural differences
between the domestic and international bond markets have already
disappeared:
Withholding tax has been removed in nearly all leading industrialised
countries. Where it remains, mechanisms for international investors to
reclaim tax have improved. Even in Italy, infamous for complex
administrative procedures, international investors have at least an even
chance of reclaiming withholding tax paid on domestic bonds.
The international market is slowly opening to a greater spread of investors
as regulations limiting the foreign asset holdings of institutional
investors have been relaxed.
For example, until 1990 Canadian pension funds were limited to holding 10
per cent of their assets overseas and were penalised by a heavy tax penalty
if the limit was exceeded. The ceiling on foreign assets is now 20 per cent,
leading them to diversify away from the domestic market.
Similarly, while some categories of US investors are still prohibited from
participating in the primary Eurobond market, all can now buy international
bonds 40 days after payment date - reduced from 90 days in the late 1980s.
A more homogeneous clearing and settlement 'infrastructure' has developed as
institutional investors have spread investments across markets.
Both Euroclear and Cedel, the clearing houses which used to be almost
exclusively devoted to the international bond market, each now clear and
settle transactions with 20 domestic bond markets.
Partly as a result of these changes, the Eurobond market is less dominated
by retail investors than in the past. One sign of this is the spate of bonds
with maturities of more than 10 years launched this year  - such as Credit
Foncier's Ecu750m 12-year issue last week - aimed mainly at institutional
fund managers with long-dated liabilities.
The development of the off-shore Ecu bond market can take some of the credit
for tempting conservative investment institutions out of domestic markets.
The Ecu bond market has been transformed from a sector based on small
corporate bond issues and retail investors to one dominated by governments,
supranational agencies and big investment institutions.
The launch of 'global' bond issues - deals sold under the same documentation
and under the same pricing in European, US and Far Eastern markets - has
accelerated the process of integration.
Since the World Bank launched its first Dollars 1.5bn global issue in
September 1989, the structure has been extended into other currency sectors.
Last year saw global issues in Canadian and Australian dollars. The World
Bank is now preparing a global issue in yen.
Such deals underline the extent to which debt securities can now be traded
between markets.
One sign of convergence is the narrowing of pricing differentials between
the Eurobond and domestic markets. Where there are no barriers to the free
flow of funds, anomalies tend to be arbitraged away by investors dealing
between markets. At the start of the 1980s top-rated Eurodollar bonds could
yield 70-80 basis points less than US domestic issues. Now the differential
is much narrower, rarely more than 40 basis points.
Different constituencies of investor still have different tastes. The
domestic US market is often a cheaper source of funds for corporate issuers,
especially US companies.
For example, Mobil, the US oil company, last week launched a five-year
domestic bond issue at a yield spread of 26 basis points over US Treasury
bonds. In the Eurobond market the same deal would probably have been priced
at a spread of 45 basis points.
Yet supranational institutions often achieve a better cost of funds by
issuing Eurobonds. But while some anomalies remain, the cost-of-funds gap
between the Eurobond market and domestic markets has certainly narrowed from
a borrowers' perspective.
New syndication techniques and standardised fee structures introduced into
the Eurobond market over the past two years have eroded any advantage it
held over the US market in terms of underwriting costs. While underwriting
fees in the US are variable, there is rarely more than a fractional
difference between the two markets.
The fixed price re-offer method of syndicating new Eurobond issues - whereby
the lead underwriting firm can hold the bonds at issue price until it is
satisfied that most of the paper is placed - is now accepted in most
currency sectors of the international bond market. This is close to US new
issue techniques.
The technique is now reaching Japan. Last year Nippon Telegraph and
Telephone announced its intention to launch a domestic bond issue based on
the fixed-priced system.
It remains an open question whether the Eurobond market can keep its share
of global investment business or whether investors will retreat to
deregulated domestic markets.
So far, the international bond market appears to be gaining as much as it
loses. However, the process of regulatory convergence means the Eurobond
market will have to convince the regulators that it still has a role to
fill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21 Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8577</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Gilts: Inflation outlook builds confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GLOOM about the UK economy held up gilt prices, in spite of the shadow over
the market caused by a large tranche of bond issues which attracted only
modest investor interest.
While prices at the short end of the gilt market rose slightly, with a
consequent fall in yields, longer-dated gilts showed little movement.
The market gained cheer from a rash of economic data which indicated a
continued fall in inflationary pressures, due to a recession which has
dragged on for 18 months and is now expected to last until well into this
year.
With inflation in virtually all areas of the UK economy likely to be be
constrained over the next year or so, demand among investors for
fixed-interest securities such as gilts remains strong.
Hence few sellers of the bonds emerged last week, even though the
availability from Monday of the Pounds 1.25bn tranche of 9 per cent Treasury
stock due in 2012 damped any downward movement in yields. By Friday night,
buyers had emerged for only about half of the total tranche, according to
gilt specialists.
The Pounds 1.25bn worth of gilts is part of a large volume of funding which
the Bank of England plans over the next 18 months. Because of the need to
borrow from the financial market to pay for Britain's rising public-sector
deficit, total gilt issues over this 18-month period could total around
Pounds 40bn.
On Friday, the benchmark 10 per cent Treasury stock maturing in 1994 closed
at 101 1/16 , up just  1/32 on the week and yielding 9.46 per cent. The
longer-dated 9 per cent bond due in 2008 saw its yield fall slightly to 9.15
per cent.
At the short end of the market, the tendency for yields to fall was
restrained by the perception that Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, is
unlikely to sanction a cut in base rates, now 10.5 per cent, before the
March 10 Budget.
The Bank is advising caution on this score, arguing that the vulnerability
of sterling within the European exchange rate mechanism would make a rate
cut risky. Mr Lamont, however, also has to weigh up political soundings
which suggest that a rate cut well before the Budget could bolster
confidence ahead of the election.
Last week's economic data painted a picture of extremely weak demand,
increasing the pressure on Mr Lamont to stimulate the economy. There was a
large fall in factory-price and retail-price inflation, while the
Confederation of British Industry reported that pay settlements in
manufacturing industry fell to their lowest level since it began collecting
such data in 1980. Pay awards for the factory sector averaged only 4.1 per
cent in the final quarter of last year, down on the 5.1 per cent recorded in
the third quarter.
Meanwhile a 53,000 jump in seasonally-adjusted unemployment last month -
well above the expected figure - cast a question mark over last week's
statement in the Bank's bulletin that the rise in unemployment in this
recession 'seems to have moderated much more quickly than in the early
1980s'.
The jobless total of 130,000 in the three months to January is almost
exactly the same as the jobless total at the equivalent period of the
1980-1981 recession, and the trend appears to be increasing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8578</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / US Money and Credit: Weak demand deflates yield hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE US Treasury cannot win. The recent furore about the yield curve and
government funding policy created enough hot air to fuel an around-the-world
balloon trip, and the Treasury - sensitive to criticism from both Wall
Street and congress - felt it could not ignore the issue.
The big question was whether the government should take advantage of an
unusually steep yield curve by issuing less longer-dated securities and more
short-dated paper.
Some even went so far as to recommend that the Treasury should stop issuing
new 30-year bonds altogether.
The idea behind the various wheezes was to shorten the maturity on the
national debt, which, because of the historically large spread between short
and long-term interest rates, would cut funding costs for the taxpayer and
force stubbornly high long-term yields lower.
After thinking it over, the Treasury eventually decided to act. It said it
would begin to issue less 10-year notes and 30-year bonds, and make up for
the reduction by issuing more at the short end of the market. The reduction,
however, would be by only a few billion dollars each refunding round.
In the case of the first quarterly refunding programme of the year,
completed last week, the reduction meant issuing Dollars 1bn less 10-year
notes (Dollars 11bn instead of Dollars 12bn), Dollars 2bn less 30-year bonds
(Dollars 10bn instead of Dollars 12bn), and correspondingly more three-year
notes.
This feeble compromise pleased few. Those in favour of more radical change
said it would have no effect. Those against change said not only would it
have no effect, but it would introduce an element of unwanted uncertainty to
financial markets.
The Treasury also left itself open to criticism that it was playing an
interest rate speculation game with the national debt. Yet the changes were
so insignificant that people wondered whether it was worth all the fuss.
That the bond markets subsequently made a complete mess of the Treasury's
carefully laid plans, seemed to be a measure of justice.
Last week the Treasury issued Dollars 36bn of new securities. If the shift
in weighting from the long to the short end of the maturity spectrum was
meant to reduce the cost of financing the national debt cheaper, and put
downward pressure on long-term rates, it failed miserably. Investor demand
for all three issues was poor. This meant the Treasury had to pay a
higher-than-expected interest rate on the money it borrowed, and it left
interest rates higher at the end of the week.
The yield on the 10-year bond jumped from 7.25 per cent to 7.38 per cent,
and the yield on the benchmark 30-year bond (the main target of the
Treasury's new, shorter-dated refunding policy) climbed from 7.76 per cent
to 7.905 per cent.
Of course, it was not the fault of the Treasury that its ambitions were
thwarted. It was simply bad luck that the new policy was introduced in a
week when the best economic news for a long time was released.
It was not only good economic news, it was the right kind of good news.
Economists have been arguing for months that the economic recovery would not
get off the ground until consumers start spending, and last week they got
evidence of just that.
According to the data, January retail sales rose 0.6 per cent, well above
market forecasts, while both November and December sales were up slightly,
not lower as originally reported. Early February car sales also came in
above consensus expectations. Just to complete the picture, initial jobless
claims showed the second straight weekly decline in the number of people
asking for state unemployment insurance.
Together, the data hardly added up to much, but it was enough to put the
wind up bond investors already unnerved by some unexpectedly positive noises
emanating from the Federal Reserve.
Statements from Mr Alan Greenspan, chairman of the Federal Reserve,
indicated that the monetary authorities believe current monetary policy is
sufficiently loose to allow room for a solid, if unspectacular, recovery by
the second half of this year.
Although Mr Greenspan says he is ready to ease monetary policy again if
necessary, the Fed chairman appears satisfied that the December one-point
reduction in the discount rate will prove enough.
Judging by the direction of bond yields, the market is betting that the next
time the Fed acts, it will put rates up, not down.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
US MONEY MARKET RATES (%)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                           Last     1 week   4 wks  12-month 12-month
                           Friday     ago     ago     High     Low
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Fed Funds (weekly average)  3.88     3.62     2.00    11.00     2.00
Three-month Treasury bills  3.89     3.82     3.86     8.29     3.76
Six-month Treasury bills    4.03     3.89     4.01     7.70     3.89
Three-month prime CDs       4.15     4.02     4.12     7.17     4.01
30-day Commercial Paper     4.03     3.90     3.98     7.12     3.90
90-day Commercial Paper     4.05     3.92     3.94     7.02     3.92
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
US BOND PRICES AND YIELDS (%)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                           Last     Change           1 week    4 wk.
                           Fri.     on wk    Yield     ago     ago
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Seven-year Treasury       96 5/8   -1 5/32   6.99     6.77     6.79
10-year Treasury        100 23/32     n/a    7.38      n/a      n/a
30-year Treasury        100 31/32 -1 21/32   7.91     7.77     7.61
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Salomon Bros (estimates).
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Money supply: In the week ended 3/2/92, M1 rose Dollars 6.5bn to Dollars
921.7bn. M2 rose Dollars 10.2bn to Dollars 3,466.5bn.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8579</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Watchdog again postpones Hyundai
fundraising issues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH Korea's Securities Supervisory Board (SSB) has decided to postpone for
the sixth time applications by two subsidiaries of Hyundai, one of the
country's leading conglomerates, to raise funds on the Seoul stock market,
Reuter reports from Seoul.
Hyundai Precision Industries and Hyundai Wood Industries have since July and
August, respectively, sought approval to raise a total of Won68.7bn (Dollars
90m) through rights issues on the local stock market.
The SSB said it delayed approval because the group had violated government
advisory rules on financial management. Last year, the government instructed
big shareholders not to sell large amounts of stock so as to help the ailing
market.
However, Mr Chung Ju-yung, founder and ex-honorary chairman of Hyundai, had
subsequently sold large stakes in the two companies, the SSB said. The
companies would have to wait another month for an approval, it added.
Stockbrokers said the news sparked heavy selling of Hyundai's shares. A
letter of appeal to the SSB also depressed investors, reflecting concern
over a possible credit crunch for Hyundai.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8580</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Teleglobe net profit triples to
CDollars 12m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TELEGLOBE, the sole Canad-ian overseas telecommunications company, tripled
net profit in the final quarter of 1991 on a 20 per cent gain in revenues.
Management control of Teleglobe passed to BCE earlier this month in a
boardroom fight.
The strength came from the overseas telecommunications business. Teleglobe
also operates subsidiaries in data communications equipment and systems.
Fourth-quarter net was CDollars 12m (USDollars 10.2m), or 26 cents a share,
up from CDollars 3.1m, or 8 cents, in the year-earlier quarter. Revenues
were CDollars 129m, against CDollars 107m.
For the full year, Teleglobe earned CDollars 25.7m, or 54 cents a share, up
from CDollars 8m, or 20 cents, in 1990.
Peoples Credit Jewellers of Toronto, which controls the troubled US Zale
retailing group, posted a loss of CDollars 132.9m, or CDollars 10.92 a
share, in the nine months ended 28 December, 1991.
The result included a special charge of CDollars 137m on its Zale
investment. Zale has filed for bankruptcy protection.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8581</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Krupp shares to be traded on
market for first time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Fried. Krupp, the German steel and engineering group, are to be
traded on the open stock market this summer for the first time in the
company's 181-year history.
The flotation follows a decision by the group's supervisory board on
Saturday to convert the group - of which 75 per cent is held by the Alfried
Krupp foundation and 25 per cent by the Iranian government - into an
aktiengesellschaft, or public limited company.
Fried. Krupp AG will serve as the umbrella organisation controlling the
combined operations of the existing Krupp businesses and those of Hoesch,
soon to be merged with Krupp.
Some of the shares are expected to be used in swap deals to pay for the
outstanding 49 per cent of Hoesch stock still not in Krupp's hands.
A majority, however, will remain under the control of the Krupp foundation -
established in July 1967 - making the group virtually immune to takeover
challenges.
The Krupp plan followed a decision by the Hoesch supervisory board last
Friday not to obstruct the merger, which is expected to produce cost savings
of DM300m (Dollars 184.2m) a year for the next five years, and a DM460m
annual 'positive contribution to results' from 1996 onwards.
Krupp, founded in 1811 as a 'manufacturer of English cast steel', first
became a stock corporation in 1903. However, Ms Bertha Krupp, the founder's
granddaughter, owned all but four shares.
The group was converted back to sole family ownership during the second
world war, when the group was known abroad as Hitler's armourer.
Once known only for its steel and weapons manufacture, it has since become a
diversified business with more than 200 subsidiaries and annual sales last
year of DM15.6bn.
At present, steel accounts for 50 per cent of turnover, with engineering and
plant-making contributing DM5.5bn, trading operations a further DM2bn and
electronics some DM700m.
The merger with Hoesch will make the group the second biggest German
steelmaker after Thyssen, and also offer synergies in motor components and
other engineering sectors.
Krupp's switch to Plc status is likely to be completed in March and first
trading in the shares is expected in August.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8582</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Visa expects fraud losses to
nearly double
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VISA International, one of the two leading US credit card companies,
yesterday said it was seeking new ways to detect card fraud as the level of
worldwide losses from counterfeiting appears likely to nearly double in the
current fiscal year.
Visa said yesterday it expected worldwide counter-feit losses to increase to
more than Dollars 100m in the financial year that ends this March 31; the
level in the 1990-91 year was Dollars 55m.
If the fraud losses continue to increase at the present rate, losses could
exceed Dollars 175m next year, the company said.
To combat fraud, Visa said it was developing an early-warning system that
would analyse card-usage patterns on all daily transactions over a certain
amount. This system, which Visa christened the 'transaction analysis
system', is intended to identify quickly probable counterfeit transactions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8583</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Sorin Biomedica agrees to
acquire Pfizer division
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN and AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SORIN Biomedica, the stock market quoted subsidiary of Italy's SNIA-BPD
textiles and munitions group, is buying the Shiley artificial organs
division of Pfizer, the US drugs group, for Dollars 230m.
The deal will be largely financed by a one-for-one rights issue by Sorin
Biomedica, which will raise around L218bn (Dollars 178.4m) through the issue
of 72.8m new shares, priced at L3,000 each.
Sorin Biomedica heads the expanding bio-engineering activities of SNIA-BPD,
which is controlled by the Fiat group. Shiley, based in California and with
production facilities in Germany and Italy, has around 1,900 employees and
expects sales of more than L200bn this year. Most of its products are used
in heart surgery.
The acquisition will boost Sorin Biomedica's turnover to over L700bn this
year, from L444bn in 1991. It will lift the contribution of the
bio-engineering division to around 30 per cent of total group sales. Sorin
Biomedica has been expanding rapidly in recent years through a number of
acquisitions, which have consolidated its position as a leading producer of
speciality drugs and high-technology items for surgical and medical uses.
Olivetti, the office equipment maker, yesterday signed a letter of accord
with the Italian government and trade unions to cut its workforce by 1,500
after a month and a half of negotiations, AP-DJ reports from Milan.
The agreement fell far short of Olivetti's initial plans, announced last
month, to cut its payroll by 2,200. Olivetti has launched a company-wide
restructuring plan in an effort to trim costs and maintain competitiveness
despite the slump in the European computer market.
Olivetti said last week it expected to post a consolidated 1991 loss of at
least L290bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8584</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Jacobs offers SFr34.6m for rest
of Allgemeine
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Klaus Jacobs, formerly head of the Jacobs Suchard coffee and chocolate
group, has offered SFr34.6m (Dollars 23.5m), or SFr300 a share, to the
minority shareholders of Allgemeine Finanz, in a move to buy the remaining
48 per cent of the Zurich investment holding company. The price is much
lower than what he paid last March in acquiring just over 50 per cent of the
company.
Union Bank of Switzerland, which advised Mr Jacobs on the transaction, said
the offer reflected the recent market price for the shares, which traded on
Monday at SFr300.
UBS also pointed out there was a put option, providing shareholders with the
option of selling the shares for SFr390 after April 3, when the main offer
expires, and up to June 30, 1994. It expected many shareholders would take
this option.
Mr Jacobs bought a 50.1 per cent stake of Allgemeine from a subsidiary of
UBS for SFr52.7m, or about SFr430 a share. At the time, the shares were
trading at about SFr400. He has since raised his stake in the company to 52
per cent.
Analysts said this was not the first time that Mr Jacobs had been associated
with discrepancies in prices offered to majority and minority shareholders.
In July 1990, many institutional shareholders in Jacobs Suchard complained
that the offer by Philip Morris to minority shareholders was much lower than
that offered to Mr Jacobs for the majority.
Switzerland has no effective code to protect minority shareholders' rights
in the event of takeovers.
Allgemeine said its net income in 1991 had jumped to SFr13.4m from SFr2.8m
in 1990. Total assets rose to SFr91.7m from SFr65.9m.
Asset value per share jumped to SFr443 at the end of 1991 from SFr378 a year
earlier, because the company changed its strategy and sold off many of its
investments at a profit.
An unchanged dividend of SFr15 a bearer share, as well as a one-time bonus
of SFr5 reflecting the good results, will be paid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8585</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Daily News credit approved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE New York Daily News, part of the late Mr Robert Maxwell's crumbling
empire, has secured approval from the US bankruptcy courts for a Dollars 10m
credit line to normalise operations while a buyer is sought, writes Patrick
Harverson in New York.
The News and its numerous creditors reached a funding agreement with
Sterling National Bank &amp; Trust, which earned from the deal the right to be
the first of the newspapers' creditors to receive repayments. The deal is
believed to have given the newspaper's reorganisation committee more room to
put together a plan to rescue the struggling tabloid from bankruptcy.
The Dollars 10m credit line allows the News some breathing space. It will
now be able to pay some suppliers and continue normal credit practices while
considering offers from potential buyers.
Among those to have expressed interest are Mr Peter Kalikow, the millionaire
property developer who owns the New York Post, a rival tabloid. Mr Kalikow,
who filed for personal bankruptcy last year, revealed last Thursday that he
was preparing an offer for the News.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8586</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / International Company News: Echo Bay reduces target for gold
output this year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ECHO BAY Mines, one of North America's biggest precious metals mining
groups, has set 1992 targets which will see gold output fall and cash
production costs rise.
The Toronto-based company has set a production target of 700,000 troy ounces
of gold this year, down from 733,900 in 1991, which in turn followed a 10
per cent drop from the 1990 level.
The cash cost target is Dollars 255 an ounce compared with Dollars 249 last
year and Dollars 244 in 1990.
Echo Bay plans to lift capital expenditure from Dollars 50m to Dollars 66m
this year but exploration spending will be Dollars 5m, only half the 1990
level and down from Dollars 6m last year.
Silver output is targetted to jump from 5.6m ounces last year to 8m ounces
in 1992. In 1990 silver production was just over 2m.
Echo Bay announced its 1992 targets at meetings in Europe and North America
after revealing net earnings for 1991 were Dollars 6.8m, or 0.07 cents a
share, compared with a net loss of Dollars 59.7m, or 60 cents, in 1990 when
the company wrote off two investments.
Revenues fell to Dollars 315.6m from Dollars 338.9m reflecting lower gold
prices and production. The average price realised by Echo Bay for gold was
Dollars 392, down from Dollars 404.
The company has hedged 109,200 ounces of 1992 gold production at an average
of Dollars 397 an ounce and 3.7m ounces of 1992 silver at Dollars 4.45.
Pre-payment of loans reduced Echo Bay's hedged position and the company has
chosen not to lock in present 'low' prices by making any additional forward
sales. Gains of Dollars 6.2m from 1991 pre-payments of gold and silver loans
will be recognised in 1992 earnings.
Echo Bay's proven and probable reserves at the end of 1991 totalled 12.535m
ounces of gold, against 12.462m the previous year, and 116.994m ounces of
silver, against 135.881m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8587</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Hibernia work capped while investors sought
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE THREE remaining partners in the Hibernia oil project off the coast of
Newfoundland have put a brake on construction work while they seek new
investors for the CDollars 5.2bn (Pounds 2.48bn) venture.
The move followed the decision by Gulf Canada Resources to abandon its 25
per cent stake in the project. Gulf, controlled by Olympia &amp; York
Developments, developers of the Canary Wharf in London, said last month that
it needed to conserve resources for higher priorities.
The field was originally expected to produce 110,000 barrels of oil a day by
1996, but the slowdown will delay completion until 1997 at the earliest. The
federal and Newfoundland governments are contributing about half the cost of
the project, but Hibernia's long-term viability depends on an increase in
oil prices.
The remaining shareholders, Mobil Canada, Chevron Resources Canada and
Petro-Canada, said no new contracts would be signed from this week and most
work already under way would be slowed down. Work on the concrete gravity
base for the production platform would be stopped immediately.
The slowdown will affect Canadian as well as foreign suppliers. Wimpey is
among the companies which have been told to halt work. About 70 jobs will
also be lost at a design office in Paris.
The three remaining partners have appointed Goldman Sachs and Wood Gundy to
find a replacement for Gulf. However, Petro-Canada has also indicated that
it would like to to reduce its stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8588</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Redland offer timetable extended
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Takeover Panel has further extended the timetable regarding Redland's
offer for the ordinary and preference share capitals of Steetley.
With no news forthcoming from the secretary for trade and industry as to
whether the bid would be referred to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission,
the Panel's view was that the timetable should be further extended.
It will review the matter of the timetable again if there is no announcement
by the trade and industry secretary by March 12.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8589</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Porvair in medical buy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Porvair is acquiring all the preference shares and 75 per cent of the
ordinary shares of Polyfiltronics, a maker of medical diagnostic devices.
Consideration is Pounds 300,000 cash and Porvair may obtain the remaining
stake for up to Pounds 2m depending on profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8590</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Petrocon claims 34% of Wilkes
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Petrocon Group now owns or has received indications of support amounting to
some 34 per cent of James Wilkes ordinary equity.
The figure includes Petrocon's purchase on Thursday of 330,000 Wilkes
ordinary shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8591</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Anglo &amp; Overseas assets rise over year
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The net asset value of Anglo &amp; Overseas Trust was 317.3p at December 31, a
rise of 18.5 per cent over the 267.7p of a year previously and a fall of 3.3
per cent from the 328.2p reported at June 30.
Net revenue for 1991 slipped to Pounds 7.35m (Pounds 7.66m). Earnings
emerged at 6.36p (6.64p) and the final dividend is lifted to a proposed 4.7p
(4.4p), for a total of 6.45p (6.15p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8592</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: GT Venture net asset value 124.4p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of GT Venture Investment Co stood at 124.4p on
December 31 compared with 125p a year earlier and 144p at the June 30
year-end.
Pre-tax profits for the six months advanced to Pounds 371,000 (Pounds
346,000) and earnings per share worked through at 1.65p (1.42p) basic and
0.72p (0.7p) fully diluted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8593</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: SW Wood open offer result
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SW Wood said that of its open offer of 3.91m new ordinary shares 661,875
were placed firm, 1.52m were taken up by shareholders and the balance of
1.73m would be allotted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8594</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Newmarket Venture assets up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWMARKET Venture Capital had a net asset value of 60p at December 31, its
year-end. At the end of 1990 the figure stood at 56p.
The company has a portfolio of venture capital investments in the UK and the
US. These are currently being realised and, as has previously been
announced, it is proposed that the company is wound up voluntarily and the
assets distributed to shareholders in 1994.
The company added that it does not take realised gains on its successful
investments into the profit and loss account and it does not normally expect
to pay ordinary dividends.
The p&amp;l merely reflects deposit and investment income and the running costs
of the company.
Pre-tax losses were cut to Pounds 776,000 (Pounds 1.25m) and losses per
share to 2.1p (3.4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8595</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Chelsfield plans to go public
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHELSFIELD, the private property group headed by Mr Elliott Bernerd, is
planning to go public within four to six months either through a flotation
or a reverse takeover of a quoted company.
The plans to seek a listing on the stock market emerged as speculation
spread in the City about the financial well-being of the group.
The speculation centred on the demerger of Pall Mall, the joint venture
vehicle for the assets of Laing Properties, which Chelsfield acquired with
P&amp;O for Pounds 492m in April 1990.
This will require an injection from Chelsfield of about Pounds 250m into the
joint venture from which it will acquire half the UK assets and a 50 per
cent stake in the US assets, Mr Bernerd said. The Canadian properties will
be acquired by P&amp;O.
Mr Bernerd confirmed that Chelsfield has already made arrangements to
satisfy the cash injection through senior lending with banks of between
Pounds 100m to Pounds 120m, a further Pounds 50m to Pounds 60m of loan stock
with equity rights and the remainder coming from an equity placing.
Mr Bernerd also confirmed that the demerger of Pall Mall would be
conditional on the repayment of a Pounds 340m non-recourse loan made to the
joint venture.
Following the placing, Chelsfield will have Pounds 360m of gross assets,
Pounds 120m of senior debt and Pounds 60m of subordinated loan stock.
Gearing would be at about 33 per cent, excluding the loan stock.
Mr Bernerd, who will retain about 50 per cent of the enlarged share capital,
said that the preferred route for the company in going public was through a
reverse takeover.
There were 'a good half a dozen situations' among listed property companies
that have lost their way in terms of stock market recognition, are unloved
and provide a good opportunity for Chelsfield to reverse into.
Mountleigh, which Chelsfield has been rumoured to be interested in for some
time, was a very good example of such a company, Mr Bernerd said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8596</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Ciments Francais falls 59%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CIMENTS Francais, the French company which is one of the world's largest
cement groups, announced profits for 1991 down by 59 per cent to FFr400m
(Pounds 40.94m) against FFr980m in 1990.
News of the profits fall comes at a turbulent time for the French
construction industry, which has been badly affected by the slowdown in the
economy. It follows shortly after last week's announcement of an agreed
FFr4.6bn takeover bid by the Fougerolle building group for Societe Auxiliare
d'Enterprises (SAE).
Despite the slowdown Ciments Francais did manage to increase sales by 6.5
per cent to FFr16.5bn in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8597</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Era ends as Leopoldo Pirelli gives up
executive power
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR LEOPOLDO Pirelli, 66, chairman of Pirelli, the loss-making Italian cables
and tyres concern, is giving up executive powers in the company established
by his grandfather 120 years ago.
Management control is going to a seven-member executive committee.
The group includes Mr Marco Tronchetti Provera, 44, Mr Pirelli's son-in-law,
who has emerged as the company's new driving force. Mr Tronchetti Provera,
already one of two managing directors, has now been named executive deputy
chairman.
Mr Pirelli will remain chairman, but concentrate on liaison between Pirelli
and Societe Internationale Pirelli and Pirelli &amp; C, the two financial
holding companies which control it.
The termination of direct Pirelli family control over the company ends an
era in Italian family capitalism.
Although Mr Pirelli's son, Alberto, 38, remains one of three deputy
chairmen, Mr Tronchetti Provera's steady rise has left him increasingly
sidelined in recent months.
The management changes represent further fall-out from last year's abortive
takeover bid for Continental, Pirelli's slightly bigger German rival. The
costs of that bid, notably the secret financial guarantees given to
Pirelli's allies, account for around half its forecast L690bn (Pounds
320.03m) loss for 1991.
Despite calls for changes at the top, Mr Pirelli had stressed his intention
to stay in charge. The change now, on the eve of a L519bn rights issue to
buttress the group's shaky finances, will end speculation about his future.
The arrival of a younger generation of management not tainted by the
Continental affairs should also help to restore shareholders' confidence.
There has been growing concern in recent weeks about Pirelli's vulnerability
to a takeover following reports of sustained purchases of shares in Pirelli
itself, and in the two holding companies. Although theoretically immune to a
bid thanks to its complex structure, the rumours have raised doubts about
the company's future.
Mr Tronchetti Provera is believed to have been firmly against the
Continental takeover and to have watched with increasing dismay as it
foundered. His family is one of the core shareholders in Pirelli, with a 5.6
per cent stake in Pirelli &amp; C, the ultimate holding company.
Observer, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18 Photograph Leopoldo Pirelli, staying on as chairman
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8598</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Receiver in last ditch effort to fly
Compass
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE receiver of Compass, the failed Australian domestic airline, Mr Ian
Ferrier, announced what appeared to be a last ditch effort to get the
company flying again.
Mr Ferrier told a Sydney press conference that another fledgling local
airline, Southern Cross, was negotiating to take a 75 per cent stake in
Compass and inject about ADollars 60m (Pounds 25m). He has given Southern
Cross two weeks to cement a deal.
The airline crashed into receivership late last year, stranding about
125,000 holiday season ticket holders. Mr Ferrier has estimated Compass is
facing a ADollars 171m deficiency in funds if it is liquidated and a
ADollars 45.2m deficiency as a going concern.
The difference largely reflects the company's liability to ticket holders
and aircraft lessors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8599</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Trilon Financial profits boosted to
CDollars 109m for year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TRILON Financial, a key holding company of the Peter and Edward Bronfman
interests of Toronto, posted a sharp jump for 1991 profits because of better
results by its financial services and property management affiliates.
Earnings were CDollars 109m (Pounds 52.1m) or 74 cents a share, up from
CDollars 59m a year earlier on revenues of CDollars 5.7bn against CDollars
6.2bn.
London Insurance, one of Trilon's two biggest holdings, contributed CDollars
59m, unchanged, and Royal Trustco returned to profitability.
Its earnings of CDollars 107m included CDollars 21m from an asset sale and
its dividend is still not covered fully by profits.
Moody's is reviewing Royal Trustco's long-term debt and may lower its
rating. 'The review will focus on long-term earning capacity in relation to
potential asset quality problems,' said the agency in New York.
RT carries a single A-3 rating on its senior debt. Moody's also pointed to
the impact of the recession in Ontario on RT's domestic business.
Senior RT management told analysts in Toronto this week that the company's
high level of non-performing loans in the past two years was due to the
north America and UK recession.
DBRS, one of Canada's two credit agencies, lowered its rating on O&amp;Y First
Canadian Place debt from A-high to single A.
The company owns the Reichmann Brothers' flagship Toronto office complex,
which now has a 28 per cent vacancy rate.
DBRS also reduced ratings on the bonds of several upper Olympia &amp; York
Developments subsidiaries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8600</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Newman Tonks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Newman Tonks open offer of 13m new ordinary was taken up as to 10.4m by
shareholders (79.83 per cent).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8601</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Telecommunications busy in merger activity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRIAN BOLLEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Telecommunications was a busy sector for international merger and
acquisition activity last week, writes Brian Bollen. Telefonica de Espana's
purchase of 80 per cent of Telefonica Larga Distancia, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico-owned long distance carrier, consolidates its position in Latin
America at a time of intensifying competitiion among global long distance
carriers.
The asset-pooling joint venture between Motorola of the US and Northern
Telecom of Canada is aimed at stepping up competition in the cellular
telephone sector. American Telephone and Telegraph said its joint venture
with a St Petersburg-based company was only a small part of its plans to
develop Russia's communications and improve the infrastructure there and
eastern Europe.
Northumbrian Water is continuing the trend for diversification by the UK's
privatised water companies. It described its joint venture agreement with
Spanish construction company Obrascon as a significant step forward for its
activities in Spain, where it has been providing river cleaning expertise
for several years.
After a series of non-core disposals, Imperial Chemical Industries started
buying again. Its bolt-on acquisition of Barnices Valentine, a
Barcelona-based maker of vehicle repair paints, will fill a gap in its
southern European markets. Also bolting on was Allied-Lyons, which acquired
the Michigan-based Dawn Donuts chain.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
CROSS BORDER M&amp;A DEALS
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
BIDDER/INVESTOR         TARGET            SECTOR      VALUE  COMMENT
                                                     Pounds
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Motorola (US/Northern   Motorola-Nortel   Telecoms     110m Sector
Telecom (Canada)        Communications                      competition
                        (JV)                                hots up
Telefonica de Espana    Telefonica Larga  Telecoms     79m  In search of
(Spain)                 Distancia                           synergies
                        (Puerto Rico)
Cap Gemini Sogeti       Programator       Computer     48m  Agreed bid
(France)                (Sweden)          services
Alcoa (US)              Kofem (Hungary)   Aluminium    28m  Controlling
                                          products          interest
                                                            sought
Babcock International   Consilium CMH    Materials    21.4m Long term
(UK)                    (Sweden)         handling           growth move
BTP (UK)                Lembiotte/TRL    Adhesives    8.8m  Completing
                        (both France)                       European
                                                            jigsaw
Citizen Watch (Japan)    G Boley         Machine      4.5m  First
                         (Germany)       tools              foreign
                                                            acquisition
Ash &amp; Lacy (UK)          Galvanisation   Galvanising   1.7m Third such
                         de L'Artois                        buy
                         (France)
Northumbrian Water (UK)/ Obrascon        Water supply   n/a Seed corn
Obrascon (Spain)         Northumbrian                       move
                         (JV)
Italcementi (Italy)      Cemos Ostrava   Cement        n/a  Italians
                         (Czechoslovakia)                   cement
                                                            position
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: FT Mergers + Acquisitions International
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8602</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / A giant humbled by its bad debts: A look at the troubles of
National Westminster Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
None of the big English banks is proud of its financial results for 1991,
which they all are about to disclose, starting with Lloyds on Friday. But
the humiliation of reporting sharply lower profits - or possibly even losses
 -is likely to be felt most keenly by National Westminster Bank, for much of
the 1980s the biggest UK bank on most measures but now with a market value
less than both Barclays and Lloyds.
The seeds of decline had been planted by the time Lord Alexander became
chairman at the end of 1989. But when interviewed earlier this month he
refused to blame his predecessors: 'I am not prepared to judge the past.'
Seated at his 'lucky desk' - which he has transported from job to job since
his days as a leading barrister - he was on alert to stop himself making any
statement that could be construed as a profit forecast. As a former chairman
of the Takeover Panel, he was particularly keen not to be reprimanded by the
Stock Exchange for disclosure of price-sensitive information.
His anxiety was probably misplaced. It has been an open secret in the City
for months that NatWest's results will be very bad indeed. The precise
profit or loss seems relatively unimportant, since the downward trend will
be so pronounced.
Only four years ago, in 1988, NatWest made bigger profits - of Pounds 1.4bn
before tax - than any UK bank had ever done before or has since. But two
lacklustre years followed. Profits were depressed in 1989 by provisions
against possible losses on loans to less developed countries and in 1990 by
an increase in UK loan losses. Last year however the bad debt charge was so
big - an estimated Pounds 1.5bn from its UK lending alone - that the bank is
thought by some analysts to have made a small loss.
In NatWest's defence, all UK banks suffered in 1991 from unprecedented
levels of bad debts on their exposure to British companies and individuals.
As the biggest lender to small and medium size companies NatWest was bound
to be hit hard.
'This is the bottom-line judgment of the boom years of the 1980s', Lord
Alexander said. Though NatWest cannot absolve itself of blame for the bad
debts, he said that another measure of performance is NatWest's operating
profit before bad debt charges, which in the first half of the year grew by
16 per cent, faster than both Barclays' and Lloyds'.
However, other comparisons with Lloyds show a different picture. At the end
of June, NatWest had total assets of Pounds 128bn. Lloyds' assets were less
than half that at Pounds 54bn. Yet brokers believe Lloyds made more than
Pounds 600m in pre-tax profits during 1991, a modest increase on the
previous years' outcome.
These analysts also expect Lloyds to make pre-tax profits greater than
Pounds 700m in 1992, compared with around Pounds 350m for NatWest. In other
words, Lloyds appears to be on course to make much bigger profits than
NatWest in three successive years.
This performance has also been reflected in the share prices of both banks.
Since the beginning of 1988, Lloyds' share price has more than doubled,
while NatWest's price is no higher than four years ago. As a result, Lloyds'
stock market value - which is close to Pounds 5bn - is Pounds 200m greater
than NatWest's.
Lord Alexander plays down the humiliation of slipping behind Lloyds. 'We are
not saying we need to be Number One'. However he also stresses that NatWest
is not a 'semi-public institution . . . we run the business first and
foremost for shareholders'.
Lloyds has done better than NatWest because it concentrated its resources on
its core UK business of supplying financial services to individuals. In the
1980s it reduced its involvement in international banking - which was a
highly competitive market - and its investment banking has been kept to a
minimum.
NatWest, on the other hand, was intent on becoming a universal bank and on
expanding around the world. Huge financial and management resources have
been devoted during the past few years to reviving an ailing investment
banking subsidiary, County NatWest, and to stemming losses in its US
subsidiary, NatWest Bancorp.
Lord Alexander still eschews Lloyds' strategy of concentrating the bulk of
resources on one or other sector. 'There are and will remain twin pillars to
the business, a retail pillar and a corporate pillar', he said.
None the less he has initiated a reorganisation. He is reconfiguring the
business into two separate banks, one serving individuals and small
companies, the other big companies. This is similar to a reorganisation by
Barclays last year.
But NatWest has gone further in that its corporate bank, NatWest Markets,
combines all its investment banking, treasury and corporate lending
operations, whereas Barclays has kept the lending operations within its
retail bank. Even before the changes take place, he is confident that County
NatWest's long-troubled stockbroker is now in a position where 'it can be
profitable in 1992'.
A management reshuffle has accompanied the structural change. 'We need to
keep a balance between the 'grey hairs' - good solid bankers in their
fifties - and the younger generation with different management skills', he
said.
Thus Mr Derek Wanless has been appointed as a deputy group chief executive
with responsibility for NatWest Markets. At the age of 44, he is seen within
NatWest as a high-flier and possible successor to group chief executive, Mr
Tom Frost, due to retire in August next year.
Whether Mr Wanless becomes chief executive so soon probably depends on the
performance over the coming months of Mr John Tugwell - seen as the other
contender for the top job - who took charge of NatWest Bancorp in April when
losses from these US operations seemed to be escalating out of control.
NatWest executives say they are delighted by Mr Tugwell's performance to
date and that the US operations are on course to return to profit in the
current year. However Lord Alexander says he is 'keeping an open mind on the
future of the US business over the medium term'. In other words, selling it
is an option.
In terms of the outlook for profits in the medium term, the most important
appointment may have been that of Mr John Melbourn, formerly chief executive
of corporate and institutional banking at the bank, as a chief executive in
charge of credit risk. Part of his brief is to recover funds which the bank
has already written off in bad debt provisions.
One NatWest executive admitted that such recovered funds could be the single
biggest source of the group's future profits growth. Nonetheless, when
NatWest announces its results on February 25, shareholders will wish that
the source of this future growth - the 1991 bad debt charge - was not quite
so deep.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FORECAST OF UK BANK PERFORMANCE
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
            Pre-tax profit (loss)      Net dividend
                Pounds million         Pence per share
                   1991  1990          1991   1990
                    est                 est
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Abbey National      625   582           10.5   9.5
Barclays            570   760           21.1  21.1
Lloyds              630   591           16.5  15.3
Midland            (135)   11            1.7   9.0
NatWest             (20)  504           17.5  17.5
Standard Chartered  190   150           20.0  20.0
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: S G Warburg
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8603</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Economics Notebook: Mr Lamont's headache over public
borrowing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For Britain's embattled chancellor, last week's big jump in UK unemployment
and the average 6.5 per cent pay awards for 1.5m public sector workers were
yet another reminder of the growing pressures on the state's finances.
Even before the recent rash of bad economic news, the public sector
borrowing requirement, or deficit, was expected to total around Pounds 12bn
in 1991-92 and the government's hope of keeping the 1992-93 PSBR down to 3
per cent of GDP or around Pounds 18bn was looking steadily more fragile.
Forecasters have also been making increasingly pessimistic medium-term
projections about the PSBR since the big public spending increases announced
in last November's Autumn Statement.
Last week, Oxford Economic Forecasting predicted that the PSBR would still
be around Pounds 20bn by the middle of the 1990s. The rather more optimistic
'Green Budget' produced by the Institute for Fiscal Studies and Goldman
Sachs International a couple of weeks earlier projected a deficit of Pounds
6.4bn, or 0.8 per cent of GDP, as late as 1996-97.
Such projections have cast doubt on the government's ability to return to a
balanced budget over the course of the current economic cycle: an objective
that Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, described as 'paramount' in his New
Year interview with the FT.
At first sight this is bad news. The balanced budget commitment has
reassured financial markets that the present lurch from the public sector
surpluses of the late 1980s to substantial deficit is no more than a
justified and temporary response to a protracted and damaging recession.
But would abandoning the balanced Budget really matter? The markets don't
seem to think so.
They have so far shrugged off mounting speculation that the chancellor might
unveil a generous tax-cutting Budget as well as the consequent
back-of-the-envelope calculations that the PSBR could leap to around Pounds
24bn or 4 per cent of GDP next year.
Many economists would argue that the markets are right not to worry, and
that a balanced budget is just mumbo-jumbo. In the mid-1980s, the
appropriate size of the PSBR was a subject of long and earnest debate in the
Treasury and among outside economists. But despite employing some of
Britain's best economic brains - including Mr Alan Budd, now the
government's chief economic adviser - the issue came nowhere near a clear
conclusion. The upshot, according to Mr Peter Spencer, then a Treasury
economist and now chief UK economist for Shearson Lehman Brothers, is that
there is simply no objective guide to the right level of government
borrowing.
However, the UK experience has not prevented European Community leaders
adopting specific borrowing limits among the criteria to determine whether
an EC member state will be eligible for moving to the third and final stage
of economic and monetary union around the end of this decade.
The Maastricht agreement states that government deficits must be either at
or near 3 per cent of GDP and that a country's ratio of debt to GDP must not
exceed 60 per cent for a country to move to Emu.
According to officials who helped prepare the treaty, these criteria were
not simply plucked out of the air. They are underpinned by an assessment of
the growth potential of the community in a time of near-price stability
(when inflation would be between zero and 2 per cent) and intended to yield
an improvement in the debt ratios of the member states over time.
So why should not Mr Lamont just tell the House of Commons on Budget Day
that the balanced budget rule has gone, to be replaced by the Maastricht
criteria? After all, the chancellor, for all his Euro-scepticism, is a
strong supporter of the European Monetary System as a weapon against
inflation. If he acquiesces in the Europeanisation of monetary policy,
should he not do the same when determining the UK's fiscal stance?
The temptation to adopt the Maastricht criteria must be all the greater
because the UK's government debt position is far more favourable than that
of its EC partners. Thanks to the budget surpluses of the late 1980s,
Britain's net public sector debt fell to around 27.25 per cent of GDP by the
end of 1990-91 from 47 per cent at the end of 1985-85. The UK net debt ratio
is well below the EC average of 42 per cent and, according to the
IFS-Goldman Sachs Green Budget team, would remain so, even if Britain's PSBR
were to stay at 3 per cent of GDP for five years.
The bad news for Mr Lamont is that the Maastricht debt criteria could prove
too disruptive for the UK economy once it has emerged from recession.
The UK has continued to run a substantial current account balance of
payments deficit in spite of a sharp fall in demand in the recession. To
some economists this is a sign that the UK cannot afford to run as large a
budget deficit as other EC nations with a better trade performance. Any
substantial and sustained increase in government borrowing would risk
fuelling further growth in the current account deficit, particularly if the
savings ratio declines as recovery comes and consumer confidence returns.
There is also concern that a return to persistent deficits would undermine
the supply side economic reforms of the 1980s that have boosted the
underlying efficiency of the economy.
Another worry - which, one hopes, would be of a temporary nature - surrounds
the implications for the Maastricht criteria of the very high real interest
rates that currently prevail in Britain. Bank base rates at 10.5 per cent
are very high when compared with 4.1 per cent retail price inflation in the
12 months to January.
The Maastricht criteria apparently were not crafted with such high
inflation-adjusted interest rates in mind. It is therefore doubtful whether
a 3 per cent PSBR-to-GDP ratio would be sustainable with such real rates and
low inflation. Servicing the debt would become an ever-greater burden to the
state.
Mr Lamont will therefore have some explaining to do, if he bows to reality
and abandons the concept of a balanced budget over the cycle on Budget Day,
March 10.
To embrace fully the fiscal provisions of Maastricht could be long-term
fiscal folly. But if financial markets are to be kept sweet, the chancellor
will have to find a credible middle way of defining a sustainable borrowing
requirement. It will not be easy, if only because the British economic
establishment has tried before and failed to produce an answer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8604</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Wace passes share dealing dossier to DTI
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WACE GROUP has passed the Department of Trade and Industry a dossier on 13
people who bought more than 3.7m shares (about 9 per cent of the shares in
issue) in Parkway Group in the months before Wace bid for it.
Six of the group, who bought more than 750,000 shares, are relatives of Mr
John Clegg, Wace's chief executive who stepped down suddenly three weeks
ago.
Barclays de Zoete Wedd, Wace's stockbrokers, were aware only of the purchase
of 75,000 shares of this total when they handled the takeover, but they
received written assurances from Mr Clegg that he was unaware of his
relatives' share dealing.
Parkway's share register, obtained by the Financial Times, reveals that Mr
Clegg's relatives shared addresses in north London with other people who
bought Parkway shares heavily in the months before the bid on August 1 1990.
Wace's internal investigation has uncovered a pattern of purchases of nearly
2m shares registered at two addresses in Hendon, north London, Belfast, and
the Anglo-Irish Bank in Dublin.
Mr Clegg was a director of Anglo-Irish Bank but resigned at the same time of
leaving the Wace board.
The inquiry will also question why two nominee companies in the Channel
Islands and Haywards Heath, Sussex, bought 400,000 shares in the months
before the bid.
Wace's bid of 28p per Parkway share on August 1 was double the previous
day's price.
However, the Parkway shares had fallen sharply during the spring of 1990 on
worries about the company's indebtedness and so only those buying shares in
the few weeks ahead of the bid would have made a profit.
Some of the deals under investigation which stretch back to late 1989 would
have made a loss.
Mr Clegg left Wace after rumours - denied by him and the company - of links
with the IRA. An investigation by security forces found no such links.
But that investigation prompted wider inquiries into the company's financing
culminating in a meeting last June with the Royal Ulster Constabulary, the
police in Sheffield, Mr Clegg's home town, the DTI and the London Stock
Exchange's Insider Dealing unit.
The DTI is now investigating whether there was insider dealing in Parkway
shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8605</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Day rules out BAe top level reshuffle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE appointment of a new chairman at British Aerospace, the UK's biggest
engineering company, is not expected to lead to any significant top
management reshuffle.
Sir Graham Day, BAe's interim chairman, said at the weekend that the
company's search for a new chairman was 'on target' and that the position
would be filled by someone who would be expected to work as part of the
defence, aerospace, car and property group's existing executive management
team.
'We are not looking for someone to come into the company with a fresh look
but to join and work with the existing team', he emphasised.
Sir Graham made a strong defence of Mr Dick Evans, the company's chief
executive. Mr Evans is playing a central role in the selection and
interviews of potential candidates for the chairmanship.
Some of BAe's critics in the City believe that further top management
changes will be needed if the company is to restore its credibility with
investors following its mishandled rights issue last autumn.
Sir Graham has been irritated by recent speculation that the search for a
new chairman was proving difficult. 'We have made no offers and no one has
turned any offer down,' he said.
BAe, which is due to report its preliminary results for the year ended
December 1991 on Wednesday, is still hoping to announce the appointment of a
new chairman in May to coincide with the company's annual meeting. Sir
Graham said a short list of less than five candidates had now been drawn up.
The company had also started the first interviews of potential candidates.
While declining to disclose any names on the short list, he said BAe was
looking for a candidate who was British and came from a large company with
international experience. Not all the candidates were based in the UK but
all were British because of the difficulties of appointing a foreign
national at the top of a company with such wide-ranging defence activities
as BAe.
Candidates would be meeting BAe's top management team, including Mr Evans,
to get a feel for the management they would be working with, Sir Graham
explained.
He added that Mr Evans and Mr George Simpson, the new deputy chief
executive, had the BAe board's 'full support'.
Rocket deal, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8606</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / French approve Nestle bid for Perrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government has approved the offer by Nestle, the Swiss foods
concern, to buy Perrier, the French mineral water group currently being
courted by Italy's Agnelli family.
Approval from the French finance ministry for the FFr13.42bn (Pounds 1.37bn)
bid being mounted by Nestle and its French ally, the Indosuez banking group,
is a fresh setback for the Agnellis as it removes one of the obstacles to a
full-scale takeover battle for Perrier on the stock market.
The French bourse authorities, which have already given the offer the green
light, can now open the bidding period during which Perrier stockholders can
accept Nestle's FFr1,475 a share offer price. Bourse authorities were
expected to move quickly to open the bidding period, which usually lasts
around a month.
Since they resumed trading last Monday, Perrier shares have climbed far
above the FFr1,475 a share offered by Nestle and Indosuez, leading to the
view that the group will need to raise the offer to win control of the
company. Speculation has been fuelled by the disclosure that Arab Banking
Corporation, the Bahrain-based bank, now has 1.4 per cent of Perrier.
Although the government's decision is a step in Nestle's favour, the battle
is by no means over.
Attention this week will shift to the courts. The key issue is whether the
French commercial courts will accept Nestle's attempt to annul the purchase
of a crucial 13.8 per cent of Perrier by Saint Louis, a French foods group
allied with the Agnellis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8607</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Bush heads for comfortable win in primary poll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MANCHESTER, NEW HAMPSHIRE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A CONFIDENT President George Bush yesterday launched a last-minute drive to
win over uncommitted voters in New Hampshire as his campaign chairman
predicted a comfortable victory over Mr Patrick Buchanan, his rightwing
Republican opponent, in tomorrow's primary election.
With polls showing Mr Bush holding a surprisingly strong lead, the White
House dismissed fears that Mr Buchanan would embarrass the president in this
recession-hit New England state, enabling him to continue his campaign.
Mr Robert Teeter, Bush campaign chairman, said there was no evidence that Mr
Bush was in trouble. 'He will win, and he will win comfortably,' Mr Teeter
insisted.
Mr Buchanan, a television commentator and former speech writer to presidents
Nixon and Reagan, preaches an 'America first' message which leans toward
protectionism and isolationism.
According to the latest Boston Globe poll, Mr Bush, with 54 per cent, holds
a 28-point lead over Mr Buchanan. Most experts believe the challenger needs
at least 35 per cent to maintain a credible campaign in the up-coming
primaries in the south next month.
The president, who drew small, politely enthusiastic crowds during two days
of late scheduled campaigning at the weekend, took the high road yesterday.
He avoided attacks on his opponent and promised an upturn in the US economy.
'Housing and real estate are going to lead the recovery,' he told an
audience yesterday.
In the Democratic race, former senator Paul Tsongas of Massachusetts basked
in his new position as the front runner, maintaining a clear lead over
Governor Bill Clinton of Arkansas, the previous favourite who has been
damaged by unsubstantiated charges of adultery and draft-dodging.
Mr Clinton's slide has provoked a scramble among the other Democratic
candidates whose survival depends on a second or third place showing in
tomorrow's primary, the first of the 1992 election campaign. Last night, all
five Democrats were preparing for a televised debate in Manchester.
Political experts predict a heavy turn out in New Hampshire which has a
tradition of election upsets and come-from-behind wins such as Mr Bush's
victory here in 1988. This unpredictability is compounded by the economic
troubles in the state which has gone from boom to bust since Mr Bush took
office in 1989.
Tax plans countered, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16 Photograph Bill Clinton faces a tough contest in the New
Hampshire primary having lost the lead to Paul Tsongas (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8608</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Letter: US stance on shipping ignores spirit of Gatt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr EFTHIMIOS CHRISTODOULOU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I read with interest Frances Williams's report, 'EC farm stance seen as
biggest threat to Gatt talks' (January 14).
I must note, however, that apart from the well-known problems with
agriculture, there are, also, difficulties in other sectors of the
negotiations. The attitude of the US with regard to maritime transport is
one of great concern to my country - for which shipping is an economic
activity of paramount importance - and, I would say, to other maritime
countries too.
The US insists on preserving its own right to sign bilateral most favoured
nation (MFN) agreements even after a postulated successful conclusion of the
Uruguay Round. This approach is by no means compatible with the spirit of
the negotiations and cannot be considered as helpful.
Maritime transport is a sector already liberalised to a great extent. It is
then hardly conceivable that, as a result of the Uruguay Round, more
restrictions than those existing at the beginning of the negotiations would
be imposed on shipping.
If the right of bilateral MFN agreements is to be preserved, and if an
effective standstill and a gradual and progressive roll-back are not to be
included in the framework of the agreement under negotiation, then the
exemption of maritime transport from the Uruguay Round altogether is
preferable. At least, in this case, no more restrictions would be imposed on
shipping as a result of its 'liberalisation'.
Efthimios Christodoulou,
Minister of National Economy,
Athens
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8609</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Letter: Ideas for all strands of opinion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr GRAHAM MATHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It is unfortunate that your columnist Joe Rogaly (February 14) said
'the IPPR is Labour's think-tank in the same way as the Centre for Policy
Studies, the Institute of Economic Affairs and the Adam Smith Institute are
the Conservatives''.
The IEA is independent and puts out ideas which anyone - Conservative,
Labour, Liberal Democrat or whoever - is welcome to pick up. If Joe Rogaly
will look around next time he is here, he is very likely to see evidence
that our academic, opinion-forming and policy-making guests come from all
strands of political opinion.
Graham Mather,
general director,
Institute of Economic Affairs,
2 Lord North Street,
London SW1P 3LB
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8610</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Letter: Towards a 'level playing field' in trade and the
environment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr BARRY COATES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I was pleasantly surprised to see your extensive coverage of trade and
the environment (February 12). It seems at last that there is a recognition
that trade and environment issues are inextricably linked.
However, I felt that the discussion, both in the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade report and the article, did not adequately address the
central issue - that trade rules should treat producers fairly, and create
the much sought after 'level playing field'. An important element in fair
trade is that producers should not be able to 'dump' their products at
prices that are below cost.
Those costs must include the use of environmental services - for example,
using nature as a source (as in timber) or as a sink (as in waste disposal).
If companies do not pay for those services, they are trading unfairly. This
is the crucial point that the Gatt report does not address. Under current
rules of trade, Gatt allows nations to impose countervailing duties for
dumping covering most costs, but does not extend this to environmental
dumping. In fact, the rules explicitly do not allow differential treatment
of traded products on the basis of their production method.
This leads to environmentally destructive competition and low commodity
prices. For example, timber producers have no incentive to spend money on
long-term forest management when their competitors are not required to do
so. The result is forest damage, and, in the long run, possible
deforestation. National action alone is not sufficient; a change in
international trade rules is required.
I agree with Gatt that national policies should be the main mechanism to
establish environmental policies, but it must be recognised that Gatt needs
to play a role in setting up the framework for fair trade between nations.
Otherwise, there will be a transfer of polluting industries to developing
countries, as suggested in a recent memorandum from the World Bank's chief
economist.
This is not a rabidly protectionist view. Most environmentalists favour the
reform of trade rules in the area of agriculture, for example, but, unlike
Gatt, we regard sustainable development as the objective, rather than trade
liberalisation itself. It is to be hoped that the nations that determine
Gatt's rules, including the UK, are also working towards those objectives.
We look forward to their support for the long-awaited reform of our
international trading system at the Earth Summit discussions in June.
Barry Coates,
head of development policy,
World Wide Fund for Nature
Godalming, Surrey
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8611</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Letter: Constraint on teachers' pay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MARTYN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader, 'Fair pay for teachers' (February 11), addresses only one
part of the equation in offering competitive salaries to teachers. The main
constraint in accommodating an increase of between 5.5 per cent and 8.5 per
cent will be the financial resources available to a particular school.
Under the local management of schools (LMS) system, individual schools are
funded by a 'unit of resource' based on the number of pupils on the roll. In
recent years, this has failed to keep in line with the teachers' pay awards,
with the consequence that school budgets - delegated to in-dividual schools
 -are inadequate.
In attempting to come to terms with these budgets schools either have to
reduce staff levels or accept a degree of deficit budgeting.
As a result of this pay increase, we surely will be expecting to see more of
the practice witnessed in Dorking where parents have been asked to
contribute Pounds 30 a head to meet the wage bill.
Martyn Lloyd,
1 Darfield Road,
Burpham,
Guildford,
Surrey GU4 7YY
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8612</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Letter: Accountants' virtues finally recognised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr IAN R MCNEIL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Chartered accountants owe Michael Dixon one (Jobs Column, February 12).
At last someone has recognised their inestimable virtue. If I didn't have
such a high regard for the ethics and integrity of journalists, I would send
him a bottle of something fizzy: I am sure he would appreciate vintage
Tizer.
I found it striking to see the degree of overlap between the attributes
which the researchers found in chartered accountants and those which, I
hope, Royal Air Force recruiters are looking for. Calm, even-tempered,
inclined to plan ahead, reliable, not impulsive. These are exactly the
characteristics which I would pray for in someone flying fast jets in
low-level training over my house.
In the letters column of a less serious newspaper than yours, Michael
Dixon's story could be the spark for a long series of accountant jokes. I am
sure you won't allow that to happen. Just in case, we have all heard the one
about the difference between accountants and actuaries, and the one about
the accountant advising a man landing by balloon]
Ian R McNeil,
president,
Institute of
Chartered Accountants,
Chartered Accountants' Hall,
Moorgate Place,
London EC2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8613</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Right way to reform the CAP 'reform'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SAMUEL BRITTAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
There is something priggish about the claims of British ministers to be more
liberal and more free-market than any of their opposite numbers in the
European Community - although that would not be difficult.
Scepticism is amply justified by the British government's reaction to the
MacSharry plan for reforming the Common Agriculture Policy (CAP). The plan
is a remarkable attempt by the EC's agriculture commissioner, Mr Ray
MacSharry, to decouple payments to farmers from agricultural prices, and
thereby to furnish some support for farmers without having to rig the
structure of world food markets.
The direction of the MacSharry plan - towards transparency and away from
market rigging - is surely one that nearly all gradualist reformers have
advocated. Indeed, the commissioner will have his work cut out getting his
ideas through meetings of ministers beholden to the farm lobbies.
If he is entitled to support from any government, it is surely the British,
which has far and away the smallest proportion of its citizens working on
the soil. Yet as recently as last Wednesday, February 12, Mr John Gummer,
the British agriculture minister, was pouring cold water on the proposals at
 -you will never guess - the annual general meeting of the National Farmers
Union.
I might as well state - before he dictates a letter to the Financial Times -
that Mr Gummer's complaint is that income payments will be biased towards
the low income farmers, and away from the more prosperous and efficient ones
who predominate in British agriculture, and who are influential beyond their
numbers among the shire Tories. It would surely be best to welcome the
MacSharry proposals and concentrate on the distribution of income support.
The MacSharry proposals do, however, need a different kind of reform. To see
why, recall the deficiency payments which were used to support British
agriculture before the UK joined the Community in 1973. The system was less
bad than the CAP, because:
the cost was obvious to the taxpayer, and thus self-limiting, and
the British consumer paid for imports at world market prices rather than at
prices rigged by import levies and the like. Even then, superficial minds
argued that the cost of the policy could be reduced by shifting the burden
from the taxpayer to the consumer by higher prices - an error known as
fiscal illusion.
The real problem of the old British system was different. It was that, as
deficiency payments were tied to agricultural proceeds, farmers were given
wrong signals about market demand for their products.
The MacSharry plan suffers from a similar defect. This is shown in Reforming
the CAP, a paper by Professor Stefan Tangermann, of the University of
Goettingen, recently published by the Institute of Economic Affairs*. The
professor even manages to find a reason for coupling payments at least
partly to farm output and income, rather than treating them purely as social
security or redistribution towards the poor. This is because farmers have
been 'trapped' into the present scale of production by a CAP which gave them
false reassurance.
The change that Professor Tangermann advocates is shifting the basis of
income support from current production to a past reference period before
reform, for example, the average of 1989-91. This seemingly trivial
alteration would, at a stroke, banish all incentive to produce on an
inappropriate scale by fossilising the basis for payments to farmers. This
would allow farmers to respond to world market signals, thus incidentally
facilitating the Gatt negotiations.
A further great advantage is that it would no longer be necessary to make
income support conditional on farmers' setting aside land for non-farming
use - as payments would no longer have anything to do with current
production. Forcing farmers not to use land is like dumping coffee in the
sea or imposing early retirement - all stupid and ultimately immoral forms
of compulsory waste, imposed because policymakers cannot think of better
ways of coping with market-clearing prices.
The exact basis for income payments to farmers is a matter of political
haggling to which elementary economics can contribute little. But it can
contribute something to the question of whether to tie the payments to the
farm or the individual farmers. The Tangermann proposal is to make the
payments to existing farmers for a period of, say, 15 years, but to allow
the rights to them to be bought and sold.
The accompanying IEA publicity talks about farmers being given lump sum
compensation, for instance bonds which might be worth Pounds 150,000 for a
farm of 240 acres. This is slightly misleading, and could put off finance
ministers, whose budgets are based on primitive cash flow concepts. The
bonds arise from making the MacSharry payments transferable. All that
governments and the Commission need do is to legalise a market.
It is easy to show that the worldwide race to protect farmers is
self-defeating, and any benefits go not to working farmers, but to
landowners. The land lobby is influential partly because economy-watchers,
from finance ministers to economic journalists, are too busy to look more
than occasionally at the intricate details of this one particular sector,
and fear to trip up over the details. Yet ending the scandal of the CAP
could make far more difference to economic welfare than the difference
between the worst and the best conceivable annual government budget in
Britain, and other Community countries.
*2 Lord North Street, London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8614</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Leading Article: Short-changed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
PUTTING your money into a savings account with a bank or building society is
no longer the straightforward activity it once was. As a growing number of
savers have discovered in the last year, banks and building societies
commonly discontinue a well-established savings account and replace it with
a similar one offering better terms to attract new customers.
Savers who do not monitor carefully what their building society is doing may
be stranded in an account which earns less interest than they have a right
to expect.
Building societies offer several excuses for doing this kind of thing. One
is that in the age of retail financial markets, savers ought to shop around
constantly for the best bargain as they do when buying cornflakes or shoes.
Another is that savings institutions are forced into this sort of ploy
because consumers are already too astute and the savings business is less
profitable than it used to be. The real reason seems to be that computer
technology has made it easy to close off existing customers and old
accounts, and thereby pay the better interest rate only to a smaller group
of new customers.
A recent ruling by the Building Societies Ombudsman accepts that societies
should take reasonable steps to inform customers of new accounts by
advertising in the press and publicity in their branches. Rather weakly, the
Ombudsman stopped short of insisting that building societies should actually
tell customers directly when a better account is available.
Yet when TSB Bank opened a new savings account recently, it wrote to all
holders of similar old accounts, telling them they would be transferred to
the new one. One society, National &amp; Provincial, has promised to tell its
customers what the best account is for them. Quite right too. Savers are not
only the customers of building societies: they are also their owners. When
an industry treats its owners this way, it is a sign that something is going
seriously wrong.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8615</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Leading Article: How to cut BT's prices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MOST encouraging feature of the BT price review, which started last
month, is that it will be conducted to a large extent in the open. Past
examinations of the telecommunications group's prices by Oftel, the industry
regulator, have been behind closed doors.
Openness is important not just because price control must be seen to be fair
to BT's customers. It is also important because errors in controlling the
company's prices in the past have mainly resulted from Oftel's exclusive
reliance on its own internal resources. Sir Bryan Carsberg, Oftel's
director-general, may be a distinguished accountant, but he has a tiny staff
to pitch against BT's array of lawyers, economists and accountants. By
consulting widely, Sir Brian should receive help from independent experts.
Sir Bryan is right when he asserts that a price cap is a better way of
controlling BT's monopoly power than direct curbs on profits. A price cap
gives the company an incentive to improve efficiency, because it is allowed
to keep any extra profits that it earns through cutting costs.
But profits must be taken into account in setting the price cap. The cap
should allow BT to earn reasonable profits if it makes reasonable progress
towards higher efficiency, but reward it with extra profits only if it makes
exceptional progress on efficiency.
Detailed forecasts
Judging exactly how far BT's prices should fall can only be made on the
basis of detailed forecasts of the effect on profits both of different price
caps and of different definitions of reasonable profits and efficiency.
Oftel will be doing this work in the next few months. In the new spirit of
openness, it should publish these before concluding a deal with BT.
On the basis of the figures now in the public domain, however, the
provisional conclusion has to be that BT's profits are excessive. In the
financial year to the end of March 1991, BT earned a return of 25.4 per cent
on the capital employed in its regulated businesses, compared with the 18
per cent that Oftel had initially expected. The difference between these two
rates - about Pounds 700m in hard numbers - is a measure of BT's extra
profits.
What then should be done? Nothing, according to BT. Its argument is that the
price cap, which was tightened last year, is already cutting profits, as the
4 per cent decline in pre-tax profits for its third quarter reported last
month shows. The likely effect of the current cap should, indeed, be the
starting point for the review. But looking at one quarter's profits in
isolation, especially in the depths of a recession, cannot be the basis for
a formula that will last for four or five years. Profits normally fall in
recessions. Most other companies have been much worse affected than BT.
One-off cut
If, as seems likely, BT is still earning excess profits when the current cap
expires, there are two principal ways of returning these to telephone users.
Oftel's preference would be to tighten the cap a notch or two; but a one-off
cut when the next price cap is imposed would also be possible.
Sir Bryan's objection to a one-off cut is that BT would have less incentive
to improve efficiency in future if extra profits earned this way were clawed
back immediately. He argues that in a competitive market, which ought to
provide the benchmark for regulating a near monopoly like BT, firms with
particularly high efficiency see their extra profits eroded gradually
because it takes time for rivals to catch up.
This argument would be conclusive if BT's extra profits were the result of
better-than-expected efficiency. But Oftel has explained the divergence
between BT's actual profits and its forecasts mainly in terms of its initial
decision not to regulate the company's international call charges, which
earn a return on capital of over 80 per cent. Why should BT's customers have
to pay more because of a regulatory oversight? It seems sensible to phase
out extra profits that stem from BT's extra efficiency only gradually, but
it would be better to hand back those that do not in the form of a one-off
cut.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8616</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Winter of despair, spring of hope: Ford needs short-term
repairs in the UK and a long-term overhaul across Europe to be a survivor in
the 1990s
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It is the best of times and the worst of times for Ford in Europe. Never has
its performance in the world's biggest car market been painted in such stark
colours of success and failure.
It achieved record car sales in western Europe last year and yet collapsed
into a record loss, compounding the huge losses it had also racked up in the
US.
The world's second-largest vehicle maker captured its biggest ever shares of
the Italian and French car markets and achieved its highest-ever sales
volume in Germany.
In the UK it suffered its lowest car sales since 1977 and, most alarmingly,
its UK market share sank to its lowest level since 1975.
At Ford of Britain - traditionally the milch cow of its European operations
 -record profits of Pounds 437m (on ordinary activities) in 1988 have been
transformed in three years into a staggering loss (on ordinary activities
and before extraordinary gains) of Pounds 920m in 1991.
In the US parent company's books Ford made a net automotive profit of
Dollars 284m last year in continental Europe. The surplus was obliterated,
however, by the losses of Dollars 761m at Ford's established British
operations and losses of Dollars 354m at Jaguar, plus the heavy financing
costs - Dollars 247m - of the Jaguar acquisition. The result was a European
automotive loss of Dollars 1.079bn.
The woes of Ford's mainstream operations in the UK have been compounded by
the medium-term financial disaster of the Jaguar takeover. The Pounds 1.6bn
proudly paid by Ford at the end of 1989 to acquire the UK luxury car maker
is rapidly looking like the sting of the century for Jaguar's former
shareholders.
Exacerbating Ford of Europe's management discomfort is the sight of General
Motors, its arch rival and for long the loss-making laggard in Europe,
accelerating past it to a succession of bumper profits.
Ford and GM both sold just over 1.6m cars in western Europe last year. While
GM is expected to unveil record net profits for its European operations of
about Dollars 2bn for 1991 - dwarfed unfortunately by GM's huge losses in
the US - Ford has only red ink to show for its efforts.
The reasons for the crisis that has engulfed Ford in Europe can be found in
large part in the UK recession. Urgent emergency roadside repairs are now
being carried out at Ford of Britain, but the broader European problems are
more deep-seated. Ford of Europe is confronting severe structural challenges
as it seeks not only to recover the ground lost to its European rivals, but
also to prepare for the Japanese onslaught.
Most immediately it must staunch the haemorrhaging in the UK.
Ford of Europe executives, pressed to explain the financial woes, point
first to the failure to forecast the depth of the UK recession.
Mr Bill Fike, the aggressive president of Ford of Europe, says simply: 'The
market fell away from us so fast we had excess stocks. Each month the
industry was falling away faster than our forecasts.'
Mr Ian McAllister, Ford of Britain chairman and managing director and
another new arrival in Ford's European management blood-letting, said last
week: 'We were building vehicles for a market that did not exist.'
Faced by the task of 'liquidating' its bloated stocks, Ford embarked on a
ruinously expensive price war in the UK last summer. Marketing costs jumped
in the UK last year to the shocking level of 24 per cent of revenues from 14
per cent in 1990. These costs range from discounts and low-cost finance to
special fleet deals.
'We need a better balance,' said Mr McAllister last month. 'We have elected
to reduce our volumes (sold) to the daily rental fleets in 1992 rather than
just turning over metal. It is not economic.' Ford of Britain was taking
action, 'so that we are not laundering vehicles through dealers into used
car fleets,' he said.
With the zeal of the newly converted he insisted: 'I don't see the point of
chasing registrations for the sake of it.'
After two years of trailing the recession downwards Mr McAllister insists
that the UK operations have touched bottom, although he refuses to indicate
when the company might re-emerge into the black.
There is a long way to go, however. Last year, excluding Jaguar, Ford of
Britain's traditional operations slid to a pre-tax loss on ordinary
activities of Pounds 430m from a profit of Pounds 61m a year earlier.
As marketing costs escalated, production has had to fall to bring stocks
under control. Ford is creaking under the burden of fixed costs. The British
operations, excluding Jaguar, used only about 70 per cent of their plant
capacity last year. The Halewood, Merseyside, Escort/Orion plant suffered
110 'down days' with no output. The Southampton Transit van plant suffered
50 'down days'.
Only Dagenham of the three assembly plants escaped such costly production
cuts, thanks to its ability to produce left-hand-drive cars for continental
Europe. More than 50 per cent of Dagenham's Fiesta production was exported
last year.
In a glaring oversight Ford had failed to equip Halewood for left-hand-drive
Escort/Orion car production. Trapped in the confines of the UK market it
worked a three-day week for most of 1991, and car output totalled only
127,117 last year compared with 188,804 in 1989. (In 1990 Halewood output
was hit by a seven-week strike). Belatedly the mistake has now been made
good and car export shipments from Halewood started this month.
The Halewood mistake was exposed by the pattern of new car demand in Europe.
While there was famine in the UK, formerly Ford's biggest European market,
there was feast in Germany.
The imbalance was exacerbated by a shortage of the right mixture of engines
and gearboxes, says Mr Fike. Ford is investing heavily to catch up with its
rivals' engine programmes - the first units from its Dollars 2bn Zeta engine
development programme have started coming off the assembly lines at
Bridgend, South Wales - but last year it was left having to push 'brown'
engines to unwilling customers in Germany because of the lack of 'green'
engines equipped with catalytic converters.
Ford was left with capacity where it had no sales in the UK, but with demand
in Germany which it did not have the capacity to satisfy.
Mr Lindsey Halstead, Ford of Europe chairman, insists this will improve in
1992, when sales finally begin to pick up in the UK, and as the abnormal
demand generated in Germany in the wake of reunification subsides. 'That
will put us in a better financial position.'
For the longer term, the Ford of Europe top management seeks to attack the
daunting structural challenge. Last week the message went out from Ford of
Europe's Warley, Essex, headquarters via its private television network to
the workforce of nearly 100,000 that the company was 'leaving no stone
unturned to find ways of improving the international competitiveness of our
European operations'.
The comforting reassurances are being followed by tough actions. 'The battle
in Europe has begun - and truly only the fittest will survive,' Mr Fike told
more than 300 senior Ford managers recently.
In the past year he says Dollars 500m of costs have been taken out of Ford's
European operations. For the first time for decades the European workforce
is now below 100,000. In 1979 a workforce of 150,000 produced 1.4m vehicles;
last year a 100,000 workforce produced 1.8m units.
The screw is being tightened further. Another 2,100 jobs will be cut in the
UK alone this year. Layers of senior management are being taken out as Mr
Halstead works to flatten the pyramid of the Ford hierarchy and aims to cut
indirect salaried staff across Europe by a third.
Mr Halstead believes that part of Ford's current lack of competitiveness
stems from its supplier structure. (Some 50 per cent of the costs of a car
are bought in from outside suppliers.) Now the numbers are being cut
radically and remaining suppliers will have to shoulder much more of the
research and development burden. The number of suppliers has been cut by 15
per cent to 900 since 1988; Ford plans to shrink the total by another 33 per
cent by 1995 to 600.
Ford is aiming to achieve a 25 per cent cut in its investment spending by
1997 without reducing the quality of the investment. Involving component
suppliers early on in product development, getting designers and engineers
to work simultaneously and asking consumers what they want sooner are all
considered vital to gain greater investment efficiency.
It is working again towards improved productivity and quality at the UK
Dagenham and Halewood vehicle assembly plants, coupled with dire warnings to
the workforce of a failure to catch up with Ford's equivalent continental
European operations.
'It isn't the facilities that are different, there is not a damn thing wrong
with the Halewood facility. It is the way labour is organised and the way
labour functions . . . You have to close the gap (with continental Europe)
eventually, or you have to shift capacity because otherwise you will have to
say to hell with it,' says Mr Halstead.
Ford is seeking to reduce the complexity of its model range. At the same
time it has the ultimate ambition of reducing new model development times
from the 72 months of the recent past to only 36 months by adopting
radically different Japanese-style 'heavyweight' project management teams.
Under this system each major car product line would become its own
mini-business area.
He admits that Ford has been cost-driven rather than customer-driven. At the
same time it has been 'awfully compartmentalised' with a vertical structure
of sales and marketing, manufacturing, product development, finance and
human resources all reporting upwards.
Instead Mr Halstead is seeking a horizontal structure with decision-making
responsibility pushed down in the organisation. 'It will take five more
years to get where we want to be,' he admits. 'The Japanese are still the
low-cost producers and they have more horizontal structures.'
Mr Halstead accepts that Ford is hampered by having its research and
development efforts divided between two sites in the UK (Dunton, Essex) and
Germany (Merkenich, Cologne) but declares that recent speculation that
Dunton could be closed is 'ludicrous. From 1985 to 1992 we invested Pounds
156m at Dunton. Now tell me we are going to walk away from that.'
Instead the Halstead vision calls for the 'co-location' of development teams
working on a specific project at a single site. 'There is a 10 per cent cost
penalty of having two sites. We carry about 250 people more than we need, so
we must re-organise to make the two sites stand more alone.'
Beyond the radical structural reforms Ford also needs a healthier sales
balance in western Europe by cutting its earlier overwhelming dependence on
the UK.
For several years it has been plotting a strategy for conquering market
share in southern Europe, and its actions are now yielding fruit. It has
moved in on Fiat's domestic fiefdom in Italy and has managed to push its
share of the Italian car market to 11.1 per cent last year from 7.7 per cent
in 1990 and 4.8 per cent in 1989.
In the midst of its current woes Ford's success in Italy shines as one of
the most considerable coups that any car maker has pulled off in the
European arena. Fiat has claimed that Ford has simply bought market share,
but Mr Halstead insists: 'That is wishful thinking. We made money in Italy.'
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FORD'S BREAKDOWN
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Ford Europe car sales*
1991                 Volume    Market
                              share (%)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Germany              426,454   (10.3)
UK                   385,944   (24.2)
Italy                259,107   (11.1)
France               175,388    (8.6)
Spain                120,619   (13.6)
Western Europe     1,600,000   (11.9)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
*Excluding Jaguar
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Automotive Industry Data
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Western Europe
Passenger car sales 1991       Market
                     '000     share (%)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
VW group            2,222      (16.5)
Fiat group          1,728      (12.8)
GM group            1,627      (12.1)
Peugeot/Citroen     1,617      (12.0)
Ford group          1,610      (11.9)
Renault             1,356      (10.1)
Total              13,488     (100.0)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Automotive Industry Data, Industry provisional estimates
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Ford production Europe
Cars &amp; light commercial vehicles
                    1991        1989
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Germany          951,735     999,018
UK               451,996     503,267
Spain            341,302     310,440
Portugal           9,560      21,682
Karmann (Germany) 19,660      21,052
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total          1,774,253   1,855,459
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14 Chart (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8617</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Leading Article: Water babies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHAIRMEN of the UK's privatised water companies have not hitherto been
seen as negotiators in the Gordon Gekko class. Yet in one week's frantic
haggling in July 1989, they appear to have out-negotiated ministers and
civil servants to the tune of Pounds 2bn.
The story is told in the National Audit Office's account of water
privatisation, released on Saturday. Even through the foot-deep litter of
Whitehall caveats, it is possible to detect what really happened.
The government's merchant bank adviser, Schroders, told it that - partly
because of regulatory uncertainty - water companies' shares would have to
yield more than those of British Gas. It argued that the companies would
need to cover their interest payments four times over with profits for a
mass market privatisation to succeed.
That was what the government wanted, but it tried to keep interest cover to
three times. Enter, in that crucial July week, the water chairmen, playing
their trump card: unless the government loosened controls on prices, and
gave them stronger balance sheets, they would have to make 'heavy
qualifications' (the NAO's words) in their flotation prospectuses.
Over the next few days, the government caved in: it relaxed price ceilings;
switched from net debt for the companies of Pounds 435m to a cash injection
of Pounds 1.1bn; jacked up predicted future costs; and gave way on interest
cover.
Since much of the companies' riskiness had now been eliminated, was it still
necessary to offer such a generous yield? Apparently so. The average yield
was set at 8.55 per cent, compared with British Gas's 7 per cent.
The sale went well. Since then, the water companies' shares have
outperformed the market - and British Gas - by 30-50 per cent. They now
yield less than Gas.
Water privatisation raised Pounds 3.6bn for the taxpayer, some Pounds 2.13bn
less than the government's 'illustrative' estimates before the July
negotiations started. Let us have simpler, more leisurely privatisations in
future, says the NAO. Let us have better negotiators, too.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8618</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: Leo in Love - Nuffield Theatre, Southampton
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLAIRE ARMITSTEAD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If Leo in Love serves one useful purpose, it is as a reminder that boulevard
comedy is not simply the preserve of the commercial theatres of London and
New York. The French, who after all invented the term, are responsible for
this fatuous excursion into the emotional byways for middle age.
Jean Sarment's play, adapted and translated, is the archetypal star vehicle
 -a little creaky in the joints and warped in the wheels, but offers a more
or less roadworthy ride to an actor of a certain age. Produced originally as
Leopold Le Bien-aime in Paris in 1927, it was taken up the the French actor
Georges Wilson, for whom it has become something of a speciality, and
arrives in Southampton under the wing of Martin Jarvis.
The plotline is contrived to within an inch of its life. The eponymous Leo,
woman hating bachelor, has a chance meeting on a riverbank with the 'dead
letter supervisor' for the Paris post office - a civil servant responsible
for disposing of undelivered mail, who tells him of two misrouted letters
from women which he opened years earlier. One told her suitor to get lost,
while the other - to a man called Leopold  - specified the time and venue
for a romantic tryst, which, helas, must never have been kept.
Realising the letter to have been addressed to him, Leo is immediately
transformed from curmudgeonly fisherman to ardent roue, who fixes all the
village romances while inviting his one-time sweetheart and authoress of the
letter to stay, in the hope of rekindling their amour. Marie-Therese -
rather amusingly played by Sarah Badel - is now a hefty widow with no
inkling of Leo's blighted love nor any recollection of the aborted
assignation.
In the interests of those who plan to see the show during its forthcoming
tour of the southern counties, I will give no more away except to say that
director Patrick Sandford has driven a Rolls-Royce of a cast down a pretty
paltry avenue. The capering joviality of Jarvis is nicely offset by a
handful of cameos including a stringy spinster from Angela Pleasence and a
sniffy priest from Christopher Godwin. The set, by Robin Don, is a delight.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13 Photograph Martin Jarvis as the women hating bachelor
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8619</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: Romeo and Juliet - Royal Exchange, Manchester
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One of the delights of the Royal Exchange Theatre in Manchester is that - as
its name suggests - it is the home of the old stock exchange. The theatre in
the round is on the trading floor. It is ringed by galleries and some of the
old prices can still be seen chalked on boards.
This seemed a natural place for Romeo and Juliet, evoking images of Romeo
shinning up and and down. The Manchester theatre, however, is full of
surprises, and the central surprise of Gregory Hersov's modern dress
production is that there is no balcony scene as such. Instead there is a bed
scene: a large double bed where the adolescent lovers come of age is placed
firmly in the centre of the stock exchange floor. Afterwards Romeo departs
with a climbing rope, but we never see it being used.
There are other novelties. This is the first time that I have seen the early
love-sick Romeo enter drinking from a bottle of Jack Daniels. Played by
Michael Sheen, he also smokes heavily and wears a ring in his left ear.
Alcohol is prominent throughout. The nurse (Gillian Hanna) gets drunk at the
banquet. The icy Lady Capulet (Amelia Bullmore) seldom appears without a
glass in hand, possibly as a sedative to protect her from her husband,
splendidly played as a north country businessman by John Branwell. In the
background there is a touch of John Braine's novel, Room at the Top.
Poetry is not the production's strong point. Mercutio's Queen Mab speech,
spoken by Jud Meyers, comes out as rap, with the music going in the
background. There are no pauses to let the beauty of the lines take over.
And whatever else may be said of Kate Byers's Juliet, she is not at her best
when speaking verse. Some of the best-known lines like 'Gallop apace, your
fiery-footed steeds' come out as if they were simply par for the course.
Nevertheless, the entire show is an extraordinarily vibrant spectacle which,
one is tempted to say, owes something to West Side Story. The remarkable
fact is that, apart from the poetry, it gets everything right. This Juliet
is, as she should be, more mature than Romeo, and clearly a handful for her
parents. Romeo matures later and the piece is full of adolescent energy and
changes of mood. The fights, seemingly springing up from nowhere, are
convincing throughout.
The production owes a lot to the set, designed by David Short, and the
lighting by Michael Calf. At first it looks as if the play will be done
almost without scenery and props - in line with the modern dress. The main
device is the light: Calf manages to capture the shimmering Italianate heat
rising up from the floor. Yet the initial absence of props is deceptive. It
draws attention to the importance of the bed when it appears centre-stage.
And by the death scene at the end, the stage is almost crowded with tombs.
The performance runs in Manchester until March 28 and then tours a number of
leisure centres around the country. It is worth catching anywhere.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8620</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: Die Eroberung von Mexiko - Hamburg
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLEMENTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Wolfgang Rihm's commission from the Hamburg Staatsoper is his fifth work for
the opera house, though he has shrunk from calling them 'operas' and settled
instead for the more neutral, capacious description of 'music theatre'. But
Die Eroberung von Mexiko ("The Conquest of Mexico") makes a thrilling piece
of music drama on the grandest imaginable operatic scale, with its
requirement for orchestral ensembles to be dispersed around the auditorium,
pre-recorded tapes, a huge chorus, and singers and speakers in the pit who
'shadow' the voices of the onstage protagonists.
It also deals in big and intrinsically dramatic cultural ideas, chronicling
the arrival in pre-Christian Mexico of Cortez and his conquistadores and
their bloody subjugation of the native people and their beliefs. The
confrontation between Cortez and the Mexican god-king Montezuma is at its
core, and that clash of larger-than-life personalities was the starting
point for Rihm's libretto, which he has based upon Antonin Artaud's 1934
outline scenario of the same name. Other textual references are drawn into
the dramatic net too - the poetry of Octavio Paz, for instance - but in many
ways the treatment of Die Eroberung is far more direct than in Rihm's
previous large-scale dramatic pieces: there is none of the bundling of myths
and philosophical commentaries to be found in his Hamlet maschine and
Oedipus from the 1980s which, together with Rihm's Artaud ballet Tutuguri
from 1982, are the new work's likeliest precursors.
What is carried over from these works is the economy of dramatic means;
there is no clutter of superfluous characters to supply local colour, no
weighing-down narrative to impede the action. The text focuses upon
Montezuma and Cortez, the clash of masculine and feminine, animus and anima;
to underline that the Mexican king is sung by a soprano onstage (the
wonderfully eloquent and assured Renate Behle) and doubled by high soprano
and contralto in the pit. The Spaniard is portrayed by a baritone (the
light-toned, sympathetic Richard Salter) and reinforced by two narrators
offstage. The part of Malinche, the go-between for the Spanish, is taken by
a mime and danced with automata-like compulsiveness by Miriam Goldschmidt.
Though the synopsis identifies four distinct parts - Prologue, Confession,
Overthrow, Abdication - the action moves seamlessly, wonderfully paced. The
opening section presents a potent image of a 'waiting Mexico' dominated by
magic and intuition. The music and action grows steadily out of nothingness.
Percussion figures are tossed around the auditorium, muttering choruses
begin to well up are heard, and identifiable vocal lines begin to define
themselves. Elsewhere there is an astonishing range of vocal and
instrumental effects, always precisely focused - massive choral outpourings
(recalling the power and weight of Rihm's Dies, heard in London last year),
sensuous melodic lines wrapped around the entwined voices, fierce
declamatory explosions, threatening rhythmic chanting, snatches of consoling
tonality.
Without a complete score or libretto it was impossible to determine how much
of the detailed dramaturgy of the Hamburg staging that counterpoints the
musical scheme is part of Rihm's prescription, and how much the work of the
director/designer Peter Mussbach. After the horrors of Mussbach's Idomeneo
in Amsterdam last year it is reassuring to encounter a production as
visually stunning and dramatically cogent as this. With bold, simple
geometric designs and the use of primary colours, he never obscures the
action, and finds images that complement precisely Rihm's aural imagination.
Die Eroberung von Mexiko ends with the sight of a huge black cube, teetering
obliquely downstage; inside it are Cortez and Malinche, trapped in
irresolvable conflict, while the music fades out on a luscious,
unaccompanied duet for Montezuma and Cortez that seems on first hearing as
haunting as anything in contemporary opera. It is an important new work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8621</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: Purcell Room recitals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Not before time the South Bank is endeavouring to lift the image of the
Purcell Room. After years of this venue providing a bald platform space for
recitalists to perform in front of invariably meagre audiences, it is
getting a bit of a face-lift, with avant-garde works of art on the walls,
new curtains on stage and a few potted plants for evening events.
If this is the Cinderella of the South Bank's three concert halls, one can
hardly claim it is being dressed up for the ball. But then cosmetic
trappings like these will never count for much. The hall has good acoustics,
which matter far more. And audiences will only come if the programmes are
seen to be more enticing than in the past. I attended a pair of events last
Thursday and may have been lucky, for these proved to be two uncommonly
enjoyable recitals.
The first was at lunchtime, a Rossini birthday programme. As befits a
mid-day audience, it was made up of popular items, including favourite
excerpts from the comic operas and the Soirees musicales. But everything was
put across in the right spirit, light-hearted without being winsome. The
soprano Eileen Hulse, accompanied by Scott Mitchell, offered a few
nicely-turned songs and Yvonne Howard announced herself as a Rossini comic
heroine of noted promise, able to move her warm mezzo around with a real
sparkle.
Then, in the evening, came the first in a new series of song recitals. By
and large the artists who will be appearing are not established figures on
the recital platform, but this opening evening with the soprano Janis Kelly
has set a standard for the others to follow - not least in the style and
judicious touch of 1920s glamour with which it was presented.
The programme was an all-French one. It may be that the voice itself wanted
some of the glamour of the singer's appearance, but if that means that she
is prepared to work harder on the words to compensate, then it matters
little. There was no doubt here that we had a recitalist who understood what
she was singing and could speak the poems aloud quite eloquently if she
wanted to. The fast patter of her Poulenc Cinq Poemes de Max Jacob went with
a deal of the zing which is quite crucial to them.
The other virtue was an important one, shared equally between the singer and
her accompanist, Iain Burnside: they both understand that in the French
repertoire the less one does, the more the music is likely to respond. A
group of Faure melodies was successful because the songs were so simply
handled, just clear words and swift speeds, strictly no sentimentality
allowed. Satie's word-play in 'Dapheneo' and his Mad-hatter in 'Le
Chapelier' were dead-pan humour at its most killing.
On the surface this looked to be a modest recital, a shortish programme by a
singer not previously well-known in the field and schooled in a rigorous
style of interpretation, a few too many physical gestures apart; and yet it
delivered more than does many a lavishly-feted prima donna. At the end I
could happily have sat through it all again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8622</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Many people get upset if you say that Rowan Atkinson is wasting himself on
the prize twerp he plays in Mr Bean Rides Again. If you go further and
assert that his Blackadder series were better they ask what you mean by
'better' and point out that Mr Bean is hugely popular and wins international
awards. The same is true of Macdonald's hamburgers, and all you can say to
anybody who cannot see the superiority of Blackadder is that they may as
well watch the lesser series.
Another comedy which seems to me second rate is Evening Shade, an American
import which began last week on Channel 4 (8.30) with Burt Reynolds playing
a failed football coach. To call it syrupy would be an insult to Tate And
Lyle.
Horizon considers the studies of the sun that became possible during the
eclipse on July 11 last year (8.10 BBC2). Coast Of Dreams (9.00 C4) is the
first of a pair of documentaries dealing with life among expatriate Britons
on the Costa del Sol, today from the British pov and next week as the
Spanish see it.
In Panorama (9.30 BBC1) David Dimbleby chairs a debate about Scottish
independence, a subject which is going to bore the English to tears before
the Scots are happy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8623</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Arts: A chapel to remember - Architecture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN AMERY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A new building of European stature in England is a rare thing. I felt that I
had seen one when I recently visited the new chapel at Fitzwilliam College,
Cambridge designed by MacCormac, Jamieson Prichard  - the practice of
Richard MacCormac the current President of the Royal Institute of British
Architects.
Fitzwilliam College is situated to the north of Cambridge's city centre,
where it occupies a flat site of some eight acres. The first range of
residential and collegiate buildings were designed in the 1960's by Sir
Denys Lasdun. The budget was extremely restricted by the modest resources of
the University Grants Committee. As a result the long ranges of brick and
concrete buildings are functional but uninspiring.
The plan of the college, devised by Lasdun, was an intelligent one with a
spiral arrangement of college buildings around the centrally placed hall and
public rooms. The hall itself does provide a moment of architectural
excitement with its explosion of parabolic curved roofs soaring from a
fort-like brick base. More recently a new residential range was added to an
intriguing design by Richard MacCormac. This is now looking very well as the
planting grows around the window bays from a series of brick terraces.
The chapel is the latest addition to the college and is the result of a
generous private benefaction. It seems to me to be one of MacCormac's best
and most complex buildings. He had a difficult task to join a modest chapel
on to a Lasdun range. What he has achieved is a small creation resonant with
architectural ideas.
The plan is a circle joined by a bridging element to the flat end of an
existing block. The circle defines the whole building, immediately giving it
a strong but discreet character on the college campus. The chapel itself is
on the first floor and is reached by two curving staircases that gradually
emerge into the clear light of the main chapel space. This is defined by
four structural columns supporting a flat roof which surmounts a clerestory
of windows giving top light. In section, the chapel lies like a boat moored
between the staircases, apparently suspended in space. The impression of a
boat is reinforced by the swelling timber underside of the chapel which you
pass as you climb the stairs; you almost feel as though you are clambering
into the safety of a sturdy rowing boat as you reach the timber floor of the
main chapel, a sensation which is enhanced by the ships railings surrounding
the edge chapel. The altar stands towards one edge of the circle. Behind the
altar is a flat wall of glass giving on to a beautiful view of lawn and
trees.
I heard the architect talk in Oxford about his chapel and the symbolism of
its design. We are, when we approach the chapel, moving on a journey through
life that takes us into the safe haven of an ark which may transport us into
the after life. The boat-like form of the small chapel inside the thick
walls is a protected place where we can deal with grief and death and look
out into the only eternity we can see - the perpetual miracle of the renewal
of nature. This is an intuitive building, its mystical sensations made
manifest by the care exercised by the architect - and the craftsmen, who
built the chapel and made the joinery to such a high standard.
For once, here is a building that prompts a whole series of architectural
associations and influences. The circular form with cubic shapes inside it
has a long tradition. In 1553, Vignola built a cube with an oval drum at the
church of S. Andrea in the Via Flaminia, Rome. He was to develop this oval
design at S. Anna dei Palafrenieri in the Vatican later in the late 1560's.
Here the church itself is oval in plan, but set inside a rectangle.
Michaelangelo's Capella Sforza in S. Maria Maggiore in Rome (built to
Michaelangelo's design but probably completed by Giacomo della Porta in the
late 16th century) is a real precedent for the Fitzwilliam chapel. In plan
the apsed transepts are formed of curves which are less than a semicircle.
The whole design shows incomplete forms leading into one another - something
later Baroque architects, especially Boromini, were to understand and
exploit.
The flavour of MacCormac's chapel is, however, far from the Baroque. There
is more than a reminiscence of the work of Sir John Soane. This is seen in
the way MacCormac cleverly allows light into the building, through the
interstices of the various elements. Soane, too, was intrigued by the idea
of 'things inside other things'. The great glass wall that allows nature
almost to surround the altar comes from the famous students' chapel at
Otaniemi near Helsinki, in Finland, designed in the 1950's by Kaija and
Heikki Siren. There a glass east wall brings the rather melancholy world of
Finnish pine forests into the chapel. A large wooden cross stands in the
wood beyond, like something from a wintry painting by Caspar David
Friedrich.
Two other elements of the chapel are redolent of recent architectural
history. The whole sense of fine timber and skilled carpentry brings into
the mind the world of Frank Lloyd Wright's early houses and, perhaps more
particularly, the Californian timber houses in Pasadena by the brothers
Greene and Greene. The other element, the curved form of the brick walls,
seems inspired by the work of Louis Kahn at his Salk Institute at La Jolla,
California and his Government buildings in Dacca, Bangladesh. Mario Botta,
too, has recently perfected the form of the circular brick tower -
especially in his remarkable office 'castle' in Lugano.
This small Cambridge college chapel is an important and enjoyable new
building. Labels have been attached to MacCormac: he has been called a
Romantic pragmatist. I suspect that all that really means is that he has
taken advantage of the freedom of form and structure made possible by
modernism - and added to it an imaginative sensitivity inspired by the more
romantic strands of recent architectural history. Couple this understanding
with a very strong sense of the value of materials, and you have a
combination of geometry and feeling that is both remarkable and rewarding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13 Photograph Christopher Dunkley The latest addition to
Fitzwilliam College is the result of a generous benefaction. Richard
MacCormac has achieved a small creation resonant with architectural ideas
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8624</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Residential conference facility
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AF BUDGE (BUILDING) has been awarded a contract in Leeds for the
refurbishment and conversion (pictured) of the Grade II listed Weetwood
Hall, Otley Road, Leeds into a residential conference centre.
Set in nine acres of mature parkland, this development is due for completion
in spring 1993, and will be finished to high standards both internally and
externally.
The centre will provide residential accommodation, conference and lecture
rooms, banqueting suites and catering facilities for up to 150 guests.
Having originally acquired the Hall in 1919 for student accommodation, the
University of Leeds is now taking advantage of the growing demand for
conference facilities.
In a contract, worth about Pounds 5.3m, Budge will construct a three-storey
stone faced extension with pitched roof and hardwood windows.
The Hall, parts of which date back to 1625, will also be extensively
refurbished. This includes restoration of the external stonework, listed
decorative ceilings and wood panelling.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8625</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Hong Kong Airport development
project
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hong Kong's Provisional Airport Authority (PAA) has awarded INGERSOLL-RAND
an order for six large DM-M2 drilling rigs with a list value of around
USDollars 5m (Pounds 2.8m) to be used in the site formation contract for the
Chek Lap Kok Airport.
The drills will produce holes for blasting rock from Chep Lap Kok itself to
form most of the foundation for the new airport.
Excavation of 90m cu metres of rock and weathered derivatives will be
required, nearly one and a half times the UK's annual crushed rock
production.
The purchase of equipment for the site information project will aid bidding
for the 30-month contract.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8626</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Scottish hospital
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CEMENTATION PILING &amp; FOUNDATIONS has won an extension to its Pounds 618,000
contract for the Health Care International private hospital on Clydebank,
Scotland. The initial 19-week programme for driving the 1,500 piles involved
was awarded in August but has been extended to enable the driving of 400
precast piles for an adjoining hotel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8627</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Community housing scheme
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HUNT THOMPSON ASSOCIATES (HTA) has been appointed as community architects by
the Waltham Forest Housing Action Trust for the redevelopment of three 1960s
high rise estates. The three estates are Cathall Road, Leytonstone, Oliver
Close, Leyton, and Chingford Hall, Chingford.
Under the proposals most of the 2,100 high rise flats will be demolished in
phases and their occupants will work with the architects on the design of
the new two or three-storey homes which will be built to house them. The
appointment of HTA covers the preparation of a masterplan for the
redevelopment of each of the estates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8628</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Bristol foul water distribution plan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BALFOUR BEATTY CIVIL ENGINEERING has been awarded road, water and energy
contracts totalling over Pounds 12m.
Phase II of the Bristol northern foul water interception contract, valued at
Pounds 8m, has been let by the City of Bristol, agency for Wessex Water.
The work is to be carried out under a 130-week target cost contract and
comprises 3.1 kilometres of tunnels to carry the combined flows from the
east and central areas of the City of Bristol to the main trunk sewer in the
Avon Gorge.
Three different sizes of tunnel will be constructed through the sandstones
and mudstones underlying Bristol, using roadheader type excavation machines
mounted inside tunnel shields.
'One pass' smooth bore precast concrete segments 3.35 metres, 2.44 metres
and 1.83 metres in diameter will be used to line the tunnels. Sixteen shafts
varying in size from 3.66 metres to 7.62 metres in diameter and at depths up
to 23 metres deep are also required.
Work is also about to commence on the Avon Ring Road Stage 1B (II) contract
for the County of Avon. The Pounds 3.04m scheme is due to be completed by
spring 1993.
The contract comprises the construction of two kilometres of 7.3 metre wide
dual carriageway, commencing at the junction of Westerleigh Road with Avon
Ring Road Stage 1B(II).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8629</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Pounds 15m retail developments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ALFRED McALPINE BUILDING, the specialist management contracting and
design-and-build company within the Alfred McAlpine Group, has won over
Pounds 15m worth of contracts in the retail sector in the UK.
Three of the contracts are for Marks &amp; Spencer and total over Pounds 7m in
value. Work has started on the extension and refurbishment of a store at
Lancaster, while at Workington a shell is to be fitted out to provide new
retail space. The third project for Marks &amp; Spencer involves fitting out a
retail building at Northwich.
Alfred McAlpine Building is also undertaking a management contract for
fitting out a developer's shell at the new Buttermarket Centre, Ipswich, for
Owen Owen. The contract comprises 10,700 sq metres of retail space, offices,
storage and access facilities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8630</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Birmingham business park
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An office development on a Birmingham business park features in over Pounds
10m worth of new work won by TARMAC CONSTRUCTION. The Pounds 6.7m
development will provide office units in four separate buildings.
Since 1989 the company has been awarded eight contracts for the construction
of infrastructure and buildings at the park by the developer Arlington
Property Developments.
Tarmac Structural Repairs has won two contracts worth more than Pounds
500,000 each. Repairs are to be carried out to all columns and cross beams
including cathodic protection to a bridge taking the A4041 across the Tame
Canal at Sandwell for the Borough Council (Pounds 518,000). A swimming pool
at a leisure park is to be refurbished and repaired for Gillingham Borough
Council in Kent (Pounds 509,000).
Other contracts include the construction of gabion walls for a quarry at
Kendal in the Lake District for Tarmac Econowaste (Pounds 400,000); and a
car park and access roads for the Queens Park Hospital at Blackburn (Pounds
234,000).
The contract housing division has won a Pounds 1.2m order for repairs to
homes for Blairtummock Housing Association in Strathclyde and a Pounds
670,000 contract for the removal of balconies on housing blocks for
Clydebank District Council.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8631</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: Improving bulk handling capacity at
Hull
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Contracts worth Pounds 7.9m have been won by MOWLEM NORTHERN, a division of
John Mowlem Construction.
The Bentley office is working on two civil engineering contracts at Queen
Elizabeth Dock in Hull.
The larger project, worth Pounds 2.2m, comes from Hull Bulk Handling, a
division of Fernwood Holdings, involves construction of bulk handling
facilities, including a one kilometre raised conveyor on trestle legs and
pile foundations, connecting the dock to a stockpile area.
The second contract, at Queen Elizabeth Dock, is an extension to the
quayside road to enable development to the east. The Pounds 830,000 contract
is being undertaken for Associated British Ports.
Following the completion of a Pounds 3.5m design and build contract for a
European Research Centre at Ruddington Fields, Nottingham, for Ranson,
Hoffman and Pollard, Mowlem Northern's east Midlands division, based at
Nottingham, has begun work on another design and build contract at this
business park.
A two-storey office building, providing 30,000 sq ft at the entrance to the
park, will form the new headquarters of a major government department.
The Nottingham office has also won a Pounds 1.2m contract from the Derwent
Housing Association to build a 38 bed frail and elderly sheltered housing
unit at Swiney Way, Toton.
The Leeds office is engaged on a Pounds 1.2m sheltered housing scheme in
Meanwood for the Anchor Housing Association.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8632</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Construction Contracts: J. Sainsbury superstore
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WIMPEY SOUTHERN has won contracts together worth a total of more than Pounds
16m from three of the UK's major food suppliers - J Sainsbury, Nurdin &amp;
Peacock and British Bakeries.
The largest is J Sainsbury's flagship superstore at West Hove, Sussex. With
a sales area of 40,000 sq ft and parking for 650 cars, the supermarket will
be landscaped to enable it to blend into its green valley surroundings.
Elaborate brickwork detailing, clay tiled roofs and glazed walkways will
complement the design of the store.
Nurdin and Peacock is Wimpey Southern's client on the second of its three
awards - a Pounds 3m contract to construct a distrubution warehouse covering
8,900 sq metres in Brighton.
The third contract is for the demolition of various buildings and
construction of a steel-framed dispatch and ingredients store for British
Bakeries in Erith, Kent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8633</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Management: How to make your mark in Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A cross-border deal loomed; the Americans were flying in. But Volkert
Klauke, head of corporate finance at the Price Waterhouse accountancy firm
in Germany, was worried about letting his American colleagues loose in
Frankfurt without an elementary briefing on the differences between
Anglo-American and Germanic corporate culture.
Klauke, who joined PW last year after 10 years with Deutsche Bank in New
York, met the American team at the airport. Before they were allowed to meet
the client - or leave the airport - he gave them a lecture on how to succeed
with German businessmen.
Here are Klauke's observations and some practical do's and don'ts:
The adage that time equals money is taken more seriously in Germany than
elsewhere: time is valuable and is rationed out extremely carefully. The
more important the businessman, the more difficult it will be to gain access
to his time. As Klauke puts it: 'The importance of people is expressed in
terms of their limited availability'. Diaries are plotted out months in
advance. In some big German companies, board directors do not see each other
without making an appointment first.
It follows that being late for a meeting is more than an impropriety: it is
an insult. And it means that off-the-cuff meetings are out of the question:
you cannot ring up and say: 'Hi, I'm in town. How about a chat?' Klauke says
it is far better to write with a request weeks, if not months, in advance.
Do not try to change a schedule at short notice.
Germans observe a strictly linear approach to problem solving, says Klauke.
They will seize upon one problem and work on it step by step until it is
solved, rather than tinkering with a dozen problems at once and advancing
them all at the same time. 'Never give a German a whole lot of problems to
solve at once,' says Klauke.
German businessmen are highly sensitive to infringement of their personal
space. 'Space is at a premium here because there isn't much of it,' observes
Klauke. Open plan offices are rare and German executives fence themselves in
from each other behind solid, shut doors. Do not burst into an office, and
once in there 'don't grab a chair and sit down wherever you feel like. Don't
slouch all over a chair and don't try and rearrange the furniture,' Klauke
cautions.
Personal relationships are the basis on which business is done in Germany,
but they are exceedingly difficult to forge. Klauke says that it would be
unlikely that an employee of a German company would be invited to a
colleague's home until he or she had worked there for at least two years.
The only way to make friends with colleagues outside work is to play sport.
If you are too old, become involved in the arts world. In this way you build
the relationships and the trust which will, over the long-term, bear fruit.
This is one cause of Germany's fabled long-termism: businessmen have a view
to a lifetime working with each other. This makes it difficult for
non-Germans to be really successful in Germany, unless they are there for
life. Klauke cites the story of his near-neighbour in a salubrious suburb of
Frankfurt where many main board directors of German companies live.
The neighbour is the head of an American investment bank. 'You drive past
his house every day and after a while notice that he's often away during the
week, and he's rarely there at weekends at all,' Klauke says.
'You realise that he doesn't like living in Germany very much. It's unlikely
that he'll stay here for long. Germans think: why should we do business with
him if he's not going to be around in five years or so.
'He won't be around to live with the consequences of his own advice.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8634</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Management: Bending minds to a new learning circle - The
latest business fashion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER LORENZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Peter Senge looks and sounds rather like a younger, slimmer and more
respectable version of Jimmy Swaggart, the American revivalist preacher. He
is one of the most charismatic speakers around.
Yet Senge, a star professor at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology who
also has a consultancy business with a list of blue chip clients, disparages
charisma in the business world.
Most of the outstanding leaders he knows do not stand out in a crowd, he
says: they are often mediocre public speakers who fail to mesmerise
audiences with either brilliance or eloquence.
Instead, what distinguishes them is the clarity and persuasiveness of their
ideas, the depth of their commitment to their companies, and - above all -
their openness to continually learning more, both individually and in
partnership with everyone around and below them.
Senge (pronounced Sengee) is one of a growing cohort of evangelists for the
concept of 'The Learning Organisation'. Though its intellectual roots are
heavily European, and reach back into the 1940s, it shows every sign of
becoming the next American-spawned management fashion after 'total quality',
time-based competition, and 'change management'.
The notion is potentially extremely powerful, although its ambitious nature
increases the chance that, like most management fads, companies will rush to
adopt it in a half-baked way.
It rests on the argument that, in an age when quality, technology and
variety are all becoming widely available at relatively low cost, the only
sustainable competitive advantage that a company can create may be the
ability to learn faster than its rivals and to anticipate changes in the
business environment.
The concept has various degrees of depth and breadth, simplicity and
complexity, according to which pundit one follows.
In essence, a 'learning organisation' is considered to be one which:
encourages continuous learning and knowledge generation at all levels; has
processes which can move knowledge around the organisation easily to where
it is needed; and can translate that knowledge quickly into changes in the
way the organisation acts, both internally and externally.
As Senge puts it, such an organisation is one 'that is continually expanding
its capacity to create its future'. Hence his view, in common with many
other academics and consultants, that good 1990s leadership has less to do
with the 1980s muscular virtues of intuitive charisma and visionary strategy
than with the quieter ones of what he calls 'organisational design,
stewardship and teaching'.
To Senge, model 'learning organisations' include Hanover Insurance, a New
England company, Herman Miller, the mid-west furniture maker, and Analog
Devices, a Massachusetts microchip manufacturer. In many respects, he also
admires the way Shell, the European oil giant, manages its learning process.
Senge's prescription of what it takes to build and sustain such a paragon is
contained in a book called 'The Fifth Discipline - The Art and Practice of
The Learning Organisation'. It was one of 1991's best-selling business books
in the US and has just been published in Europe*.
To Senge, five interrelated disciplines need to be fostered among
individuals and groups in an organisation if it is to reach the heights of
Hanover Insurance and the others:
SYSTEMS THINKING
Though he deals with this first in the book, and in by far the greatest
depth - he is, after all, a professor of systems thinking - he actually
calls this the 'fifth discipline'.
As Senge says, individuals and organisations in all walks of life tend to
focus only on one or two obvious parts of a problem, rather than on its
entire 'system'. Hence their tendency to choose simple explanations and
'solutions'.
Systems thinking, on the other hand, draws from a century of theory and
practice to provide a set of techniques which help people to 'see the
whole': to perceive the inter-relationships or 'structures' that underlie
complex situations.
Systems thinking also detects patterns of change over time, so that people
can cease taking what Senge calls 'snapshots', and come to see that cause
and effect are seldom close in time. Systems thinking also helps people
realise that the most obvious solutions usually fail to work; a perfect
example is Britain's 1970s rent control legislation, which simply dried up
the supply of private rented accommodation.
Senge illustrates the effect of systems thinking - and the lack of it - very
effectively through several examples, from the arms race and environmental
pollution to a business simulation game played at MIT.
This demonstrates the disastrous effects that can be experienced by the
various links in a brewing production, distribution and retailing chain (or
'system') when each link makes entirely independent decisions on levels of
ordering and supply, without any knowledge or understanding of what
decisions are being taken by other links. Optimising sub-systems in this way
works only when demand is stable. When it rises or falls, the knock-on
effect on the entire system is panic, crisis and chaos.
One of the other keys to systems thinking, Senge suggests, is the ability to
recognise structures that occur repeatedly. He provides nine detailed
examples of 'systems archetypes', or 'generic structures', that occur time
and again in private and organisational life.
PERSONAL MASTERY.
A ghastly term, this translates as 'personal growth and learning'. Among
other points under this heading, Senge stresses the importance of intuition
to systems thinking; denies that change only occurs in the face of crisis;
and warns of the dangers of 'empowering' people before they have learned at
least some of the other disciplines.
MENTAL MODELS
These are deeply engrained, often subconscious, assumptions which affect
what we think about people, situations and organisations, often creating
contradictions between what we say and do.
Senge suggests that a General Motors' belief that cars are basically about
styling, rather than performance, has impeded any real cultural and
strategic change at the car giant. And he makes much of Shell's use of
scenario planning since the 1970s to challenge its managers' comfortable
assumptions about how the company and the oil world worked.
With the help of one of Senge's mentors, the widely influential Chris
Argyris of Harvard, Hanover Insurance has used the concept of mental models
as a key part of its process of organisational learning.
SHARED VISION.
This must not, as it is so often, be imposed, since it will at best command
compliance - not commitment. That will actually discourage people in the
organisation from learning - as may charismatic leadership by a very strong
individual.
TEAM LEARNING
Some theorists argue that learning can be done only by individuals, not by
teams - nor organisations, for that matter. Senge dissents.
Borrowing from Argyris, he outlines various 'defensive routines' which
impede learning within teams, and can 'reduce to 63 the collective IQ of a
team of managers with individual IQs above 120'.
All five disciplines are obviously powerful in themselves, let alone in
combination. But Senge's claim that they are all integrated by the fifth,
systems thinking, is arguable. Surprisingly for a professor of this subject,
his book does not actually contain a model of how an organisation learns;
instead, it is full of helpful systems thinking models.
Senge also draws inadequately on the wealth of past European research into
systems thinking and learning organisations: his is a very American
approach, yet it also omits at least one of the keys to Argyris' work: a
much-quoted concept known as 'double loop learning'.
All the same, Senge has accomplished the praiseworthy task of popularising
both systems thinking and 'the learning organisation' for the wider business
public. Characteristically, he does so on the page, almost as much as in
person, in charismatic fashion.
*Century Business Pounds 20/Doubleday Dollars 25
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11 Photograph Peter Senge, one of a growing cohort of
evangelists for the concept of 'The Learning Organisation' (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8635</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Labour attack over opt-out schools
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR alleged yesterday that the Pounds 25m allocated by the government for
improving technology facilities in state schools has become a further unfair
subsidy for schools that have opted out of local authority control.
The Department of Education has announced that 20 per cent of the Pounds 25m
intended for 1992-93 will go to the opted-out, or grant-maintained sector,
which contains only 3.5 per cent of secondary schools.
Such schools already receive favourable capital funding allocations from the
government. They also benefit from a funding formula which obliges local
education authorities to top up the school's budgets by an extra 16 per
cent. That is intended to meet administration costs no longer provided by
the local authority, and is fixed irrespective of the costs incurred.
In the approach to the election the latest figures will fuel controversy
that the government is seeking to 'bribe' schools to break free from local
authorities.
Mr Derek Fatchett, a Labour education spokesman, said: 'These figures
illustrate the government's double standards in education. We need to
improve resources for technology teaching, but there can be no justification
for giving nearly seven times as much to children in grant-maintained
schools.'
In recent reports on school technology teaching school inspectors criticised
standards. 'Few pupils had acquired the full range of competencies required
by the national curriculum', they said, citing 'many instances' of poor
facilities, lack of space for practical work and cramped teaching areas.
Mr Kenneth Clarke, education secretary, is keen to see most secondary
schools opt out of local authority con-trol within two or three years of the
coming general election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8636</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Weapons job cuts spark Israeli protest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOUSANDS of workers yesterday shut down production at Israel Military
Industries (IMI), one of the country's biggest state-owned weapons
exporters, with a one-day strike and staged an angry demonstration outside
Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir's office to protest at plans for heavy
lay-offs at the loss-making company.
The unrest at IMI, best known for producing the Uzi sub-machine gun, follows
a steep decline in the fortunes of Israel's military manufacturers,
contributing to a 2 per cent fall in overall exports last year.
It is also an uncomfortable sign for Mr Shamir's government, which faces a
general election in June, of growing unease over unemployment, which has
climbed to more than 10 per cent of the workforce under the strain of mass
Jewish immigration from the former Soviet Union.
Mr Shamir and Mr Moshe Arens, the defence minister, held an unscheduled
meeting with the IMI workers' leaders after some 7,000 demonstrators forced
their way through police lines up to the door of the Prime Ministry,
injuring three policemen and damaging several cars in the process.
The two ministers agreed to seek ways of preventing the implementation of
plans by IMI - which exports 60 per cent of production - to dismiss up to
1,500 of its 9,000-strong workforce. The defence ministry has already
backtracked on plans to buy two types of ammunition overseas because of high
prices at IMI.
IMI has slimmed down from 15,000 workers in 1985. In 1991, projected losses
of Dollars 60m (Pounds 33.1m) turned into actual losses of Dollars 400m as
sales slid by one sixth to Dollars 500m. Exports to the US were halved to
Dollars 70m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8637</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / South Africa's master of the strategic compromise: Cyril
Ramaphosa, ANC secretary-general, is instrumental in shaping a
post-apartheid society
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE African National Congress is willing to make major concessions on the
issue of multi-racial power sharing in a post-apartheid South Africa, which
could form the basis of an eventual deal on a new democratic constitution.
Mr Cyril Ramaphosa, ANC secretary-general, said in an interview that a
post-apartheid ANC government would rule in coalition with the mainly white
National Party, the current ruling party, even if the ANC won a large
majority of votes.
The 39-year-old Mr Ramaphosa is the most important black leader in South
Africa apart from ANC President Nelson Mandela. When it comes to ANC policy,
his influence not only rivals, but possibly exceeds, that of the
septuagenarian Mr Mandela.
It might be argued that South Africans would not now be pushing forward to
all-party interim government if it were not for Mr Ramaphosa. When he took
over as secretary-general last July, the ANC and Pretoria were locked in a
fruitless dispute over violence. He insisted that talks on a new
constitution begin immediately, dropping the pre-condition (imposed by Mr
Mandela, among others) that certain obstacles first be removed. A man of
easy charm and humour, he quickly won the trust of his interlocutors.
As a former trade unionist, he is a master of the strategic compromise. True
to form, he used an interview with the Financial Times to offer significant
concessions to the ruling National Party.
On a coalition with the National party, he concedes: 'We would agree, soon
after a new constitution is adopted, you may well need to bring in people
from other parties into government.' He speaks in the soft and deliberate
voice, devoid of arrogance, which makes him such a favourite among senior
Nationalists. He cites the example of Zimbabwe, where white ministers held
key portfolios in the first post-independence government.
Coalition government is the National party's bottom line, and he knows it.
But the Nationalists are demanding much more than Mr Ramaphosa is willing to
give: they want rule by coalition entrenched in the constitution; the ANC
leader insists it should be voluntary.
'We would be quite vehemently opposed to a situation where we would be
forced to get into a coalition government with any party ..our view is that
forced marriages don't work.' He believes that coalitions will arise
naturally out of South Africa's political and ethnic diversity.
The Nationalists want more security than that, to prevent domination by the
black population: South Africa, including the nominally independent
'homelands', has 28m blacks and only 5m whites.
Mr Ramaphosa has an offer to make in this regard as well: 'You need a
constitution which has sufficient checks and balances to prevent one
dominant party exercising power all on its own.' But checks and balances are
not all he is offering: 'you could have a system where you share power by
saying that on certain clauses of the constitution - amending the
constitution or taking particular decisions - you would require ..a majority
which would need the agreement of other parties in parliament.'
'That could well be a permanent feature in a constitution  .. the type of
feature that could give comfort to those parties that feel they could be
marginalised by a majority party.'
That would depend, of course, on the areas subject to joint decision-making.
Here Mr Ramaphosa is surprisingly flexible: he suggests that the budget
might be one such area.
On the issue of devolution of power to the regions - one of the main planks
in Nationalist strategy - Mr Ramaphosa is conciliatory; as a liberation
movement, the ANC clings to the vision of a popular grassroots democracy
requiring maximum devolution. But he knows that the Nationalists want
devolution so that they can weaken a central government dominated by the
ANC, and to enable them to retain what he calls 'pockets of apartheid' -
white neighbourhoods where local regulations effectively keep out blacks.
That would be 'completely out of the question,' he says.
For the moment, forming an interim government is the priority. The ANC
proposes a council of state to make policy, while ministers continue to run
their departments; Pretoria could probably agree to this. But Mr Ramaphosa
says an interim parliament/constituent assembly would have to be unicameral,
with no special weighting for minorities; the government wants a bicameral
body, with an upper house where minorities have veto power.
'That could well be the crunch point,' says Mr Ramaphosa. 'We can only think
of one method of election, that is one person one vote on a common voters
roll based on proportional representation.'
On economic policy, there is likely to be even less common ground between
Pretoria and the ANC - despite recent reassurances from Mr Mandela that the
ANC has outgrown nationalisation. The ANC president may have realised the
dangers of preaching nationalisation - foreign investors on his recent
overseas trip clearly shocked him with the vehemence of their opposition -
but other ANC leaders have learned no such lesson.
Mr Ramaphosa could well prove Mr Mandela's sternest opponent on the issue
when the ANC meets for an economic conference in April. He refuses to
comment on economic questions - mindful, no doubt, that contradictory
statements on debt repayments (from him and Mr Mandela) have hurt the ANC's
image. But he is understood to describe himself privately as a socialist.
However, Mr Ramaphosa is not without humour on the matter. He drew attention
to a framed cartoon on his office wall: it shows him flogging a dead horse
labelled 'investment' and shouting 'That'll teach you] Now giddup]'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5 Photograph Ramaphosa, willing to make major concessions on
power sharing (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8638</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Iran looks to Islamic alliance in west Asia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TEHRAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAN yesterday said the inaugural summit with Turkey, Pakistan and former
Soviet Moslem states was a first step towards an Islamic economic and
political alliance in south-west Asia, Reuter reports from Tehran.
President Ali Akbar Hashemi Rafsanjani said shortly before opening the
two-day summit it was 'natural' for the emerging republics of former Soviet
central Asia to turn to the three founder-members of the Economic
Co-operation Organisation (ECO).
The ECO hopes the inclusion of Azerbaijan, Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan, and
possibly Tajikistan, will inject new life into a group that has existed
unobtrusively since its creation 27 years ago by Tehran, Ankara and
Islamabad.
The leaders of the traditionally Moslem former Soviet states of
Turkmenistan, Azberbaijan, Kirgizia and Khazakstan are attending the
meeting.
Apart from taking in new members, the meeting is likely to approve a 10 per
cent lowering of tariff barriers between Turkey, Iran and Pakistan and to
discuss steps towards freer trade and movement of people.
The meeting will also offer an opportunity to discuss regional disputes such
as the civil war in Afghanistan and the conflict between Armenia and
Azerbaijan over Nagorno-Karabakh.
Iran, Pakistan and Turkey all say they support United Nations peace efforts
for Afghanistan, seen as another potential ECO member.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8639</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Algeria presses Gulf states for aid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY WALKER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ALGIERS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ALGERIA is pressing Gulf states and potential aid donors for up to Dollars
2bn (Pounds 1.1bn) in emergency assistance to combat severe economic
difficulties, which it blames for recent Islamic fundamentalist-inspired
unrest.
Mr Lakdar Brahimi, Algeria's foreign minister, visited Saudi Arabia at the
weekend at the start of a Gulf tour apparently aimed at securing Arab
financial support.
According to Algerian officials, Mr Brahimi is taking a similar message to
that put in Lisbon, last week, to his Portuguese counterpart, Mr Joao de
Deus Pinheiro.
'We need assistance right now,' said one official. 'If, tomorrow, there is
civil war, the instability will be felt everywhere, including Europe and the
Arab world.'
A state of emergency was declared in Algeria about a week ago after days of
rioting had left at least 50 people dead and hundreds wounded. The
disturbances followed the cancellation of a second round of voting in
national elections in which the Islamic Salvation Front (FIS) was certain to
consolidate a landslide victory.
Algeria's plea for additional help coincides with delicate negotiations with
its main creditor banks for the 're-profiling' of about Dollars 1.5bn in
short-term commercial debt.
Algerian central bank officials insist they are not seeking rescheduling,
but are asking instead for an extension of the debt's maturities to an
average of about eight years. About 85 per cent of the debt is owed to
Japanese and French banks.
Attempts by a core group of creditor banks, led by Credit Lyonnais to reach
agreement on a 're-profiling' package are being held up because of
objections by Bankers Trust of the US whose limited exposure in Algeria
amounts to about USDollars 20m.
It is estimated that such an arrangement would release about Dollars 800m to
help fund imports of raw materials, spare parts and equipment to spur
Algeria's recovery.
The government is finalising an emergency economic programme aimed at
solving Algeria's chronic housing problem and at providing jobs for an army
of unemployed young people.
Algeria, whose external debt totals about Dollars 27bn has been squeezed
since the mid-1980s by the collapse in oil prices.
Its economy - oil and gas account for 97 per cent of export earnings - has
registered negative growth in recent years, and its difficulties in meeting
its debt commitments have added to its economic woes.
Mr Mohammed Boudiaf, head of a military-backed five-man presidency set up to
rule Algeria, told the foreign press yesterday there 'may be 5,000 to 6,000'
FIS supporters in detention camps.
It was the first official acknowledgement that such a large number of
suspected FIS activists had been rounded up. Previously, government
officials had spoken of hundreds.
The authorities are known to have established several detention centres
outside Algiers to accommodate people arrested under the state of emergency
declared more than a week ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8640</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / China and Taiwan membership drive tests Gatt loyalties
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FRANCES WILLIAMS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A GAME of Chinese chequers is being played out at the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (Gatt) over the membership of China and Taiwan.
Negotiations on China's 1986 request to rejoin the 103-member world trade
body, stalled for more than two years, finally started to move again last
week when a Gatt working party began discussing a draft protocol of
accession. The talks were suspended in mid-1989 after Beijing's suppression
of the pro-democracy movement and a slowdown in economic reform.
The US and EC want further clarification of China's present and future trade
regime before they are prepared to begin drafting membership terms - China
is to answer written questions within the next few weeks. But Beijing's
renewed push for Gatt entry has been supported by developing countries such
as India and Mexico.
Trade officials in Geneva see a link between these developments and Taiwan's
membership bid.
Taiwan applied to join in January 1990 as a 'separate customs territory' -
the same formula used for Hong Kong and Macao, which are already Gatt
members.
Beijing has dropped its outright opposition to Taiwanese membership but
insists the island cannot join before China does. Washington, which is
lobbying for Taipei's Gatt application to be admitted, says there can be no
link between the two sets of negotiations.
Taiwan's candidacy is supported by Gatt's industrialised members. But
developing nations have been reluctant to give their backing without
Beijing's sanction.
The most likely outcome of behind-the-scenes discussions now under way in
Gatt is an understanding with Beijing that, while there can be no formal
linkage, negotiations on Chinese membership will be intensified. If all goes
according to plan, Gatt's governing council will decide next month to
establish a working party on Taiwan's membership application.
Since Taiwan is a market economy that has already taken steps to liberalise
trade, drafting its accession protocol could in theory be completed within a
year. This scarcely looks feasible for China, which will need special rules
written into its terms of entry to take account of its planned economy.
The next meeting of the China working party is likely to be held this
spring.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8641</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / The European Market: Dual-use goods expose EC export control
disparities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE success of the single European market depends partly on how far
governments are prepared to trust their Community neighbours; and nowhere
will this be more important than on issues of external trade.
Concern over the quality of countries' export control systems is being
brought into focus by the European Commission's plans to tear down internal
barriers to the export of so-called 'dual-use' goods and technologies, which
can be used for civilian or strategic purposes.
The Treaty of Rome allows member states to maintain as many restrictions on
the trade in weapons as they think necessary. But until now national
controls have also been applied to dual-use goods and technologies, even if
they are only being traded between EC member states.
Accepted international definitions of such products - which are not covered
by the arms-trade treaty clause - have embraced items as diverse as personal
computers, machine tools and airliners.
Movement of dual-use products within the Community may account for between 5
and 8 per cent of intra-EC trade, but neither the Commission nor industry
has reliable figures. Both appreciate, however, that the administrative
burden alone is hampering free trade, not only between genuine buyers and
sellers within the Community, but between project partners which have to
'export' and 'import' dual-use components across EC borders.
Mr Hanns Glatz, Daimler-Benz's representative in Brussels, says: 'In the
internal market, it will be increasingly difficult to stay national in the
development and production of dual-use technologies: you'll have to enter
co-operation deals and alliances across Community borders.
'As long as one of those countries is in a different export control system
from another, the one subject to the tougher rules will be excluded as a
partner.'
Progress towards a European Commission initiative on dual-use export
controls has been slow.
In 1988 the Brussels official collecting data on existing national systems
was thrown out of one foreign ministry on the grounds that it was none of
his business. Earlier this month, however, EC foreign ministers agreed that
expert discussions should begin on the abolition of internal barriers and
harmonisation of dual-use export controls, on the basis of a Commission
discussion paper which identifies a number of 'key elements' for any
legislation:
A common list of dual-use goods and technologies subject to controls.
A common list of banned or restricted destinations for such exports.
Common criteria for issuing licences from the EC.
A forum for co-ordinating licensing and enforcement.
Administrative co-operation between customs and licensing offices throughout
the EC.
Pushing ahead, European companies would like to extend any free market in
dual-use goods and technologies to Scandinavia and other members of the
European Free Trade Association (Efta). The Commission is restricting itself
to solving the problems caused by EC controls for the time being, but there
is a strong international dimension to its plans.
A common EC list of products would probably encompass those drawn up under
existing international agreements. EC policy on exports beyond Community
borders would also correspond with US thinking on export controls, which has
gradually shifted from preoccupation with west-east controls to more complex
concerns about restricting global proliferation of dual-use technology.
But although much of the hard work has been done in other forums, the
practical difficulties which remain are enormous. The transparency of
national policies - whether lists are published, for example, or even
available - varies from country to country, as do the penalties for
infringing the rules. Some member states levy fines of Ecu16,000 (Pounds
11,400); some have no limit or recommend imprisoning offenders for up to
seven years.
At the moment the Commission is maintaining its light touch in this
sensitive area, allowing member states to debate the main political issues
between themselves.
This is the strategy of informal consultation described by national
officials as 'a model of how to develop Community policy', but characterised
slightly differently by one Brussels official: 'The member states are making
an effort to reach agreement between themselves, partly because they want to
keep the Commission out.'
The Commission may decide to step in if such discussion results in the
harmonised and simplified licence for intra-EC trade suggested by some
member states. Brussels fears such a move would restrict access to the
internal market and actually increase the administrative burden on EC
companies.
The Commission's timetable - legislation by early autumn, implementation by
the end of the year - is ambitious, possibly too ambitious according to some
northern member states which doubt whether their EC partners will manage to
bring their export control systems up to scratch in 11 months.
Even the Commission concedes in its paper that some member states 'have less
sophisticated control systems and little practical experience, up to the
present, in operating controls'.
If that situation does not change quickly, EC members will be reluctant to
take their neighbours' efficiency on trust alone when barriers come down on
January 1 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Illustration (Omitted). Photograph On the move, shipments of
dual-use products within the Community may account for between 5 and 8 per
cent of intra-EC trade (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8642</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Brittan to step up calls forJapanese market access
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SIR Leon Brittan, the EC competition and financial services commissioner,
will today renew pressure on Japan to provide genuine equal access to its
markets for EC financial institutions, when he addresses the Japanese
Financial Services Institute in Tokyo, writes Andrew Hill in Brussels.
During his six-day visit to Japan Sir Leon is also expected to criticise the
international drift towards bilateral trade agreements, such as that between
Tokyo and the US.
Since Sir Leon's last visit to Japan a year ago, the Community has issued a
joint declaration with Japan which called for 'equitable access' to both
markets and set up a framework for regular high-level political contacts.
The EC and Japan also reached agreement on plans to open the Community
market fully to Japanese car imports by 1999.
Sir Leon is expected to praise progress made by Tokyo in removing obstacles
to foreign companies and enforcing competition powers. But in meetings with
politicians and business leaders he will stress the need for Japan to
continue the process.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8643</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Russian oil workers lower output to press demands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
STRIKING oil workers in Russia's northern region of Komi have halted
one-tenth of their oil production to press demands for the freeing of energy
prices, special tax benefits, and improved supplies of industrial equipment,
food and consumer goods.
Itar-Tass news agency said workers in the Komi autonomous republic, who
began warning stoppages at 96 oil wells at the weekend, had decided to
abstain from further action elsewhere until today, pending talks with the
government in Moscow. The shortfall amounts to more than 3,500 tonnes a day.
Oil workers in both Komi and Tyumen, by far Russia's largest oil producing
region, have been threatening strike action for weeks. They say the
government has failed to honour a promise by President Boris Yeltsin to let
them sell one-tenth of the oil for their own benefit. The government has
been working on a deal to raise workers' pay and eventually to free the
domestic price of oil, currently fixed at Rbs350 a tonne for deliveries to
the state.
Russian oil output last year is estimated at 461m tonnes, 11 per cent down
from 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8644</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Bosnia-Herzegovina alarmed at vice-president's remarks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
YUGOSLAV Vice-President Branko Kostic has said he would never allow the
Yugoslav army to withdraw from the republic of Bosnia-Herzegovina while he
remained a member of the federal presidency, Reuter reports from Belgrade.
His comments will alarm the ethnically-mixed republic which is due to hold a
referendum on independence on February 29 and March 1.
Bosnia-Herzegovina has a mixed population of Moslems, Serbs and Croats. Its
politicians fear that fighting between Croat militias and Serb irregulars
backed by the Yugoslav army could spill over into their republic.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8645</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Swiss reject tighter code on animal protection
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWISS voters yesterday rejected a proposal that would have tightened further
already stiff regulations on animal experiments, Reuter reports from Zurich.
Officials in Berne said a majority of Switzerland's cantons (regions) had
voted against the proposal, which had sparked one of the country's most
emotive referendum campaigns.
To succeed, the proposal needed the backing of at least half of
Switzerland's 26 cantons, regardless of the popular vote.
The drugs industry and government had said the proposal would cut
life-saving research and jobs.
Interpharma, an organisation representing Switzerland's world-leading
pharmaceutical and chemical industry, said the result was a 'clear
indication of the commitment of the Swiss people to continue as a leading
country in medical and biomedical research'.
A spokesman for the Swiss Animal Protection League, which launched the
referendum, expressed disappointment over the result but said the League
would go on looking for ways to improve animal protection.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8646</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Germany cuts transatlantic phone charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEUTSCHE TELEKOM, the German state telecommunications monopoly, is to cut
transatlantic call charges by up to 37 per cent, and will investigate its
entire tariff structure.
The aim, according to the group, is to bring its charges closer into line
with the demands of international competitiveness and justified costs.
However, the drastic cuts in transatlantic charges, which will lower the
cost of a three-minute call to New York from DM9.43 to DM5.98 (Pounds 2.08),
follow strong pressure from both US and German industry.
Deutsche Telekom, one of the last great bastions of state monopoly in
telecommunications in the west, has been under attack from customers for its
high international call charges, especially since both Britain and France
have reduced their transatlantic tariffs.
At the same time, Germany has faced US pressure to bring its charges into
line as it is one of the largest net beneficiaries in the bilateral pooling
of telecommunications income: far more calls are made from the US to Germany
than vice versa because of the disparity in charges.
Earlier this year the two governments agreed substantial cuts in the
'accounting rates', according to which the telecommunication income is
divided.
The Deutsche Telekom decision also includes the first step towards a
'radically new tariff structure' for leased lines.
According to the new structure, lines for longer distances will become
significantly cheaper while short-distance traffic will be more expensive.
The charges will come into effect from July 1, but will make no overall
difference to the organisation's income.
In a second step, however, Deutsche Telekom said it intended to reform
overall tariff levels for leased lines from January 1 1993.
The group also decided to increase charges for cable TV connections by up to
DM3 per home, arguing that the rate remained well below comparable levels in
Sweden and France.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8647</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Democrats counter Bush tax cut plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEMOCRATS in Congress have countered President George Bush's bid for a cut
in the capital gains tax rate with a proposal to index all future capital
gains to inflation.
The indexation plan forms part of a Dollars 90bn (Pounds 49.7bn) tax reform
package put together by Democrats on the ways and means committee of the
House of Representatives, Congress's key tax body, in response to the Bush
package backed by the Republicans.
While Democratic party leaders have opposed a capital gains tax cut as a
gift to the rich - they claim 70 per cent of the money would go to people
earning over Dollars 100,000 a year - it became clear last week that many
Democrat backbenchers favoured some form of cut.
Mr Dan Rostenkowski, ways and means chairman, tried to craft a cut that
would target middle income families by giving a bigger exclusion to those
earning less than Dollars 100,000.
But his committee opted for indexation, applied to all new assets except
collectibles, on the grounds of simplicity.
While indexation would still bring big benefits to the rich, a 1990 study by
the Congressional Budget Office showed that the gains realised by lower
income taxpayers contain a greater proportion of inflation than those
realised by the wealthy.
Many tax reformers have advocated indexation of capital gains on the grounds
that much of the gain is merely the result of inflation, and does not
represent a real income rise.
This was one of the reasons given this year by the US Treasury for the cut
proposed by Mr Bush to a top rate of 15.4 per cent for long term gains.
Congressional aides expect indexation to cost Dollars 3.5bn in lost revenue
over the next six years, and in the short term the measure might even bring
in some additional revenue, as investors roll over their assets to establish
a new base for indexation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8648</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / PLO condemns Israeli raid as 'state terrorism'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TUNIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
An adviser to Mr Yassir Arafat, PLO leader, said Israeli raids into south
Lebanon on Sunday were 'state terrorism' and showed the Jewish state was not
committed to the Middle East peace process, Reuter reports from Tunis.
Bassam Abu Sharif, quoted by the Tunisian state news agency TAP, said: 'The
crimes committed daily by the Israeli government in south Lebanon prove that
it is not serious in the Middle East peace process and is pursuing its
expansionist plans.'
'Israeli repression and state terrorism can lead only to further hostility,'
Abu Sharif added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8649</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Bank of Portugal attacks OECD report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK BLUM and ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LISBON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Bank of Portugal has dismissed Portuguese inflation forecasts made by
the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) in its
latest report on the economy as inaccurate and 'unhelpful'.
Mr Jose Alberto Tavares Moreira, bank governor, said the OECD's forecast of
10.5 per cent inflation for 1992 was 'clearly nonsense and imprudent' at a
time when the government is locked into conflict with public sector unions
over this year's annual pay awards.
'This will create problems internally. It is the net contribution of the
OECD in these negotiations and confused state of affairs,' he said.
The government hopes to keep inflation at 8 per cent this year, down from
11.4 per cent in 1991. Mr Tavares Moreira admitted it might be difficult to
meet that target, but said price rises would remain clearly below 9.5 per
cent this year.
In line with its target, the government announced just over a week ago that
it was imposing an 8 per cent pay settlement for public administration
employees. This angered public sector trade unions which have called a
one-day national strike for tomorrow in protest.
Mr Tavares Moreira said it was likely the government would not be able to
reach a formal agreement with the unions over wages this year, but that no
agreement would be better than one allowing excessive wage rises.
He also criticised an OECD suggestion to allow the escudo to appreciate
freely against other currencies.
'We think this would be extremely dangerous for the economy and would
jeopardise restructuring efforts in many sectors. The OECD suggestion that
we should completely free the exchange rate is unacceptable and goes too
far.'
Mr Tavares Moreira, also indirectly criticised the government's 1992 budget
which envisages cutting the budget deficit from above 6.5 per cent of GDP to
5.2 per cent this year. This is to be achieved mainly by increasing revenues
while current expenditures are set to rise by about 36 per cent. 'It falls
short of our expectations,' he said.
The bank has made control of inflation through high interest rates its main
priority, but he said there was no intention to tighten monetary policy any
further.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8650</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Overworked Americans
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Americans increasingly find themselves overworked and underpaid as they
struggle to maintain their living standards, according to a report by the
Washington-based Economic Policy Institute.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8651</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Friendship move
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Bulgaria's president Zhelyu Zhelev, a former dissident, will visit France
tomorrow to sign a friendship treaty.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8652</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Australian Bonds: Government spending plans raise concern
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE AUSTRALIAN govern-ment has become preoccupied with its forthcoming
economic statement, due on February 26. Most expect a fiscal stimulus from
Mr Paul Keating's Labour government; the exact details will determine the
market's direction in the coming months.
The government is under considerable pressure to reduce unemployment and
stimulate the recession-hit economy - especially with an election due by the
middle of next year.
Dealers and investors are waiting to see whether the government will
announce a spending package, whether these measures will be inflationary,
and if further interest rate cuts are on the cards.
Australia was one of the top-performing government bond markets in 1991,
helped by steadily falling interest rates. At the beginning of 1992, the
overnight market rate was 7.5 per cent, compared with 12 per cent a year
earlier.
However, since the beginning of 1992, bond prices have fallen. Overseas
investors, who made considerable gains in 1991, decided the time had come to
take profits, and US-dollar based investors in particular were keen to
switch out of Australian dollar assets because of fears the Australian
currency would weaken from a level of around 77 cents to the US dollar.
The result was a sharp sell-off in the Australian debt market. The yield on
the 10 per cent bond due October 2002 rose from 9.3 per cent on January 7 to
10.3 per cent by January 31. The Australian dollar had dipped below 74 cents
to the US dollar, although it subsequently recovered and at the end of last
week it was quoted at around 75.4 cents.
The economic statement is expected to include measures aimed at reducing
unemployment, which rose to a post-war high of 10.6 per cent of the
workforce in December 1991.
Although the unemployment figures for January (released last week) were much
better than expected, analysts warn that January figures are not always a
reliable guide and should be treated with some caution.
The seasonally adjusted unemployment rate fell to 10.3 per cent and
employment rose by 46,900 in January, whereas economists had expected
unemployment to be unchanged or even slightly higher, while employment was
expected to rise.
Bond yields rose on the news as hopes of an easing in monetary policy
subsided.
Mr Ralph Willis, finance minister, tried to reassure the financial markets
last Friday that the government remained committed to keeping inflation
relatively low, even if it boosts spending.
But the concern in the market is that a substantial increase in spending
would force the government to borrow heavily in the bond market and that the
resulting new supply would push bond prices lower.
At the tender of government stock on February 11, a total of ADollars 800m
was sold, consisting of ADollars 400m of the March 1994 bond and ADollars
400m of the October 2002 bond.
The amount sold was slightly lower than expected, although there is probably
going to be an additional tender in May.
The yield on the two-year paper - which was sold at an average of 8.119 per
cent at tender - is now 8.28 per cent, while for the 10-year bond, the yield
has risen from 10.085 per cent at the tender to 10.17 per cent on Friday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8653</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBQCLADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920217
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  17 FEB 92 / Survey of Portable Computers (13): Optimistic forecasts -
Pen-based Systems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCORDING to the famous saying by Baron Lytton (1803-1873), 'the pen is
mightier than the sword.'
The pen may also prove a more powerful tool than the computer keyboard if
pen-based computer systems turn out to be as popular as many manufacturers
and industry analysts now predict.
Pen computers come in several guises, although most are electronic tablets
which resemble a Victorian school slate, complete with a stylus or 'pen'.
The pen is used to write free text, fill in boxes or indicate sections of
diagram on the computer screen.
Such systems generate excitement because they enable the most
keyboard-illiterate, from the chief executive to the humblest blue-collar
worker, to exploit computer technology.
Pen computers are being developed in both the US and Europe. One of the
latest, from Momenta International of California, is a hybrid system,
incorporating a keyboard as well as a pen.
This, says Mr Mike Daly, former managing director of Grid Computers in the
UK, makes it ideal for applications such as business planning or for editing
and correcting reports.
Other types of pen PCs fall into three categories. Machines in the first
category are intended for vertical applications, where customised software
enables engineers, nurses or surveyors, for example, to gather data.
One application using the Gridpad machine, from Victor Technologies, part of
the Tandy group, is for crash assessors from motor insurance companies. It
uses the Gridpad to calculate the cost of repairs by displaying expanded
vehicle diagrams on the screen.
By touching individual components on the screen with the pen, the machine
automatically records the parts that need replacing. This data can then be
sent over a telephone line directly to a mainframe computer where the price
of the replacement part and labour costs can be calculated.
A similar package, to enable surveyors or architects to collect data on the
site of a refurbishment project, is under development for the NCR pen
system, by SurvSoft, of Weston-Super-Mare.
By indicating the appropriate component from the diagramatic selection of
walls, floors and ceilings that are stored on the hand-held machine, the
surveyor can build up a picture of the surroundings.
The appropriate measurements are inserted by calling up a calculator pad on
the screen and then indicating the appropriate figures. The plan can then be
fed back into the computer system in the office.
More sophisticated than these are machines which can actually recognise
handwriting. Although most of today's systems can recognise letters or
numbers, and can store signatures, the ability to use a pen PC like the
traditional notebook and pen is still some way off.
Mr Chris Fell, an analyst at information technology research group
Dataquest, predicts it will be 1994 before such systems become reliable
enough to find widespread acceptance.
The third category comprise the simplest systems, which are intended for
applications where a paper copy is required but where a printer would be
cumbersome or too expensive. One example of such a machine is the
ScriptWriter produced by Peripheral Vision of the UK. It can be used for
taking down an order, and leaving a hard copy with the person placing the
order.
Or it can be used by traffic wardens: as the warden writes down the details
of the ticket on the sheet of paper placed on top of the board, the pressure
registers the same information - car registration plate, for example - into
the computer memory. Once the warden returns to base, the details can be fed
into the main computer system. Because the application requires little more
than a simple form to enable the warden or salesperson to take down simple
details, these electronic clipboards are considerably less expensive than
their more sophisticated counterparts, and therefore are finding more
widespread applications with blue-collar workers.
Mr Bill Clough, president of Microslate, the Montreal-based pen computer
maker, points out that in North America the white-collar market is 95 per
cent saturated with computer technology while the blue-collar workforce is
only 11 per cent saturated.
In Europe the situation is different. Mr Alasdair Macgregor, UK marketing
manager for workstation systems at NCR, says that companies such as his are
aiming at the white-collar worker because that is where most corporations
will get the best return on investment.
One factor which could inhibit the growth of the market is any dispute over
the operating system used in pen-based systems. SurvSoft, for example, uses
'windows' software, so that pictures, or 'icons' appear on the screen. This
approach is being promoted by Microsoft with the Pen Windows version of its
popular Windows software environment. This will enable users to adapt
Windows applications developed for desktop computers for use on pen
computers. But many believe its lifespan will be limited.
More promising in the longer-term, believes Mr Fell, is the Penpoint
operating system developed by Go, the California start-up company. It has
been specifically designed for pen PCs, and is therefore a more appropriate
solution.
Mr Fell believes a dispute between promoters of the two approaches could
well be avoided, with the market moving progressively from the Windows
approach to the Go one. If this proves correct, then pen technology could
prove the next revolution in computing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII Photograph Pen-PC from Victor Technologies (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8654</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS PRICE and JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CLUTCH of UK and US economic indicators failed to revive dull and
directionless trading in stock index futures, writes Chris Price and Joel
Kibazo.
After opening at 2,526, the March contract had retreated to 2,518 by
mid-morning as independent traders unwound overnight positions. The release
of UK inflation figures helped steady March, although the revival was
tempered by the publication of poor UK output statistics.
But a disappointing opening on Wall Street following a weak performance in
the bond market dragged the contract lower, while the release of better than
expected US factory gate prices failed to impress.
However, March followed Wall Street's mid-afternoon bounce, and a brief
rally was seen before the official close. March closed at 2,530, down 5 on
the previous session and around 6 points above its estimated fair value
premium to cash of about 10. Turnover reached 8,416.
In LTOM, good two-way business gave rise to improved volume of 27,949
contracts. The FTSE-100 option traded 10,912. BP was the busiest stock
option, as traders continued to reflect on Thursday's poor results. It
traded 3,514 lots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8655</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Economic diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: The main opposition party in the former Soviet republic Moldova, the
Popular Moldova Front, holds party congress in Kishinyov, likely to focus on
issue of reunifying Moldova with Romania (until February 16).
TOMORROW: National Savings results ( January). Summit in Tehran of Economic
Co-operation Organisation (ECO) of Iran, Pakistan and Turkey, which have
agreed to admit three former Soviet Moslem republics Azerbaijan,
Turkmenistan and Uzbekistan (until February 17). Mr Leon Brittan, European
Community vice-president, visits Tokyo (until February 21). Congo's
constitutional referendum.
MONDAY: CBI survey of distributive trades (January). European Community
foreign ministers meet in Lisbon to discuss European political co-operation.
Financial Times holds conferences 'Cable Television and Satellite
Broadcasting' and 'London Motor Conference' in London.
TUESDAY: UK acquisitions and mergers (fourth quarter). Public sector
borrowing requirement (January). New Hampshire primary election to select
party presidential candidates, the first in the US for the 1992 election.
Institute of Directors makes statement on small firms in the UK economy.
South Korean delegation crosses the border village of Panmunjom to attend
the sixth inter-Korean premiers' talks (until February 21).
WEDNESDAY: Manufactuers and distributors stocks (fourth
quarter-provisional). Retail sales (January-provisional). US consumer price
index (January); housing starts (January); and real earnings (January).
Financial Times conference 'Television of Tomorrow' in London.
THURSDAY: Major British banking groups' monthly statement (January).
Provisional estimates of monetary aggregates (January). Gross domestic
product (fourth quarter-preliminary estimate). US jobless claims;
merchandise trade (December).
FRIDAY: CBI monthly trends enquiry (February). European Community holds
informal meeting of its environment ministers in Estoril (until February
22).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8656</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Retail price cuts cause sharp drop in inflation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, PETER MARSH and RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK inflation rate fell steeply last month as a result of deep price cuts
in shops hit by the recession, according to government figures released
yesterday.
The Central Statistical Office also announced a further fall in
manufacturing output at the end of last year, putting Mr Norman Lamont, the
chancellor, under more pressure to stimulate the economy in next month's
Budget.
In the 12 months to January, the retail prices index rose by 4.1 per cent,
after a 4.5 per cent year-on-year rate in December. The fall in the annual
rate was much bigger than expected in the City, and followed two consecutive
monthly increases.
A measure often taken as the underlying rate of retail price inflation - the
RPI without mortgage costs - showed a year-on-year rise last month of 5.6
per cent, after 5.8 per cent in December.
But the good news for the government on lower inflation, which it reckons
will provide the base for a broad economic recovery, was countered by a 1.2
per cent drop in manufacturing output between the third and fourth quarters
of last year.
With manufacturing accounting for just under a quarter of UK output, it
appears the non-oil economy contracted slightly or was flat in the final
quarter - the sixth consecutive quarter of recession.
Especially worrying for the government - whose record on the economy will be
a central theme in the election - are signs that the rate of decline in
manufacturing output is increasing. The fall at the end of last year
followed several months in which production had appeared to stabilise.
Mr Lamont said the RPI figures showed Britain was on course for permanently
low inflation, though he described the production figures as
'disappointing'. Earlier this week, other government figures had revealed a
big drop in factory-goods inflation and a large increase in unemployment,
indicating that the recession is likely to continue well into this year.
According to the CSO, the sharp fall in retail price inflation was partly
caused by exceptionally sharp price reductions in the January sales. Prices
of clothing and footwear fell by 5.1 per cent, the steepest drop since 1921.
A drop in petrol prices also helped to push down Britain's inflation rate to
a figure well under the 4.5 per cent average in the other countries in the
European exchange rate mechanism.
The RPI numbers were received coolly by Mr John Smith, the Labour shadow
chancellor, who said inflation was being 'suppressed rather than defeated'.
The economic gloom has heightened fears among senior Conservatives that
Labour will squash any Tory lead in the opinion polls and begin building
momentum behind its campaign for the general election.
Details, Page 3
Joe Rogaly, Page 7
Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8657</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: BP causes a spasm with its dividend -
London Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In 1981, ICI cut its dividend and the stock market shuddered, then shrugged
off the news. A less drastic dividend decision from British Petroleum sent
the stock market into rather more of a spasm this week.
ICI's decade-old dividend cut was significant because it signalled just how
dire the early-1980s economic recession would be. BP's decision - and a
slight rejigging of dividend policy by Hanson - similarly prefigure the
future, but in a slightly different way. They provide fresh examples of the
pressures on UK companies' dividend policies over the next few years.
On Thursday BP decided to hold its fourth-quarter dividend unchanged,
producing a rise for the year of 4.7 per cent, barely more than the
inflation rate. Robert Horton, BP's chairman, told analysts on Friday that
the company must ensure that dividend payments are covered on a replacement
cost basis. BP's replacement cost profits - that is, profit excluding stock
holding gains or losses - amounted to Pounds 72m in the fourth quarter; the
quarter's dividend payout will come to Pounds 227m. On that logic, unless
BP's earnings improve the dividend must ultimately come into question.
The outlook offers little comfort. 'Trading conditions for the first half of
1992 are likely to be broadly similar to those of the previous six months,'
said the company. Much therefore depends on the 'demanding cost and
profitability improvement programme' underway throughout the group.
BP shares reached their all-time high of 377 1/4 p in July 1987, just before
the October crash and the government share sale that so disastrously
coincided with it. The echoes of that event still linger: because the sale
went so badly, the Kuwait Investment Office was able to pick up a
substantial stake in BP, which the company later bought back, weakening its
balance sheet just at the moment when oil prices fell and the economy went
into a downward slide. In October 1991, BP shares were touching 354p, before
sliding to trade between 275p and 295p. On Thursday, the day the profits and
dividend were announced, the shares closed at 274p, a drop of 10p on the
day, but still more or less in touch with the trading range. The next day,
Friday, saw the real damage: Horton met the analysts and the shares had
fallen to 255p by midday. They closed at 255 1/2 p, their lowest since
January 1989. Since autumn 1991, BP has underperformed Shell by a quarter.
The message sent by the Hanson dividend development was rather different.
Hanson is switching to quarterly rather than half-yearly dividends, citing
the desires of its US shareholders. Shareholders will be unaffected, but a
timing adjument will neatly reduce the dividends paid in the year to
September 1992, and thus lower the company's advance corporation tax (ACT)
payments. Like many big UK companies, Hanson finds itself unable to reclaim
all its ACT payments because it hasn't enough mainstream corporation tax
against which to offset it.
Hanson's tax-management skills and ability to keep buying UK earnings have
kept this burden to a minimum. Other companies are under greater pressure.
The Hanson dividend switch tells us perhaps less about the company's
famously deft financial management than analysts' immediate comments
suggest. Instead, the lesson may be a more general warning of downward
pressure on dividend growth created by the interaction of four factors: the
UK's tax system; the country's high payout ratio; its worse-than-elsewhere
recession; and the high overseas exposure of its big companies.
In 1981, despite the ICI dividend cut (and FT headlines such as 'The City
shivers') the market closed the week of the announcement up 18.2 points on
the FT Ordinary share index. This week, the market closed at 2,513.9 on the
FT-SE 100 index, a drop of 3.3 points on the week. That understates the BP
impact - at mid-morning on Friday, the FT-SE was a fraction away from
breaking the 2,500 level. It steadied, however, and the recent trading range
remained intact.
One reason is undoubtedly that the imminence of the election has left the
City in a form of suspended animation. Neither good news, such as the
lower-than-expected inflation figures; nor bad news, such as a gloomy
assessment of the economic outlook by the Bank of England and
much-worse-than-expected unemployment figures, can break the trance.
As the charts show, the most recent two elections both show a pattern of
rising equities in the months before the vote. So far, working on the
assumption of an April 9 vote, the stock market has tracked its previous
pattern. It is now faced with a choice, however. If it is to replicate
recent form, the market might follow the steady rise of 1987 to the election
date and beyond. Or it might repeat the pattern of 1983, with a dip before
the election, then a recovery in the closing weeks of the campaign, and a
fall later on. In both cases, however, there was a steady downward trend of
trading volumes in the weeks before the vote. This year, that pattern seems
to have set in early.
One other striking feature of recent weeks has been the way in which shares
which have done best so far this year differ from those which have done
worst. Looking at companies of reasonable size, those which have risen most
seem to be ones away from the core of the market: medium-sized media
businesses, for example, specialised retailers and so on. Those which have
fallen most have a markedly more heavyweight character: the bottom 20
includes British Gas, Wimpey, General Accident, Pilkington, Ranks Hovis
McDougall, British Aerospace, Taylor Woodrow and BET.
When such key institutional holdings show drops of 10-20 per cent while the
market as a whole is rising 2 per cent, there may be more pessimism at work
than the broad averages show.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8658</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Long View: Professional fouls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE ARE no more vulnerable victims of fraudsters than ever-so-slightly
greedy old age pensioners, offered a little bit more for their money by
charming and sympathetic rogues.
Within the past few days Anthony Wheeler, a former mayor of Chippenham, got
four years for a Pounds 1.3m swindle and Peter Clowes was sent down for ten
years for stealing Pounds 14m (although investors would have lost more than
Pounds 150m in Barlow Clowes without government compensation).
Small investors may be a little safer for the confinement of these two, but
the honesty of the financial markets remains doubtful. Two Guinness trials
have collapsed or been abandoned, leaving much debate about the conduct of
fraud trials; Conservative MPs are threatening legal action against Lloyd's,
the venerable insurance market which was once at the centre of the City of
London establishment; and the plight of the pensioners of Maxwell companies
remains unrelieved - apparently the banks which received misappropriated
share certificates as collateral accept no obligation to return the stolen
goods.
Perhaps we should not get all this out of proportion. We are seeing a
temporary peak in financial crime which has emerged from the huge growth of
investment, borrowing and financial trading in the 1980s. There are
historical parallels with the scandals of the 1920s which led to the last
wave of financial regulation, including the Prevention of Fraud
(Investments) Act in Britain. The US Securities and Exchange Commission and
the Glass Steagall Act date from the same period. With the financial boom
over we can expect the level of newly-exposed fraud to subside quickly.
Public regard for the honesty of the financial markets may not be restored
quickly, however. We have fallen between two stools. At one extreme we could
warn the public that the financial markets were all fundamentally dubious,
and they should trust nobody. Alternatively we could impose a heavyweight
regime of restrictions which could guarantee the public's safety, at the
cost of crippling the flexibility and efficiency of the system.
We have chosen a middle course. Pompous regulators have set up expensive
structures, and bankers and insurance officials pose as paragons of virtue.
The public, however, has no easy way of knowing, in the wake of the BCCI
collapse, which institutions are sound. Moreover, compensation is a lottery:
Barlow Clowes victims have been repaid, even though they were strictly
speaking not entitled to be, while Maxwell pensioners are simply not
covered.
Defences are being hammered into place. This week officials of Imro, the
regulatory body which authorised Robert Maxwell to control Bishopsgate
Investment Management, claimed in front of a Parliamentary Select Committee
that there were no grounds for turning him down. If that is true then there
seems little point in the whole elaborate approach which has been developed
through the Financial Services Act 1986. Of course, it may not be true, and
it may be simply that the Imro men were, like most people, frightened of
crossing the litigious Maxwell.
Curiously, Imro has been much more ruthless in cracking down on several
leading investment institutions which have run into administrative problems
with their personal equity plans. They have been heavily fined because small
sums went astray. On the other hand, the much bigger problems which many
life assurance companies have had in administering personal pension plans
have gone entirely unpunished, because they are the responsibility of
another regulator, Lautro, which takes quite a different attitude.
These inconsistencies are unfortunate, but the real point about the trials
of Imro is that bureaucratic bodies of this kind are better at enforcing
well-defined rules than they are at dealing with slippery people.
Infringements involving misallocation of money or clear breaches of rules
can be detected by inspectors, whereas the suspect behaviour of individuals
normally has to be reported by someone and recognised as potentially
dangerous by a regulator.
Indeed, clients sometimes complain, but fellow practitioners or
professionals such as accountants, lawyers or actuaries seldom do. Nobody
shopped Robert Maxwell. Telling tales is not part of the City of London's
culture but, unfortunately, our system of self-regulation assumes that it
is.
Protection has a price. The public scarcely lost out through business
failures in the old London Stock Exchange before Big Bang. But this was
because the market was run as a cartel with generous commissions and the
ability to eject troublemakers. Once competition was introduced the old
compensation scheme had to be abandoned.
There is a particular problem when the professionals meet the public. In
professional markets, dealers are essentially trying to cheat each other,
within certain rather fuzzy conventions. When cases reach court it is hard
to define precisely what normal custom and practice consists of, and
dishonest (let alone criminal) behaviour is therefore almost impossible to
prove. Should the public ever blunder into this ethical pea soup it is
gravely at risk.
Few private individuals were exposed to the manipulation of the Blue Arrow
rights issue but more than 20,000 were tempted by the prospect of large and
easy returns into becoming Names at Lloyd's. By definition these are - or
were - people of substantial wealth. They trusted the professionals, and the
problem was not just that the professionals claimed to be honest when they
were not, but that so many of them actually believed it themselves. Within
largely closed communities it is too easy for people to take it for granted
that they are entitled to huge rewards for undemanding responsibilities. No
bell rings when greed becomes dishonesty. Perhaps the peak of the fraud
cycle is over. But in the end it may prove a mistake to try to impose
arbitrary standards of business ethics across a broad front. It might be
better to provide a restricted range of regulated and protected investments
and services and then to warn members of the public that they stray at their
peril.
But a warm smile, an obsequious manner and an extra percentage point of
interest might still collect quite a lot of money down Eastbourne way.
How to beat the cowboys: Page III
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8659</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / MCC pensioners face cut in benefits as scheme closes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN, Investments Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ADMINISTRATORS for Maxwell Communication Corporation have terminated its
pension plan, saying the company cannot be preserved and that there will be
no source of contributions to replenish those siphoned off by the late Mr
Robert Maxwell.
The move will probably deprive the company's employees and deferred
pensioners of benefits, leaving them to rely mainly on the State Earnings
Related Pension Scheme. Employees have been paying 5.75 per cent of salaries
into the scheme.
The independent trustee for the pension fund, Law Debenture Trust
Corporation, has said it will immediately begin a legal challenge to the
move.
The administrators for MCC, Price Waterhouse, have found that Pounds 40m of
the fund's Pounds 75m in assets are missing.
In a letter to employees yesterday, Price Waterhouse said that some parts of
MCC might find new owners and that this offered the best hope for its
employees. However, Price Waterhouse earlier said it would not give
preference to bids for MCC companies simply because they promised to honour
obligations to the pension fund. Pension contributions paid by workers in
January will be refunded.
Meanwhile, Mirror Group Newspapers said yesterday it would wind up its
pension schemes to protect its employees, and that it would 'so far as it is
able' protect all current and future pensions. A new scheme for current
workers would be established which would invest their contributions along
with those of MGN.
Winding up the scheme will force the government to pay a portion of the
pensions, known as the Guaranteed Minimum Pension, providing an indirect
cash infusion to the scheme.
MGN has asked British International Helicopter to contribute a 'substantial'
sum to the pension fund to cover the scheme's shortfall in assets for its
own employees.
BIH workers and pensioners are members of the MGN scheme, but the company is
a subsidiary of Robert Maxwell Group, currently in administration. The fate
of these pension payments is unclear, MGN said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Photograph What am I bid for the mirror? Leslie Weller of
Sotheby's conducting yesterday's auction of the contents of Robert Maxwell's
London apartment. Report, Page 8 (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8660</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Parkway shares went to Clegg relatives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRONWEN MADDOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIX RELATIVES of Mr John Clegg, the former chief executive of Wace Group,
and three people believed to be connected with them, bought 2.6m shares in
Parkway Group in the months before Wace bid for Parkway, the share register
obtained by the Financial Times reveals.
The share price of Parkway, which was Wace's main rival in the printing
services industry, had ranged from 26p in May 1990 to a low of 14p at the
end of July. It doubled on August 1 when Wace bid 28p cash per share.
Mr Clegg resigned suddenly as Wace's chief executive three weeks ago
following allegations that the company had links with the IRA. Both Mr Clegg
and the company denied the allegations, and investigations by several
security forces found no evidence.
During those investigations last year, the insider dealing unit of the
London Stock Exchange looked into share dealing in Parkway but found no
evidence of misconduct.
In recent weeks Wace's own internal inquiry has uncovered 'potentially
unlawful dealings' in Parkway shares. This is understood to refer to
'significant' new evidence which has been passed to the Department of Trade
and Industry.
Barclays de Zoete Wedd, Wace's stockbroker, was aware only of the purchase
of 75,000 shares when it was handling the acquisition but that discovery
aroused 'consternation', according to one observer of the takeover.
However, BZW completed the transaction after written assurances from Mr
Clegg that he was unaware of the investments in the names of James,
Christopher and David Clegg. Although they were his cousins, he said he had
not contacted them for years.
Wace and BZW were unaware then that Mrs Jayne Riley, whom Mr Clegg has
described as the cousin whose financial backing allowed him to buy into Wace
in 1983, had acquired 400,000 Parkway shares registered on July 12. She
subsequently has proved to be his half-sister.
Of those, 200,000 were registered in the care of the Anglo- Irish Bank of
Dublin. Mr Clegg, who was a director of AIB, resigned three weeks ago when
he left the Wace board.
Other shares owned by Mrs Riley were registered at an address in London NW2
shared by a Miss McHale, the owner of 800,000 shares at the time of the bid.
That has led to inquiries about a second address in London NW4 used to
register the purchase of more than half a million shares in the name of Mrs
McHale and 600,000 shares in the name of a Mrs Johnston.
Because BZW used the Parkway share register of July 26 1990 it was unaware
too of the purchase of a further 47,000 shares in Clegg names - James,
Vivienne and Christopher - registered on August 13.
The register, which takes between two and five weeks to incorporate
dealings, listed the three at the same address in Sheffield, Mr John Clegg's
home town. The later list also shows a holding of 250,000 shares in the name
of Mr Keith Riley, Mrs Riley's husband, registered on August 28.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8661</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / EC and Efta move closer to single market deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community and the European Free Trade Association (Efta)
yesterday broke the legal logjam that had been blocking the creation of the
world's largest single market, covering their 19 member countries.
The settlement of the remaining dispute over juridical matters brings the EC
and Efta partners close to the altar. But before the contract establishing
the European Economic Area (EEA) is signed, there could be further hitches.
An earlier treaty negotiated last October was thrown out by the EC's Court
of Justice (ECJ) because it contained a joint EEA panel of judges. The court
had complained that such a mixed EC-Efta court would undermine its own
autonomy.
As a result the EEA court idea was abandoned. Negotiators started again this
year trying to find another formula that would ensure reasonable legal
uniformity throughout the future common economic zone.
The European Parliament has further muddied the water by calling this week
for any new EEA draft treaty to be resubmitted to the court for its opinion.
The European Commission, which has negotiated the far-reaching EEA deal on
behalf of the Twelve, said last night it would decide next week what course
to take. The treaty has to be ratified by the European Parliament, plus
national legislatures of EC and Efta states.
The EEA could be short-lived, with many Efta countries applying for full EC
membership. For this reason, both sides have settled for a less than legally
perfect arrangement. They agreed:
A legal disputes settlement procedure, under which differences over judicial
interpretation of EEA laws would go to a joint EEA political committee. If
there was no agreement, and if one side chose to invoke safeguard or
retaliatory measures, then the other side could demand binding arbitration.
In the absence of any overall EEA court, both sides will exchange
information on case law.
Efta has agreed to let the Commission and the ECJ deal with virtually any
competition case of significance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8662</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow reverses early loses as
bonds improve
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
Equities tracked bond prices yesterday, reversing morning losses as bonds
firmed and ultimately ending unchanged, writes Karen Zagor in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down just 0.90 at
3,245.75. The index fell sharply at first, then recovered to post modest
gains by mid-afternoon, but succumbed late to sporadic selling in the last
hour and a half. The more representative Standard &amp; Poor's 500 finished down
1.20 at 412.49, while the Nasdaq composite of secondary stocks slipped 2.82
to 636.28. Turnover on the New York SE was relatively heavy at 216m shares.
Market sentiment was negative, with big board declining issues outpacing
those advancing by a margin of 915 to 771.
Bond prices exerted a strong influence on equities prices for a second day.
Stocks followed bonds lower in morning trading, when the benchmark 30-year
bond tumbled to 100 1/16. But as bond prices started to recover on
short-covering, equities also turned higher. In late trading the long bond
was quoted at 101, up 3/16 to yield 7.91 per cent.
The bond market's morning performance was dominated by reduced change of
another cut in interest rates and the pressure of absorbing Dollars 36bn in
new securities issued this week. But the market received some support from a
report that the producer price index had fallen 0.3 per cent in January,
although the core index rose 0.3 per cent, stripping out food and energy.
Auto stocks continued to benefit from expectations that the worst is behind
the US auto industry following better than expected early February car
sales.
Ford, which predicted substantial improvements in 1992 operating results,
climbed Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 37 1/8 and General Motors firmed Dollars 1
3/8 to Dollars 38. Chrysler was one of the morning's most active big board
issues, adding Dollars 1 1/4 at Dollars 16 3/8 after Kidder Peabody put the
issue back on its 'buy' list for the fist time since 1988.
Airline issues also moved higher, in thinner trading yesterday morning.
Delta Air Lines rose Dollars 2 1/4 to Dollars 68 1/4 , AMR, parent of
American Airlines, was up Dollars 1 7/8 to Dollars 74 and UAL, parent of
United Airlines, firmed Dollars 4 3/8 to Dollars 146.
Shares in Living Centers, a nursing home company, were quoted at Dollars 15
3/8 in heavy trading. An initial public offering was priced at Dollars 14
1/2 a share.
Salomon, the Wall Street investment bank, slipped Dollars  1/2 to Dollars 30
as news from the company's meeting with investors hit the market. Mr Warren
Buffet said he will stay on as interim chairman until the government
investigation is completed.
Canada
TORONTO stocks ended slightly lower, as a slump in the gold sector was
offset by a jump in mining shares.
Based on preliminary figures, the 300-composite index dropped 7.87 points,
or 0.22 per cent, to close at 3,573.89, with declines topping advances 303
to 286. The index was off 22 points, or 0.62 per cent, on the week. Volume
today was 23.30m,shares worth CDollars 259.1m, compared with yesterday's
28.92m shares worth CDollars 309.1m.
The gold sector fell 1.62 per cent on index, while financial services and
consumer products showed smaller losses. Industrial products and energy
climbed moderately, while the mining sector jumped 1.45 per cent.
Fishery Products International lost 1 to 6 1/4. The company said it will
implement temporary 'unscheduled downtime' at its processing plant in
Catalina, Newfoundland, and will temporarily withdraw 11 vessels from its
fleet. As a result of these moves, 1,005 employees will be out of work.
SHL Systemhouse Inc. said it plans to sell 11,159,773 common shares. SHL was
down 1/4 to 15 7/8.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8663</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Krupp clears last obstacle to
its takeover of Hoesch
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE last significant obstacle to Krupp's takeover of Hoesch, and the
creation of a DM30bn (Dollars 18.8bn) German steel and engineering combine,
was cleared yesterday.
The supervisory board of Hoesch instructed the group's management to press
on with merger negotiations after hearing that the link-up would offer cost
savings of about DM1.5bn over the next five years.
More than two-thirds of the economies would be made in the steel sector,
although no plant would be closed, Hoesch executives told the board, which
includes representatives from unions, shareholders and regional politicians.
Job losses, in addition to those already planned by the two companies, would
be limited to 1,800 from a combined workforce of about 110,000. From 1996
onwards, the new group could expect a 'positive contribution to results' of
DM460m a year, Hoesch said.
The merger is expected to be approved at the Hoesch annual meeting on June
22, and back-dated to take effect from January 1.
Krupp refused to comment on reports that it would pay for the outstanding 49
per cent of Hoesch through a share swap arrangement. But it is understood
that Krupp, which is privately controlled (only the Krupp Stahl steel
subsidiary is quoted), plans a flotation and to offer its new shares for
Hoesch stock.
There was concern in Germany yesterday that the relatively small job losses
might overload the new group with high wage costs at a critical time. Steel,
which accounted for DM12bn of combined sales in 1990, is suffering from the
world market slump. The companies' engineering specialities, including plant
and automotive components, are feeling the effects of falling international
and domestic demand.
However, the deal will give the new company critical mass in steel
production, with output almost as high as that of Thyssen, the country's
biggest producer, and synergies across a wide range of markets.
The merger is likely to be followed by a series of co-operation deals with
other companies. Krupp's two steel divisions, for example, are to be rolled
into one.
Hoesch yesterday responded to gloomy speculation about 1991 results with an
announcement that profits would be 'well over' DM200m, without specifying
whether they were before or after taxes. Operating profits in 1990 were
DM440m.
Claiming to be satisfied with the outcome, the company said all sectors had
shown improved results in the last quarter of the year. Even steel was
expected to break even.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8664</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Top Swedish banks downgraded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S two leading commercial banks had their long-term debt ratings
lowered yesterday by Standard &amp; Poor's, the US credit rating agency.
Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken (SEB) and Svenska Handelsbanken were rated at
AA and will now be AA-, writes Robert Taylor in Stockholm.
S &amp; P said about Dollars 30bn of SEB's debt and Dollars 802m of
Handelsbanken's debt would be affected. The changes reflected the
deterioration of the banks' asset quality, caused by the continuing
recession.
The credit losses in 1991 stemmed from the banks' exposure to the troubled
Swedish commercial real estate market.
S &amp; P added that Sweden's lingering economic downturn was likely to 'cause
further weakness in the property sector and elsewhere, prolonging the asset
quality dilemmas of both banks until 1994, and perhaps beyond'.
But S &amp; P said core earnings of the two banks before loan losses and
provisions continued to be strong, primarily driven by healthy and
increasing net interest margins.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8665</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Salomon closer to reaching a
settlement on bond offences
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SALOMON Brothers expects to reach a settlement with the US government of
issues relating to the Wall Street firm's illegal activities in the bond
markets within the next few months.
Mr Robert Denham, Salomon's chief legal counsel who spoke along with senior
executives to a meeting in New York yesterday of institutional investors and
analysts, would not specify what form the settlement might take. It is
likely, however, that current negotiations with government agencies will
lead to a series of fines and penalties being imposed upon the firm for its
violations of Treasury rules in 1990 and 1991.
Last year Salomon set aside Dollars 200m to cover possible liabilities from
the bond auction-rigging scandal, and government fines could take up a
significant portion of the reserve. The remainder will go towards settling
the 44 lawsuits filed against the firm by individuals and companies who
allege they suffered losses because of Salomon's misdeeds.
Yesterday's meeting, attended by Mr Warren Buffett, the billionaire investor
who took over as interim chairman when the scandal broke last August, and Mr
Deryck Maughan, the firm's chief operating officer, was aimed at restoring
confidence in the firm and explaining some of the changes that have been
made since last summer.
Mr Maughan took the opportunity to deny press reports that there had been a
wave of recent defections from Salomon. He revealed that 335 employees have
left the firm voluntarily since August, only slightly higher than the 326
who departed in the same period a year earlier.
Although Mr Maughan expected more departures following this week's special
bonus payments to managing directors (made under compensation schemes
launched in 1986 and 1988), he thought no more than 'five or ten' would
leave in the coming weeks.
Of changes made since last summer, Mr Maughan confirmed that Salomon has
stopped speculating in US equities for its own account to reduce trading
risk. He also said the firm reduced its balance sheet by Dollars 37bn (to
Dollars 100bn) between June and September to put Salomon's finances on a
more secure footing.
Mr Maughan revealed that the firm's business most damaged by the scandal was
US equity underwriting. The fourth quarter of 1991 was 'a once-in-a-decade
opportunity, and we were on the bench' because US companies were reluctant
to grant lead managership of stock issues to Salomon while it was under
investigation by the government.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8666</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: From baseball hats to antiques - Maxwell's
goods are sold: The sale at Sotheby's yesterday raised Pounds 430,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE MAX factor which drove the price of Robert Maxwell's shares down during
his life finally began to work in reverse yesterday.
The notoriety of his name drew a crowd that would not have shamed Oxford
United to Sotheby's yesterday for the sale of 'The Complete Contents of the
Chairman's Apartment at Maxwell House'. But it also drove up the price of
rather mundane objects as those seeking Maxwell ikons and mementos engaged
in brisk bidding.
Some of the briskest was for lot 285, a collection of hats, comprising three
baseball hats, one inscribed MCC and another GUVNOR, together with two
trilby hats, a tweed and some coat hangers.
'Someone's being sold a pup there. The best hats are already gone. Those
were just a few left over,' said a former Maxwell employee sardonically. Lot
285 sold for Pounds 1,100.
There was considerable interest in the Maxwell office desk, chair and filing
box. The modern black leather filing box with a brass plaque engraved
CHAIRMAN had an estimated value of between Pounds 80 and Pounds 100. It
fetched Pounds 1,300.
The chairman's desk went for Pounds 1,200 and his perfectly ordinary black
leather and chrome chair - though obviously strong - shot through its
estimated price of between Pounds 100 and Pounds 200 to bring in another
Pounds 2,000 for the administrators, Price Waterhouse.
Robert Maxwell's very large double bed didn't seem to attract the same
degree of interest. Mr Leslie Weller, the auctioneer, had to stoop to Pounds
500 to get things moving, despite the padded serpentine headboard
upholstered in red and and blue sprigged boucle material, with oyster silk
valance, box spring and mattress. It raised Pounds 1,400, only Pounds 200
more than 'A Large Sofa'.
The sale engendered enormous interest with queues out into Bond Street as
would-be bidders queued to register.
The event drew eight sets of television cameras and as Mr Weller did his
stuff quiet-voiced American reporters did their voice-overs talking of the
elegant and the personal.
For any business troubles there were also the shredding machines. A pair of
conventional shredders went for Pounds 220 and a desktop version was bought
for Pounds 400.
The grander items, antiques bought in to give the Maxwell apartment a bit of
class, sold well, but the unsentimental often didn't reach close to the
Sotheby estimates.
The top prices were paid for the mahogany three-pillar Maxwell Regency
dining table and a pair of George IV silver wine coolers, each of which
fetched Pounds 20,000.
The most expensive painting was from the Maxwell drawing room - L'Indolence
by Jean Baptiste Santerre, which went for Pounds 14,000.
Sotheby's then add 10 per cent commission on to all prices. The total raised
from Robert Maxwell's official London possessions was Pounds 430,000,
excluding commission - still ahead of the Pounds 400,000 estimate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8667</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: White heir is promised the crown - David
Clarke, eventual head of Hanson in the US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR DAVID Clarke, the 50-year-old president of Hanson Industries in the US,
yesterday named by Lord White as his eventual successor to the executive
chairmanship, said he would never forget the first time the two met.
On a freezing winter's day 18 years ago Mr Clarke, backed up by a small army
of lawyers and advisers, waited in a New York office to meet the man who
wanted to buy his family business, Seacoast Products, for Dollars 32m. Mr
Gordon White, as he was then, entered the meeting alone but with a terrible
cold. He immediately took him outside for a face-to-face meeting and bluntly
asked: 'David, are you sure this company is worth Dollars 32m?'
Mr Clarke believed it was. That was enough for Mr White, who bought the
company. Lord White, now aged 69, yesterday said he liked Mr Clarke because
he reacted well to his direct business approach. Mr Clarke, who had only
worked for his family business since he left New York state's Hobart College
in 1964, had given it to him straight, so he hired him as his deputy.
In 1975, Hanson Industries, which still only consisted of Seacoast, a
manufacturer of fish oil, experienced its worst crisis. The price of fish
oil crashed. Mr Clarke remembers warning Lord White that operating profits
were about to slump from Dollars 17m to Dollars 7m. It was then that Lord
White decided that he would focus more on acquisitions, while Mr Clarke
would focus on running the business.
By the following year Lord White had acquired Carisbrook Industries and
Hygrade Food Products, while Mr Clarke squeezed Dollars 3m of costs out of
Seacoast, and then Hanson record of increased yearly profits. In 1978 Mr
Clarke was appointed president of Hanson Industries, a post he has held ever
since.
One of Hanson's advisers, who has known the two men for more than a decade,
says: 'Gordon and David have built up an extraordinary relationship. David
looks to Gordon almost as a father, certainly for his inspiration, while
Gordon increasingly relies on David as he begins to take over more of the
day-to-day running of the US businesses.'
Mr Clarke says that Lord White asked him to create in the US the 'mirror
image' of the UK side of Hanson. To that end Mr Clarke built up a loyal team
at the centre who would descend on the companies that Lord White had
acquired and turn them round by cutting costs and rationalising the
businesses.
While Mr Clarke is fulsome in his praise of Lord White, describing him as
'the greatest motivator of people', he yesterday made it clear that, as
executive chairman of Hanson Industries, he would be different from Lord
White. Mr Clarke believes that profit increases in the 1990s will be
dependent on organic growth, instead of relying solely on acquisitions.
'This is the first year since 1975 that we are looking through a gun
barrel,' he says. 'If people are saying that Hanson needs another mega-bid
to grow, they are looking at it the wrong way. Commentators should start to
look at Hanson as an operating business. I would guess that the main bulk of
our profits this year will come from the running of our own businesses, such
as Cavenham Forests, Peabody Coal and Beazer.'
Mr Clarke was quick to add that he was not saying Hanson was shifting from
acquisition growth to organic growth. 'If there's a mega-deal out there that
is reasonably priced we should probably go for it. But it would be a mistake
to say that we have to do a deal.'
To maximise profits from existing businesses Mr Clarke has earmarked about
Dollars 300m (Pounds 165.7m) for capital expenditure, about Dollars 50m more
than last year. He is also considering what he calls bolt-on acquisitions to
existing companies.
If there is a lesson to be learned from the group's decision to take a 2.8
per cent stake in ICI, Mr Clarke says Hanson should be more open about its
'excellent' corporate governance. 'We have a director who has put on weight
recently. Lord Hanson warned me at lunch today that he (the director) was
putting too much salt on his meal. That is corporate governance at its
best'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Photograph Lord White (left) with David Clarke, whom he has
named as his successor as chairman (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8668</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Clarke revelation a lower priority for
analysts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MANY STOCKBROKERS' analysts left the meeting without taking in the
significance of Lord White's identification of Mr Clarke as his successor,
write Charles Leadbeater and Norma Cohen.
The implications of Hanson's decision to pay its dividend quarterly, the
prospects for acquisitions in continental Europe and the impact of the
Beazer acquisition upon the group's balance sheet were of much more
immediate concern. Overall, investors said the company had acquitted
reasonably professionally.
The off-the-cuff announcement of Mr Clarke's position as heir apparent will
probably have little bearing upon Hanson's share price in itself, although
some fund managers said it reflected poorly on the way the long-planned
presentation was conducted.
One fund manager explained: 'We were a bit stunned to hear Lord White's
announcement. At first we thought he meant the person who was succeeding him
as the next speaker.'
Mr Charles Pick, from Nomura, commented: 'It is helpful to some extent to
know who it is, but it is only half the riddle solved.'
The problem is that the disclosure of the identity of Lord White's successor
leaves Lord White looking like a lame duck, while also increasing pressure
upon Lord Hanson to name the person who will eventually take over as the
chairman of the group as a whole.
Most investors and analysts remarked that Lord White seemed more subdued and
less fit than Lord Hanson.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8669</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Lancastrian rescue takeover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LANCASTRIAN, a small, northern building society with 12 branches and Pounds
293m total assets, yesterday became the latest building society to surrender
its independence after making a loss.
The society is to be taken over by Northern Rock, the 11th largest society
with assets of Pounds 4.5bn, but the merger must first be approved by a
general meeting of Lancastrian's investors.
The Building Societies Commission, the industry regulator, stepped in to
organise a merger to protect investors under Section 33 of the 1986 Building
Societies Act, after it became apparent that Lancastrian was going to make a
loss of Pounds 1m this year as a result of losses on its Pounds 25m
commercial lending book. It is understood to contain few bad debts.
Lancastrian reported a loss of Pounds 1.5m on its building society
activities in 1990, but the group made an overall post-tax profit of Pounds
468,000. Its main problem is that its free capital ratios, at about 2.5 per
cent, are well below the 4 per cent industry average.
Several societies were invited to submit proposals for the takeover.
Northern Rock's main competitor is understood to have been Yorkshire. The
takeover will enable Northern Rock to expand its branch network and customer
base.
Other small societies are expected to disappear in next few months after
declaring a loss in 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8670</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK company news in brief
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CALDWELL INVESTMENTS, the USM-quoted textile company, is to fund expansion
in Romania via a 1-for-4 underwritten rights issue of 1.69m new ordinary
shares at 27p each to raise about Pounds 395,000 after expenses.
*****
JACOBS GROUP has conditionally agreed the sale of Jacobs Offshore to
Seascope Shipping Holdings for Pounds 5.25m cash. Jacobs will also subscribe
Pounds 1.25m cash for 1.25m, 5 per cent redeemable preference of Pounds 1
each in Seascope.
*****
LANGSIDE HIRE has acquired from Moss Bros the Dormie brand name, together
with full agency and concessionary licence rights.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8671</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Piqued on the peaks: The off-piste financial problems at the
Winter Olympics in Albertville
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, ALICE RAWSTHORN and RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ALBERTVILLE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A momentous first week of the Winter Olympics in Albertville ends today:
records have been set and buckets of tears shed. The Games used to be dogged
by political imbroglios; now commercial questions are causing off-piste
problems.
For the French the spectacle of a Winter Olympics on Gallic soil, or snow,
has been greeted with characteristic panache. A son et lumiere Olympics
symbol is projected on the Paris skyline every night. Newspapers are packed
with pictures of bob-hatted French contestants and reports of every medal
win, no matter how obscure the event.
Whether citizens of the Savoie region, home of Albertville, will be quite so
enthusiastic when they tot up the bill for hosting the event remains to be
seen. 'Les jeux paieront les jeux' ('The games will pay for the games') was
the catchphrase of Mr Michel Barnier, the ambitious young conservative
politican who dreamed up the idea, together with Mr Jean-Claude Killy,
France's triple gold medalist from the Grenoble winter Olympics. The
organisers were confident that they could meet the original FFr2.9bn (Pounds
800m) bill through a combination of government subsidies, sponsorship and
sales of television rights.
Unfortunately for Mr Barnier and his fellow Savoyards, the final tally will
be closer to FFr3.9bn. More than FFr1bn has been spent on equipment, double
the budgeted amount. The bobsleigh run alone cost FFr220m, rather than
FFr130m.
At the same time less cash has rolled into the organisers' coffers than they
hoped. The main problem has been the effect of exchange rate changes on the
sale of television rights to the all-important US networks. The rights were
sold in 1987, when there were FFr9 to the dollar. Now a dollar buys less
than FFr5.5 and the organisers' insurance will not fully cover the
shortfall.
Nobody will know the real cost of the Albertville Games until the accounts
are published in May or June. But observers believe the Games are heading
for a loss of FFr250m to FFr500m. The critical question is: who will pay?
The Savoyards have already started muttering that whoever does stump up the
extra cash, it will not be them.
The sponsors have already paid their share, and are too engrossed in their
own business battles to pay much attention to the balance sheet of the Games
as a whole.
The most hard-fought contest concerns the use of the Olympics in marketing
campaigns. It has pitted the Visa credit card company and the International
Olympic Committee on one hand against American Express on the other. Visa,
one of 12 official sponsors of both the winter and the summer games, is
reported to have contributed some Dollars 20m of the total Dollars 170m
sponsorship budget in The Olympic Programme (TOP) scheme. The scheme - set
up by the International Olympic Committee at the 1988 games to amalgamate
winter and summer sponsorship - is filled by multinationals such as Kodak,
Matsushita, Coca-Cola and IBM.
Amex was the official card sponsor of the 1984 Los Angeles Olympics, but
declined to support the 1988 games.
Visa stepped into the breach in 1988 and exercised its first refusal rights
to sponsor this year's Games. The company has conducted a clever advertising
campaign in the US, proudly proclaiming that only its credit card is worth
carrying in Albertville - and implying that the Amex card would not be
welcome.
American Express has responded to this 'comparative' advertising blitz with
its own commercials, which contain numerous references to the Olympics, all
of which fall short of claiming any official sponsorship role.
As a result, Mr Dick Pound, chairman of the IOC marketing commission, has
vigorously attacked Amex for alleged 'ambush marketing': he believes Amex is
undermining Visa's position as lead sponsor of the Olympics without paying a
cent to towards the estimated Dollars 800m cost of staging the Winter Games.
For its part, Amex argues that its advertising campaign is simply trying to
redress Visa's alleged distortions - the implication that Amex cards are not
welcome in the Albertville region. Ms Deborah Botwood, head of Visa's
European public affairs operation, says Visa 'does not feel it is an Amex
versus Visa issue, more an IOC and Amex affair; I wish we could forget all
about this.'
The IOC and American Express were, in fact, already embroiled in litigation
before the Games even began. The committee recently sued Amex in France over
alleged improper use of the Olympic symbol, the five interlinked rings. Last
year an issue of Expressions, Amex's magazine for card-holders, ran an
article about the Olympics, illustrated by Barcelona's summer games mascot,
a cartoon dog called Cobi. Wherever Cobi goes, he carries with him the
Olympic, five-ring symbol.
Amex claims it had permission from the Spanish Olympic Committee, the
national organising body, to use Cobi, but on February 4, a French court
ruled against Amex and in favour of the IOC. At the same time, the court
ruled in favour of Amex, against the IOC, on a related matter. Amex is
currently giving to customers in the Savoie region, home to Albertville, a
guide to the Games, using caricatures of skiers, skaters and so forth, which
the IOC claimed were similar to caricatures it is using on official
literature. The court decided the IOC's claim was groundless. Half-time
score: IOC 1, Amex 1.
Such litigation might seem to signify nothing more than a short-lived
snowstorm on the slopes. But with the winter and summer Olympics combined
now attracting something in the region of Dollars 1.84bn of total
international sponsorship, it is easier to understand the sensitivity of all
concerned. As Mr Pound put it: 'When the only thing you have to sell are the
aspirations of youth and five rings, then misappropriation of intellectual
property becomes a very serious matter.'
Several observers believe that, in the long term, legal disputes and public
mud-slinging between sponsors may inflict serious damage to international
sport. Mr Ian Muir, chairman of the UK's Institute of Sports Sponsorship and
Coca-Cola's UK manager for external affairs, said: 'If ambush marketing is
allowed to continue then the major companies will look again at their
sponsorship.' Such sentiments help to explain Mr Pound's anxieties and the
IOC's determination to seek legal redress against companies that seek to
imply a closer connection with the Olympics than they actually have.
Any drop in sponsorship would also affect television advertising, since the
biggest sponsors also tend to be the largest buyers of TV advertising space.
According to Mr Pound, Albertville's TV ratings have been 'extraordinarily
good.' CBS, the US network which has paid Dollars 243m for world coverage
rights to the Winter Olympics, and is likely to spend another Dollars 100m
in production costs, 'will not lose money', he said.
In fact, CBS has been thrilled about its Albertville ratings. British-born
network boss, Mr Howard Stringer, has been telephoning journalists to draw
their attention to a 24 per cent audience share on the opening ceremony and
a 33 per cent audience share on the dramatic men's downhill. Both figures
were considerably ahead of rival network ABC's viewing figures for the
Calgary Winter games in 1988.
CBS declines to comment on the pricing of its advertising. Overall the
network is showing a total of 116 hours' coverage with the main events shown
in prime time, recorded if necessary.
In the UK, with contestants destined to come in the lower 50s in the
rankings, the Albertville Olympics have not exactly set the ratings alight.
BBC figures are likely to show that it attracted between 6m and 7m viewers
for the opening ceremony and slightly more than 4m for the men's downhill on
BBC2 - up on Calgary, partly because the events are in European time. The
Games should give BBC2 a brief respite in the ratings battle and take its
audience share to about 13 per cent compared with the less than 9 per cent
that it attracted the previous week.
As the second and final week of the Winter Olympics gets under way, there is
only a short breathing space for television networks to finalise their
coverage plans for the Summer Olympics in Barcelona. And executives from the
world's largest companies will no doubt be preparing for what could prove
another gruelling sponsorship battle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Cold war, observers believe
the Winter Games are heading for a loss. The critical question is, who will
pay? (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8672</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The week that was: Seven days the Tories would rather forget
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This has been a ghastly week for the Conservatives. They have been obliged
to abandon hopes of a recovery in the economy during the first half of this
year. Ministers now accept that there will be few signs of an end to the
recession before election day. Yet the game is not over; indeed it has
hardly begun. Assuming an election on April 9, there are still nearly eight
weeks of politicking to go. That gives the Tories time in which to press
home their advantage as the party in government.
They will need to use the opportunity well.
On Thursday three successive items of depressing economic news fell like
hammer-blows on Conservative morale. First, seasonally adjusted unemployment
rose in January by 53,000, nearly twice the anticipated figure. It was the
biggest monthly increase since August; the previous downward trend was
reversed. The worst-affected areas seemed to be in marginal constituencies
at present held by the government. Second, it was announced that some 75,000
homes had been repossessed by mortgage lenders last year. The number of
householders in arrears with their mortgages is still climbing. Many of
those affected are likely to be new entrants to the housing market, tempted
by the government's promotion of home ownership during the second half of
the 1980s, and most particularly by the Lawson binge of 1988.
The third piece of bad news was that manufacturers had cut their capital
spending by 15 per cent compared with the previous 12 months. This was
followed by yesterday's figures indicating that factory output fell by 1.2
per cent between the third and fourth quarters of last year, and 5 per cent
over 1991 as a whole.
The government now has to acknowledge that this is turning out to be the
longest recession since the war. That is the economists' technical term. I
would call it a depression.
As this seeps into the public consciousness it could, in theory, result in a
melting away of support for the Conservative party. That could put Mr Neil
Kinnock into 10 Downing Street, for while Labour might not pick up
sufficient additional votes to win the election, the Tories could easily
drop enough to lose their majority.
So much for the gloomy side of the Conservative story. There is, however,
reason for the government to take heart. Average earnings for those in work
 -nine-tenths of the labour force - have increased by about 7 1/4 per cent.
The retail price index rose by only 4.1 per cent in the year to January,
principally as a result of the slump. The 3 per cent addition to real income
is not uniformly spread but it will have had a positive effect on most
voters' pockets. Mortgages whose rates are revised annually will have come
down in January and February; historically such movements have always
increased Conservative support.
More to the point, the government has it in its power to buy our votes, or
try to. The general expectation is of a half-point cut in interest rates,
probably around the time of the Budget. That could be followed by a
tax-cutting bonanza, with a penny or two off the standard rate of income tax
combined and an increase in the tax thresholds, the whole to be festooned
with individual goodies for particular interest-groups.
A month ago such a Budget would have been described as a shameless piece of
political chicanery, which would be correct. Four weeks from now a giveaway
Budget would be defended by government supporters (and businessmen who fear
Labour) as a reasonable relaxation of fiscal constraints at this time in the
economic cycle. Another billion or four on the public sector borrowing
requirement is easy to shrug off, if it saves high-earners from Labour's
proposed 59 per cent rate of personal taxation.
This is not to say that Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, will necessarily
live down to the worst expectations of him. His record to date suggests the
opposite. His monetary and fiscal rectitude since he took office last
November match the performance of the then Mr Roy Jenkins, who lost the 1970
election for Labour by staying virtuous to the very end. Anyway, the
political advantage of an irresponsibly generous tax-cutting budget is not
clear. Labour could spell out what it would do with the money saved by not
making the income tax cut. Mr John Smith, the shadow chancellor, is
preparing a shadow budget, whose effect as a counterblow is unpredictable.
But then - you never know - the Tory manifesto might surprise everyone and
actually offer some radical policies.
Meanwhile, we must await a decent run of opinion polls to see whether the
political stalemate has been broken. If there is to be a Labour government
with an overall working majority Mr Kinnock's party needs to start piling up
significant opinion poll leads today, and hold them until polling day. There
is no sign of a wave of enthusiasm for Labour of the magnitude required to
give the party such a sustained lead. On the contrary, the biggest question
of 1992 politics is why Labour is not 10 points ahead. The answer is partly
that Mr John Major is more popular than Mr Kinnock, partly that the Tories
are still the party most trusted to get the economy right, and partly that
Labour's me-too campaign has failed to gather momentum.
The polls will probably resettle at the break-even 40 per cent Tory, 40 per
cent Labour, 15 per cent Liberal Democrat at which they have stood for the
past couple of months. The most likely outcome of that is a hung parliament
with the Conservatives the largest party. Then the game would really begin.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8673</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: SFO claim 'a very good result'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
AN OFFICER in the SFO said yesterday that the Blue Arrow result was being
viewed as a success. The officer said: 'It's a very good result and I think
it justifies what we did in a case in which we attracted a lot of criticism.
It's quite an important result, not just for us at this critical time, but
as far as the perception of what is tolerable and not tolerable in the
City.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8674</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Cost of trial estimated at Pounds 35m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COST of the Blue Arrow case is estimated at almost Pounds 35m, making it
the most expensive trial yet, John Mason writes. The Guinness trial, the
previous record-holder, cost about Pounds 10m. The only published figure for
Blue Arrow has been the Pounds 2m disclosed by the Serious Fraud Office,
covering costs of both investigation and prosecution. This figure would not
include the costs of police attached to the SFO. Defence costs were easily
the largest item, and lawyers calculated that Pounds 30m would be a minimum
figure. These bills were all met initially by the companies involved -
National Westminster Bank, UBS Phillips &amp; Drew and City solicitors Travers
Smith Braithwaite. Following the corporate acquittals, each is negotiating
for substantial refunds from public funds. Court costs are thought to have
reached a further Pounds 1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8675</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Convictions a jolt to City 'bad
behaviour' - Four defendants found guilty, Six acquitted during year-long
trial, Case adds to controversy over prosecution of complex frauds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YESTERDAY'S convictions of four of the defendants in the Blue Arrow trial
has sent the biggest shock through the City since the Guinness scandal
erupted five years ago.
Then, the arrest of corporate financiers from two of the City's foremost
houses - Morgan Grenfell and Cazenove - prompted a period of intense
navel-gazing as financiers and other professionals digested the case's
implications: that advisers could be hauled into the dock alongside the
companies they advised.
The turmoil at Morgan Grenfell after the Guinness scandal broke also brought
home how the reputations of financial houses could be called into question.
The upheavals at County NatWest and Phillips &amp; Drew after the Blue Arrow
scandal repeated the message.
Yesterday's verdicts, though, brought home a different message: City
advisers can also be convicted.
Against the background of a growing belief in the City and legal worlds that
complex financial wrongdoing is more a matter for expert regulators than the
criminal law, that has come as a shock.
The belief that prosecutors would find it difficult to gain convictions of
City advisers had been strengthened in the past week by the collapse of
trials against three City defendants over the Guinness affair.
The successful prosecutions of four of the individual defendants in the Blue
Arrow case are unlikely to change the view in the City that complicated
financial malpractice should not be tried in the courts. The financial
watchdogs set up after the Financial Services Act - which came into effect
after the offences in the Blue Arrow case - certainly think they provide the
best apparatus for tackling such cases.
Mr John Young, chief executive of the Securities and Futures Authority, the
regulator for London's securities markets, said of the Blue Arrow verdicts:
'It just leaves me feeling that in cases of that sort - those to do with
misleading markets, or misusing market information - you need a rapid
regulatory approach with quick action which would hurt, including expulsion
from the industry and penal fines. It would all be over in six months. That
is better than a five-year trudge through the courts.'
Long before yesterday's verdicts the financial scandals of the 1980s had had
a marked effect on City practice.
Corporate financiers agree that specific procedures in rights issues are now
far more tightly observed, while Blue Arrow underlined the importance of
obtaining proper legal advice. It also brought home the need for greater
management control in banks and securities houses.
Bankers remain reluctant to speak publicly about the changes that followed
Blue Arrow. Two senior investment bankers in different firms agreed,
however, that it undoubtedly illustrated the need to get full legal advice
on disclosure obligations and tactics used to support clients. Equally
importantly, it highlighted the need for good management in an area where,
they admitted, aggression had always to be kept under control.
Both agreed that in the excitement of a hostile bid, for example, it
remained possible to be carried way and place the bank's money and
reputation at risk.
Blue Arrow has also had more specific effects on practice in rights issues.
Procedures surrounding the late acceptance of share applications in issues
have tightened considerably as a result. Whereas flexibility used to be
shown, and was considered to be in the interests of all concerned, deadlines
for receiving acceptances are now adhered to far more rigidly.
One of the bankers also pointed to the organisational improvements in large
houses to prevent accidental breaches of disclosure requirements. He said
that five years ago such practice was somewhat shoddy.
Announcements to the market are now more carefully worded. In the 1980s,
according to one broker, there was a general acceptance of the need for an
element of caveat emptor to be applied to the reading of advisers'
announcements. Now there is increased concern about the potential to
mislead. Whether this has led to more information being given out to the
markets is debatable.
The prosecution in the Blue Arrow case of a City solicitor - Mr Alan Keat of
Travers Smith Braithwaite, an adviser to County - was unsuccessful, but left
many lawyers feeling vulnerable. It has prompted some to reassess their
procedures.
At the heart of their concern is the possibility that merely by advising and
acting for a client, a solicitor might be charged on the basis that he must
have known everything his client was doing. Pressure on solicitors to take a
more 'pro-active' role in deals - operating increasingly as house lawyers
for their clients and required to come up with solutions to enable a deal to
succeed - further underlines this concern.
Mr John Grieves, head of corporate finance at Freshfields, said there was
now an increased willingness to prosecute which must inevitably make
solicitors more vigilant.
'Life is a lot more hazardous because there is a tendency to have a go at
anyone who has been involved,' he said.
His firm's principle of using two partners on all big transactions,
particularly hostile bids, had been strengthened to avoid leaving one
partner isolated.
The solicitor had been helped by a general change in attitude brought about
by prosecutions such as Blue Arrow and Guinness and the regulatory structure
set up after the Financial Services Act, he said.
The changes following Blue Arrow and Guinness have led to big changes in
practice. City financiers and lawyers like to project these scandals as part
of a different age, characterising them as manifestations of the 1980s bull
market.
Yet City fraud persists - only its nature has changed. The Maxwell case
provides the most striking evidence that the new regulatory system is not
infallible, although some insiders claim that the extent of wrongdoing runs
far wider.
A corporate finance lawyer with one large City practice, who refused to be
named, said: 'There are always things to lie and cheat about, only the cases
change. I don't think the cycle of bad behaviour is the cycle of boom
markets.'
The problem now was the lack of information revealed to the market about the
financial position some companies were in, he said. If one company failed to
announce bad news and no action was taken, then another followed suit. The
result: 'Pretty soon, you're on that slippery slope again . . .'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8676</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Counting the cost of the scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON and RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Blue Arrow scandal has cost National Westminster Bank and UBS Phillips &amp;
Drew dearly.
County NatWest's parent now expects the affair to set it back at least
Pounds 50m. Of that, Pounds 30m has been paid in compensation to misled
investors.
'Quite a fine for one evening,' reflected Mr Roger Flemington, the NatWest
deputy chief executive.
By contrast, UBS Phillips &amp; Drew offered shareholders Pounds 45m in
compensation. The Swiss-owned firm has always tried to depict itself as the
'junior partner' in the case, but its greater involvement in placing Blue
Arrow shares after the failed rights issue left it more vulnerable to
criticism from institutional investors.
The damage to their reputations in the markets was considerable.
NatWest commissioned extensive market research among both its corporate and
individual customers, and that found there had been little impact on the
reputation of the parent bank itself. Potential clients of County, however,
expressed second thoughts on whether to choose its corporate finance
department to act as adviser.
The depth of the scandal at one stage led the parent to consider closing
County. Its recovery, largely under the chairmanship of Mr Howard MacDonald,
did not happen overnight. Regaining the confidence of the Bank of England
required reviewing the systems of checks and balances in County. Restoring
confidence in the markets took longer.
Looking back, some in the parent bank regret not having kept the investment
banking arm on a somewhat shorter rein. Mr Flemington admitted with
hindsight that Blue Arrow pointed to a failing to integrate one sub-culture
properly into the overall management structure.
Within an organisation as large as NatWest, sub-cultures such as investment
banking remain distinctive. What is important is to recognises this, whilst
still blending them into the overall structure, he said.
The impact of Blue Arrow on P&amp;D was arguably less than that on NatWest. Its
name has not been linked as frequently with the affair as that of County.
And although the firm went through its own upheaval at the end of the 1980s,
it has recovered more quickly and more strongly.
The dangers of reputational risk have not been lost on the company. Mr Rudi
Mueller, chairman of P&amp;D said: 'I am confident that our levels of compliance
and systems of control are among the highest in the business, as you would
expect of a bank with a triple-A rating.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8677</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Mixed results for corporate
Untouchables
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD DONKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COVER of an issue of the Serious Fraud Office's house magazine features
a cartoon of Mrs Barbara Mills, its departing director, as a pin-striped
Robocop.
This lampoon by her colleagues was their way of commenting on the high
profile she had sought since taking up the post in September 1990.
That she projects herself as a sort of female Elliot Ness leading a team of
corporate Untouchables is a popular observation in the City. In a week of
mixed fortunes for prosecutions, with the conviction of Mr Peter Clowes
almost eclipsed by the collapse of the Guinness Two case, and with four
convictions in Blue Arrow - but six acquittals - it appears that the SFO gun
has in some cases been firing blanks.
The strain at its Elm Street offices was beginning to show, even before the
Guinness Two jury was discharged and the case dropped. One staff member
confided only three weeks ago: 'We have so many people deployed on Maxwell
and BCCI (the collapsed Bank of Commerce and Credit International) that we
would have difficulty coping if another big fraud was to break.' Recognising
the difficulties, the government lifted cash limits on the SFO last autumn
to allow extra funding for the Maxwell and BCCI cases. The annual budget of
Pounds 18m pales, however, when measured against the costs of some of its
most prominent prosecutions. The Blue Arrow trial is thought to have cost
about Pounds 35m. The defence costs alone would easily have dwarfed the SFO
budget for a year's investigations.
Since its inception in 1988 the SFO has brought 73 trials, involving 158
defendants and achieving 109 convictions. The 69 per cent conviction rate is
showing a small improvement on the 63 per cent rate in its last annual
report. In comparison London's Metropolitan Police Fraud squad can claim a
consistent conviction rate of about 95 per cent. The SFO does not disclose
how many cases it has started and abandoned.
The figures also mask a disturbing number of high-profile cases that have
failed to produce convictions. That Blue Arrow resulted in some convictions
must have been a big relief for the SFO.
Critics of the SFO have pointed to the time-lag involved in cases such as
Blue Arrow that are built on the back of Department of Trade and Industry
investigations which themselves take years.
The SFO was formed on the recommendation of the Fraud Trials Committee under
Lord Roskill. It now consists of 21 lawyers and 27 accountants working
full-time with police and accountants seconded part-time for individual
cases, and seeks to bring a multi-disciplinary approach to fraud cases.
Roskill recommended that police officers in fraud cases should be given
powers of interview similar to those available for DTI inspectors, who can
compel interviewees to give evidence that may later be used against them in
a trial.
The government instead left police interview powers within the Police and
Criminal Evidence Act and gave the civilian members of the SFO powers under
Section 2 of the Criminal Justice Act 1987 to compel answers to questioning
and to seize documents.
The crucial difference between these powers and those of DTI investigators
is that evidence collected in Section 2 interviews of suspects cannot
generally be used against them unless the evidence can be shown to be a
clear lie. It has yet to happen, but it is only a matter of time before
parts of a suspect's Section 2 interview are used to rebut evidence given in
the witness box.
Section 2 notices are used mostly to enable people such as bankers to have a
legal sanction to breach their professional duties of confidentiality and
give evidence about clients who are under investigation.
This partly explains why SFO investigators tend to wait until they have
accumulated a mass of evidence before they approach suspects for
questioning.
It is not a hard-and-fast policy and it has its detractors in the SFO.
Mr Michael Chance, a former deputy director of the SFO and now a consultant
at London solicitors Cameron Markby Hewitt, has defended the investigation
system.
He said: 'There can't be a particularly tight blueprint as to how to set
about a fraud investigation because they aren't all the same.
'It's set out very clearly in guidance given to all members of the SFO that
you keep you eye on the ball and right from the start, as soon as you
possibly can, you identify the principal offences and the principal
offenders. You don't go amassing mountains of stuff and then try and dig in
your pile for evidence of offences. That's not a realistic way to go about
it, and that's not the way the SFO goes about it.' While the SFO is
satisfied with the system of referral - it does not seek out its own
investigations - it would like a closer liaison with regulators, and in some
cases earlier discussions on the possible fraudulent implications of some
regulatory cases.
It remains a small organisation with large responsibilities. Mr Chance
argues that it is too small at present.
'It cannot adjust very comfortably to changing workloads,' he said.
The current budget, which is projected to increase to about Pounds 21m next
year, is supporting about 60 cases on the SFO's books at any one time.
Mrs Mills is unimpressed with the current argument that fraud can be handled
by US-style civil actions where the burden of proof is lower. Her view is
that it must remain under criminal law.
Mr Chance reinforced the argument. He said: 'Would Peter Clowes have gone to
prison for 10 years if he had been dealt with by his regulator? He would
have been fined.'
He added: 'My own feeling is that if people engage in serious dishonesty to
the detriment to the public the right course is a criminal prosecution.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8678</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Five who spent a year and four days
before the court
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GUILTY:
Mr Jonathan Cohen, 48, was chief executive of County NatWest during the Blue
Arrow affair and noted for his forceful manner. The rapid staff turnover
under his leadership earned County a 'revolving door' reputation.
Mr Cohen resigned from County in February 1988, moving to Charterhouse, the
merchant banking arm of Royal Bank of Scotland, as vice-chairman. He
resigned in August 1989 after publication of the DTI report. In court
yesterday his counsel revealed for the first time that this resignation had
been prompted by the Bank of England.
Mr Cohen has since worked as a financial consultant on a freelance basis.
Mr David Reed, 44, was head of corporate finance at County throughout the
deal but resigned after being criticised in the DTI report.
Mr Reed was noted for his forceful style and willingness to push the rules
to the limit. At the time of the Blue Arrow deal he was riding the crest of
a wave, having sewn up several deals and won a succession of clients.
He was a 'home-grown' product of County, having joined the bank in the mid
1970s. He went straight into accountancy after leaving school and worked in
Peat Marwick Mitchell's Sydney office before joining County.
Mr Nicholas Wells, 37, was the corporate finance director at County who
organised the Blue Arrow rights issue. At the time he was tipped as a rising
star in merchant banking. Young and pushy, and with an apparent charm, Mr
Wells appeared the archetypal corporate financier of his generation.
After reading economics at Cambridge he trained as an accountant with Peat
Marwick. He went into corporate finance by joining Lazards in 1979, moving
to County in 1982. He moved to Barclays de Zoete Wedd in early 1988 but
resigned in July 1989 after being criticised in the DTI report. Mr Wells has
since worked on a freelance basis for people such as Mr Michael Ashcroft,
the ADT chairman.
Mr Martin Gibbs, 62, was head of corporate finance at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew at
the time of the issue, but was near the end of his career. After almost 20
years with P&amp;D, he was looking forward to retirement, which he took in 1989.
Phlegmatic rather than aggressive, Mr Gibbs was seen as typifying the City's
old-school style of working, rather than fitting the image of a brazen 'Big
Bang' operator. One trial witness said of him that 'he wouldn't park on a
double yellow line'.
He joined P&amp;D in 1959 as a junior analyst after three years as an accountant
with Pannel Kerr Forster. He studied engineering and economics at Cambridge.
NOT GUILTY:
Mr Christopher Stainforth, 38, was a corporate finance director at P&amp;D
helping organise the issue. He resigned from P&amp;D after 10 years following
criticisms in the DTI report.
Mr Stainforth trained as an accountant with Peat Marwick before moving into
corporate finance with Schroders.
Since resigning from P&amp;D, Mr Stainforth has been involved in running a
number of companies. He intends to relaunch his career in the City.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5 Photograph Jonathan Cohen, David Reed, Nicholas Wells, Martin
Gibbs and Christopher Stainforth (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8679</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow Verdicts: Record saga ends with shrugs and
resigned smiles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BLUE ARROW court-room, in a specially adapted modern office building in
London's Chancery Lane, was tense when the jury of 11 men and one woman
returned at 1pm yesterday on their fourth day of deliberation.
The convictions - all by unanimous verdicts - of four of the defendants were
received with surprise by many in the courtroom. Lawyers had generally
agreed that the tone of summing-up by the judge, Mr Justice McKinnon, had
been favourable to all five defendants remaining on trial.
The four convicted men made no comment as they left the court, released on
bail for the weekend. Shrugs and resigned smiles were the order of the day.
The convictions of the four men - from an original total of 10 defendants -
can mark only a partial success for the Serious Fraud Office which brought
the prosecution. Because of the length and cost of the trial, and the
acquittal of three of the seven individual defendants and all three of the
corporate defendants, the trial raises questions over the competence of the
SFO and the legal system to handle such complex cases.
Blue Arrow was, after the first Guinness trial, the second high-profile
'mega-trial' brought by the SFO. It lacked its predecessor's ability to grab
headlines, but was much longer and more expensive, estimated at Pounds 35m.
Originally expected to last a maximum of eight months, it expanded to a
year, putting the system of trial by jury under exceptional stress. Few deny
that the trial was anything but a troubled prosecution, as the acquittal
rate and long periods spent by lawyers arguing in camera indicate. Observers
point to two causes: the ambitious scale of the prosecution and the
non-interventionist style of the judge, Mr Justice McKinnon.
Trials of this scale require judges of exceptional ability and reputation.
Mr Justice McKinnon came to Blue Arrow with a relatively short record as a
judge. He was appointed a High Court judge in 1988 and his experience was
largely in civil, rather than criminal, cases.
As the trial progressed, he made a series of decisions which, because of
their 11th-hour timing, surprised many at the Criminal Bar. But, among the
Bar, there is general agreement that the prosecution, because of its
insistence on maintaining such a cumbersome case, should take most of the
blame for the difficulties.
The SFO took over the case in July 1989, soon after the publication of the
Department of Trade and Industry report into the affair. The SFO was under
pressure to bring the case to court quickly and the arrests of individual
defendants were made in November 1989. Relying largely on evidence from the
DTI report, it was decided that the appropriate charges were conspiracy to
defraud along with more specific charges under the Prevention of Fraud
(Investments) (PFI) Act.
Mr Nicholas Purnell QC, then chairman of the Criminal Bar Association, was
put in charge of the prosecution. Previous high-profile prosecutions he had
led included the Brinks-Matt bullion robbery. Under the direction of Mr
Purnell the prosecution was ambitious, reflecting the SFO's determination
that it should not shy away from tackling the biggest of fish.
The prosecution saw the case as one of corporate fraud, allegedly carried
out using the financial muscle and reputations of County NatWest and UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew Securities. In bringing charges against three companies, the
SFO was sailing into largely uncharted waters. Proving corporate criminal
liability is notoriously difficult. From the outset, prosecution and judge
disagreed over the scale of the trial. After the preparatory hearings, the
indictment was reduced and the PFI charges dropped. Mr Justice McKinnon also
ruled that the proceedings should be split into two trials. The case still
proved a legal juggernaut. Ten legal teams - totalling some 50 barristers
and solicitors - filled the courtroom. The prosecution called 80 witnesses
and lasted from February to the end of July last year. At its heart was a
simple issue, the prosecution believed. The integrity of the London markets
demanded that share dealings be transparent, with investors entitled to know
price sensitive information that could affect their judgment.
By intervening in the market to buy large and secret holdings of shares in
the Blue Arrow rights issue, the defendants, the prosecution claimed, rigged
its outcome and maintained the company's share price at a false level.
In essence, the defendants' case was that they were only doing their jobs.
They were acting as merchant bankers and stockbrokers should do - supporting
their clients. What had surprised the markets was the extent of their
intervention, but this had been a consequence of the greater financial
strength open to them following Big Bang.
The arguments quickly became complex. Under what circumstances could
rights-issue deadlines be ignored? What precedents existed for financial
advisers taking stakes in client companies? What should investors be
entitled to know?
It was not the stuff of classic courtroom dramas. The core issues only once
sparked angry exchanges - when Mr Purnell and Mr Jonathan Cohen clashed over
the circumstances in which marketmakers could hold shares without disclosing
them.
The ennui was not helped by the air conditioning, which pumped fumes from a
nearby wine bar into the courtroom. The judge complained of the
'oxygen-free' atmosphere. One defence team assembled its own weather
station, monitoring temperature and humidity levels, which soared over the
summer.
The drama in the trial came not from the issues of market practice, but from
how the affair had been received within the National Westminster Bank and
the Bank of England. Defending Mr Stephen Clark, a former County NatWest
finance director, Mr Alun Jones QC alleged that NatWest's top management had
conspired with Bank officials to stop the scandal becoming public. The
accusations were denied by all witnesses from NatWest and the Bank.
The first open signs of the prosecution running into trouble came in
September, when Mr Justice McKinnon ruled that Mr Clark and Mr Alan Keat,
the City solicitor who advised the merchant bank, should be acquitted
because of insufficient evidence.
In December, the judge interrupted a closing speech by one defence counsel
to make two rulings that set back the prosecution case. The allegation that
senior executives within National Westminster Bank had been misled was
thrown out and evidence given by a key prosecution witness dis-regarded.
At this point, the prosecution felt its case was still largely intact. It
was in legal arguments at the end of the evidence, however, that the
prosecution suffered its gravest setback. The judge directed that all three
corporate defendants - County NatWest, NatWest Investment Bank and UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew Securities - should be acquitted. In what had been billed as
a case of corporate fraud, the companies were free.
At the start of the judge's summing up, the jury was then told to strike out
three quarters of the indictment. Such evidence, the judge ruled, was
relevant, but nothing adverse to the defendants could be drawn from it.
Mr Justice McKinnon admitted there had been severe stress on the system. If
the jury had felt overstretched, they were not alone, he told them. He, too,
had found himself overwhelmed at times.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8680</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Labour to unveil plan for homes spending
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN and JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR INTENDS to unveil plans soon which would allow a government led by Mr
Neil Kinnock to implement a housebuilding programme without adding directly
to public spending.
The package is one of a number of ways in which the party aims to harness
private funding for measures which would not require extravagant spending
pledges.
Mr Clive Soley, Labour's housing spokesman, will announce details of a
national housing bank which would encourage the building of homes for rent
by lending to housing associations and private landlords.
The bank would be structured as a public limited company rather than a
statutory corporation. Its borrowing would fall outside the Treasury's
definition of the public-sector borrowing requirement, and would not
increase it.
The bank would also offer a way of recycling local authority capital
receipts from the sale of council houses back into housing without
increasing the PSBR.
Local-authority money invested in the national housing bank would not count
towards the PSBR - even if the money were lent to housing associations.
A blueprint for a national housing bank has been drawn up by Mr Stephen
Merrett, who advises Labour's front bench on housing policy.
In a Fabian Society pamphlet Mr Merrett suggests that up to Pounds 10bn
could be raised through such a bank over five years.
A National Housing Bank. Fabian Society, 11 Dartmouth Street, London SW1H
9BN. Pounds 3.50.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8681</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Sunderland's civic boat comes in
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PERHAPS it did stop raining, just for a minute, as the mayor raised the
flags and released 7,000 red and white balloons, marking Sunderland's ascent
to city status yesterday.
Outside the civic centre the balloons drifted through the grey February sky,
pursued by energetic small citizens of Britain's newest city.
Inside, beside a table laden with civic teacups, Mr David Thompson, the
mayor, spoke of his delight that, 60 years after its first attempt,
Sunderland had at last won such status. 'Our fortunes began to change when
Nissan came in,' said Mr Thomson. 'We were quite intent when we lost our
shipyards that we wouldn't go down.'
A total of 23 towns, from Armagh to Wolverhampton, competed to be named a
city by the Queen to celebrate the 40th anniversary of her accession.
Sunderland, the 51st city in England and Wales, is one of 11 declared since
1900. The most recent was Derby in 1977 to mark the Queen's silver jubilee.
It was also announced yesterday that the mayor of the city of Chester, and
his successors, are to be lord mayors.
Sunderland, said Mr Thompson, had been 'quietly confident' of winning the
honour. That may surprise the council officials who, barely a fortnight ago,
were privately doubting its chances. Perhaps they had been studying the
form. William Hill, the bookmaker, had quoted Sunderland as ninth favourite
at 14-1. Chelmsford had been favourite at 4-1, Brighton next at 7-1.
The Wearside town's keenness to win the title, which confers no money or
additional powers, reflected its determination to enhance its image in the
fight for new investment and employment.
Sunderland, which dates back to the seventh century, suffered a big blow to
morale when its last shipyards closed three years ago, ending a 600-year-old
industry. Now promoted as 'the advanced manufacturing centre' of the north,
it has attracted Pounds 1bn of investment in a decade - notably the Nissan
car plant - but still has high unemployment.
'Maybe being a city will bring more work,' said Mr Stephen Martin, aged 19
and jobless, out shopping with his wife and baby daughter.
A few citizens - obviously reading the wrong script - complained that the
litter and graffiti had lowered the civic tone. Others seemed split between
delight at getting almost equal with Newcastle upon Tyne - which has city
status and a lord mayor - and confusion that a place with no cathedral could
be a city at all.
But Nina McDougall, aged 11, running after balloons, had no doubts. 'It'll
mean more playgrounds. Sunderland's even better now it's a city.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8682</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / MPs will protest to Lloyd's chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN, RALPH ATKINS and RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT is facing mounting pressure from its own backbenchers, many
of whom are Names, to step into the fray at Lloyd's with the aim of imposing
regulatory reform.
A group of about 25 MPs is to visit Lloyd's on Monday and is expected to
discuss concerns about alleged malpractices with Mr David Coleridge, the
chairman of Lloyd's.
Lloyd's said yesterday that the visit was planned three weeks ago as part of
the efforts of the Lloyd's council, its governing body, to publicise the
recommendations of a market task force which completed an investigation into
business practices at Lloyd's last month.
A group of Conservative and Labour MPs is dissatisfied with the way the
market has handled its relations with Names - the individuals whose assets
provide the insurance market's capital. MPs who attended a meeting with Mr
Coleridge on Tuesday say they were unimpressed. Mr Coleridge had been urged
to provide information to Names about syndicates stored on computers at
Lloyd's.
Commons motions tabled on Thursday by two Labour MPs, Mr Brian Sedgemore and
Mr Dennis Skinner, sharply criticised the Lloyd's market and suggested there
was 'structural rottenness' which required regulation under the Financial
Services Act.
Ms Marjorie Mowlam, who speaks for Labour on City matters, has called for an
independent investigation into allegations by Names that market insiders
have been given access to the best business.
Yesterday Mr Richard Page, MP for Hertfordshire South West and vice-chairman
of the Tory trade and industry committee, said: 'I believe that they
(Lloyd's) have got to address the self-regulation problem in a very
forthright and immediate fashion - and, if not, then it is a function that
the government should step in and impose on them.'
That view was echoed by other Tory MPs, about 40 of whom are Names at
Lloyd's.
Mr Spencer Batiste, MP for Elmet, said many MPs would like Mr Peter Lilley,
trade and industry secretary, to intervene. Mr Batiste, who joined Lloyd's
in 1987, said many MPs felt that Lloyd's seemed 'unable to put its own house
in order'.
Mr Rupert Allason, MP for Torbay and a member of Lloyd's since 1974, said he
had been assured by his agent that syndicate managers would be 'feeling the
squeeze' like everybody else in future years. He expected to make an
underwriting loss this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8683</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Conservative Names urge probe of alleged malpractice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER and DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE POLITICAL controversy surrounding the Lloyd's of London insurance market
this week has highlighted the position of Conservative MPs who are also
Names.
A few Conservative MPs, who themselves could face heavy losses as a result
of their membership of syndicates specialising in loss-making catastrophe
reinsurance business, have been at the forefront of the controversy and have
pressed the government to look into allegations of malpractice by market
insiders at Lloyd's.
More than 40 Conservative MPs - out of a total of 366 - are Names at
Lloyd's. Many, including Mr John Wakeham, the energy secretary, joined
Lloyd's in the 1970s when the low costs and profitability of the market made
it an attractive investment.
At a time of high marginal tax rates the ability to offset insurance losses
against tax was also seen as a benefit.
Even in the past three years - as asbestosis, pollution and catastrophe
claims have pushed Lloyd's into the red - many MPs have still made money out
of Lloyd's. Some, though, may be hard hit.
For example, Mr Paul Marland, MP for Gloucester West who joined the market
in 1987, is a member of a number of syndicates managed by Rose Thomson Young
and Gooda Walker, which will produce some of the worst results in the market
in 1988, 1989 and 1990.
Mr Marland is one of 3,000 Gooda Names to have received cash calls. Last
month the Gooda Walker syndicates announced a cash call of Pounds 101m.
MPs from the south of England have also been pressed by Names among their
constituents who are angry about the way the market's recent losses appear
to have been concentrated among a minority of Names in the market.
In these circumstances Tory backbenchers have been receptive to allegations
from Names about malpractices by insiders at Lloyd's. Many MPs argue that
the evidence presented by discontented Names shows that the self-regulation
introduced by the 1982 Lloyd's Act is no longer adequate.
Tory MPs are reluctant to side openly with Labour MPs who have consistently
called for more independent regulation of the Lloyd's market, but they are
keen to press for action. Mr David Tredinnick, Tory MP for Bosworth, who
like Mr Marland is also a member of catastrophe re-insurance syndicates,
said: 'There is a feeling that self-regulation may not have been as
successful as was first thought. This is a classic opportunity for
self-regulation to prove itself.'
Mr Tredinnick said he had suffered 'some losses', but his concern was for
the future of the market.
Mr Roger Knapman, MP for Stroud, said the current regime was not
satisfactory and that self-regulation was something Lloyd's must take 'very
seriously.' Mr Knapman, who joined Lloyd's in 1978 and was a member of 10
Lloyd's syndicates last year, said the market should 'deal very seriously'
with anyone who did not maintain the highest standards.
They must realise that Names are their 'bread and butter' and 'stand behind
them,' he added. However, there was a danger that reform would bring
'suffocating layers of regulation' which would make the market
uncompetitive.
Mr Knapman said of his own financial exposure: 'I do not expect good news.'
As well as Mr Marland and Mr Tredinnick, two other MPs have been members of
catastrophe re-insurance syndicates in recent years. Mr Ian Lang, the
Scottish secretary, was a member of 255 in 1990, but he stopped underwriting
last year. Mr Gerald Bowden, MP for Dulwich, was a member of the Gooda
Walker syndicates 298 and 299 in 1989.
According to Lloyd's Mr Peter Brooke, Northern Ireland secretary, and Mr
David Hunt, Welsh secretary, were members of Lloyd's last year.
Other members included Mr Edward Heath, the former prime minister; Mr Archie
Hamilton, the armed forces minister; Mr Alan Howarth, a junior education
minister; Mr Peter Lloyd, a junior Home Office minister; Sir Nicholas Lyell,
the solicitor-general; Mr Richard Needham, a junior Northern Ireland
minister; and Mr Timothy Renton, the arts minister.
Other Tory MPs who were members include Mr Robert Adley (Christchurch), Mr
Rupert Allason (Torbay), Mr James Arbuthnot (Wanstead and Woodford), Mr
David Ashby (Leicestershire NW), Mr Spencer Batiste (Elmet), Mr Henry
Bellingham (Norfolk NW), Sir Peter Blaker (Blackpool South), Sir Nicholas
Bonsor (Upminster), Mr Robert Boscawen (Somerset &amp; Frome), Mr Kenneth
Carlisle (Lincoln), Mr Winston Churchill (Davyhulme), Mr David Evennett
(Erith &amp; Crayford), Sir John Farr (Harborough), Sir Norman Fowler (Sutton
Coldfield), Mr Ralph Howell (Norfolk N), Sir Anthony Meyer (Clywd), Mr John
Moore (Croydon C), Sir Charles Morrison (Devizes), Mr Graham Riddick (Colne
Valley), Mr Jonathan Sayeed (Bristol E), Sir William Shelton (Streatham), Mr
Anthony Steen (S Hams), Mr Neil Thorne (Ilford S), Mr John Townend
(Bridlington), Mr Peter Viggers (Gosport), Sir John Wheeler (Westminster N),
and Mr Jerry Wiggin (Weston-super-Mare).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph Paul Marland, received cash call from Gooda Walker
(Omitted). Photograph David Tredinnick, admitted to suffering 'some losses'
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8684</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Government will reduce training cash
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART and CATHERINE MILTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SPENDING PLANS for the Department of Employment for the next three financial
years, published yesterday, confirm that cuts in spending on training in
real terms will be about Pounds 170m next year.
Overall spending for the department next year will rise nearly Pounds 0.5bn
to Pounds 3.8bn for England and Wales.
The department will spend Pounds 2.7bn on training and vocational education
and nearly Pounds 1bn on the Employment Service next year.
Mr Tony Blair, shadow employment secretary, said that in real terms Youth
Training would be cut by Pounds 50m next year and Employment Training, for
the adult unemployed, would be cut by Pounds 60m.
The department did not question those figures but said the reduction in YT
budgets reflected reduced demand as a result of a slight increase to 61 per
cent in the school stay-on rate for 16-year-olds next year.
The reduction in ET is the result of studies by the department which show
that not all unemployed people require training.
The department and Labour also clashed over the interpretation of figures
relating to the Employment Action programme, the emergency make-work scheme
for the un-employed, which should provide 60,000 places in 1992-93 at a cost
of Pounds 170m.
Mr Blair said the scheme was a dismal failure and had attracted only 8,200
people. The department said the figure at the end of January was 8,500,
which represented a large rise on the figure of 5,130 at the end of
December.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8685</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Tory opinion poll lead cut to 2.5 points
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CONSERVATIVE lead over Labour has halved, according to an opinion poll
published today.
That was before the political storm over this week's gloomy figures on
unemployment, house repossessions and economic output.
The Tories' 40 per cent rating in a Gallup poll for The Daily Telegraph is
2.5 percentage points above Labour's - compared with a 5 point lead a week
before. The poll was completed on Tuesday.
Labour and Tory strategists will study opinion polls over the next few days
for any sign of the latest economic statistics marking a turning point in
the campaign. Neither party has been able to build a lasting lead so far
this year. The Gallup poll shows the Liberal Democrats up 3.5 points at 17.5
per cent.
MPs now regard April 9 as a near certainty for the election date, leaving
only three complete weeks before the campaign proper begins.
Mr Chris Patten, Tory party chairman, intensified the pre-election mood at
Westminster yesterday by threatening legal action against Mr Peter Hain,
Labour MP for Neath, over comments Mr Hain made last week on BBC television
over thefts from MPs offices.
Conservative party lawyers have been instructed to start libel proceedings -
unless Mr Hain apologises, retracts and gives redress for what Mr Patten
said were 'untrue' allegations. Mr Patten said Mr Hain had said that he had
organised or encouraged a concerted campaign of criminal activity to gain
political intelligence to discredit the Labour and Liberal Democrat parties.
Mr Hain said he would not be 'gagged' by Conservative Central Office 'about
these sinister series of apparently politically motivated pre-election
smears and computer burglaries'.
Mr Patten's threat came as ministers acknowledged that some of the
legislative programme would be lost if the general election was on April 9.
Two possible casualties are the Asylum Bill and the Schools Bill, which
seeks to privatise the Schools' Inspectorate.
Ministers raised the prospect of changes to immigration rules being part of
the Conservative manifesto by saying that if the controversial Asylum Bill
was not completed it would be reintroduced if the Tories won the election.
The bill was proposed by the government to toughen immigration procedures in
the face of increasing numbers of asylum seekers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8686</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Dobson attacks level of electricity profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTRICITY privatisation will mean at least an extra Pounds 800m in profits
to the electricity generation and supply industry this year but gives no
real benefit to consumers, Mr Frank Dobson, shadow energy secretary, said
yesterday.
In a letter to Mr John Wakeham, the energy secretary, Mr Dobson estimated
that the electricity industry would make Pounds 3.4bn profit this financial
year, compared with Pounds 2.6bn last year and Pounds 1.4bn in the year to
April 1988. He accused the government of failing to provide real competition
or regulation.
Mr Wakeham said his department had no forecasts for the electricity
industry's profits. 'In any case, it is right that companies should be able
to increase their profits as they become more efficient.'
What really mattered, Mr Wakeham added, was that prices to consumers had
fallen 2 per cent in the past 7 years.
Mr Dobson has also accused Mr Wakeham of starting rumours that he was about
to announce agreement by the electricity industry to buy 40m tonnes of coal
a year from British Coal.
National Power and PowerGen denied they were close to a deal, saying that
volumes had been discussed but not price.
The 12 regional electricity companies of England and Wales, which buy power
from the generators and sell it to customers, said earlier this week Mr
Wakeham had asked them to put pressure on the generators to agree an accord
with British Coal. In the past he has insisted that any deal should be
negotiated without government involvement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8687</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Ramsden back
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR TERRY RAMSDEN, former chairman of Glen International, will appear today
at City of London magistrates' court charged with 22 offences involving
fraudulent trading, obtaining property by deception, dishonestly inducing
creditors to wait for payment, false accounting, making deceptive statements
to investors and making false statements to government-appointed inspectors.
The Serious Fraud Office said last night that Mr Ramsden had returned to the
UK yesterday after waiving his right to contest extradition proceedings from
the US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8688</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / 'Sherry' hearing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A HIGH COURT judge yesterday reserved judgment on an attempt by sherry
producers to halt sales of Stone's Original Pale Cream, a new drink blending
Spanish and British sherries. They said Matthew Clark of Leeds, the maker,
was trying to cash in on the reputation of the Spanish product.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8689</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Pensions sales show growth
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SALES OF life assurance and pensions enjoyed strong growth last year, the
Association of British Insurers reported yesterday. But its figures also
suggested that consumer confidence in the stock market was low.
There was a 6 per cent fall in takings for unit-linked regular-premium
products, which are directly exposed to stock market fluctuations. Business
in non-linked regular premium schemes, which spread risk more widely,
increased by 9 per cent. The trend was more marked in single-premium life
bonds. In non-linked bonds, some of which invest only in cash or government
stocks, there was a 76 per cent rise in new business to Pounds 3.059m.
In pensions, new single premiums rose 35 per cent to Pounds 4.164m, while
annual premiums increased 8 per cent to Pounds 1.113m.
Weekend, Page VI
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8690</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Redundancies at aviation plant
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A CUT in production of Boeing 737 aircraft in the US has forced an aviation
components company to make 195 redundancies.
Smith's Industries at Bishop's Cleeve, near Cheltenham, said the
redundancies were a consequence of Boeing's decision to reduce 737
production from 22 aircraft a month to 14.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8691</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / BNFL to shed 750 workers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH NUCLEAR Fuels is to cut 750 jobs at its head office and design
centre at Risley, near Warrington, Cheshire, the company said yesterday.
The cuts, which affect engineering and design staff, have been caused by the
rundown of construction at BNFL's Sellafield nuclear waste reprocessing
plant in Cumbria.
BNFL said the job losses, which would reduce its engineering division from
1,750 to 1,000 by the mid 1990s, were necessary for it to become more
competitive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8692</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Receiver called to furniture chain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT 550 jobs were put at risk yesterday at 40 ELS stores throughout
England and Wales as an administrative receiver was called in at the
furniture chain, John Thornhill writes.
ELS, which is wholly-owned by the Greater Nottingham Co-operative Society,
was particularly badly hit by the collapse of the housing market. KPMG Peat
Marwick, the receiver, said ELS had suffered 'continuing significant
losses'.
The company had turnover of Pounds 50m last year. It employed 423 full-time
workers and 123 part-time staff. KPMG said it would seek to sell the
business, or parts of it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8693</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / No second trial for Seelig and Spens
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORMER MERCHANT bankers Mr Roger Seelig and Lord Spens will not face a
further trial on fraud and false accounting charges arising from the
Guinness takeover of Distillers in 1986, the Serious Fraud Office said
yesterday.
On Tuesday, 4 1/2 months after their trial began, Mr Justice Henry
discharged the jury because Mr Seelig could no longer defend himself
adequately.
He said two psychiatrists believed that, because of the mental, physical and
emotional strain Mr Seelig was suffering, there was a risk that he might do
'something irrevocable' if the trial went on.
Miss Elizabeth Gloster QC, for the SFO, told the judge that Mrs Barbara
Mills QC, SFO director, had decided not to subject either Mr Seelig or Lord
Spens to a second trial.
'It appears to her that, in the light of the medical evidence relating to Mr
Seelig's mental condition, it is not realistic to suppose that he will be in
an adequately fit mental state to endure a long trial within the reasonably
foreseeable future, and that, even if . . . he were to recover sufficiently
within a reasonable period of time to face a second trial, there would be a
real and substantial risk of a recurrence of the same problems.'
In those circumstances Mrs Mills had asked Sir Patrick Mayhew QC, the
attorney-general, to consider directing that a nolle prosequi, which halts
proceedings but is not equivalent to an acquittal, be entered to stay the
proceedings against Mr Seelig, and that had been done.
Miss Gloster said Lord Spens was in a different position as his health did
not appear to prevent him standing trial again. 'However, Lord Spens has
already had to face the strains of a long trial which finally aborted,
through no fault of his own, without a verdict.'
Mrs Mills therefore had to consider whether, 'notwithstanding that she
remains satisfied that there is sufficient evidence to proceed against Lord
Spens, the public interest requires him to be subjected to the rigours of a
second lengthy trial.' Her decision was that it did not, Miss Gloster said.
'The events which gave rise to the charges against Lord Spens happened some
six years ago. His alleged culpability as one of several recruits to the
illegal share-support scheme may be regarded, in comparative terms, as of
lesser gravity than that of those who took the centre-stage position. It
could be regarded as unfair to proceed to a second trial at which Mr Seelig
was absent.'
In addition, Mrs Mills had taken into account the costs to the public of a
retrial.
'Accordingly,' Miss Gloster said, 'the director has decided that, in the
very special circumstances of this case, the prosecution should not offer
any further evidence against Lord Spens in respect of the counts in this
indictment.'
The judge then sat in private to hear an application by Lord Spens that the
judge enter a formal not guilty verdict against him. That was adjourned
until Friday.
Outside the court Lord Spens said the position was very unsatisfactory. 'The
collapse of this trial has absolutely nothing to do with me. Mr Seelig has
been discharged and I am in limbo as to whether I have been acquitted and
whether I can get costs.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8694</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Manufacturing output falls 5.2%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANUFACTURING output fell by 5.2 per cent last year compared with 1990, with
the rate of decline speeding up in the last quarter, the Central Statistical
Office said yesterday.
Seasonally adjusted output in the three months to December was at its lowest
quarterly level for nearly four years.
Factory output in December was 8 per cent below the level in the second
quarter of 1990, when it reached a record. In December output fell 0.3 per
cent from November.
Manufacturing output fell 1.2 per cent between the third and fourth quarters
of last year, while between the second and third quarters it was flat. It
fell 0.7 per cent in the second quarter and 1.5 per cent in the first.
Factory production has fallen for six successive quarters, the longest run
since the CSO started keeping records in 1952. While factory production in
the 1974-75 and 1980-81 recessions fell for just five quarters, the total
decline in manufacturing output was deeper - 12 per cent and 15 per cent
respectively.
Last year, output by the metals and chemicals industries was virtually flat
between the last two quarters.
Mineral products - such as building materials - food, drink and tobacco,
textiles and clothing and general manufacturing each saw a fall of 1 per
cent between the two quarters while engineering declined by 2 per cent.
The chemicals sector increased output by 3 per cent last year compared with
1990, while food, drink and tobacco was unchanged. All the other main
sectors recorded falls - engineering fell 7 per cent, textiles and clothing
8 per cent and metals and minerals 9 per cent.
Since manufacturing output began to decline in mid 1990 engineering has been
among the hardest-hit sectors, with production falling 12 per cent.
Between the third and fourth quarters output of the energy and water
industries increased by 3 per cent, leaving output of all production
industries - manufacturing, energy and water - virtually unchanged over the
period. For last year, energy and water output rose 3.5 per cent, with all
production industries down 3 per cent.
Because of a squeeze on earnings across manufacturing, unit wage costs in
the three months to December were up 4.4 per cent on a year earlier, after
5.0 per cent in November.
There was a further increase in manufacturing productivity, with output per
person between September and December up 3.3 per cent on the previous year.
In the three months to November this figure was up 2.7 per cent on the same
period in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8695</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / January car output slips 16%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK CAR production in January was down 16 per cent year-on-year because of a
further fall in demand from both domestic and export markets.
Output was sustained early last year by a rise in export production. The
Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders warned yesterday that exports
could no longer be relied on to counteract poor domestic sales.
According the SMMT and the Central Statistical Office, car production last
month fell 16 per cent to 95,279 from 113,472 in January last year.
Commercial vehicle output fell by 10.7 per cent to 16,507.
Seasonally adjusted, car output in the six months to the end of January was
17 per cent lower than in the previous six months, and 20 per cent lower
than in the corresponding period a year before.
Export output in the past six months - seasonally adjusted - was 2 per cent
down on the same period a year before but 17 per cent lower than in the
previous six months.
Output for the whole of last year fell 4.5 per cent to 1.23m from 1.29m in
1990.
Toyota results, Volkswagen forecast, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8696</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Four men arrested in Pounds 2.3bn Sagawa Kyubin loans
scandal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROSECUTORS yesterday arrested four leading figures in the Sagawa Kyubin
scandal in which Y528bn (Pounds 2.38bn) in allegedly improper loans were
taken from the coffers of Japan's second largest parcel delivery company.
The arrests mark an important step in a widening investigation by the Tokyo
District Public Prosecutor into improprieties at the company. The scandal is
expected to involve gangsters and could net politicians as well.
The police arrested Mr Hiroyasu Watanabe, former president of Tokyo Sagawa
and Mr Jun Saotome, former managing director of the company on charges of
breach of trust. Also arrested were Mr Micho Ouchi, former chief accountant
at Ichihara Kanko Kaihatsu, a golf course development company, and Mr Yasuo
Matsuzawa, president of Heiwado, a medical equipment sales company.
Improper loans and loan guarantees from Sagawa were allegedly funneled
through the two companies with most of the funds eventually used for
speculation in the stock market. This turned sour when the market turned
down two years ago.
Much of the money, however, is also alleged to have found its way into the
hands of gangster-controlled companies associated with the Inagawakai, a
large crime syndicate.
It was alleged last night that Y5bn was funneled back to both ruling party
and opposition politicians through the purchase of tickets for fund-raising
events. It is unclear whether this type of political contribution would
amount to impropriety on the part of the politicians, or whether Sagawa
obtained any political favours as a result.
Specific charges against the four men yesterday involved misappropriation of
Y12.6bn in loans and loan guarantees. Prosecutors yesterday raided 15 more
locations in an effort to assemble more evidence to support the charges.
The raids have been well planned and publicised in advance and news of the
unfolding scandal now occupies up to half of the 30-minute evening news on
NHK, the state broadcasting system. The arrests were shown on television,
although public prosectors refused to confirm news of the arrests to foreign
journalists on the grounds that to do so would violate the civil rights of
the accused.
Public interest in the scandal has been heightened by the expectation that
it may eventually bring down leading politicians.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Photograph Businessman Hiroyasu Watanabe, centre, being taken
to Kosuge prison after his arrest yesterday (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8697</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Heavy retail price-cutting pushes down inflation rate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHARP reduction in inflation yesterday was welcome news for the
government following Thursday's steep rise in unemployment and the record
number of house repossessions.
The fall in the annual rate of increase of the retail prices index for
January to 4.1 per cent puts the UK headline inflation rate below the EC
average of 4.9 per cent and below the ERM average of 4.5 per cent.
Overall the RPI fell by 0.1 per cent from 135.7 in December to 135.6 in
January, based on a weighting of 100 in January 1987.
But the good news on inflation also reflects bad news on the economy. A
breakdown of the falls in prices of the components of the RPI reveals the
desperate lengths adopted by some retailers in January to overcome the
negative forces of the recession.
The biggest of these falls was recorded in clothing and footwear, where
prices fell 5.1 per cent on the month, the biggest fall recorded in this
sector since February 1921.
The Central Statistical Office said that the figure reflected the
exceptionally sharp price reductions in the January sales which turned out
to be even more extensive than the record cuts in the January sales last
year.
There were further steep price reductions in household goods, where prices
fell 1.7 per cent on the month - the largest monthly fall since 1956 and a
reflection of price discounting in furniture and electrical appliances.
The link between the heavy discounting by retailers in January and the sharp
fall in the annual rate of inflation leaves a question mark over the
prospects of keeping inflation at its present rate if demand picks up.
Seasonal factors and higher prices for fares and utilities were the main
reason for the rises that occurred last month. Fare increases of 6.3 per
cent in January pushed travel costs up 2 per cent on the month, while higher
prices for house-contents insurance caused a 1.7 per cent monthly increase
in the price of household services.
A sharp rise in the price of home-killed lamb, and increases of fresh
vegetables caused seasonal food prices to rise by 2 per cent.
A smaller rise in non-seasonal food prices - 0.8 per cent - reflected more
expensive bread, cheese, soft drinks, beef and bacon.
A 1.1 per cent monthly increase in personal goods and services reflected
higher charges for services including health insurance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8698</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Storms claim seven lives in California
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A bewildered Californian couple return to their flood-wrecked mobile home in
Ventura. The worst storms to hit southern California in a century have
killed seven people this week, and two more were forecast this weekend for a
region in its sixth year of drought. Most of the stormwater has run off into
the sea. The state's governor has put damage costs so far at Dollars 23m at
least.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8699</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blast kills five in Algerian clashes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY WALKER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ALGIERS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FIVE people were killed in an explosion yesterday in the centre of Algiers
after a gunfight with police, the Algerian news agency APS reported. The
explosion occurred in the Casbah, ancient heart of the city, during a day of
sporadic gunfire and skirmishes between riot police and Islamic militants.
Three security force members were also wounded in the incident. There was no
immediate explanation for the blast.
An expected mass protest by fundamentalists against the state of emergency
imposed last week did not materialise, after imams at Friday prayers had
urged people to avoid confrontation.
Conflict in and around the Casbah, a densely populated warren of old
colonial style buildings and narrow passageways, followed a gun attack on a
police guard post nearby. The area is a stronghold of the now underground
Islamic Salvation Front (FIS) which had urged its supporters to 'mobilise'
against the state of emergency.
Yesterday's threatened confrontation was billed as the first 'test of
strength' between the FIS and the authorities since the the state of
emergency was declared. Algeria's military rulers took few chances.
Guardsmen, supported by police, in riot gear and heavily armed, blocked
approaches to city squares where the FIS had planned to hold its rally.
Algerians were told repeatedly in radio broadcasts that demonstrations would
not be tolerated.
Many residents of Algiers stayed at home to avoid trouble. There were few,
if any, episodes of stone throwing or the burning of tyres that were a
feature of last Friday's clashes that helped prompt the imposition of
emergency rule. Western observers believe yesterday's 'stand-off' will
continue for the time being.
Hundreds of FIS activists, including most of the leadership, have been
arrested since the military, in mid-January, aborted a second round of
voting in parliamentary elections that were certain to confirm a sweeping
victory for the FIS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8700</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Opec unable to agree on oil production cut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A THIRD day of tense talks by ministers from the Organisation of Petroleum
Exporting Countries failed to yield an agreement on cutting production and
boosting oil prices.
Saudi Arabia had presented various proposals aimed at achieving a cut in
output to 22.5m-23m barrels a day (b/d) from the current 24.2m b/d. Mr
Hisham Nazer, its oil minister, spent most of Thursday night closeted with
colleagues from the United Arab Emirates, Kuwait and Algeria to formulate a
proposal that would be acceptable to all members. But talks foundered
yesterday on Mr Nazer's insistence that his country keep its one-third share
of Opec output.
Mr Nazer said the kingdom had offered to cut output by 500,000 b/d, which
would keep production above 8m b/d, but other producers wanted an even
bigger fall.
The kingdom is sensitive about the political implications of asking some of
the smaller producers to share too large a part of the burden. Countries
such as Venezuela and Algeria are constrained by political instability at
home and are under intense pressure to boost oil prices while keeping as big
a market share as they can.
However, Saudi Arabia is unwilling to yield its huge market clout and
appears intent on forcing other members to accept this.
With the oil price dropping more than Dollars 4 since November, Opec members
are prepared to haggle over every barrel of production. Any allocation of
production levels is likely to be more closely allied to capacity than in
the past. Some producers are believed to be unhappy that this could set a
new course for Opec away from any form of production quotas linked to
historic output.
The oil market is watching for any signal that can give a direction to
prices. But a cut of some 1.5m-1.7m b/d is unlikely to have a big effect on
prices. Mr Homoud al-Rqobah, Kuwait's oil minister, commented that a cut to
22.5m b/d would push prices up but not to the target price of Dollars 21.
'If they cut production so that actual output is in the area of 23m b/d oil
prices are likely to continue trending sideways,' said Mr Michael Rothman,
senior energy futures analyst at Merill Lynch. 'If a credible agreement is
reached to cut production to 22.5m b/d, oil prices could drift upwards but
not dramatically.'
Oil prices fell on the news of Opec's disarray and the futures price on the
New York Mercantile Exchange dropped 30 cents to Dollars 19.40 a barrel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8701</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Mass Greek protest over name of new republic of Macedonia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE, JUDY DEMPSEY and DAVID WHITE, Defence Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEVERAL hundred thousand Greeks yesterday demonstrated in the northern city
of Salonica against the use of the name Macedonia by the breakaway Yugoslav
republic, Greece's northern neighbour.
The demonstration coincided with suggestions that the European Community may
soon recognise Macedonia as an independent republic.
Mr Dinos Kosmopoulos, the mayor of Salonica, capital of the Greek province
of Macedonia, said the emerging republic (of Macedonia) had 'challenged our
history and stolen our name.'
Greece refuses to recognise the Macedonian republic's independence unless it
changes its name and gives guarantees that it has no territorial claim on
northern Greece.
However, there is increasing speculation that if other western countries
recognise Macedonia, the Greek government will drop its opposition to the
name providing Macedonia denies the existence of a Slavo-Macedonian minority
in Greece.
Meanwhile, in Macedonia itself, the Yugoslav federal army continues to
withdraw its forces from the republic. David White, Defence Correspondent,
adds: The UK is discussing sending specialised support units to Yugoslavia
for the planned UN peacekeeping force, but is resisting involvement by
British combat troops. Its reluctance is based on fears that the plan may
become a long-standing commitment such as the UN force that has been in
Cyprus since 1964 or Britain's own engagement in Northern Ireland since
1969.
However, Mr Douglas Hurd, foreign secretary, yesterday expressed Britain's
'full support' for the plan and urged 'swift UN involvement'. The shape of
the force of up to 13,000 is expected to be worked out early next week after
talks involving 31 countries.
Britain's contribution is likely to focus on areas such as portable
satellite communications and engineering units. But experts believe it may
involve fewer than the 1,200 personnel suggested by the UN.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8702</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blow dealt to prospects of US recovery: Across-the-board
fall in industrial production much worse than expected by markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROSPECTS of an early US economic recovery were dealt a blow yesterday by
much worse than expected industrial production figures.
The Federal Reserve said production fell 0.9 per cent last month, nearly
twice the decline expected on Wall Street.
The Fed also revised previous figures sharply downward to show declines of
0.3 per cent and 0.4 per cent in November and December.
Separately, the Commerce Department reported a 0.3 per cent decline in
producer prices - a further sign of ebbing inflationary pressures. Figures
for business inventories, meanwhile, showed a sharp rise in December,
indicating that corporate sales were falling short of projections.
The production fall - the largest since last spring - was led by the motor
industry, where output contracted 8 per cent relative to December. However,
the report was a sea of minuses, with nearly every sector registering
substantial declines.
Manufacturing production was down 1 per cent, while the factory utilisation
rate fell nearly a percentage point to 78 per cent, the lowest level for
nearly a decade.
On Thursday, hopes of recovery had been lifted by a 0.6 per cent rise in
retail sales in January and a revival of car sales in the first 10 days of
February.
Analysts yesterday tried to make sense of the conflicting reports. Some saw
the production fall as a lagged response to poor consumer demand at the end
of last year. If the tentative signs of better sales were sustained, output
might rise in coming months.
However, Mr William Griggs, of the Wall Street firm Griggs and Santow, said
too much had been made of a modest upturn in the highly volatile series for
retail sales. The economy was 'certainly not on an upswing'.
On Wall Street, share and bond markets were unsettled by the conflicting
reports. Bond prices closed slightly higher, but failed to regain ground
lost after a period of weakness.
The market is fearful that Congress will vote to increase the budget deficit
beyond the Dollars 400bn (Pounds 221bn) already expected in fiscal 1992 and
remains convinced that the Federal Reserve will not ease policy in the near
future.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8703</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Victory for Kohl in tax reform battle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE German government yesterday won approval for a big tax reform package
intended to pump more money into the collapsed east German economy, largely
at the expense of the west.
The deal was pushed through in the face of bitter opposition from the Social
Democratic Party (SPD) by uniting all the new federal states in the east to
vote for an increase in value added tax from 14 to 15 per cent.
The package also includes the first steps towards corporate tax reforms,
including increased thresholds for company property tax and trade profits
tax, intended to make industry more competitive in the single European
market.
The vote in the Bundesrat, the upper house of parliament, after weeks of
deadlock, is a big victory for Chancellor Helmut Kohl's government. However,
SPD leaders warned that it had only been achieved at the expense of further
embittering relations between east and west.
Victory for the government came after the last-minute decision by
Brandenburg, the one state in the former East Germany ruled by the SPD, to
back the package, along with neighbouring Berlin, ruled by a coalition of
the main parties.
Mr Manfred Stolpe, Brandenburg's Social Democrat premier, under fire himself
for his dealings with the East German security police as a church leader
before unification, swung the whole debate with a passionate speech spelling
out the extent of economic collapse in the region.
'Do you really all begin to know the misery we are facing in the east?' he
demanded. 'Is it really clear to you how critical this turning point is,
where we stand in 1992? The demolitions are still going on. Companies are
still closing down - every week, one, two, three or four. Every week,
hundreds of jobs are being lost.'
The tax package will mean an extra DM33bn (Pounds 11.4bn) in finance for the
eastern states over the next three years, because the whole increase in VAT
will be used to bolster the German Unity Fund. That will provide urgently
need cash for job creation schemes.
Mr Oskar Lafontaine, premier of the Saarland, said that the government had
deliberately pitted the poorer states of the west, against all those in the
east. The VAT increase would hit the lowest paid hardest, and aggravate the
social tension in the country. It would destroy solidarity between east and
west.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8704</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Oil job for Perez de Cuellar
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ENI, the Italian state oil concern, has appointed Mr Javier Perez de
Cuellar, the former United Nations secretary-general, as a special adviser
to the group's president, Mr Gabriele Cagliari, writes Robert Graham in
Rome. Mr Cagliari said ENI would benefit from Mr Perez de Cuellar's
experience in a fast changing world where international institutions like
the UN were playing an increasingly important role. Mr Perez de Cuellar, a
72-year-old Peruvian diplomat, ended a 10 year term as UN secretary-general
last month. Mr Perez de Cuellar has also been appointed to the board of two
companies in the banking group headed by Mr Edmond Safra - Republic New York
Corporation and Luxembourg-based Safra Republic Holdings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8705</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Quebec shelves hydro scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Quebec's energy ministry and Hydro-Quebec have confirmed that the CDollars
13bn Great Whale hydro-electric project in the north of the province may be
delayed indefinitely because of a campaign by the Cree Indians, writes
Robert Gibbens in Montreal.
Ms Lise Bacon, Quebec's energy minister, said Hydro-Quebec was considering
speeding up alternative projects further south and on the St Lawrence North
Shore, together offering nearly as much power as Great Whale's 3,000mw in
the far north.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8706</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Fokker wins order from China
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FOKKER, the Dutch aircraft maker, announced a sales breakthrough in China
yesterday hours before the Netherlands government bowed to pressure from
Beijing and blocked the export of Dutch-built submarines to Taiwan, writes
Ronald van de Krol in Amsterdam.
Fokker said it had won an order to supply seven 100-seater Fokker 100s to
the regional airline, China Eastern, and that it expected to win further
Chinese orders.
Fokker, which has never before sold aircraft to China, said negotiations had
been taking place on and off for five years. However, it is clear the deal
would not have gone ahead if the Dutch government had not blocked
shipbuilder Rotterdam Droogdok Maatschappij from accepting a Fl 2.5bn
Taiwanese order for four submarines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8707</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Somali groups agree to end bitter civil war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   UNITED NATIONS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The two sides in Somalia's civil war yesterday signed separate commitments
to an immediate cessation of hostilities, with a formal ceasefire to be
completed by early March, the leader of one of the rival delegations said,
Reuter reports from the United Nations.
The agreement came after three days of UN-sponsored peace talks in New York
co-ordinated by Undersecretary-General James Jonah. Up to 30,000 people have
been killed or wounded in three months of fighting in the Somali capital,
Mogadishu, in which supporters of General Mohamed Farrah Aidid, of the
United Somali Congress (USC), have been battling to oust interim President
Ali Mahdi Mohamed, also of the USC.
Earlier yesterday, the International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC)
called for a massive and urgent world effort to save 4m-5m people in Somalia
from mass starvation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8708</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Centre-right to offer alliance with Tory MEPs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Christian Democrat group in the European Parliament has decided to
pursue talks for a quasi-merger with British Tory MEPs, with a joint
structure and secretariat to be finalised this spring.
Last year, the European Democratic Group (34 Tory MEPs and two Danish
conservatives) made a controversial request to link up with the Christian
Democrats, the leading centre-right political group. The arrangement
proposed will fall short of that, but Christian Democrat leaders see an
alliance with the UK Tories as a bridgehead for their federalist views in
Britain.
Last night, a meeting in Brussels of CD leaders, including Chancellor Helmut
Kohl and four other prime ministers, criticised Prime Minister John Major,
deploring his 'negative stand' at the Maastricht summit on monetary and
social policy. However, their chairman, Prime Minister Wilfried Martens of
Belgium, said the Tory MEPs had shown 'they would like to bend the views of
the UK government' towards favouring monetary union, and particularly a more
active EC social policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8709</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: M and S recalls wine
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Marks and Spencer ordered the recall of two types of its Italian wines after
the discovery of slight traces of a chemical fungicide.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8710</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Rushdie at lecture
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Author Salman Rushdie made a surprise appearance at a lecture at Stationers'
Hall, London, to mark the third anniversary of the death sentence issued
against him by the late Ayatollah Khomenei of Iran.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8711</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Break-ins to be probed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A senior Scotland Yard detective is to investigate a series of burglaries at
Liberal Democrat constituency offices in various parts of Britain to see
whether they are linked.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8712</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Move to ban hunting fails
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A bill to outlaw hunting with hounds of foxes, stags and hares, promoted by
Labour MP Kevin McNamara, with support from both sides of the House of
Commons, was defeated by a majority of 12.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8713</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Trial-weary City says world has changed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OUTCOME of the Blue Arrow trial was greeted with surprise yesterday in
the world of corporate finance, four of whose former City of London stars
were convicted for their role in disguising the failure of the employment
agency's 1987 rights issue.
Institutional investors, meanwhile, confessed to a kind of 'litigation
fatigue', noting that the Blue Arrow rights issue occurred more than four
years ago and the events leading to the Guinness trial which collapsed on
Tuesday happened in 1986.
The chief executive of one leading securities house, who would not be named,
said: 'I was rather surprised: I thought they were going to get off.' The
head of corporate finance at another added: 'The judge's summing up made it
look as though it was going to go the other way.'
But investors generally cheered the efforts at prosecution, saying the mere
fact charges had been brought had changed City practices forever.
'The trials have sent a warning to those who were tempted to sail close to
the wind,' said Mr Charles Nunnelly, deputy chairman of Robert Fleming Asset
Management and chairman of the Institutional Fund Managers Association.
Indeed, investors say the world has changed since the events of the Blue
Arrow rights issue, where the brokers attempted to hide a large unsold block
of shares.
'In placings, acquisitions and takeovers, one can ask the right questions
and expect honest answers,' said one institutional fund manager.
'The mere possibility of prosecution should act as a deterrent, even if they
are not found guilty.'
Another corporate finance chief said: 'If a deal goes wrong in that way,
it's much more significant for you even than what happens to the individuals
concerned. There is a great deal of disenchantment with the legal process
which has led to this. The most effective sanction of all is commercial
failure, rather than this attenuated and unsatisfactory legal process.'
Mr Nunnelly said: 'These trials have been badly mishandled. The fact that
it's taken so many years for these cases to come to trial is absolutely
unacceptable.'
He joined those urging City fraud cases to be heard by a judge and two
professionals, saying they bore little resemblance to common criminal cases.
Mr Gareth Williams, QC, chairman of the Bar Council, called for urgent
reform.
'It is intolerable that these fraud trials last for such a long time,
thereby not only using up a great deal of public money but also placing an
intolerable burden on all those involved, particularly the jurors. The jury
is, and must remain, the cornerstone of our legal system, but a better
system, which retained jurors, must be found.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8714</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Independent republics in disarray over armed forces
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN LLOYD and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MINSK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE FUTURE of the Common-wealth of Independent States was thrown into doubt
yesterday when three former Soviet republics said they would immediately
create their own armed forces.
The declarations by Moldova, Azerbaijan and Ukraine at the CIS summit
meeting in Minsk constituted a sharp rebuff to Russian president Boris
Yeltsin, who has sought to maintain a unified military command.
The question remains open on when the other republics, especially Russia,
will form their own military forces. However, the remaining eight republics
agreed to retain a form of unified command for two years.
Belorussia and Uzbekistan agreed to the transitional period, but with
reservations.
Mr Stanislav Shushkevich, chairman of the Belorussian parliament, said its
constitution did not allow it to be a member of a military pact, but it
would stay within the commonwealth structure for the time being.
Marshal Yevgeny Shaposhnikov was confirmed as head of the united strategic
and conventional forces - but decisions on the chief of the general staff
and the commanders of the strategic and conventional forces were delayed.
The presidents agreed to meet again in the Ukrainian capital of Kiev on
March 20.
All 11 members have agreed there should be one unified command over the
strategic nuclear forces, under the control of the presidents of the four
states with nuclear weapons - Belorussia, Kazakhstan, Russia and Ukraine.
The agreement on control of the nuclear forces is, according to Mr Leonid
Kravchuk, the Ukrainian president, a statement only of general principles -
'and so we could sign it.'
He made clear that Ukraine intended to destroy its nuclear warheads by 1994
 -at the end of the two-year transitional period.
The urgent military issue which has divided Russia and Ukraine, control of
the Black Sea fleet, also appears to have been put off until the March
meeting in Kiev. Mr Kravchuk said after the 11-hour meeting last night that
he had not discussed military questions with Mr Yeltsin.
Russia, meanwhile, is likely to face calls from its parliament and some of
its senior military advisers for the immediate creation of a Russian army -
especially as it is now clear Ukraine will take no further part in the
commonwealth forces.
However, Mr Yeltsin was reported to have said that 'Russia does not intend
to create its own armed forces'.
The vexed question of the division of property of the former Soviet Union
has also been left to the meeting on March 20.
Mr Kravchuk said that the meeting passed in an 'atmosphere of goodwill',
although officials attending the meeting said tempers flared between him and
Mr Yeltsin.
Some 20 documents were signed by the presidents, including an economic
agreement which, according to Mr Kravchuk, devolves responsibility for
concluding trade contracts from the state level to the level of enterprises
and local organisations.
The United Nations announced yesterday that the General Assembly would meet
on February 28 to admit eight former Soviet republics to the UN, Reuter
reports.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8715</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Blue Arrow jury convicts four: Year-long Pounds 35m trial is
most expensive in UK criminal history
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE marathon Blue Arrow fraud trial ended yesterday with four prominent City
of London financial advisers being convicted at the Old Bailey of conspiracy
to defraud over their handling of the 1987 rights issue for the employment
agency.
A year and four days after the trial began, the jury returned guilty
verdicts against Mr Jonathan Cohen, Mr David Reed, Mr Nicholas Wells, all
former executives with County NatWest, the merchant banking subsidiary of
National Westminster Bank, and Mr Martin Gibbs, a former director of UBS
Phillips &amp; Drew Securities. All the verdicts were unanimous.
A not guilty verdict was returned against the fifth remaining defendant, Mr
Christopher Stainforth, a former corporate financier with UBS P&amp;D.
The four found guilty were allowed home on bail and will return to court on
Monday for sentencing. It is considered certain that solicitors will lodge
appeals on behalf of all four after sentencing.
After his acquittal, Mr Stainforth merely said he was 'pleased' by the
jury's verdict in his case.
Neither NatWest nor UBS P&amp;D, which have been paying the defendants' legal
fees, made any comment.
The verdicts will be seen as partial consolation for the Serious Fraud
Office which brought the prosecution. They came at the end of week which,
following the collapse of the second Guinness trial, has seen unprecedented
questioning of the way the SFO and regulators tackle large fraud cases.
The Blue Arrow trial, however, will be regarded as only a mixed success for
the SFO. Of the 10 defendants originally standing trial, six have now been
acquitted. Two individuals and all three corporate defendants were acquitted
on the instruction of the judge earlier in the trial.
The length of the trial and its cost - at some Pounds 35m it was the most
expensive trial in UK criminal history - is already fuelling the debate
about how fraud cases can be most effectively dealt with by regulators and
the courts.
After the verdicts were returned, the prosecution announced it would apply
to recover from the convicted defendants some of the Pounds 1m costs of the
Department of Trade and Industry inquiry.
A second Blue Arrow trial is still in prospect. Conspiracy charges are
outstanding against four other individuals involved in the rights issue.
They are: Mr Charles Villiers, the former County chairman; Ms Elizabeth
Brimelow, County's former compliance director; Mr Paul Smallwood, a former
equities director with UBS P&amp;D; and Mr Tim Brown, another former equities
director with P&amp;D. The SFO is expected to announce shortly whether it will
proceed.
The charges arose from the handling by County NatWest and UBS P&amp;D of the
Pounds 837m Blue Arrow rights issue to fund the takeover of Manpower, the US
employment group. At the time the issue was the largest ever attempted in
the UK.
The prosecution alleged that the defendants had dishonestly conspired to
mislead the markets by secretly buying shares, totalling almost a fifth of
Blue Arrow, in the failed issue to present it to potential investors as a
success.
The defendants all argued that in the post-Big Bang world they were entitled
to do this.
Page 5
Convictions a jolt to City 'bad behaviour'
No second trial for Seelig and Spens, Page 4
Editorial comment Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1 Photograph Mr Jonathan Cohen, a former executive of County
NatWest, the merchant bank, shortly after he and three other defendants in
the Blue Arrow fraud case were found guilty (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8716</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
STERLING
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.771 (1.77265)
London:
Dollars 1.7685 (1.7705)
DM 2.88 (2.8725)
FFr 9.785 (9.7875)
SFr 2.595 (2.58)
Y 226.25 (226.0)
Pounds index 90.8 (90.7)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
GOLD
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
New York Comex Feb
Dollars 355.1 (357.3)
London:
Dollars 354.0 (356.4)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
N SEA OIL (Argus)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Brent 15-day  Mar
Dollars 18.45 (18.30)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.6265 (1.6265)
FFr 5.5335 (5.537)
SFr 1.46585 (1.459)
Y 127.9 (127.75)
London:
DM 1.6285 (1.623)
FFr 5.5325 (5.5275)
SFr 1.4675 (1.4575)
Y 127.9 (127.7)
Dollars index 63.7 (63.6)
Tokyo close: Y127.95
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Fed Funds: 3 7/8% (4)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
3.89% (3.859)
Long Bond:
101 (100 31/32)
yield: 7.905% (7.908)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE 100: Yield 4.89
2,513.9 (-8.7)
FT-A All-Share:
1,205.56 (-0.3%)
FT-SE Eurotrack 100:
1130.78 (-5.90)
FT-A World Index:
144.51 (-0.9)
New York:
DJ Ind. Av.
3,245.98 (-0.68)
S&amp;P Comp
412.48 (-1.21)
Tokyo: Nikkei
20,883.86 (-507.16)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
3-month interbank:
10 7/16% (same)
Liffe long gilt future:
Mar 97 11/32 (97 27/32)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8717</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Travel: Royal approval - Skiing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN THE Duchess of York visited Altenmarkt in Austria recently, she became
one of the latest people to discover the pleasures of this little-known town
and its big ski area.
Altenmarkt is known mainly for being the home of the Atomic ski factory and
the Steffner ski sweater plant. If your business is not at one of those
places, then it is easy to miss Altenmarkt. Many do. They roar along the
motorway from Salzburg and turn off to St Johann in Pongau and Zell-am-Zee,
or drive on to Schladming and Obertauern, all of which are better known than
Altenmarkt.
Yet Altenmarkt does not deserve to be overshadowed. It is the mother town of
a ski region that is far bigger than many more fashionable areas. The locals
refer to Zauchensee - the resort six miles from Altenmarkt - as a ski
paradise. I do not think they are exaggerating. The Amade ski area of which
Zauchensee is the hub provides 320 kms of skiing spread across five valleys
and six mountains.
In Austria, Altenmarkt is known as a schneeloch, or snow hole, because it
gathers snow from the west and south whereas most other resorts receive snow
from only one direction. Another advantage is that it is so close to
Salzburg. It is only a 45-minute ride from Salzburg airport. I once landed
at Salzburg airport at 3.40, cleared customs by 3.50, was in my hotel in
Altenmarkt by 4.50 and had rented skis and boots by 5.30.
Altenmarkt has a population of 3,000. It has some shops that would not look
out of place in London's Bond Street as well as a sports centre with two
indoor tennis courts, two squash courts, swimming pool, Turkish and sauna
baths, and a floodlit cross-country skiing trail. Best of all, there is an
onion-topped church with magnificent bells that boom out the half-hour and
hour.
Like many Austrian ski resorts, Zauchensee has grown enormously in the past
20 years - and with it Altenmarkt. Germans from nearby Munich as well as
Austrians from Salzburg and Vienna have discovered the pretty town. They
have brought prosperity to it but clogged its streets with cars.
'Everybody likes to get bigger but the problem with many villages is that
they have too many buildings,' says Eddie Kocher, head of the tourist
office. 'You have to walk for 20 minutes to see a green field.
'That must not happen here. We have 3,000 beds, the same number as we had
ten years ago, and we like that. We do not want to get bigger. People come
to Altenmarkt and say: 'This is a village. It has a family atmosphere.' This
must not change. Our job over the next 20 years is to improve on, not spoil,
the success of the past 20 years.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8718</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Travel: The fun of Flims - Skiing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ANDERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   IF KLOSTERS leaves you cold
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
so many duchesses, darling - or if you find Davos dull on third
acquaintance, then Flims, just 90 minutes south-east from Zurich, could be
right up your schuss.
Flims is a ski resort for those who think they have 'done' Switzerland. It
has a large, pretty ski area which, although not particularly challenging,
holds enough slopes to keep an intermediate happy for a week. It is not
overcrowded, is relatively high and is convenient for airport transfers.
Best of all, it is very little-known to British skiers - no Hoorays on the
slopes or gluhwein-louts on the streets.
Both Flims and its sister-village of Laax, a few miles away, are cradled
amid a sunny bowl which faces south-east and is called Der Weissen Arena -
the White Arena. It is a long-established resort with several new lifts,
opening-up a relatively well-interconnected 'ski circus.'
Flims Dorf, the original village, wends along a busy main road. There is
little Alpine romance here; it is a working village with the usual cluster
of bars, banks and (expensive) ski-hire shops for tourists. The Albana bar
is within staggering distance of the two main ski lifts - a three-man chair
to Foppa and a four-man to Naraus, from which there are (occasionally icy)
red runs back - and the two-stage gondola to a wider ski area at Startgels.
Flims Waldhaus, just up the road towards Laax, is more sedately attractive:
a cluster of cafes, shops and purpose-built hotels, among them the slightly
fantastical Schweizerhof, which perches like a wedding cake among the trees;
the smart Adula, with its gourmet Barga restaurant; and the five-star Park
Hotel. In both villages, apres-ski is more muted than manic; but then, many
find that a major attraction.
Much of the best sport is to be had in the La Siala area. It is largely
wide-open, motorway skiing, but hugely enjoyable in good snow. Better skiers
should seek out the black descent from Crassons or (in good snow) the steep
paths down to Plaun.
The piste station of Crap Sogn Gion is served by a cable-car from Murschteg,
a purpose-built satellite of Laax. The run under the cable-car is used as a
downhill course but can be tackled by a confident intermediate. There are
nice, fast red runs from much of the Crap Sogn Gion area, but the great
attraction is higher up, on the black run off the Vorab glacier:
knee-tremblingly steep for a short while, then a long descent full of
swooping and whooping down to Alp Ruschein.
The White Arena is well served with largely self-service mountain
restaurants, although even the cavernous ones such as Nagens tend to fill
quickly at lunch-times. The food is standard hearty German fare; for those
whose frozen tongues cannot get around the word weinerschnitzel, nearly
everyone in Flims speaks English.
One of the best restaurants is the Runcahohe, tucked away in the trees
towards the bottom pistes of Flims Dorf, although the long pole to reach it
renders one incapable of little more than falling into a chair and calling
weakly for the house speciality, coffee laced with a near-terminal dose of
rum. A couple of these make the easy, but pretty, tree-lined run back to
base more interesting.
The real cognoscente soon discover the delightfully-uncrowded farming hamlet
of Falera, reached by a long, fast blue run from Crap Sogn Gion or (lower
down) the Curnius chairlift. It has a couple of hotels for lunch, two pretty
churches, a distinct aroma of cow, and friendly locals who seem surprised
that any skier should bother to drop in for . . . well, anything really. It
also has the World's Slowest Chair Lift back to Curnius.
And that is Flims: unpretentious, efficient, pretty and, although day-to-day
expensive, less so than its super-posh near neighbours. Drawbacks? One, and
it is T-shaped.
In common with many Swiss resorts, Flims suffers from the curse of the
T-bar, the silliest ski-lift known to man. There are dozens of the things.
And at the head of the queue for the busiest, flashiest T-bar of all, I fell
off. Right in front of everyone. And got on again. And fell off again. And
again. Until an aged and kindly Swiss gentleman helped me on, and off at the
top. He even offered to carry my ski poles.
Oh, the shame of it. Thank God there were no Brits there to see me ..
Andrew Anderson travelled to Flims with Powder Byrne Original Skiing
(071-223-0601) which offers five hotels and one chalet in the resort. Prices
range between Pounds 568 and Pounds 684 a person per week for half board in
the three-star Waldek Hotel, to between Pounds 860 and Pounds 1,050 in the
five-star Park Hotel, depending on season. Powder Byrne 'ski managers' will
ski with holidaymakers every day if clients wish - a useful service. The
lift pass costs around Pounds 95.
Other operators to Flims include Swiss Travel Service and Made To Measure.
Flims' close proximity to Zurich means it is a useful long weekend
destination; there are regular scheduled flights on SwissAir from London
Heathrow to Zurich, or long weekends can be tailor-made by Powder Byrne.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8719</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Travel: Under the volcano, the real Mexico erupts - Nicholas
Woodsworth flees a sanitised haven of luxury in search of the noise and
bright colours of the traditional frontier towns - and the mountain that
shadows them
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'FUMAROLAS,' said the Mexican gentleman sitting on the aircraft beside me.
Was he talking about some local brand of cigars, I wondered? He was a big,
middle-aged man with a heavy black moustache and a large girth: just the
type, I thought, who at the end of this non-smoking flight might be badly
missing his favourite cigars.
'Fumarolas,' he said again, this time tapping the plexiglass window beside
my head. I looked out, and far below saw a cone-shaped mountain rising high
above the surrounding hills. From its summit a long trail of white vapour
tailed horizontally in the wind.
'Es el Volcan de Fuego,' said the big man, buckling his seat belt for our
descent. 'Esta un cono eruptivo y constantamente emite fumarolas.'
Not even a hopeless Spanish speaker like me could fail to understand. As the
volcano receded In the distance and the aircraft headed earthwards to
Manzanillo and the Pacific coast, the image of that long white tail of
vapour lingered, bright against the dark green jungle beneath it.
The luxury hotel Las Hadas sits at one end of the wide, sweeping Bay of
Manzanillo. At the other end, across four or five miles of bright blue
water, you can see the port city of Manzanillo itself, a silhouette of
cranes, shipping piers and freighters riding at anchor.
Perched on the steeply sloping edge of a small peninsula and surrounded by
walls and gates, the resort is a little world unto itself. Las Hadas has
everything - tennis and golf, bars and restaurants, marinas and beaches,
shops, beauty parlours, doctors and church services. Exclusive in the true
sense of the word, Las Hadas has everything, in fact, except Mexico itself.
Most of the guests are American. They vacation at Las Hadas not to come to
Mexico but to get away from Chicago, Philadelphia or Kansas City. Struggling
to catch up with the Japanese has its price - most Americans have only two
weeks' holiday a year, and it shows.
Captains of industry arrive, pale and drawn, and are received by smiling
staff in red fezzes and white uniforms. Silent electric golf carts ferry
them to rooms where bouganvillia-covered patios overlook the bay. Once
installed, they collapse at pool-side, not moving very much more than the
captive green iguanas that sit sunning themselves on the little island in
the middle of the pool. The last thing the guests at Las Hadas want is
noise, bustle and that mixture of pleasures and irritations which, in
unpredictable measure, lie in the vast country that is outside the hotel
gates.
Like everyone else at Las Hadas, I fed the iguanas red hibiscus flowers and
drank coco-loco cocktails sitting on an underwater stool at the pool bar.
I wandered through the white-washed architecture - domes, arches, towers and
terraces - that lends to the resort its Moorish village theme. I browsed
through the souvenir shops at the shopping arcade. I tried lunch at the
Oasis beach restaurant, a sunset aperitif at the Legazpi piano bar, and a
seafood dinner at The Dolphins restaurant.
It was all undeniably pleasant. But unlike everyone else, I had one simple
problem. Not having worn myself ragged through 50 consecutive weeks of
merciless battle with the Japanese, I found myself the tiniest bit bored.
This was relaxing perhaps, but it was not Mexico. I wanted noise, movement,
colour and the country outside the Las Hadas gates. So I rented a car. I was
thinking of the volcano and its long white trail of vapour.
* * *
Mexico is like any part of the world where holiday-makers come for warm
ocean water and sunny beaches: leave the coast and head inland and in a
surprisingly short time the traffic, crowds, bars, restaurants, hotels,
condominiums and time-share apartments disappear. Less than 15 minutes
behind Manzanillo, where the heavily commercialised coastal plain suddenly
gives way to steeply-rising hills, I felt myself moving into an older, more
traditional Mexico.
A dramatic change came over the country as I rose above the humid coast. The
country became drier and more sparsely covered. The leached tropical red
soils of the littoral gave way to grassland. Corn grew tall in roadside
fields. Cactus appeared. Cattle wandered in herds. By the time I leveled off
on a plateau high over the coast, the air was cool, clear and scintillating,
and I was in the open rangeland of cowboy country. As I drove through the
town of Colima in the centre of the plain I saw, looming over the twin
spires of the town's baroque cathedral, the skyward-rising flanks of the
Volcan de Fuego.
Built by the Spanish conquistador Hernando Cortes in 1527, Colima is one of
Mexico's oldest settlements. Cattle ranching and farming on the surrounding
plain have done it well. Proof of its wealth are the shiny new pick-up
trucks that roll into town when a day's work is over. Driven by smiling
Mexican ranchers wearing cowboy hats and silver-and-turquoise belt buckles,
they blast music far and wide through open windows as if to announce their
happy prosperity.
But it will take more than prosperity to change Colima. Although only 30
miles from tourist seaside resorts, its colonial churches and plazas are
rarely visited by foreigners, and its frontier flavour remains strong. The
greater the distance I drove from the coast, the further back in time I
seemed to move.
Outside Colima I began to climb again, following a road that made its way
first past sloping corn fields and pastures, and then wound upwards through
green jungle of broken hills and narrow valleys. An hour later I was at last
under the volcano.
From 20,000 ft in the air, the Volcan del Fuego had looked perfectly smooth,
featureless and still. Now, looking upwards from its base, I saw a steep
world that was rough, wild and full of life.
Wildflowers - bright orange, yellow and blue - grew in masses along the
roadside. Whole trees were picked out with blooms, and long-tailed birds
perched in their branches. More spectacular yet were the butterflies that
flitted about in their thousands, some tiny, some so large they looked like
white handkerchiefs being jerked in the air by an invisible hand.
But this was a human world as well. Riding horses fitted with high,
wooden-pommeled saddles, dour and silent Indians followed by packs of dogs
filed along the roadside carrying loads of maize or firewood home to adobe
villages. Higher on what had now become a rough dirt road, the villages -
smokey, low and mud-built - seemed to revert to some prehistoric existence.
Higher still, where the road became a track, the mountainside took on its
most primordial aspect: just six months before, large swathes of the
volcano's upper slopes had been scarred by the lava burns of a violent
eruption.
But I was not interested in travelling too far back in time. In the small
hillside village of Comala, where ashes from the eruption had rained down on
cobbled streets, red-tiled roofs and the shady gardens of walled courtyards,
peasants in white cotton were celebrating the fiesta of the Virgin of
Guadaloupe.
In the village's main square, scores of horses tied to hitching posts stood
in the sun flicking their tails at flies. Hot and sweaty, their scent
mingled with that of the square's flowering roses and the odour of tortillas
cooking in cantinas behind arched collonades. Like the horse's straw-hatted
riders, I took refuge in the shade there, and feasted on bean and guacamole
tacos and a strong red punch made from tequila and pomegranates.
Out in the middle of the plaza, under the cupola of a band-stand surrounded
by milling crowds, tall coconut palms and trees bright with oranges, a
uniformed brass band played Mexican marching music. From the church
opposite, where a winged angel perched between two tall spires, swelling
organ music drifted through open doors. At the tables immediately around me,
strolling guitar and accordion players sang loud rancheros, the vibrant,
simple music of the Mexican countryside.
It was the most cheerful, clashing, and confusing of seranades. It did not
matter. Here, under the volcano, was every movement, colour and noise any
fugitive from a peaceful seaside resort could wish for. I had found Mexico.
There are no direct flights between the UK and Mexico. The most convenient
routes are via Dallas and Miami. Nicholas Woodsworth flew to Mexico with
American Airlines: (London tel: 081-572-5555), which offers excursion fares
to a number of Mexican west coast destinations for around Pounds 600.
In Manzanillo, Woodsworth was the guest of Las Hadas Hotel, PO BOX 158,
Manzanillo, tel 30-000, telex 62506. Car hire for inland excursions is
available through major agencies, but somewhat pricy at around Dollars 80
(Pounds 44) per day.
Information about travel in Mexico can be had from the Mexican Tourist
Office, 60 Trafalgar Square, London WC2N 5DS, tel: 071-734-1058.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8720</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: Bunin comes to London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT half of Stanislav Bunin's capacity audience on Wednesday at the
Barbican seemed to be Japanese, since his recital debut here was sponsored
by Asahi Shimbun and Japan Airlines. London has been curiously slow to
welcome this Muscovite pianist, whom the rest of Europe has been celebrating
since 1988. Just why, we rapidly discovered.
Bunin's family tree includes not only the composer Szymanowski, but the
great teacher Heinrich Neuhaus. His technique is immaculate, and yet in this
all-Chopin programme he never once brandished it for its own sake. If nobody
could fail to notice his tingling chord-cascades in the Second Sonata, or
his racing brilliance in the B-flat minor Prelude, they were merely what the
music required - but rarely gets in such generous measure.
All his attention was concentrated upon realising the music, lucidly and
lovingly, and he achieved some miracles of penetrating simplicity: in the
trio of the Marche funebre, for example, which became quite luminous. He
went in for no dramatic swaying or gesturing; usually he bent forward over
the keyboard, watching the keys and his hands intently as if monitoring
delicate, high-precision instruments.
The result never sounded like hi-tech calculation. On the contrary, Bunin
allows himself plenty of expressive rubato - sometimes, indeed, in pieces
which strike me as presupposing a sterner pulse; but always in the pure
service of lyrical sense. He cultivates a notably beautiful, velvety
piano-sound, which affords him full-force moments without turning clangy. In
the 24 Preludes of op. 28 he exploited colour-effects less than many
pianists, preferring to secure all the necessary contrasts by meticulous
characterisation of every prelude.
With the F minor Fantaisie he was unusually deliberate, but fascinating.
There is anyway something obscure, even evasive about this hugely ingenious
piece: one can't expect definitive revelations of what it's about, just more
or less plausible 'readings' of it. Much the same is often said of the
Polonaise-Fantaisie - and of the B-flat minor Sonata. This time, however,
Bunin's glorious performance of the sonata really had the impact of a
revelation.
Even the Marche funebre had an unfamiliar stamp (troubled and inconsolable,
without pomp or strident protest) which carried complete authority; and in
the first movement, Bunin's powers encompassed the essential driving urgency
and an extraordinary wealth of sensitive detail. It will stay in one's mind
for a long time. Meanwhile, Bunin has a considerable repertoire beyond his
revered Chopin: may we soon hear him in more of it]
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8721</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: An aerobics class in hell - Forsythe's 'In the Middle,
somewhat elevated'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WILLIAM Forsythe is the most fashionable choreographer of our time. His
ballets are staged for many companies and, as we have reported, his own
Frankfurt troupe plays two regular seasons in Paris every year. He is a
purveyor of large, curiously grey-toned and determinedly earnest
theatre-pieces to which audiences and commentators love to ascribe deep
philosophic meaning. (The journalism surrounding Forsythe's work is of
stunning pretensiousness and obscurantism - like the pieces being
described). He is also a manufacturer of dances which rupture and derange
the classic vocabulary, speeding it viciously up, driving it to the verge of
physical breakdown.
This, of course, inspires parrot cries of 'The new Balanchine' from
observers who presumably neither know nor care about the Balanchine academy
and style. (They may well also confuse a circus knife-throwing act with
Olympic fencing). What catches audiences is Forsythe's skilled admixture of
menacingly oblique drama - dark stages littered with anxious, arcane
activity - and brutally unbalanced movement. Probably the best, and saddest,
thing to be said about Forsythe's current work is that he offers a dance
recipe exactly attuned to our times.
In 1988, Forsythe staged In the Middle, somewhat elevated at the Paris
Opera. On Thursday night it arrived at Covent Garden, a fact perhaps not
unconnected with the presence of Sylvie Guillem as guest with the Royal
Ballet, since she created a leading role in Paris, together with Laurent
Hilaire, who is also now in London to take part in performances. The
choreography is cast in Forsythe's most extreme and distorted style, like an
aerobics class in hell. Six women, three men, tastelessly garbed in leotards
of an unfortunate green shade, fling themselves on to a stage bare, dark,
with characteristic Forsythe lighting which both illuminates and obscures
(there's a message here]), with two gold cherries above the stage, in the
middle, somewhat elevated (ah] the other message), while an electronic score
by Thom Willems, Forsythe's favoured composed, clanks and bangs like a
dyspeptic radiator.
There ensue sequences of choreography in which the academic language is
pushed towards its physical edges, tilted angrily off balance, driven onward
with fierce muscular pulses. Patterns are dispersed, fragmentary. The
dancers move in an out of their character as performers - sometimes
sauntering away from the scene of the crime, or standing as observers at the
side of the stage - as a further example of the piece's degage and
disingenuous attitude. What is most remarkable is that the dance-language is
so blatant, so essentially dull, and so fundamentally unadventurous. For
someone hailed as a classic innovator, Forsythe provides brutalism on the
most obvious terms by mugging academism, instead of evolving the new writing
claimed for him - and also claimed by him: 'The vocabulary is not, and never
will be, dated. What dates is the writing'. But Forsythe's view of dance is
of unrelenting, undifferentiated physical stress, of harshness and
deformation, of dynamics unleashed but aimless. It taxes its interpreters.
It also degrades them, cheapens their identity in making them appear like
demented and hyperactive gymnasts.
That said, the Royal Ballet's casts perform magnificently well. Sylvie
Guillem and Laurent Hilaire are entirely at home - Mlle Guillem too
revealingly so - and Darcey Bussell, in the other leading role, is a marvel
of Mach-one speed and laser precision, through the task is unworthy of her.
To Peter Abegglen (who finds prodigies of energy and clarity for his solos),
Michael Nunn, Bonnie Moore, Deborah Bull, Deborah Jones, Gillian Revie, all
praise.
The nice irony of the programme is that In the Middle is preceded by two of
Ashton's most assured and beautiful classic dances: Scenes de ballet and
Monotones. There is, I think, more truth about classic dancing in our
century in the first five minutes of Scenes than in all the Forsythe
choreography I have seen, for it is a marvel - though it will look more
marvellous this season when its casts are fully adjusted to its demands. A
welcome for Sergiu Pobereznic as the male lead - easy, quietly noble, with
elegant feet - and for the return of Monotones and its lunar felicities,
with Bryony Brind also happily returned to the stage. No welcome at all to
the Opera House's short commons: this programme comprises 70 minutes of
dancing and 60 minutes of interval. With today's uncomfortable seat prices,
more could - should - be given to an audience faced with harsh choices on
how to spend money in a recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Photograph Darcey Bussell and Laurent Hilaire, a dance recipe
attuned to our times (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8722</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: 'Street Scene' lives up to its promise - The Coliseum
has got it right this time round
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THIS IS a superb revival. It proves three points at one blow
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
that Street Scene, termed a 'Broadway opera' by its creators, is one of the
key achievements of Kurt Weill's opera-composing career and thus of our
century; that the ENO remains a company capable of incomparable ensemble
work; and that all David Pountney's 1989 production needed was the
paring-away of its bedizening excesses to afford an evening of musical
theatre on the highest level.
Under the care of the revival producer, Nicolette Molnar, the show has been
pruned, tightened, focused. The plethora of 'freezes', tricks with cut-out
props during the Ice Cream Sextet, jokey curtain calls and other examples of
excrescent business have gone, leaving a concentration on
character-observation and a fine meshing of the personal with the communal
that do more than any producer's underlining of detail ever could to reveal
the fierce vitality and integrity of the opera's musico-dramatic fabric.
Thus handled, Street Scene emerges as one hoped it would first time round at
the Coliseum - as a startlingly original masterpiece, a finely planned and
executed meeting-point of 'popular' and 'serious' rarely achieved in our
categorised, compartmentalised century, a work of luminous humanity whose
vision of life at the lower end of the city is at once a period piece and
piercingly, at times painfully modern.
In 1992, indeed, with hard times, vagrants in city doorways and house
repossessions all around us, the 'relevance' of the work might be thought
too grim to bear. But of course it is not like that at all: the
multifariousness of the musical idiom, and the determination of Weill and
his librettists to please and to move but never to lecture their audiences,
ensure that one leaves the theatre uplifted in spite of the threadbare
setting and the tragic finale.
The conductor, James Holmes, is another notable improvement. He keeps the
action fluent, the colours bright, the pace cumulatively building. In this
difficult-sized and -shaped theatre, balance between voices and instruments
is still uneven (might the company not consider experimenting with a
smaller-sized pit band?), but the problem has diminished under Mr Holmes's
care, and his comprehension of the score's marvellous unity-through-variety
is impressively evident.
The cast is filled with newcomers - Meriel Dickinson's magnificently
implacable Mrs Jones, Anthony Mee's ebullient, ice-cream-apostrophising
Lippo Fiorentino and Terry Jenkins's fire-breathing Mr Kaplan are the most
important revenants from 1989. There are too many keenly acted and sung
cameos to list: the Henry of Keel Watson, Greta Fiorentino of Christine
Bunning and Harry Easter of Richard Halton demand particular mention, but so
do the raucously exhilarating Dick and Mae of Philip Gould and Caroline
O'Connor - their showstopper did just that - and the excellent contributions
from all the children.
The principals come fresh to their roles. Mrs Maurrant affords Janice Cairns
one of her finest achievements on this stage: powerful of voice, artlessly
sympathetic and shining with womanly candour, she takes her proper place as
the opera's tragic heroine. Mark Richardson finds the right raw physical and
vocal intensity as her violent, inarticulate husband.
As Abraham Kaplan, the conscience of the piece, the young American tenor
Kevin Anderson (British debut) lacked a little in mellifluousness but
nothing in naive passion - this was another acutely physical performance.
Lesley Garrett may have seemed a surprising piece of casting as Rose
Maurrant; in the event, she subdues her natural attention-grabbing
tendencies to eloquent and touching purpose. Her New York accent needs more
work.
This revival, sponsored by BMW, has been pitched at special low prices. In
crude value-for-money terms - and in other, nobler ways as well - it
represents, therefore, one of the greatest bargains the London theatre
currently has to offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Photograph Kevin Anderson and Lesley Garrett in this superb
revival (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8723</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: Moody at Scott's
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARRY BOOTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A FUNNY man and a fun player, roly poly saxophonist James Moody and his
quartet extended Ronnie's season of ribaldry this week. For the last three
weeks we have had Roy Ayers' funk and fusion interspersed with harmless
double entendre and now it is Moody's turn to make 'em laugh.
An early bopper who started out with Dizzy Gillespie in the mid-1940s, his
career has seen stints as a sideman to that most serious of musicians, Miles
Davis, as well as front man in Las Vegas clubs. British audiences last saw
him in the Albert Hall, blowing behind BB King as a part of Gene Harris's
big band. Nowadays his gigs as a quartet leader feature comic vocal antics
('More Frankenstein than Billy Eckstine,' he admits), as well as short and
punchy versions of standards like 'Wave'.
Why Moody need bother with quite so much fooling around is anybody's guess.
He's an old hand and can get around a tenor, not to mention the alto and
flute, and stirs up unlikely tunes like 'Roll Out the barrel'. The
improvisation on all three instruments, which are employed in equal
measures, is clean and snappy and the accompanists - Todd Coolman (bass),
Marc Copland (piano) and Akira Tana (percussion) - take their solos by rote
and willingly enough. Copland and Coolman (a good name for a jazz man) work
especially well on the former's ballad, 'But not for them'.
But the gags and patter dominated in a show more suited to the supper club
than jazz club. Not that he's unfunny: the one about a pet dog which liked
cantaloups - 'My Melon Collie Baby' - was good. It's just that Moody is an
original bop saxophonist and it would be good to hear more of the playing
which influenced so many of today's tough young tenors.
The supper club atmosphere had already been set by Judith Owen, however,
whose name betokens someone more dull than the personable singer seated at
the piano. With a style located somewhere between Joni Mitchell and Kate
Bush, leather trousers and blonde good looks to boot, Owen has the voice and
songs which deserves to succeed on American FM radio.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8724</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Hawks &amp; Handsaws: Anyone out there?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I AM ON my way to Pasadena, to visit the good folk who run the Jet
Propulsion Laboratory at the California Institute of Technology. I am not
hurrying directly there, but taking a scenic route - Los Angeles, Cabo San
Lucas, Mazatlan, Acapulco, Hollywood, Pasadena.
My mission: to learn something at the JPL about Nasa's Dollars 100m SETI
programme, or search for extraterrestial intelligence, to be formally
launched on October 12, Columbus Day. SETI is an attempt at interstellar
eavesdropping that may yield evidence of intelligent life elsewhere in our
own Milky Way.
However, before leaving London I had to give my executive assistant, Miss
Lee, a crash course in the background to the SETI programme, so that she
could appear reasonably intelligent when in telephonic contact with the
executive assistants at the JPL. I didn't want her letting the side down.
Miss Lee is in upmode at present: so svelte and groomed that she has dug out
all her miniskirts. But like most of my friends and colleagues, Miss Lee has
the faintest grasp possible of the importance of SETI, and confuses it with
the notion of green men with pointed ears buzzing about in UFOs.
'Look,' I said. 'SETI is nothing to do with UFOs or beings that look like
blancmanges, though they might. It is about listening for messages. Not
sending anything, listening. Quite possibly the number of civilisations in
the Milky Way is one - us. Perhaps civilisations take billions of years to
evolve and then immolate themselves soon after reaching the technological
stage.
'But perhaps not. Perhaps there are 1m civilisations distributed more or
less randomly through the galaxy. The average separation between them would
be 300 light years. And they might be sending messages. It is cheaper to
beam radio messages than to gallivant through space or colonise stars.
'It would be easy for extraterrestials to send unambiguous messages,' I
continued. 'For example, a modulated beacon-signal comprising the numbers 1,
2, 3, 5, 7, 11, 13, 17, 19, 23, 29 and 31 - the first dozen prime numbers -
could only have a biological origin.
'And those messages could be inconceivably rich. Perhaps, when we tune in,
we will find ourselves listening to Volume 4,507 of Encyclopaedia Galactica.
As my good friend Carl Sagan has put it: 'We would discover the nature of
other civilisations. There would be many of them, each composed of organisms
astonishingly different from anything on this planet. They would view the
universe somewhat differently. They would have different arts and social
functions. They would be interested in things we never thought of. By
comparing our knowledge with theirs, we would grow immeasurably'.'
I smiled wisely, and concluded: 'If SETI hits the jackpot, stunning insights
are possible in the physical, biological and social sciences - all of them
filtered through the novel perspective of beings that may be profoundly
dissimilar - in the deepest sense different - to us. To quote Carl Sagan.'
Miss Lee patted her hair, checked her lipstick and studied the sueded tips
of her Pounds 200 shoes.
'I see, Michael,' she said. 'If I have grasped things correctly from your
interstellar musings, Nasa's SETI programme shows the hallmarks of an
imaginative and inquisitive civilisation - us - that is hoping,
cost-effectively, to browse through a few chapters of Encyclopaedia
Galactica. Right?
'And you are travelling to Pasadena to meet top Nasa scientists who are
hoping to stumble across radio-beamed advice columns from beings in the
Milky Way that may help us solve some of our local difficulties. Our wars
and nuclear arsenals. Growing populations. Pestilence and pollution. The
gulf between rich and poor. Our profligacy with resources and the way we are
hounding to extinction thousands of lesser species. Right?'
'Correct,' I said, suddenly on my guard.
'But what about small things?' Miss Lee continued. 'Has it occurred to you,
Michael, that the likeliest threats to civilisation are not the big things,
like nuclear war, to which this planet devotes endless man-hours of study
and contemplation, but little things. Irritants. Snicks. Puncture wounds
that we don't really feel but which could prove fatal.'
'Like?'
'Well . . . Virginia Bottomley. Or son-of-poll-tax. Or ITV. Diets. Pushing
in bus queues. The cost of dry cleaning. Neil Kinnock. Criticism of the
monarchy. Stuffiness. Diffidence. The Daily Telegraph. People who forget
birthdays. Red ties and green shirts. Music critics. All critics. Sales
talk. Treading on frogs. Pinchings and pattings. Airs and graces.
Condescension. Men.'
No wonder I am lying low in Hollywood.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8725</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Private View: The art of science - Prof Richard Gregory
describes a cultural failing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTIAN TYLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCIENTISTS feel they have become the Cinderellas of British culture, left in
rags to sweep the hearth while smart society gets dressed to go to the
opera.
'It is extraordinary, isn't it?' said Professor Richard Gregory, inventor,
neuropsychologist and philosopher. 'Science is an alien culture completely
separate from the main culture of our country.
'Yet I think science is the great adventure of the human race. I really do.
It's the only adventure which has gone on for thousands of years pretty well
continuously, exploring the nature of the universe and our place in it.
'It changes its assumptions, it's flexible, it has a great deal of
tolerance, it's totally international. If someone discovers something in,
say, Cambridge it's known in Peking the next week. It transcends all the
barriers and the boundaries. Yet it's not fully appreciated.'
Prof Gregory was striding round the flat he occupies in a grand terrace high
above Bristol, showing off his collection of antique scientific instruments.
The professor has a grasshopper mind; he is always one jump ahead of you.
His mental leaps are connected, but by the time you have seen the connection
the professor has jumped again. When explaining a difficult idea he has a
charming way of adding 'don't you think?', as if he were talking to
Einstein.
After he settled down I asked him why arts and sciences had become divorced.
'One answer is that science is jolly difficult. You've got to sit down and
think. You've got to know a lot of facts. You've got to build up mental
models because it's all beneath the appearances. Science is also inherently
more difficult to communicate.'
But surely people are interested in things like personal computers and
mobile telephones, I said.
'They're excited by the gadgets but not by how they work. I suppose you
could say the same about opera and ballet: they're more interested in the
result than in the process. Science is very much a process, a matter of
techniques and procedures.'
He agreed that scientists were partly to blame for their falling prestige:
specialists digging their own little tunnels had lost sight of the broad
horizons; they were bad at explaining themselves to the public.
Do you think there is still some theological resistance to science?
'Yes, I do. I think the idea of the old man up in heaven who has planned it
all and looks at us with a kindly eye is still popular. I personally don't
find it plausible as an explanation of the origin of the universe. I want to
know who his grandfather was, where he comes from.
'The idea of a universe evolving, like natural selection, is much more
attractive. But it does mean we've got to find our own significance, by our
own activities. Personally I don't think the universe has got an origin.
Much better to say that time never had a start.'
Has the bias against science increased in your lifetime?
'That's probably true, certainly as far as teachers are concerned. I mean, a
professor at one time had a real standing in the community. Now there is an
antipathy to a great deal of science, probably since the atom bomb. After
all, we did produce a horrendous weapon. Science has produced some
incredibly dangerous toys. You can't call people silly for being frightened
of that.'
Scientists were on a kind of toboggan ride. To stay on and try to steer the
toboggan required courage, but it was not surprising if other people felt it
was a ride they didn't want to be on.
'This is the drama of our times,' he added.
Should we be worried about genetic manipulation, for example?
'It seems to me that any tool has its dangers. If you've got a chisel you
can cut your thumb. At the same time if you haven't got tools you are a sort
of a child, really. You can't do anything. We've simply got to learn to cope
with the dangers.
'And that's why we need science education so much now. If you're a
politician and you don't understand, say, the half-life of radioactivity,
how can you talk to the experts?' This ignorance, he thinks, is dangerous
for our democracy.
So if science lacks political support, I asked, is that due to the ignorance
of politicians?
'Frankly, I think it is. There are far too few MPs who understand science.
You don't need to have a very detailed knowledge: you need a sort of
hand-waving understanding of the basic concepts.' (From his work on mind and
brain, Gregory concludes that there are two kinds of thinking, the rapid,
intuitive sort which results in 'hand-waving' explanations, and the slow,
sequential sort which he calls 'handle-turning'.)
Meeting Gregory, it is easy to see why he gets invited on to television. He
is full of bounce as well as brains, and he looks - anyway to the arts
graduates who run the BBC - as a boffin should look. His hobby is punning
(he thought of 'absinthe makes the heart grow fonder' before he saw it in a
Christmas cracker) and his favourite author is PG Wodehouse. Humour is like
scientific invention: 'A good joke puts things together in a new way.'
He was almost predestined to be an inventor-scientist rather than a
laboratory technician. His father was a leading astronomer and one of his
paternal ancestors devised a reflecting telescope two years before Isaac
Newton.
From the RAF, Gregory won a scholarship to read philosophy at Cambridge
after the war. There he was taught by Bertrand Russell (but missed
Wittgenstein by two weeks). He stayed on to lecture in experimental
psychology, moved to Edinburgh to help set up a pioneering artifical
intelligence laboratory, then came to Bristol University as professor of
neuropsychology.
Here, inspired by Francis Bacon's utopian New Atlantis of 1627, he set up
his 'Exploratory', a working museum of gadgets to demonstrate scientific
phenomena. Modelled on the San Francisco Exploratorium founded by Frank
Oppenheimer, it has produced offshoots all over the UK.
Gregory's work on perception and has taken him into the painter's world
(with Ernst Gombrich he produced Illusion in Nature and Art). So I asked him
whether there was any connection between the scientist's and artist's
approach.
'I personally think they're pretty different: the effort to communicate is
different from the effort of thinking something out. You could say arts are
evocative, evoking experiences in other people, where science is
explanatory. The good teacher has to be both.'
Aren't they both forms of problem-solving?
'Yes. But I think they're different kinds of problem.'
What about the use of illusion in the arts?
'I think illusions are the key to a great deal of how perception actually
works. Cognitive illusion leads you right into the depths of the mind. It
shows how mind takes off from physical reality. It shows how we create.'
Does creativity link the two?
'Yes, undoubtedly. I think creativity is the key to the whole thing, why
some people are creative and others are not.'
How do you account for inspiration?
'One often sort of bumbles about, playing around with an experiment.
Suddenly the penny drops and you have a bright idea. Then trying it out is
immensely exciting, because you really are playing a game against nature and
you don't know how it's going to work out.
'In most scientists' lives it only happens five or six times. But when you
know this new fact, for about a week or so, and nobody else does, it's quite
nice.'
Gregory's most recent inspiration led, with the help of a colleague in
California, to a useful discovery about how the brain fills in the blind
spot in the human eye. His best, he said, came when he was involved in the
American moon landing programme and discovered, very suddenly, how to get
pictures of the moon without atmospheric disturbance. (The solution was to
give the telescope camera a 'brain' to instruct its eye, human fashion.)
Can a person's bias towards arts or sciences be explained scientifically?
'I think there are different abilities: some have strong visual imagery,
some are good at amassing lots of data and building up generalisations,
others can remember names of, say, all the fossils but never have a
generalisation in their lives. We're not exactly the same - which is why
it's nice having lots of friends.'
Whatever a person's bias, Gregory thinks the intuitive mode of thinking, the
system of mental models or patterns, is 'vitally important.' It is the
essence of the way we think, understand, create, and make decisions about
the world. Intuitions are not necessarily true: they must always be
inspected by the other part of the brain. This theory, he says, has
important educational consequences.
You mean we are failing the intuitive side of our children?
'I think you're saying something very important. It's easy to examine on
something like arithmetic or essays which are logically set out, because you
can compare one with another. Intuition is extremely difficult to test: it
takes individual teaching.
'Developing people's intuitive understanding and then training them to test
their intuitions is what it's all about: to be educated, to be effectively
creative you need an extra stage of testing. It's a very expensive way of
educating but to my mind it's essential. You've got to nurture that creative
cauldron.'
I think Professor Gregory had dealt with my question - but my mental
processor is still chewing over the answer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8726</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Heaven and Hell: Hatred, hunger and a world within - Rabbi
Lionel Blue always knew where purgatory was. Paradise proved more elusive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RABBI LIONEL BLUE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS A CHILD, I knew where Hell was. It was a concentration camp in Germany. I
also knew why it was Hell. It was not the hunger but the hatred in it. I had
already realised that suffering and Hell are not the same.
Heaven was more difficult to locate. I learnt a poem of Henry Vaughan:
My soul there is a country,
far beyond the stars.'
It ended:
If thou canst get but thither
there grows the flower of peace,
the rose that cannot wither
thy fortress and thy ease.
A tempting prospect but, unlike Hell, it did not figure on any map.
For practical purposes, my childhood Heaven was a cinema and bliss was
watching the flashing titles of Top Hat or Snow White, assured of that happy
ending I already knew 'real' life could never provide.
These certainties of childhood dissolved into the puzzles of adolescence. I
was now an atheist who no longer believed in sin or Hell, although I still
tried to convince myself of a workers' paradise in Russia. Fortunately, I
failed.
I turned to religion because I became convinced that home was not here and
that I was a stranger in this world. I remember Oxford parties when, while
making conversation, I stepped out of my body and watched myself from
somewhere near the ceiling. It is a common experience. And, sometimes, when
people asked me the way, I replied: 'I'm a stranger here, too' - and knew
suddenly that I had said something significant. But, if I was not altogether
here, where was I?
Now, I liked poring over maps and I chanced upon some metaphysical ones.
There were the road maps of Bunyan's Pilgrim that charted his Progress past
Doubting Castle and the House Beautiful to the Celestial City. I also bought
a pious print which showed what awaited you if you entered 'the narrow gate'
or 'the broad way.' The latter led past a lottery, Sunday trains and a
sedate dance hall to damnation. The former (frequented mainly by women,
children and dogs) led past hermit huts and wayside shrines to peaceful
lawns, like those that surround crematoria. (The Hells constructed by human
beings are more convincing than their Heavens).
I knew now that Heaven was home, and that is where I wanted to go. I was
pulled towards it by an invisible gravity which altered the logic of my
life. My parents had wanted me to be a solicitor. I had intended to become a
revolutionary, or study revolutions safely in a university, but the
tantalising fragrance of the 'rose that cannot wither' pulled me - indeed,
seduced me - into the ministry and has kept me there for 40 years.
Such goodness exits somewhere; so many see it, know it and love it, although
only hints and glimpses of it are afforded to us in the world around us.
I became curious about other people's Heavens. Could I identify them with
mine? Some were more witty than helpful. The Rev. Sidney Smith's Heaven, for
example, was foie gras eaten to the sound of trumpets (which reminded me of
London's pre-war Corner Houses - a childhood paradise).
Three sources helped me in my investigations. The first was Abelard, whose
Quantia Zualia provides the only convincing hedonist Heaven. It is where you
get everything you have ever wanted and, when you get it, it turns out to be
as lovely as you expected.
The second was Teresa of Avila in her Interior Castle. While reading it, I
realised that Heaven was not in the outside world, nor even in another
dimension. It was within, and I was carrying it about with me.
What I could not accept was the orderly progress she described by which you
got there. My own was jerky and bewildering. Sometimes, I was within hailing
distance of the 'inner room' and the next minute I was flat on my face,
miles outside the moat.
The third source were those parables of the kingdom of Heaven in Rabbinic
literature and the gospels, where its inner location is explicit: 'The
Kingdom of Heaven is within you.' Although I could not digest the miracles
or marvels of the gospels, the parables seemed accurate and familiar.
Because Heaven appears as small, humdrum and over-familiar, like the lost
penny or grain of sand, we do not see it.
I also began to realise that you do not have to wait for Heaven - you can
make it happen now. Whenever you invite it into your life and testify to it
with an act of generosity, you step into it. This, too, is a common
experience, confirmed by letters from radio listeners.
It is this experience of Heaven which renews my personal religion; not
theology or official pieties. Heaven and Hell are connected intimately. They
are the same place, two sides of the same coin. It is what we project on to
them that divides them.
In this article I have been more concerned with Heaven than Hell, for the
latter does not figure seriously in present Jewish theology. It surfaces
only in Jewish jokes. A loving God and Father does not consign his creation
to such a place.
There is a tradition that, in Talmudic times, the rabbis debated the
existence of Hell. They decided (by majority) that it did not exist but, if
it did, this world was it.
Well, if this world is Hell, or an extreme type of purgatory, it requires no
further description from me. We already know it well enough  - we are in it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8727</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / How to see the future with an uncommon touch: Dominic Lawson
reveals that unlike most political pundits his omniscience is limited by his
lifestyle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINIC LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I WAS greatly relieved to read a few days ago in Peter Jenkins' column in
The Independent that 'John Major is intending to announce the dissolution of
Parliament the very day after the March 10 Budget. Polling day, as widely
predicted, would be 9 April.' Over the past few weeks people have kept
coming up to me asking me when Major will dissolve Parliament and declare an
election date, and what that date will be, and for some reason I have not
always found it easy to give the honest answer, 'I don't know.'
For some reason the Prime Minister has seen fit not to entrust me with his
greatest secret and if he had, I would not reveal it exclusively to you. But
now all that is unnecessary. Jenkins has spoken, and so sure of this
intelligence are his employers that they placed his revelatory column right
across the front page, with a photograph of the famous columnist looking
believable.
Unfortunately my relief, now that Jenkins has lifted the burden off my, and
John Major's shoulders, has been short lived. For over the following two
days I have been assailed by a new and different question. It is 'Who is
going to win the General Election?' I suppose I could say to these
inquisitive people: 'Wait until Mr Jenkins has given his forecast. Peter, I
assure you, has his finger on the popular pulse,' but for some reason I do
not think this passing of the buck will impress my interlocutors.
The trouble is that, unlike almost all of the political commentators of our
great quality national newspapers, I am not in touch with the people. I know
that Peter Riddell of The Times is a keen and well-travelled pub darts
player, and thus encounters all walks of life in our nation of beer
drinkers. I know that the FT's own Joe Rogaly is to be found every Saturday
in the stands behind the goal at the Den, Millwall's charming football
ground, where he enthusiastically acquaints himself with the moods and
prejudices of the proletariat, who, after all, make up the bulk of the
electorate. The Guardian's Hugo Young gains his invaluable insight into the
mind of the people thanks to his 20-year long enthusiasm for the sport of
all-in wrestling. He is there at all the big bouts, tapping in to the urban
subculture. And of course Peter Jenkins' long involvement in 'hot rod' stock
car racing in Essex means he is never far removed from the people so
snootily described by advertisers as C2s, Ds and Es.
But I am afraid that I cannot boast of any such intimate acquaintance with
the popular mind. Unlike these people, I am cosseted by company cars and so
rarely mix with ordinary folk on buses and underground trains. And my
lunches are not spent in pubs rubbing shoulders with the heart of England.
Unlike the leading political pundits I seem to spend most of my time, and
expense account, talking with other journalists or men from Whitehall.
There was a time when I thought that, despite all this, I was well qualified
to express opinions on 'what people think' or 'what the average person is
saying.' But one day I made some such remark to a friend of mine, a general
practitioner who works in one of the biggest and least lovely of our inner
city hospitals. He laughed derisively. 'Dominic,' he said, 'people like you
have never even made the acquaintance of anyone of average intelligence, let
alone found out what he thinks.'
When I want to know which party is likely to win the General Election -
whenever it happens - I shall consult my friend the general practitioner.
Dominic Lawson is editor of The Spectator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8728</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Sport: Fastest boats cost the most - America's Cup
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEITH WHEATLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICA'S racing yachtsmen have a saying: 'Nothing goes to windward like
dollars'. Even to a Limey landlubber the implication is obvious. Fast boats
cost money, and the fastest boats cost the most.
Dennis Conner is currently having that cynical axiom branded into him by
billionaire America's Cup rival Bill Koch. The trials to select a Cup
defender entered round two last Saturday and Conner is being out-spent and
out-sailed.
Two weeks ago Koch, skipper and paymaster of the America3 team, took
delivery of his third yacht. Christened simply America she is proving
unstoppably fast - even in a relatively untuned 'out-of-the-box' state. In
her first encounter with Conner's steed Star &amp; Stripes the new yacht's
winning margin was a huge 6m 23 secs.
'We're ecstatic because this is probably the slowest she'll ever sail,' said
Koch, an engaging white-haired energy tycoon who trained as a scientist at
MIT. 'She sailed for only eight hours before the race and we are still
learning the little tricks of what she likes.'
In the second race between the two boats, America won by 6 min. Conner won
the start by a five second margin, indicating that Koch's crew were so
confident of superior speed over the 20-mile course that a tiny advantage on
the line was barely worth the battle. After the first beat America was 2m
38s in front and never missed a beat thereafter.
Conner, beaten only once in four America's Cups going back to 1980, has made
major modifications to Stars &amp; Stripes in the two weeks since the first
round robin ended. She now has a forward canard fin, possibly steerable, as
part of a two-element keel and has had her rudder moved forward.
It sounds like a dog's dinner grafted on a hull designed over 18 months ago,
making it virtually prehistoric in terms of the new International America's
Cup Class. First time out it proved virtually impossible to control, as
Conner admitted with uncharacteristic candour.
'Either the boat doesn't steer the way I would like it to or I haven't
learnt to operate it yet,' said the portly, introspective sailor. While Koch
has a virtually bottomless private war-chest, Conner has had to go out and
raise corporate sponsorship for every dollar he spends on his yacht.
His target budget for the whole campaign was a mean and lean Dollars 15m,
but insiders say that Stars &amp; Stripes will not even reach that figure. It
means that a new boat is out of the question, while Koch has a fourth yacht
under construction and due in San Diego during April.
The format for the defender selection process means that the top-scoring two
yachts, out of three currently racing, go into a best-of-seven final in two
months time. Unfortunately for Dennis Conner two of the competing boats are
part of the America3 effort.
'You're never out of this until you lose four races in April,' says Conner
confidently. However, if his position becomes genuinely desperate he could
pull out beforehand, saving on everything from crew wages to hours on the
huge supercomputers used in the design process.
Ironically for a man whose 200-strong team has put together the best IACC
boats to date, Koch is unstintingly critical of the new class. In public or
private he seldom deviates from his attack on their design and cost.
'The boats are fragile and very expensive - one boat costs Dollars 5m. If
the wind gets above 17 knots something is bound to break and someone could
get physically badly hurt,' says Koch.
'I think these boats are bad for the America's Cup because they are
following the same route to oblivion that the J-boats did.' This 130-ft
class was last seen in the 1930s and never reappeared after the war because
of their high cost.
On the other hand, as his former skipper Gary Jobson pointed out, 'Bill
Koch's the one setting the pace when it comes to spending money.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8729</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Motoring: Estates make the running
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOME buyers of large estate cars can be quite image-conscious. Before
deciding upon make or model, they ask themselves: would I care to be seen in
this car at Badminton, or even my local point-to-point? Many then turn
instinctively to Mercedes-Benz or Volvo. But there are more choices around
today than for some years.
I have been driving some of the latest large estates that transport
permutations of people, lots of luggage or bulky items with ease, comfort
and style. Among them are the Audi 100, Citroen XM and Vauxhall Carlton
turbo-diesel.
The Audi 100 estate, no longer called the Avant, has lost its steeply-sloped
tail. This made it look nice and sleek and kept the rear window clean on a
wet motorway but was no help at all when you wanted to carry an awkward
piece of furniture. So Lovejoy, BBC-TV's rascally antique dealer, would
never have had an Avant.
I am not sure he would want an Audi 100 estate, either. The floor to roof
height is a meagre 30 inches (76 cm) although there is an enormous secret
compartment under the carpet. But he would approve of the Vauxhall Carlton;
a 3 ft (91 cm) single bed slides into it with space to spare. The capacious
Citroen XM has self-levelling, hydro-pneumatic suspension. One-up, it rides
as softly as a car. Fully laden - and it will take almost two-thirds of a
ton - it maintains the same height and stance and rides just as comfortably.
If Lovejoy went into marble statuary, this would be his car.
Citroen XM estates cost from Pounds 17,225 for a two-litre with manual gears
to Pounds 26,750 for a three-litre V6 automatic. A manual-only 2.1-litre
turbo-diesel is Pounds 20,640. Although in no way quirky, they are
unmistakably Citroens even if they share most of their mechanical bits and
pieces (suspension excepted) with Peugeot's bland but civilised 605 saloon.
Audi lists the 100 2.8E V6 automatic estate at Pounds 25,386. It is a
sportier drive than the Citroen although this will mean more to the business
motorist driving it solo during the week than when his family has piled
aboard at the weekend.
Both Audi and Citroen are lovely motorway cruisers although the Audi has too
much tyre rumble. The Citroen's semi-active suspension keeps it upright on
bends; for crossing rough meadows or driving down rutted tracks, it can
instantly be hitched-up an inch or two to stop it running aground.
Although Vauxhall's Carlton estate has been around for some years, a Pounds
16,585, 2.3-litre, 100 horsepower, turbo-charged and inter-cooled diesel
version is new for 1992. It is an impressive car. Build quality is
excellent, it rides well with a remarkable lack of road noise, and is
massively roomy inside. It has a silky, five-speed manual transmission and a
light clutch.
Anti-lock brakes are standard and the seats are so comfortable that it is
hard to believe it is really a Vauxhall-badged, German-made Opel. After a
slightly throbby start-up, the engine smooths out. For a turbo-diesel, it
pulls exceptionally strongly at low speeds, yet spins freely up to higher
revolutions in the gears.
Two other slightly-smaller but, for their size, roomy estates to have come
my way recently were the Subaru Legacy 2.0 GL, powered by a two-litre
flat-four with multi-point fuel injection, and a Fiat Tempra turbo-diesel.
The Subaru, with permanent four-wheel drive, has to be rated a best buy at
Pounds 14,449 for people who really must have exceptional traction. The
five-speed gearbox has a high range for road use and a low range for
off-roading or re-starting on a steep hill with a heavy trailer. It has
gentle good manners and a distinctive, although not wearying, engine note.
Fiat's Tempra and the Subaru have raised roofs so people in the back seats
have ample head-room. Parents - and grandparents - will approve of the
Tempra's rear doors. They open to 90 degrees, which makes putting young
children into their safety seats so much easier.
At low speeds, there is no mistaking the Fiat for anything but a diesel but
the 1.9-litre engine quietens and has plenty of punch once the turbo is
forcing air into the cylinders at 1,500 rpm and over. The electronic
instrument panel includes that useful aid to fuel economy, a bar-graph boost
gauge. The Tempra TDS estate costs Pounds 13,781 with power steering; ABS
brakes are an optional extra.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8730</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Sport: They're lean and mean - Rugby Football
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOWN THE years there have been good England rugby teams and less good ones.
England's team in the current Five Nations' Championship is the best ever.
They proved that in the second half against Scotland and throughout the
memorable game against Ireland in which they scored six tries. Their
performance at Twickenham two weeks ago was remarkable because Ireland won
50 per cent of the possession and had the put-in at 15 of the game's 21
scrums. The mind boggles at what England might have done with more
possession.
If Will Carling's team beat France in Paris this afternoon, as they should,
and go on and win the Grand Slam, as they should, they will have proved
themselves the best European team in the international championships for at
least 30 years.
How they have done this is instructive. They have based their methods on
those of a successful club. A squad system was introduced and a team
manager, Geoff Cooke, appointed. Cooke has brought stability and consistency
to team selection. They were not always present before.
Cooke has also introduced mental training techniques. When he gave tapes for
mental rehearsal to Paul Rendall and Jeff Probyn, England's props, he
received a dusty answer. He did not give up however. Prior to the Irish game
he asked every player to write down six reasons why they wanted to play for
England and six reasons that motivated them to their best performances. Even
a seemingly simple exercise such as this had a benefit: it helped the
players concentrate their minds on the task in hand.
The most significant reason for England's surge forward is their dedication
to fitness. England's players are fitter than ever and whether or not they
bring home the bacon in the form of the grand slam this season, this
achievement can not be taken away from them. They are 25 per cent fitter
than Wales's, believes Alan Davies, Wales's coach, and much fitter than
Ireland's, too.
England tried to improve their fitness as long ago as the mid-1970s. It did
not work then any more than did the practice of having the selectors in
track suits on the pitch at training sessions, not to mention Larry Lamb,
the referee, Don Rutherford, a doctor and a physiotherapist and one or two
other well-minded but misguided England camp followers.
'I was told I had to run six miles in 48 minutes and be able to do ten 150
yard sprints each in 18 seconds,' recalls one England international of that
vintage. 'What use was that to me? It would not increase my speed over 30
yards and that was what I needed, explosive speed not stamina. Anyway the
senior players put an end to it. We were supposed to be tested at Aldershot
and only the scrum-halves and a couple of other backs turned up. The senior
players all refused.'
In 1986, McNab returned to work with the England squad and his principles
are now followed. A number of England players recently achieved oxygen
uptake figures measuring the capacity of the heart and lungs that would have
been respectable for highly-trained athletes. Although their weight and body
size have increased, body fat has diminished, in some cases to proportions
almost as low as marathon runners. England's rugby players are not just
mean, they're lean, too.
Rugby throws up famous players in groups of two or three: Mesnel and Sella
currently representing France, for example; Price, Windsor and Faulkner, the
Pontypool Front Row, for Wales in the 1970s; Marques and Currie, the England
locks of nearly 40 years ago.
A considerable part of England's current success is due to the centre
partnership of Carling and Guscott. Concentrate on one and the other is
away. They are fast in attack and strong in defence and two better centres
have not played together for England.
They are the heart of a potent three-quarter line. As other countries have
found to their cost, concentrate on Guscott and Carling and England wings
Halliday and Underwood, will go on a spree and, if they do not then Webb
will, as he did two weeks ago. As he surveyed the wreckage of his Irish team
at Twickenham Ciaran Fitzgerald observed: 'England's back division had
everything you could ask for - speed,teamwork and strength. They had a great
ability to penetrate, not with one single player but in numbers.'
There have been two mould-breaking British teams in the past 21 years. The
first was the 1971 British Lions, the first Lions to win a series in New
Zealand, and the second was the 1974 British Lions, who went unbeaten
through a Test series in South Africa. This current England team should be
regarded as mould breakers, too.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII Photograph Captain Carling, a rare pause for breath
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8731</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / How to Spend It: Bridal gowns, one careful owner . . .
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF ANYBODY in your family is about to become a bride, you may be in for
something of a shock when the bills start rolling in. Joy Eagell and Sandra
Rishover have had what seems like an idea whose time has come - they sell
second-hand wedding dresses.
The dresses come from some of the best-known names in the business - Tatters
(beloved of the upper-crest set), Louise Hamlin-Wright, Hollywood Dream,
Beverley Summers and lots, lots more. Some have been specially-made for the
bride by a dressmaker, others are couture, yet others have originally been
bought off-the-peg. All have been beautifully dry-cleaned and are in
excellent condition.
At any given moment they probably have some 60 different dresses to choose
from and they sell at roughly half what they would have cost originally.
Prices start at Pounds 250 and go on up to Pounds 2,500. The bride gets
roughly a third of the original prices, the new buyer pays roughly half.
'Yesterday's Dress for Tomorrow's Bride' is their motto and it seems like a
very useful service.
There is a nice, relaxed showroom at 73, Fairfax Road, London NW6 4EE, where
either Joy or Sandra will see prospective brides by appointment only. Tel:
071-372-4748.
With the opening of the trout fishing season approaching a box of beautiful
artificial flies, I am reliably told, is exactly the sort of present that
fisher folk would be more than pleased to receive.
Hawkes and Black is an old-established fly tying firm and has put together
some 40 different patterns in a (re-usable) black plastic box. All are for
fishing for trout and sea trout, and all have been devised in consultation
with the relevant experts.
There are different flies for each fishing region - the Welsh Trout Fly
Collection, the Welsh Sewin Fly Collection, the North Country Spider
Collection, the Scottish Trout Collection and the Welsh Border Collection.
Each fly box comes complete with a sleeve with lots of appropriate
information on it.
Each box costs Pounds 15.99 (including postage) and can be bought direct
from Hawkes and Black (tel: 0363-83655), from Greys of Alnwick,
Northumberland, (tel: 0665-510020) or from any Greys of Alnwick stockist.
These days keeping a house filled with fresh flowers can cost up to hundreds
of pounds a week, so it is not surprising that many people have taken to
mixing fresh flowers with artificial ones. But this needs to be done
carefully - the difference between the best and the worst of the artificial
ones is huge.
Oasis, at 194-196 Walton Street, London SW3 (tel: 071-584-9519) has some of
the best artificial ones I have seen and its latest line, imitation dried
flowers, is really lovely. Made in silk, they crackle and look faded, just
like the real ones. There are small rosebuds (Pounds 1.50) and roses (Pounds
3.40) as well as flowers such as hydrangeas (Pounds 4.20) and peonies
(Pounds 3.90). The initial outlay may seem large but they wash and wash and
next year they will still look as good.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8732</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / How to Spend It: Basically, it's not as easy as it looks -
They are the staples of every wardrobe, the classics that last and last. But
what's the secret of their success?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORGIVE ME for returning to the theme of basics so soon. A mere four weeks
ago I was recommending to you the excellent qualities of Racing Green, a new
mail order company purveying nothing but . . . yes, basics. The difficulty
is one cannot avoid them - at the moment they seem to be everywhere.
For example, at a recent lunch at Marks &amp; Spencer I was galvanised by the
information that three simple items, the Brooks Brothers' blazer, the
gilt-snaffled loafer and the five-pocket Western jean (see below) are
responsible for Pounds 50m turnover a year. It may be the sequins and the
lace, the corsets and the zips that grab the headlines, but clearly it is
the basics that do the business.
Then there is the phenomenal success of The Gap clothing chain, which has
made its fortune out of nothing but basics: very well-made, simply
displayed, keenly priced (though in the UK they cost in pounds what they
cost in dollars in the US and consequently seem rather less of a bargain).
It arrived in the UK some four years and already has 35 branches. Richard
Hyman of Verdict (the retailing consultancy) guestimates that it does some
Pounds 40m a year.
You might think that anybody could do basics, that you hardly need involve a
designer at all. Exactly the opposite is true. It requires a finer eye, a
more scrupulous attention to detail and nuance to turn a basic into the sort
of must-have commodity that sets the tills ringing. From the fabric to the
stitching to the placing of the seams and the choice of buttons, every
single detail contributes to the whole.
Take the classic white cotton shirt. You might feel that this would be the
easiest thing in the world to find, and that when you did it should not cost
more than, say, Pounds 40. You would be wrong. This week I have looked high
and low - I have found delicious shirts, ravishing shirts, shirts well worth
buying, but the only truly classic simple cotton shirt I could find in the
shops came from Polo Ralph Lauren. It was perfect - but it cost Pounds 100.
Marks &amp; Spencer itself admits that it has not yet come up with the perfect
white cotton shirt. It has a ravishing classic shirt in heavy silk at an
excellent price - Pounds 49.95 - and just this week I spotted a splendidly
simple linen one at Pounds 35, but nowhere could I find the perfect plain
white cotton one.
The rewards for getting the basics right are enormous. M&amp;S, for example, has
been selling jeans, in good numbers, for years, but it was not until they
came up with the five-pocket Western jean at Pounds 19.99 that sales really
took off. Word got out that here was the definitive jean with the fit, the
proportions, the swanky air of a jean that usually costs double the price.
M&amp;S did the same with the classic gilt-snaffled loafer - working at it until
it had the softness, the comfort, the air of relaxed class that the customer
looks for. They priced it at Pounds 29.95 and it has been a huge
money-spinner ever since.
Ditto the blazer. The company had been selling a so-called classic navy blue
version for years but to the discerning eye the fabric was too heavy, the
shape too boxy, the buttons nothing special. But when M&amp;S brought out the
truly classic Brooks Brothers version last year the discerning shoppers'
network really began to buzz.
The demand for the carefully-made, properly thought-out classic seems almost
limitless. Lands' End, a US mail order company specialising in
quintessential American classics - the Oxford shirt, stone-washed jeans,
cowhide belts, flannel shirts, polo shirts, 'sweats' - put its toe in the
mail order market last November with a small brochure. The response was so
encouraging that just three months later it has brought out a much larger
brochure, in which the seeker after classics will find nothing fancy,
nothing that will ever, ever date, but solid quality at fair (but not cheap)
prices. For the catalogue ring 0800-220-106.
Johnny Boden is, by contrast, very, very British. An ex-investment banker
who tired of the endless search for the elusive piece of no-hassle clothing,
he decided to track them down, put them together and launch a mail order
service. 'I had always thought that if I felt like this then lots of other
people must, too.' What he wanted, and what his clothes deliver, is:
'Nothing fussy, nothing fancy and everything made to last.'
His first catalogue is a joy, featuring his own quirky essays on why he
chose each piece. It covers just basic clothing - moleskin trousers (Pounds
48); hand-crafted saddle leather belts with strong solid brass or nickel
buckles (amazing value at Pounds 18); heavy cotton twill button-down collar
shirts (Pounds 35); Shetland wool sweaters (Pounds 39); silk ties (Pounds
23); corduroy trousers (Pounds 48); 100 per cent pure white cotton boxer
shorts (Pounds 3 for Pounds 19); and, finally, the Boden bag (Pounds 90) to
put them all in. The catalogue is available from Boden, 9 Forge Court,
Reading Road, Yateley, Camberley, Surrey.
Take a look at the three basic items pictured left - a blazer, a pair of
jeans and a pair of loafers. They may look unexciting, but the sums of money
they generate is far from dull - they have in the last two years done Pounds
100m of business for Marks &amp; Spencer in the UK alone.
After knickers, socks and shoes these must be some of the most basic of all
basics. There can hardly be a wardrobe in the land that does not have at
least one of them, and most will probably have all three. They have become
the staples of leisure dressing. Every fashion editor worth her little gilt
chair has written reams on how to take the jean, blazer and loafer and make
them your own - how to dress jeans down with a white T-shirt, dress them up
with a handkerchief, soft white cotton shirt and a Hermes scarf, and so on
ad infinitum.
The problem with these kind of basics is that they often cost more than
seems proper for their understated role. Here at last are three excellent
versions at sensible prices, available in most M&amp;S branches. The Brooks
Brothers' blazer, nicest in navy but also available in black, red or beige,
is Pounds 79.95. The five-pocket Western jean is Pounds 19.99. Ladies'
gilt-snaffled loafers, in black or cream leather and red or navy suede, are
Pounds 29.95; mens are Pounds 39.95, in brown suede or black leather, and
available only in Marble Arch, London.
There is no garment more basic than the white shirt. They come in many
fabrics and many moods: crisp, quirky, diaphanous, classic, romantic, sleek
 -a white shirt can transform an outfit, set a scene. Sketched above are
just six of the best options around.
Top row, left to right: classic white linen by Polo Ralph Lauren, Pounds 120
(also in silk, Pounds 140), 143 New Bond Street, London W1. (post and
packing Pounds 6). Silk organza with shawl collar and tie and huge pearl and
gilt buttoned cuffs, by Lilli Crepon, Pounds 195 from Whistles branches (for
mail order, Pounds 3.50 extra, ring 071-935-7309). 'Prudence', a crisp white
cotton shirt with elongated collars giving it a rather Japanese air, Pounds
59.95 from The Shirtsmith, 139 Portland Road, London W11 4 LR. Mail order
Pounds 2.50 extra.
Bottom row, left to right: large puff-sleeved shirt in linen (Pounds 115) or
silk organza (Pounds 315) by MaxMara, 32 Sloane Street, London SW1 or 153
New Bond Street, London W1. For other stockists ring 071-287-3434. Man's
classically simple shirt in 100 per cent cream viscose by Rossperez, Pounds
89 from Malcolm Levene 13-15 Chiltern Street, London W1M 1HE.
'Unforgettable', a crisp white two-fold cotton poplin shirt with a knot in
one collar and the pocket, Pounds 70 from The Shirtsmith, 139 Portland Road,
London W11 4LR.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII Picture (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8733</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Queen: in defence of the realm
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr S. L. MAYER, Mr A. C. TELJER, Mr CHARLES SPINK, Mrs A. ROBEISON,
Sir JOHN STOKES MP and Mr J. A. PHILIPS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ARTICLE headlined 'The tourist in her own country,' by David Cannadine,
which appeared on the front page of the Weekend FT on February 8, provoked a
strong reaction from our readers. The debate continues here with a selection
of letters from those who disagreed with his views on the Queen and the
monarchy.
Several readers questioned his credentials for writing the article.
Cannadine, who is professor of history at Columbia University, New York, is
in fact an Englishman. He is author of The Decline and Fall of the British
Aristocracy and is writing a book on the constitutional monarchy.
*****
From Mr SL Mayer
Sir, David Cannadine has been living in the US too long. Never since the
latter days of Victoria has a monarch been so popular as the present one.
While it is perfectly true that her extended family may get up to occasional
tricks which neither her people nor Her Majesty approve, it is also fair to
say that members of the Royal family have had a bad press in the past and
now have a very good one, and rightly so, because of continued dedication,
hard work and service to their country such as that given by the Princess
Royal.
During World War II, Stalin enquired how many divisions the Pope had. Less
than 50 years later, the state over which Stalin ruled has disappeared. But
the papacy lives on, having played a rather important moral and ethical role
in the Soviet Union's and the eastern bloc's demise.
The Queen and the institution of the monarchy have this role in the
English-language world; one of moral suasion and example shown by Her
Majesty as well as many of her family, of devotion to duty, dedication to
human and British values in a world which is not necessarily dedicated to
any values at all.
Since these values are shared by the entire Anglophone world, and admired by
many who are not part of it, the Queen, as head of the Commonwealth, is the
living symbol of all that is good which has gone before and which endures
still; among these values are freedom of speech and press, freedom of
assembly, freedom of thought, democratic institutions and human values based
on Christian ideals.
These thoughts are universal and transcend both place and time. The Queen
and the monarchy represent them all. In an ever-changing world, the people
of the world and the people of Britain revere both those ideals and the
sovereign lady who best and most loyally represents them.
This does not mean that the institution of monarchy cannot or should not
change. It may well be that the taxation issue will be altered, as it was in
1936; that the Royal family, now more extended than ever, may be pared down
from public subsidy. But the Queen is probably the best-informed person in
the kingdom and is certainly the longest high-ranking public servant, having
now spent 40 years in the highest office. Far from being out of touch with
her people, she is in constant touch with them and the peoples of the
Commonwealth.
Britain has an influence in the world, even today, which far exceeds its
industrial power or population figures. It has this influence largely
because of its monarchy and its Queen. I would imagine that 50 years from
now, when the armies of Nato are confined to history as much as the power of
the Warsaw Pact is now, and when other empires and great powers have waxed
and waned, the institution of the British monarchy will remain, exercising
its considerable moral influence over both Britain and the English-speaking
peoples.
Sydney L. Mayer,
Connecticut, US
*****
From Mr AC Teljer
Sir, The article by David Cannadine examining the Queen's role might be
fashionable in certain circles and possibly well-intended as an appraisal.
It is, nevertheless, to a large extent misguided.
If the 'old,' out-of-date imperial monarchy flourished from the time of
Victoria's Golden Jubilee until the present Queen's accession, what of the
profoundly majestic and noble kinship shown by the Queen's late father
during the Second World War, and her parents' obvious involvement in their
nation's sufferings? Kindred spirits, indeed - not lofty imperialists]
The simple point Mr Cannadine has missed and failed to acknowledge is that
the monarch, preferably a compassionate and indulgent one - which the Queen
certainly is, however outmodish or 'limited in her social vision' he deems
her - is there not only to reflect a nation's principles and role in the
world, and to be involved in active and creative patronage.
She is also to be uniquely there in showing her subjects, whether they be
naturally British or of other races from other shores, that nearness of the
state is available to all in her presence; not as a tourist in her own
country (a ridiculous notion), but as an official of destiny within a
dynasty undiluted by common dimensions by co-operating for the nation's
good. Perhaps patriarchy or matriarchy in itself may prove outmoded, or even
undesirable in modern technological society - reverence of one kind or
another never will.
Professor Cannadine may dislike the monarchy, or royalty in general. I
believe he will always be in a small minority and that this particular band
of blue bloods will always be indispensable to certain societies for a very
long time into the next millennium. He asks: 'What is to be put in its
place?' I say, nothing. Better the 'sycophantic mythology of imperial
ornamentality' than the shallow conventionality of republican vapidity.
AC Teljer,
The Netherlands
*****
From Mr Charles Spink
Sir, Who is David Cannadine that you should not only give him the front page
of the Weekend FT, but support him with such insulting caricatures? It is
typical of the British press that probably no other country would print such
disparaging rubbish about the monarchy and the British people.
Charles Spink,
Morpeth,
Northumberland
*****
From Mrs A. Robeison
Sir, 'The tourist in her own country' was in appallingly poor taste. The
aspersions the author casts on the Queen's personality and achievements are
inaccurate, unwarranted and especially disgraceful.
A. Robeison,
Shrewsbury
*****
From Sir John Stokes MP
Sir, I am sure I am not alone among your readers in not taking too kindly to
a lecture from a professor in an American university about the British
monarchy.
There are so many misconceptions in the professor's article which show that
he completely misunderstands how ordinary English people feel about the
monarchy. He patronises the Queen for her undoubted virtues, but then says
she 'is conservative enough to regard most change for the worst,' thus
sharing the views of at least half her subjects. Does the Professor think
that a Queen full of radical views would be more appropriate?
I dispute the professor's contention that our national identity has been
weakened. It may have been so among the intelligentsia with whom probably he
mixes, but not among people in pubs, factories etc, where patriotism still
lies deep. Would a nation which is losing its way have undertaken and won
the Falklands War with all the great risks involved? Or sent such
incomparable forces to the Gulf War which earned the unstinted admiration
from our American allies there?
As for 'the old ways of doing things - ceremonial grandeur' - ordinary
people love it. The ceremonies emphasise our long history and cohesion as a
nation. Many continental countries would love to have a history such as ours
and I am quite sure the British people will never agree to the bureaucrats
of Brussels destroying our monarchy.
The professor says that the British monarchy has lost its way, but I fear it
is the professor himself who has lost his way.
John Stokes,
House of Commons,
London SW1.
*****
From Mr JA Philips
Sir, How nice it would be if the Queen were to grant an audience to
Professor Cannadine. I'm sure that he would pretty soon find that, like Mr
Heath, he was 'expendable'.
JA Philips,
Somerset
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI Photograph Pomp and glory, The Queen at the State opening of
Parliament (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8734</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / A dog's life at Buck House: As they say in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EVERY foreign correspondent in London has seen the BBC film that celebrated
the 40th anniversary of the Queen's accession to the throne, Elizabeth R, or
Isabel R as she is known in Spain.
Isabel, Felipe, Carlos and Ana are familiar figures there: Spitting Image,
the coarse British satirical television programme, has a wide audience. Such
are the realities of the New Europe. So Enric Gonzalez in El Pais was
writing for a well-informed readership in his useful summary of the Queen's
decades.
'Elizabeth has seen the disappearance of the Empire, the hard recovery of
the 1950s, the cultural revolution of the '60s, the trade union torments of
the '70s and the petty bourgeois Thatcherite insurrection of the '80s
without altering her routine.' The heart of this routine is tea. The Queen
always takes tea with her corgis, 'for whom she personally mixes meat and
biscuits which the little animals eat on the red carpets of her private
homes.'
Corgis were fully researched for Bernhard Heimrich's account in the
Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung. 'Corgis are short-legged, bustling little
dogs from Wales, which in the handbook are described as ideal for the
farmyard, vigilant guardians and good comrades. The queen has six corgis,
which she feeds with meat and biscuits every day at half past four.'
Heimrich finds the British almost as interesting as the corgis. He says that
a third of us dream about the Queen, and most of the dreams include drinking
tea with the monarch - sans corgis. So we enter the British subconscious,
and a dark place it proves to be:
'The second surprise (after the dreams) is that it is mainly night in the
Reich of Elizabeth II. This has been recognised for some time but has not
been fully accepted. On the Empire of her predecessor the sun never set. The
four decades of Queen Elizabeth II encompass the British generation which
has to abandon this dream, and the Queen as a dream figure behind the walls
of her palace in the middle of British reality, is there to help.'
Le Monde's correspondent, Laurent Zecchini, emerges as a hitherto
unimaginable entity - a French Barbara Pym. He too reports the dream of
taking tea with the Queen. 'In the collective unconscious of her people, the
Queen keeps her place at the centre of a pile of useless little things,
dusty but essential, which make Great Britain in the eyes of so many people
the vestal priestess of the cult of memories . . .'
The elegiac theme then really takes hold: 'Forty years, and always that
certain smile - a little fixed, this great professionalism, this intangible
etiquette, these prime ministers who succeed one another for the invariable
tea and conversations of no importance.'
The Italians care little for psychological speculation, and less for tea, or
even corgis. They are interested in not paying income tax. So in Il Sole-24
Ore, Alessandro Merli, with his usual good taste, celebrated 40 glorious
years of getting away with it. He reverently asked: 'Is the Queen of England
the UK's biggest tax evader?'
Merli noted that earlier monarchs had indeed paid income tax. He then ran
through the figures on the Queen's wealth and income and concluded she could
well afford to pay. But he has fears about the succession: her non-payment
of tax 'does not mean that Prince Charles, who likes to appear in the
forefront of 'inner city' causes, will not start doing it again.'
That will not satisfy the royalist Zecchini in Le Monde: 'The Queen will
have to find a recipe for a sort of neo-monarchy for the next century, an
alchemy which will bring together modernity and tradition. In the next
decade the Queen will celebrate her golden jubilee and her 75 years. Until
then, without any doubt, 'God Save the Queen.''
James Morgan is economics correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8735</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Property: A Portland life in miniature
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BRENNAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEWLY re-marketed property in repossession offers car fanatics the
opportunity of a marble-floored double garage, plus home, just off Portland
Place, London W1.
The vast houses on Portland Place itself were too large for all but the
grandest of families, even from the time they were built. Fortunately, they
provided impressive homes for the country's war heroes in the years after
1778, when Robert and James Adam started laying out the street.
The military bias long out-lasted those early generals and admirals who had
won 'a nation's gratitude' - and often substantial state pensions - for
their efforts in the continental wars. Even at the beginning of this century
Field Marshall Lord Roberts could have gathered a quorum of the Army General
Staff to his Portland Place house by sending a runner.
These days any such call would show how the road has become
institutionalised. Embassies and institutes now fill the street-front
houses, leaving only the mews properties for the individual buyer.
Duchess Mews, which takes its name from Margaret Harley, Duchess of Portland
at the time of the development, is one among the jumble of surviving back
streets that rarely fail to surprise visitors to London. Because no one got
around to redevelop the backs of the grand houses, London is fortunate in
having thousands of these freehold or near freehold houses in the heart of
areas with otherwise severely restricted leaseholds.
Aron Nakar, of Ellis &amp; Co's Regent's Park office (071-723-8955) explains
that the 951-year leasehold on the mews house he is marketing in Duchess
Place reflects an overlap of basement areas with a neighbouring building.
'The only reason that it is not freehold is that space.'
The Grade II-listed, three bedroom, three bathroom house, pictured above,
has been on offer for more than a year. As new agents, Ellis &amp; Co has agreed
a price cut with the mortgagee and Aron Nakar reports bargaining interest
around the asking price of Pounds 400,000. The large floorspaces that come
with these former stable buildings give a big drawing/dining room and scope,
downstairs, for a 12-jet whirlpool bath.
The off-beat opportunity for an owner's cars to escape central London's
yellow lines and rest instead on marble comes with the current snooker room
 -exile the table (keeping the news from what certainly would be a
horror-struck interior designer) and you would have room for two to three
cars.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8736</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Property: Sold, the broken dreams of a market under the
hammer - A look at the crowds hoping to pick up a cut-price repossessed home
at a property auction in London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LANTERN-JAWED assistant auctioneer holds the telephone receiver tightly
to his chest. 'She's got the money for the arrears,' he tells the young man
standing opposite.
Paul Milner, the legal representative overseeing the forced sale of the
caller's repossessed property, inspects his notes. 'No,' he replies, and
records the event in a notebook while the woman is informed of the curt
response. 'It's a ruse,' he says. 'At this stage they'll try anything. She
has had ample time in which to settle, and we have tried everything to get
her to pay.'
The high drama being played behind the auctioneer's rostrum goes unnoticed
by the 1,000 buyers packed into a west London hotel to bid for the catalogue
of properties, many of them the result of bad debts and repossessions.
'The proportion of the auction market taken up by repossessions has grown
markedly in the last year,' says Robin Cripp, deputy chairman of Barnard
Marcus and chief auctioneer for the two-day sale. 'In the last six months
they have been arriving in bulk.'
As repossessions have risen so, too, has consumer interest in auctions. The
attendance at last month's sale was more than double the usual size. More
than 9,000 catalogues were requested, an increase of 3,500 on last time.
Unprecedented demand has forced General Accident Properties to close its
books for an auction later this month. 'There is only so much one can sell
in a day,' says Maureen Freeman, business and development director for GA
Properties. 'The response has been quite outstanding. Auctions are showing
the first signs of a tentative revival in the general market.'
Even so, Freeman believes that the fundamental problem of oversupply (caused
chiefly by repossessions) will continue to be a drag on any recovery.
'Although some official statistics were indicating about 80,000
repossessions in 1991, the real figure was far higher, probably in the order
of 110,000,' she says. 'This year it will probably go as high as 150,000 as
unemployment compounds problems with arrears.'
Some banks and building societies - Alliance &amp; Leicester, Citibank, Bradford
&amp; Bingley - have introduced low-start mortgages in an attempt to move
repossessed stock off their books. Bradford and Bingley says that since
October it has had 33,000 enquiries about its 6.99 per cent low-start
mortgage offer, resulting in half of its 2,000 repossessed homes being
re-sold.
In response to government concern, building societies have also extended the
negotiation process on repossessions, leading to a fall in repossessions in
January. However, many people in the industry believe this is only a
short-term effect of the building societies' new stance.
Michael Minahan, manager of the Bradford &amp; Bingley building society branch
in Sutton, Surrey, says: 'Since the new year, we have stopped action on a
lot of our repossessions. I am due to visit some of our customers on whom we
would normally be seeking repossession orders, to discuss their arrears.'
But Freeman believes: 'The softer line being taken at the moment by some
building societies will just feed through to the repossession figures for
the spring.'
A report by stockbrokers UBS Phillips &amp; Drew warns of 'a tidal wave' of
500,000 vacant properties by the end of 1992. A fifth of that total will be
caused by a fresh bout of repossessions.
A flood of empty property - albeit through the worst of circumstances -
would seem to be excellent news for the professional auction buyer. But the
rise has been more than matched by an influx of private buyers into the
auction market. This has irked the developers.
'The owner occupiers tend to kill it for the dealer,' Robin Cripp agrees.
'They obviously do not need to re-sell the properties, so can bid a higher
price than the dealers. Some of them are not too happy about it, I know.'
Sohail Sarbuland, a young property developer hoping to add to his company's
portfolio of rented accommodation, complains: 'Owner occupiers are pushing
prices up for very low-grade houses. They can bid at a level which is
pitched right at our profit margin.'
Sarbuland was interested in eight houses and expected to buy three. One
property he intended to bid for was a freehold three-floor terraced house in
West Kensington, London. He reckoned on a top bid of Pounds 100,000,
spending a further Pounds 20,000 on improvements, with a year's let followed
by a sale at around Pounds 180,000. 'The money we make has got to pay for
the interest while we're sitting on the property,' he explains.
Bidding started at Pounds 90,000, but soon overtook Sohail Sarbuland's
reserve. The house eventually sold for Pounds 120,000 - to a private buyer.
Purchasers must pay a 10 per cent deposit on the day of sale, and the
balance within 28 days. Auction catalogues are available a month in advance
so prospective buyers can inspect properties. Vendors often hold viewing
days prior to auction.
Michael King, an Essex developer, was another unhappy businessman. 'There
were over 100 people at one view I went to - they were queueing all the way
round the block. I took one look, and turned my car around and left.'
He had, he admits, broken one of his own golden rules of looking at a
property in an area off his regular patch. 'The best buys are outside London
 -where fewer people will be bothered to go and view the property.'
By the time the auction starts, latecomers are struggling to get through the
doors. Nearly everyone carries a bulky catalogue, and is greeted by a large
sheaf of papers detailing withdrawals, errors, misprints and qualifications.
The removal of a whole selection of British Rail properties - subject of a
freehold dispute with the local council - causes a ripple of disappointment.
People struggle to hold on to their coffee cups - courtesy of the
auctioneers - as the crowd increases in size. In between intense study of
the catalogue, men in suits eye men in leather coats. Young couples jostle
for space with turbaned businessmen and a sprinkling of Hasidic Jews. Nearly
everyone, it seems, carries a portable phone.
At the front of the glitzy ballroom a couple of hundred chairs and their
occupants soon become lost from view. To the sides, screens allow private
access to the cramped area behind the auction rostrum, where a dozen Barnard
Marcus employees wait to process the sales. Here, also, regular customers
are allowed to stand to avoid the crush at the back of the hall.
In another room a taping system records the proceedings for legal
protection. Off to the left the auctioneers have prepared a reception room
for their most feted guests.
The auction starts apace, the auctioneer quickly whittling buyers down to
the two or three serious contenders per sale. On either side of him stand
half a dozen clean-cut male assistants who help to spot bidders and, when
the hammer comes down, collect the successful buyer from the crowd.
The properties are largely drawn from the south-east, principally from the
London area. The reserve price is set by the vendor, who will pay Barnard
Marcus a 2 per cent commission if the property is sold.
Most properties make their reserves easily. A four-bedroomed house in
Walthamstow, east London, fetches Pounds 38,000 (reserve Pounds 25,000); a
three-bed semi in Selston, Nottinghamshire, makes Pounds 38,000 (Pounds
22,000); a three-bed house in Brixton, south London, sells for Pounds 60,000
(Pounds 55,000).
Matthew Collier, a 32-year-old export order clerk from Harlesden, north
London, has come to bid for a three-floor terraced house in nearby Crouch
End. 'This house would probably cost me Pounds 120,000 at an estate agent,'
he says. 'I've been to see it, and although it needs a bit of work on it, if
I get it for under Pounds 100,000, I'll be happy.' (A smiling Collier leaves
Pounds 99,000 lighter.)
High bidders steer well clear of a two-bed terrace in Balham, south London,
which has only a three-year lease. Despite Cripp's most persuasive tones, it
sells for only Pounds 24,000. Two terraced houses in the same street in
Hetton-Le-Hole, Tyne and Wear, meet different fates: one sells for Pounds
6,000, the other is withdrawn by its owner at Pounds 7,700.
As well as residential properties, there are also investment opportunities
of varying attractiveness. A four-floor terraced house on London's
prestigious King's Road is withdrawn after failing to reach its reserve
price of Pounds 140,000, chiefly because the property - which is split into
three flats - contains two long-term tenants with registered rents of just
Pounds 26 and Pounds 21 a week.
Over the two days, 80 per cent of the properties reach their reserve and are
sold - well above the normal level of sales. On the second day, some of a
large number of Halifax Building Society properties even sell above their
open market rate.
Overall, the auction realises Pounds 9.2m: 50 per cent above last year's
average auction sale. But this is still far short of the Pounds 20m per
auction in 1988.
A somewhat hoarse Cripp says that the rise in auction sales could mark the
beginning of the end of the housing slump. 'If we carry on with this rate of
enthusiasm, I think we will see prices levelling this year and rising in
1993.'
Solicitor Paul Milner's effort to realise a sale for his client comes to
nought. The house fails to meet the Pounds 59,000 reserve set by the court;
the case has now been re-referred for a fresh valuation. A week after the
event, a frustrated Milner complains: 'And we still haven't received any
money from her.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8737</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Travel: Sedate, but so scenic - Skiing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARNOLD WILSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE are certain parts of the Engadine that look, smell and feel so utterly
and permanently Swiss that you feel they must have been like that when the
Romans were still wandering the valleys. Take Pontresina, where you suspect
that nothing much has happened since the Bernina electric railway from St
Moritz arrived in 1904. Sedate. That is the word. And with its narrow main
street hemmed-in by historic buildings with turrets, spires and painted
facades, Pontresina is also inordinately pretty.
On one of those perfect, cloudless blue days in the mountains, with snow
blanketing the countryside and muffling all sounds, you do not even need to
spend money on a lift pass to enjoy a blissful day. Pontresina is famous for
its superb cross-country skiing: there are 60 km of trails in the resort and
90 nearby. Indeed, the village is so pre-occupied with cross-country that
Club Med makes a point in its brochure of stating: 'As we specialise
particularly in cross-country in this village, there is a small supplement
for skiers wishing to practise downhill skiing.'
But Pontresina also has some of the best and most scenic downhill slopes in
the region, which it shares with St Moritz. Piz Lagalb has some really
testing runs, including a magnificent and very long semi-off-piste black run
which can be a dream in fresh powder or a severe challenge after the
formation of giant moguls. There are exquisite views from the Diovalezza
glacier, as well as excellent long runs for intermediates; some notable
off-piste terrain back to the bottom of the cable car; and a breathtaking
but technically simple descent down the glacier to Morteratsch.
Although only three miles from St Moritz, Pontresina - set snugly, and
perhaps a touch smugly, in a picturesque and sheltered valley - is just far
enough away to preserve an aloof distance from its illustrious neighbour.
'Many traditionalists return annually to the great comfort and considerable
charm of Pontresina hotels, and appreciate being at a distance from the
glitter and hubbub of St Moritz,' reports the Good Skiing Guide. The Volvo
Ski Guide makes the same point but adds that there is plenty of nightlife,
nevertheless.
Indeed, Club Med prides itself on providing most of the activities you might
require, in-house. Each of the club's 22 ski villages - mainly in France and
Switzerland - has its own ski and boot hire shops as well as boutiques
selling ski-wear, plus fully-qualified instructors.
In Pontresina, Club Med operates the Schloss and Park hotels, which are in
the heart of the cross-country area and linked by a bridge with the village.
There are three restaurants and a disco and Club Med's gentil organisateurs
provide and organise live entertainment every night.
My first reactions to Club Med's attempts to entertain me some years ago, in
Senegal, were uneasy, especially when asked to join in the nightly sing-song
with hand signals. But the fault was mine. Either you resist and look
miserably foolish or you join in cheerfully and still look foolish - but
happy. You don't have to attend the entertainment at all, of course. Indeed,
this year Club Med has a new policy of making sure no-one feels under
pressure to do anything they do not want to.
Arnold Wilson was a guest of Club Med (106-110 Brompton Road, London SW3;
reservations, tel: 071-581-1161). Prices for a week, including flight and
all meals, are from Pounds 540 to Pounds 745; for a fortnight, Pounds
940-Pounds 1,297.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8738</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Travel: Putting flesh on the bones of old Berlin - A capital
with a split personality, and the pleasures of Potsdam
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SUSAN MOORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WALL is still there.
Stretches of battered, brightly-graffitoed masonry now seem to be protected
by coiling wire and weeds to show posterity how one side of the street used
to be divided from the other, while all around road builders attempt to turn
reunified Berlin into a working reality.
From the vantage point of the line of the Wall, there does not seem a great
deal of difference between what was west and what was east, since downtown
Berlin had hitched up her skirts and rushed westwards towards the Ku'dam and
left its perimeter to go to seed.
A few blocks either way, however, and the contrast is striking. Crossing the
invisible no-man's land is like going through a looking glass. Beyond, the
visible world is in time-warp, a grand but not so old European capital
crumbling but as yet undespoiled. No doubt the late 20th century will soon
catch up with it. In Berlin and Potsdam, I felt like a vulture picking on
the old bones of the Prussian eagle before it returned to life.
Unter den Linden, as if by magnetic force, draws sightseers first up one
side and then down the other, from the Brandenburg gate and the Tiergarten
to the Lustgarten. Taxi ranks at either end account for the fact that the
surrounding streets are deserted.
Can any other boulevard boast such a sequence of ponderous, grandiose,
neo-classical and baroque public buildings? To the north: the state library,
Humboldt university, Schinkel's new guardhouse - behind whose Greek temple
portico burns the flame for the Unknown Soldier - and the monoliths of the
museum island, dominated by Schinkel's long, low Altes museum. Inside the
Pergamon museum you find not only the gargantuan late altar of Zeus and
Athene but, even more fantastically, the azure-tiled processional way and
Ishtar gate of Nebuchadnezzar's ancient Babylon.
To the south lies Langhan's Altes palais and the old library, and
Knobelsdorff's charming opera house. The gothic rather than neo-classical
church behind is by Schinkel, again, and now houses his museum-cum-shrine.
The buildings are grimy, the streets cobbled, the shops still untempting.
Perfect small baroque town palaces are in tatters: the Neue museum starkly
rises, battered and boarded up.
There is the Grand Hotel (recently taken into new ownership) for those who
want to explore the drama of this urban ghost town of the old East - the
Adlon, like the Royal palace, has long since gone. The favoured grand hotel
of the old West is the Kempinski on the Ku'damm, the street a blaze of light
and life that illustrates what Unter den Linden has been spared. Here, it
seems , no one goes to bed. After a relaxed, authentically inauthentic
dinner at the Paris Bar, one might stroll into Fofi's on Fasanenstrasse, the
new artistic and literary - '90s-smart rather than bohemian - strip. At 2am
the atmosphere changes, and there is a sense that the evening is just
beginning.
The energy of Berlin picks one up and sends one hurtling through a weekend.
Street Berlin is as fast and funny as Glaswegian. A rather drunk young man
stumbled into what had been a third-class carriage on the S-Bahn with
slatted wooden seats: 'I always travel ply-wood class,' he claimed loftily.
Berlin is surprisingly green, dauntingly large and widely dispersed. There
is far too much to see in one weekend. The decisions to be made are tough:
Komische oper, Deutsches theater or the exquisite Schauspielhaus? Whether to
go to the Bode or the new picture gallery in the suburb of Dahlem (the
latter, an extraordinary concentration of European masterpieces, wins hands
down). Should one pay homage to the celebrated Nefertiti in the Egyptian
museum or cross town to genuflect at the Pergamon altar?
On the banks of the Spree is Walter Gropius's Bauhaus archiv. Upstream is
the Japonisme of Mies van der Rohe's New National Gallery, part of an
outcrop of new museums in which the applied arts museum must rank as the
most hideous in Germany. Does one go to the Prussian Baroque Schloss
Charlottenberg, with its French garden sprinkled with delightful pavilions,
its Caspar David Friedrichs and oriental and European porcelain? Or to
Potsdam?
Once again, the latter won hands down. But avoid the motorway. The
picturesque Koenigs-allee, which takes one through the smartest suburbs of
Berlin, is fringed with forests and glistening lakes. We went on a Saturday,
the last glorious day of an Indian summer. It seemed that everyone else had
the same idea. After crossing the Glienicker bridge, we seemed to become
part of a fleet of black BMWs filled with curious Wessies, inching our way
through the shabby cobbled streets.
Potsdam is an architectural fantasy. Its town centre is Italianate, its
perimeter gothic revival. At its historical heart is an 18th century Dutch
quarter. A 19th century Russian military village lies to the north.
Merchants houses imitate the banqueting house in Whitehall; the pumping
station is an Islamic mosque complete with minaret and dome. On Telegraph
hill, in 1920-21, Erich Mendelsohn built the town's most idiosyncratic
monument, the Einstein tower.
Parks and palaces (of which there are seven) are at the heart of this summer
seat of the Hohenzollerns. Sanssoucci - in name at least - spawned a progeny
of suburban Edwardian villas. The original is a miracle of 18th century
escapism. Frederick the Great had it built to his own design (with the help
of Knobelsdorff) as a 'source of relaxation, and domestic life, for the
enjoyment of nature and the Muses'. It stretches like a long, low, ochre
limb across the top of its hill surrounded by vineyards and larch groves.
From the top one descends gently to a circular fountain via seven curved
terraces planted with vines and fig trees.
Swags of creeping stucco vines trail along the Kleine Galerie that was once
lined with fetes galantes by Watteau, Lancret and Pater. In the glossy
yellow Voltairezimmer (in which the great man never stayed) monkeys are
surrounded by bunches of grapes, melons, plums and cherries. Gilt musical
instruments and masks cascade down the walls of the exquisite rococo
circular library and white-and-gold music room. Even the caryatids that line
the garden facade of this far-from-artless rustic retreat seem unusually
spirited.
To the north, through an elegant colonnade, views stretch towards the
picturesque classical ruins. To the south lies Frederick himself, only
recently reunited as he wished with his beloved whippets. His grand,
separate picture gallery, which looks more like an orangerie than the
orangerie, offers a rare glimpse of a typical 18th century picture
collection. Original masterpieces by Rubens and Van Dyck, and Caravaggio's
powerful Doubting Thomas, who is poking an inquiring finger into Christ's
wound, happily rest toe to tip with minor works.
Sanssoucci's pleasure gardens are half restored, a combination of patchy
grass and municipal flowers beds out of character with the austere hedges
and statuary. Most delightfully fanciful of all its follies is the 18th
century Chinese tea house. This rotunda is flanked by life-size gilt
Chinamen with European faces eating and playing music under vast golden
palms, its cupola tipped by a gilt mandarin under a parasol. Here tea was
taken surrounded by the life-size and fantastically costly porcelain animals
modelled by Kandler at Meissen.
Frederick's Sanssoucci is all playful conceit, innocence and delight, its
scale intimate, its charm enchanting. In shocking contrast, the vast Neue
Palais he built in the 1760s to celebrate his escape from defeat by the
Russians is all swagger and chill great rooms. One redeeming feature, apart
from the first-rate furniture and textiles, is the hall-cum-grotto which,
apart from the usual sea shells, glitters with reef gold and encrustations
of minerals, semi-precious stones and fossils.
We left the steamy warmth and mounds of whipped cream of the 18th century
panelled tearoom to pick our way out through the park in the dark. This, it
seems, is the only time that the park at Sanssoucci is deserted. Here,
during the Potsdam conference of 1945, the Allies had divided up Berlin.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII Photograph Statues in east Berlin, much of the city seems
in a time-warp (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8739</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: In and out of love - Radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YESTERDAY was St. Valentine's Day, though the Vatican no longer regards him
(whoever he is) as a saint. He is at least the authorised patron of February
14, as each network conceded in its way. Radio 2's Gloria Hanniford dealt
with him in her afternoon programme, and in the evening there was a
programme of 'anti-love songs', Not Saint Valentine. On Tuesday (St.
Saturninus) Radio 4 told of the odd gifts given to celebrate Friday in My
Funny Valentine.
Anti-love was the feeling in Radio 3's tribute too, also on Tuesday, John
Clifford's The Price of Everything. This traces an affair from pick-up to
fade-out, the talk between Jill (Hetty Baynes) and Harry (Timothy Spall)
given a contrapuntal commentary by Cupid (Harold Innocent). Perhaps this
casting was itself an anti-love comment, for Innocent, despite his talent
and his surname, is not easy to think of in that part, especially with that
dialogue. The romance begins in a dance-hall ('I just want to talk') and is
pursued via a pub, a restaurant, a cinema, a hotel bedroom, to ultimate
disillusion (though there is talk of 'beginning again'). Jill denies being a
tart, she just wants to be paid for her time and her talk. Everything women
do costs money; she works out her dance-hall allure at Pounds 288. What men
do costs money too; Harry says he is a City man, a successful dealer in
futures, but proves to be something very much less. The play is as wise as
it is funny, and was very well done under Marilyn Imrie's direction.
The first of the Radio 4 Debates was not quite so wise nor so funny. The
motion was that 'The House of Lords is an anachronism and should not
continue in its present form,' a proposition unlikely to engender much novel
thought, even debated by Their Lordships. Lord Mishcon, proposing, reminded
us that the House was a reforming, a revising chamber; he asked if it were
really in touch, and was the hereditary principle justified: everyday ideas.
Lady Seear, seconding, called more excitingly for a radical constitutional
reform, with chambers for Scotland and Wales, and a senate, all elected by
PR.
Lord St. John of Fawsley, opposing, insisted that the House actually works,
much hard work was done in revision; no party dominated; heredity offered
youth. Lord Allen of Abbeydale reminded us that that the Lords initiated
some worthwhile Bills, such as the Charities Bill. From the floor there were
denigrations of other nations' second chambers, praise for cross-benchers,
sneers for backwoodsmen. Yet the motion was defeated by 39 to 34. Tomorrow,
'The only way to save the planet is for the West to adopt a lower standard
of living.' The Chairman is Brian Redhead, who also wakes us up in Today at
6.30, and is presenting a good ten-part series on the progress of the
Church, Protestors for Paradise.
On Thursday, Radio 4 began a new series of Soundtrack, in which events are
made to sound as if overheard, though behaviour is seldom quite spontaneous
when recorded in stereo. In The Road to Barlad, well-intentioned but
inexperienced folk decided to visit Romania and give some help - painting,
plumbing, goods, a few songs with the guitar. Work was indeed done, toilets
repaired, shoes distributed to thousands of children, who were trained to
cry 'Yes, please, Eddie]' when asked if they would like a song. But mere
good intentions were not enough. There was friction among the party; and the
inevitable irrelevance of child-adoption came up. 'We now know what's to be
done,' someone said at the end. Lovely people as they were, they should have
known before they set off.
A new series of Words on Radio 3, by Naomi Lightman, began with five minutes
on the word 'extra-mural'. Though in its way it decribes the programme, it's
hardly interesting enough to entice listeners to hear Lightman's subsequent
talks, examining varieties of the word 'tourism'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8740</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: Faust in grand opera style - Records
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD CRICHTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Gounod: Faust. Studer, Leech, Hampson, van Dam/Plasson/French Army
Choir/chor. and orch. Capitole, Toulouse. EMI 7 54228 2 (3 CDs).
Verdi orch. Berio. 8 Romances. Falla orch. Berio 7 Spanish Folksongs.
English Chamber Orchestra/Berio. Philips 432 889-2.
'Rossini Heroines'. Bartoli/chor. and orch. Teatro la Fenice, Venice/Marin.
Decca 436075-2.
A COMPOSER of genius in limited fields, Gounod was a most unsatisfactory
person - flawed in character as in much of his music, but not in the lyrical
style and polished craftmanship in which he excelled. After a period of
scorn and neglect his best music, or such of it as is nowadays performed,
shows every sign of survival. Faust, his most popular work, whose prolonged
and apparently unshakable success at the Paris Opera and elsewhere
infuriated younger composers like Debussy and led Bernard Shaw to complain
that 'the professional critic in London has to spend about ten years out of
every twelve of his life listening to Faust' may never regain the position
of almost everyone's favourite opera. But, seen now in a different light, it
is back in the repertory.
The new EMI recording made under Michel Plasson with the chorus and
orchestra of the Capitole at Toulouse and an exciting cast, comfortably sums
up and fills out the Faust we used to know rather than the one that has
recently come out of wraps. Three young Americans of great talent sing
Marguerite, Faust and Valentine. The ever-improving Cheryl Studer has the
brilliance and agility (and the trill) for the jewel song as well as the
strength to sail out in the final trio - the oboe-like timbre excludes
over-sweetness. Richard Leech, recently admired as Raoul in Les Huguenots,
even if he doesn't sound much like a philosopher old or young (few tenors
do), sings the title-role with supple grace and an engaging candour. Thomas
Hampson is Valentine, successfully conveying that the gallant soldier is
also an unpleasant bigot. The Siebel of Martine Mahe and Dame Marthe of
Nadine Denize could hardly be bettered. The dominating figure, and rightly
so, is the Mephistopheles of Jose van Dam, filled with a kind of bitter
grandeur, even contriving to suggest something of the missing serious
background.
Why, then, since the orchestral playing and ensemble work are very good, is
there a slight tinge of disappointment? Gounod carved, not in marble, but in
alabaster. Even so, the continuous smoothness and some rather ponderous
tempi make for airlessness. This is a studio production - if the Corn
Exchange at Toulouse may be called a 'studio'  - perhaps what one misses is
the tension, with the risk of occasional untidiness, of live recordings.
The feeling is partly due to the expected but unadventurous decision to use
the established grand opera version with recitatives and not the original
opera-comique Faust with spoken dialogues (Theatre Lyrique, 1859). As we
know from the ENO staging this reduces the upholstery, lets in the air and
works against Gounod's constant tendency to veer towards the grandiose. The
issue is not cut-and-dried. In his valuable study The Operas of Charles
Gounod, Steven Huebner of McGill University Montreal explains that Gounod
would have liked both spoken and recitative versions of Faust and of Romeo
et Juliette to co-exist, for opera companies to choose whichever suited them
best. Oddly enough Huebner, who inclines towards the grand opera Faust, does
not mention the ENO production.
EMI score in completeness. Marguerite's spinning song is in, also what
remains of the Walpurgisnacht. An appendix includes various things dropped
by Gounod but worth having on record. The most interesting is the
predecessor of Mephisto's 'Calf of gold', a sinister 'Scarab song' from the
world of The Tales of Hoffmann. A tiny fragment for Siebel is surely worth
restoring. It was a mistake to relegate the ballet music from the correct
place in the limping Walpurgis scene to the appendix. The dances are
enjoyable as well as typical examples of the style, and they are the only
surviving evidence of the 'orgy of queens and courtesans' promised by
Mephisto. Faust's feeble 'couplets bacchiques' are no compensation. A shame
that Marguerite's mad scene in prison has not survived.
If you prefer the church scene (excellently done by Studer and van Dam)
after Valentine's death, you can play them in that order. It is musically
insensitive to follow the church scene with the soldiers' chorus. That old
favourite is rousingly sung by the presumably specially imported French Army
Choir, without a trace of the lately fashionable alienation. A boy at school
used to sing the tune to alternative words - 'My Aunt-ie swallered a penny
bal-loon'. Unfortunately, except that 'the bloody thing bust', I can't
remember the rest. Can any reader oblige?
The Carreras single of eight romances by Verdi and Falla's Seven Spanish
Folksongs in orchestral transcriptions by Luciano Berio show a degree of
enterprise and discrimination rare in star tenors. The Verdi songs, dating
from the ten years after 1835, are studded with hints of the early and
middle-period operas including a phrase from Il Trovatore. Berio plays
wittily, affectionately, sometimes violently with these references, adding
instrumental links to bind the songs into a chain. An unexpected glance
forward to Samson et Dalila allows him to pay a swift, graceful tribute to
Saint-Saens.
The Falla transcriptions are remarkable. Berio does not imitate the
suggestive quality of Falla's masterly piano writing. He separates and
heightens colours; they are stronger, but still restrained. I have never
heard these songs sung by a man. They don't lie very well for a tenor voice.
Carreras, musical and responsive as he is, has some difficulty with the
soft, sustained lines of 'Nana', an unmasculine lullaby, and with the
beautiful, mournful 'Asturiana'. Worth hearing all the same. As conductor
Berio skilfully allows the instruments their head without covering the
voice.
The year Rossini 200 makes a blazing start with the mezzo Cecilia Bartoli's
'Rossini heroines', eight numbers taken from operas and a royal wedding
cantata, written for Rossini's favourite singer and future wife, Isabella
Colbran. All of them except the Venetian Semiramide come from his Neapolitan
period. All bar one have chorus, three of them are rondo-finales of the
Cenerentola type. Monotony is kept at bay by careful choice and contrast.
The copper burnish on Bartoli's gleaming tone is perhaps too unvarying and
she raps out all her flourishes in much the same semi-staccato. Yet how
lucky we are to have at this juncture an artist who sings with such youthful
vigour, warmth and confidence - and dead in tune.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8741</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Off The Wall - An Arts Diary: Heritage still slips away
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS WAS the week in which the dam finally started to crack. For years the
heritage lobby has wrung its hands over the weak defences that the UK has in
place against the loss of its arts treasures to rich foreigners. The
jeremiads always seemed overdone. Did the export of the Badminton cabinet
really matter? The British do not like furniture and anyway it was pure
Florentine 18th century workmanship. As for Constable's 'The Lock', most of
the paintings in the series are safely in museums and it will be a good
advertisement for British art to see it hanging in Baron Thyssen's new
Madrid Gallery. And Turner's 'Folkestone'? - the Tate is hardly short on
Turners.
But on Wednesday Christie's announced it was selling off three undoubted
masterpieces which have nestled for centuries in private English
collections, works by Holbein, Rembrandt and Canaletto. With the total
purchasing grants of our nationally funded museums frozen for a decade at
Pounds 8.47m there is not the remotest chance that they can raise an
anticipated Pounds 15m-plus to buy the Holbein, Pounds 8m or more for the
Rembrandt, or even the Pounds 4m for the Canaletto. The National Heritage
Fund, with just Pounds 12m a year with which to safeguard everything from
threatened wetlands to literary archives, is not going to splash it all on
one painting.
So rich Germans are expected to sniff around the Holbein portrait of a young
girl who was probably a German living in London in the 1530s; the Americans
will fancy the Rembrandt, a tiny cabinet painting which passed with flying
colours the committee of experts which is re-attributing so many of the
artist's works to his followers; and the Canaletto, a view of Whitehall,
could even appeal to the Japanese, who like pictures that look like post
cards.
This sudden cashing in of their family heirlooms by the English aristocracy
has caused a crisis in the art establishment, making Neil MacGregor,
director of the National Gallery very cross, and, one imagines, Tim Renton,
Minister for the Arts, very worried.
MacGregor thinks that the Holbein belongs in the National Gallery. Rarely
does a painting of such national importance come on the market. In addition
it will appeal to the public. More to the point a Cholmondeley relative,
Philip Sassoon, was chairman of the Trustees of the NG for many years and
always assumed the Holbein would end up there. But the new Lord Cholmondeley
wants the largest possible sum of money for the picture, partly for family
reasons (as the only son he inherited everything in 1990 - Pounds 100m-plus
 -and wants to help out his sisters), partly to shore up his old houses at
Cholmondeley and Houghton.
Unlike the owners of the Canaletto and the Rembrandt, he made no attempt to
negotiate a private treaty sale with the National Gallery, which would have
produced less money but saved a considerable amount of tax. His advisers,
Christie's, itself facing a loss following the slump in the market for
Impressionist and Modern art, obviously also has an interest in an auction.
Neil MacGregor is upset at the precipitate announcement and at the speed
with which the painting is presumably being rushed abroad.
Tim Renton must be doubly worried, partly because the Government has for
years ducked the whole business of establishing stronger export controls,
and partly because his pet solution to the problem, the creation of a list
of national treasures which would not be allowed out of the UK, could well
have precipitated the current rush of masterpieces on to the market. He now
seems to be backtracking furiously.
The list rallied few supporters. Even the committee that produced the idea
did so unwillingly and naturally the salerooms and the dealers are opposed.
If he drops the list Renton will have to come up with an alternative. The
options are limited. It could be more money, either for museum purchasing
grants, or for the Heritage Fund. Or he could try to persuade the Chancellor
of the Exchequer to introduce tax advantages for donators of art works to
museums. Or he can wait for the national lottery to produce the cash to
solve the problem.
None of these approaches will be in place in time to save the Holbein. But
there is one escape clause for Mr Renton. He has floated the idea that a few
really exceptional works of art should be refused export licences. In effect
he would put the national interest before that of owners. The Holbein would
fall into that category. As an imaginative electioneering gesture the
Minister could, with one hand, conjure up some extra heritage cash to
sweeten Lord Cholmondeley, while decreeing with the other that the Holbein
would be refused an export licence.
Anyone going down to the Tate Gallery on Monday is in for a big surprise.
Virtually every painting and sculpture on show - has been replaced. The
third annual re-hang, paid for thanks to a Pounds 150,000 handout from BP,
is now complete.
It means that many famous works associated with the Tate - Rodin's 'The
Kiss', for example, and the celebrated run of Mark Rothkos - have
temporarily disappeared, but since the Gallery only has space to show around
15 per cent of its holdings, the replacements punch their weight.
There are Rossettis which have not been seen in public for over a decade and
Constables which have lingered in the vaults for even longer. Eric Gill's
formidable sculpture 'Mankind' is appearing at Millbank for the first time
in a generation. This year the British rather than the international side of
the Tate's collection is getting the boost, in particular the
Pre-Raphaelites, Gainsborough, and 20th century British sculptures.
The re-hangs have proved a resounding success. In three years they have
boosted attendances from 1.2m to over 1.8m in 1991. The idea has attracted
the interest of overseas museums, and galleries in Rotterdam and the
Pompidou in Paris are about to pursue frequent change arounds. They have
brought neglected artists to prominence - Spencer was the undoubted star of
the 1991 re-hang. This time Whistler, who is being pushed into the limelight
as a run-up to a major Whistler exhibition in 1994, is expected to draw the
critical applause. They have also helped remedy the ridiculous situation in
which only a tiny proportion of the Tate's collection of 5,500 works was on
view to the public. Already the re-hangs have aired 1,700 works.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8742</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: Sentimental in the sun
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS a touch of the Mike Tyson verdict in the audience reaction to
Caribbean poet Derek Walcott's play Viva Detroit at the Tricycle Theatre.
When a huge, muscular black man mechanically declares his affection for a
woman who is offering herself to him on a plate, on the first night there
was an audible hiss from the women's section. The protest was directed not
against the woman but against the man, who was arguably doing no more than
taking his cue and responding to the circumstances.
There is also more than a touch of Shirley Valentine. Sonny, the big black
man, seems unmistakeably drawn from the Greek boatman who takes the women
tourists as they come, tells the same spiel to them all, and prefers to stay
where he is.
The difference, such as it is, is that this is the Caribbean, not the
Aegean: St Lucia in the Windwards, to be precise. Yet before I put anyone
off, I should say that the production by the Black Theatre Cooperative,
directed by Malcolm Frederick, is excellent. There is a fine set with an
outdoor Caribbean bar in the foreground and a Caribbean sun in the
background. The performances by all three members of the cast are
impeccable.
The problem lies with the play. Walcott was born in St Lucia and is now a
professor at Boston University. On the evidence of Viva Detroit, he prefers
American sentimentality to old world scepticism. The theme of the piece is
the effect on the Caribbean islands of hotels and international tourism.
Some 30 years ago, before the coming of the jumbo jets, that might have
seemed prescient, and indeed tourism has brought all sorts of hazards,
notably drugs. Walcott's play, however, is stuck in the romantic past of
television soap. An American girl arrives in the island, falls for the local
gigolo and wants to take him to Detroit. When the affair fails to work out,
her closing line is: 'Happy hours, Sonny. I mean that.' A barman who wears a
wig, and admits to being part-Indian, looks on throughout, alternately
sympathising with the gigolo and the American.
There are some attempted jokes about the Club Med and the rising power of
the D-Mark. One joke that comes off is the barman's comment after an
exchange between the gigolo and the lady: 'Tourist one, native nought.' I
also liked the reference to the privatisation of the local volcano and
laughed again when the lady pulls a gun. 'I'm a third world country, babe,'
says the gigolo. 'Let's just cancel the debt.' The rest is thin.
Marlena Mackey has superb vitality as the American. Norman Beaton could
charm anyone as the versatile barman, and one feels for Steve Toussaint as
Sonny now that the fashion has turned against muscular masculinity. All
three of them deserve better material. Walcott is currently adapting The
Odyssey for the Royal Shakespeare Company: no doubt it will be a sentimental
journey.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X Photograph Norman Beaton, Steve Toussaint and Marlena Mackey
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8743</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Arts: Hedonism colours the mood - The work of Rothenstein
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM PACKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT 84, Michael Rothenstein has woken up to find himself not famous exactly,
but certainly a Grand Old Man of British Art. Fame, or at least distinction,
was never far away; his father was the painter, Sir William Rothenstein,
principal of the Royal College of Art between the wars; his brother, Sir
John, the first and often controversial post-War director of the Tate. In
short he was born into the highest of art and cultural circles and, in his
generation, was to be the artist of the family.
So he has gone on over the years, ever prolific, showing regularly, his
enthusiasm and commitment undimmed by self-doubt, his work direct and
honest. If it has not always been so successful in the outcome as he may
perhaps have supposed, his confidence has always carried the mark more of
enthusiastic innocence than arrogance. Two current exhibitions now allow us
to take his measure. At the Royal Academy is a retrospective of his Boxes,
the constructions and assemblages he has been making since the 1960s
(Piccadilly W1, until March 5), while Flowers East at Hackney (199 Richmond
Road E8, until March 15) is showing his latest paintings and woodcuts.
In considering the two shows together, it may seem surprising that the most
recent production, even at the age of 84, should be so much better than the
more self-conscious labour of several decades. But then he was ever an
exuberant colourist and natural expressionist - and a refined and sensitive
technician besides. He has only to forget himself in his work, allowing
technique to serve him intuitively, to produce images of remarkable beauty
and adventure.
Such things now fill Flowers East. The paintings comprise the more
substantial corpus, fat and succulent surfaces yet invested with images of
wonderful energy and vigour, the drawing firm and certain, the colour rich
and bright, the tone dark and warm, the mood overall one of hedonistic
indulgence and excitement. Rothenstein is eclectic to a fault, and here his
references range from Gauguin and the Douanier Rousseau to peasant art and
popular prints at their most decorative and lively. The point is only that
being unforced, such borrowings become entirely his own. His birds of
Paradise perch in his trees, his peacocks strut in his gardens, his cocks
crow to dawns of no imagination but his own. All is convincing, all carried
through with a wonderful natural confidence and elan, none more so than the
large colour wood-cuts, each a technical tour-de-force, each block and
surface cut and printed as fresh and free as any of the birds whose image it
might carry.
The boxes are more problematical, for while they manifest in so many
respects the same technical assurance and imaginative confidence, they
stumble at last over their own self-consciousness. Here is the artist making
art not about his own intuitive life and love of the world he lives in, but
rather about art itself. He has looked at his references and examples, as
before, but now with his mind and intellect rather than his heart. He
persuades himself that his commitment is real enough, and so it is, to the
idea, but yet the object remains forlorn, unresolved and often not a little
ludicrous.
This is not to say that the intellect has no part in art, that art should be
thus thoughtless and impulsive, but only that the thought alone is not
enough, nor even the half of it. Rothenstein in the 1960s was clearly
looking closely at the latest American work, most especially at early Johns,
Rauschenberg and Warhol. The ideas were interesting, the factuality of the
objects - the brush as brush, paint as paint, pot as pot - for a while
seductive. The loaded image lifted from magazine or newspaper seemed also to
have a charmingly ambiguous potential. And so Rothenstein made his versions
of car-crash pieces (Warhol), juxtaposed Rheims cathedral to a space rocket
(Rauschenberg), and stuck his quota of brushes and paints into their boxes
(Johns).
We can see and understand why he did it, yet for the most part it remains an
exercise, impersonal and unconvincing. The more portentous and insistent his
justification, the more unconvincing it is. But some things he cannot
resist, and when a cockerel unexpectedly pops out of a box, and the fun
starts, we do begin to think again.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X Picture 'Untitled', 1991, by Michael Rothenstein at Flowers
East (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8744</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Books: Resistance territory
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY VERRIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SECRET WAR: THE STORY OF SOE by Nigel West John Curtis/Hodder &amp; Stoughton
Pounds 20, 305 pages
AS THE Second World War recedes from view, disappearing into the dead ground
somewhere between 'contemporary' and 'modern' history, the number of writers
who understand the true political nature of the conflict is diminishing.
This is, to some extent, inevitable. Participants in what was, in reality,
an ideological war of far greater complexity than can be defined by citing
'fascism,' 'democracy' - or 'communism' - by rote are ageing. Relatively few
of these participants in an ideological conflict which, by Britain, was
fought largely by clandestine means, have now the inclination to tell us
what this war was like for them and the resistance movements in
enemy-occupied territories.
Some accounts of SOE (the Special Operations Executive) are being written by
those who do understand the underlying political realities. Histories
narrating heroism, tragedy and turpitude are in train concerning the Low
Countries, Italy, Greece and Yugoslavia. But some of these histories have
been long in the works. Press on, gentlemen, please] A generation is coming
to maturity to whom the Second World War in occupied Europe is little more
than ''Allo, 'Allo.'
In the meantime, one has to do with popular or populist accounts of the
shadow war. Although the work under review is not immune from factual errors
and does reflect the author's political prejudices, Secret War is important,
even necessary, in historical terms. The book raises, if unwittingly, the
central issue in an ideological war of unprecedented ferocity. The Second
World War brought resistance movements into being which possessed a singular
highest common factor, well-defined by a senior member of SOE who in no
sense could be called a man of the Left: 'These people (resistants) were not
necessarily, or even mainly, the people who had hoped things would go back
to being just what they had been when it began. They were risking their
lives for war aims of their own, which differed in many important respects
from ours.'
Precisely: what French resistants called a necessity for a national return
to moral, rather than political standards, defined as pure et dure was, in
Winston Churchill's eyes, and those of his few close associates, a
revolutionary demand. This demand, moreover, was not only inimical to men of
the Right, but possibly damaging to British interests.
It is just on this central issue that Mr West, devoting most of his text to
it, goes so sadly astray. He seems convinced not only that SOE was tasked to
'set Europe ablaze' by supporting resistance movements in sabotage
operations and the like, but was riddled with men of the Left - and beyond -
who were the conscious or innocent tools of a fiendishly cunning Soviet plan
to subvert first an occupied, then a liberated, Europe in the attainment of
Stalin's imperial objectives.
That the Soviet dictator had such objectives for Europe as a whole is
possible, although one should always be mindful of de Gaulle's 1944
appreciation that 'Stalin's ambitions are vast but finite.' But setting that
debate aside, it is simply not the case that SOE was either as described by
Mr West or was tasked to support revolutionary resistance. Impeccable
establishment figures like Fitzroy Maclean, Bill Deakin and Christopher
Woodhouse, to say nothing of many lesser but eminently reactionary types,
all of whom fought hard in the shadow war, have testified in writing to the
fact that SOE's support for resistance movements was entirely governed by
one basic criterion: were the movements in question an 'adjunct' to
Britain's wartime and post-war strategic and political objectives, or were
they, directly or otherwise, hostile to them? If the answer was construed as
'yes,' SOE was tasked to support movements: if 'no,' to lay off, or even
oppose them. The evidence for this policy is abundant - indeed, much of it
has been published.
There is another area in which Mr West goes astray. He seems convinced that
SOE, as a body, both formulated and executed policy for the direction of
clandestine war. It must be emphasised to any who seek understanding of how
Britain, an empire in decline, waged its last global war, that there was
only one arbiter: Winston Churchill. He could be overruled - notably by the
chiefs-of-staff - but where clandestine operations were concerned, above all
in their political context, he spoke and decided with an unambiguous,
authoritative voice.
That Eastern Europe was sacrificed to Stalin's ambitions - a fact on which
Mr West quite rightly dwells - reflected strategic realities, cold-bloodedly
appreciated by Churchill from 1940 onwards. SOE simply did not come into
this picture because, whatever the politics of its men and women in the
field, Eastern Europe was not an area in which it could operate effectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8745</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Books: The charms of Catch 22 - Fiction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS BEST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PETTIBONE'S LAW by John Keene Bloomsbury Pounds 8.99, 363 pages
BROTHERLY LOVE by Pete Dexter Harvill Pounds 14.99, 294 pages
DOUBLE-WOLF by Brian Castro Allen &amp; Unwin Pounds 8.95, 225 pages
HELLO DARLING, ARE YOU WORKING? by Rupert Everett Sinclair-Stevenson Pounds
13.95, 232 pages
YOU ENJOYED Catch 22? You'll love Pettibone's Law, a rip-roaring first novel
by John Keene. It does for Vietnam what Joseph Heller did for the Second
World War, and does it every bit as well. It is superb entertainment, a
wonderfully maniacal book of a kind which Americans always seem to manage
better than anyone else.
The plot is broadly similar to Catch 22. Smilin' Jack Rawlins is a fighter
pilot, posted reluctantly to Vietnam, who keeps his head down and gets
through his tour of duty as best he can, pausing only to drink as much as
possible and sleep with all the women he can find. He is surrounded by
lunatics - a pilot who sings Country and Western as he flies into the
attack, another who seeks out enemy fire because it will mean two more
points towards his Air Medal - and comforts himself with Pettibone's Law,
which states more or less that everybody is mentally deranged until they
have proved otherwise. In Vietnam, as in Heller's Italy, to believe anything
else is to court disaster.
Deranged on the ground, as well as in the air. The only sane people in
Vietnam are the Vietcong, who at least know what they are fighting for. On
the American side, they are fighting for a variety of reasons - one because
he has political aspirations at home, another because he pays no income tax
if he can spend a few hours in Vietnam each month, another because he wants
to erect a monument to himself in the form of an officers' mess built with
stones from a Buddhist temple, and erected by two Americans under the
command of a Vietcong prisoner. What none of them is fighting for is truth,
justice, the American way. None of them gives a damn about the American way.
It has been done before of course, but rarely so well. The author was
himself a fighter pilot in Vietnam, and has subsequently emerged unscathed
from a university writing programme. He writes from the heart, with such
verve and vigour that it seems a fair bet that he will never produce another
book as good. It comes as an original paperback, with a note from Joseph
Heller.
Pete Dexter's Brotherly Love is a story of the Philadelphia backstreets, a
battleground between Italian mafia and Irish union bosses. As a child, Peter
Flood sees his sister accidentally run over and killed by the
Mafia-controlled cop who lives next door. Peter's Irish father subsequently
chops the cop's head off (just as, in real life, the New York mafioso John
Gotti - who lost his son in identical circumstances - is alleged to have had
the guilty neighbour cut up with a chainsaw).
Peter's father is killed in turn and Peter is adopted by his uncle. He grows
up alongside his cousin, almost as a pair of brothers. The cousin becomes a
gangster, but Peter is made of sterner stuff. He seeks a better life,
distances himself from his criminal heritage. That he cannot escape his
background, and is ultimately trapped by it, forms the crux of the novel. It
is a neat little fable, though not as well judged as the author's previous
effort, Paris Trout.
Double-Wolf, by Brian Castro, is an ambitious reconstruction of one of
Freud's most famous cases, seen mostly through the eyes of the Wolf Man
himself, but paralleled also by the career of an Australian con man and
amateur psychoanalyst, who acts more or less as his double. It is a complex
idea, determinedly self-conscious and literary, and tells us, in the words
of the blurb, 'many important and disturbing things about the nature of our
culture and its roots'.
Last, and very definitely least, Hello Darling, are you working? is not so
much a first novel as an ego trip for the actor Rupert Everett, who is
putting pen to paper in the belief that everyone has a book in them
somewhere. The story, not altogether surprisingly, is about an actor just
like Rupert himself. There is even a picture of him in his vest on the
cover, in case his fans cannot make the connection.
What is really disturbing, though, is the suspicion that this witless
enterprise might have been intended as a TV series with the author in the
star role. If, God help us, that ever came about, it would be only poetic
justice if he was passed over for the lead in favour of a professional
author. The author might have to learn a bit of acting technique - how to
wiggle his eyebrows, how to move up stage without bumping into the furniture
 -but nothing that could not be picked up in the course of an afternoon.
Acting is easy, after all. Almost as easy as writing a novel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8746</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Books: A writer's gift for getting the picture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KEEPING A RENDEZVOUS by John Berger Granta Books Pounds 14.99, 248 pages
INTO THEIR LABOURS by John Berger Granta Books Pounds 15.99, 513 pages
AFTER A youthful career as a painter and art-teacher, John Berger emerged as
a significant writer when he was in his mid-twenties. He became known in the
early 1950s as an art-critic. Today having passed the age of 65, when people
in many professions are forced to retire, Berger is as industrious as ever,
his brain still teeming with ideas and insights.
Berger's gift for seeing into a picture, his skill in defining its relation
to society and to history, was apparent from the start. His arresting
descriptions of paintings in engage terms reached a wide public when, in the
early days of Monitor and Granada's cultural programmes, he became a guru of
art-appreciation on television. He was the first critic ruthlessly to sort
out the gold from the dross in the work of Picasso, about whom he published
a controversial book, The Success and Failure of Picasso, in 1965.
Not content with being merely a critical mediator between the artist and the
public, Berger also had ambitions in fiction. As novelist he applied himself
to that confusing period of European history when the Austro-Hungarian
Empire finally crumbled, culminating in the outbreak of the first world war.
Berger's hero was the son of an Italian merchant and his Anglo-American
mistress, a young man who lived for danger and for the seduction of women.
He was a modern Don Juan caught up in the rising tide of Serbian
nationalism, Italian Irredentism, and other forces of peasant aggression.
The novel straddled a Europe full of racial tension, with its climax set in
Trieste. It was wonderfully well visualised in terms of the historical
period.
This was the novel G which won the Booker Prize in 1972. It represented the
peak of Berger's literary achievement. And of his notoriety - he turned the
customary speech of acceptance at the dinner into a speech of rejection,
attacking his hosts for their exploitation of local labour in the sugar
plantations of the Caribbean, and announcing his intention of donating the
prize money to the Black Power movement. If the speech had been intended as
a crude publicity stunt which - to judge from the passionate intensity with
which it was delivered - it clearly was not, it could hardly have been
better timed. The speech did wonders for the book, and even more for the
Prize. It inaugurated a tradition of a verbal firework display at the end of
the dinner that in recent years has tended to lapse.
After that public performance Berger withdrew into obscurity to a village in
the French Alps where he still lives. He has made an extensive study in this
region of peasant life - 'a life' as he puts it, 'committed completely to
survival'. Berger lives there not as an observer, a literary researcher with
a tape-recorder and a note-pad, but as a member of this community. By now he
is as familiar with the messy business of slaughtering a cow and carving up
the meat, or shovelling the shit from the outhouse to a barrow in a nearby
field - an annual chore he describes with relish - as anyone brought up to
these tasks.
But he remains nonetheless a writer, one who since 1974 has produced three
novels, Pig Earth, Once in Europa and Lilac and Flag, aiming to trace the
journey of the European peasant from the mountains to the metropolis. This
trilogy, now appearing in one volume as Into Their Labours, is a remarkable
achievement of observation and unpatronising sympathy.
At the same time the journalism has not dried up. Keeping A Rendezvous is a
collection of pieces dating from the late 1980s onwards and happily full of
what Berger still does best of all. This is to stand in front of a work of
art and tell us exactly what he sees. He does it with Velazquez's 'Portrait
of Aesop', with Tintoretto's 'Woman With Bare Breasts', with the recumbent
nudes of Henry Moore, with a collection of black and white photographs of
the French countryside around Belfort, with a number of drawings on paper by
old masters and moderns. In all these instances what Berger sees goes far
beyond the ostensible boundaries of the picture. He is especially perceptive
in describing that curious 20th century French folly, an ideal palace built
out of tufa by Ferdinand Cheval, a village postman in the Department of the
Drome who died in 1924 but whose monument still lives.
One word of caution: Berger is not always the easiest of writers to read. He
puts his paragraphs together like a game of dominoes and he seems to have an
infinite number of double-blanks to place between each set of paragraphs.
The Berger blank is like the Pinter pause, a pregnant moment of silence
within the text. He over-uses it to the point where it has become an
irritating mannerism. Berger likes to develop his ideas through parallels
between different areas of experience, particularly between human and animal
life. Sometimes these are illuminating but sometimes they simply lead
nowhere. However, Berger at his best, as in the piece here on Jackson
Pollock, is a remarkably rewarding interpreter of visual experience.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8747</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Books: Hemingway sans teeth
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL GLOVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LESS THAN A TREASON: HEMINGWAY IN PARIS by Peter Griffin Oxford Pounds
14.95, 206 pages
THE FIRST part of Peter Griffin's threatened multi-volume biography of
Ernest Hemingway, Along with Youth, published in 1985 to critical plaudits
from the likes of Raymond Carver and Mario Vargas Losa, dragged us from
birth to the year of Hemingway's marriage to Hadley Richardson in 1921. It
encompassed such matters as his war-time exploits in Italy and the writing
of his first short story. This second volume is the tale of the Paris years,
1922-26, in which the author begins to take his art seriously, becomes
fanatically addicted to Spain and bullfighting, and falls out of love with
the hapless Hadley.
Hemingway's prose style has been mimicked by many lesser writers, and the
results are almost always the same: naivety and artlessness. Unfortunately,
Peter Griffin has decided that the best way of making his own mark as a
biographer of Hemingway - and it is a difficult field to enter given the
plethora of biographies that are already in print - is to do as Hemingway
did. He even declares as much in his epilogue, where he speaks of A Moveable
Feast (Hemingway's fictionalised memoir of the same period, published in
1964) as offering 'the biographer a chance to give his story of Ernest's
life the texture of Ernest's fiction'.
What we are therefore offered is a brief, fictionalised reconstruction of
the man and his milieu; an unadorned narrative with the minimum of fuss.
Unfortunately, the minimum of fuss does not necessarily make for the maximum
of impact.
In January 1926 Hemingway set sail on the Mauretania for New York, prepared
to do battle with two enemies: the publisher of his first collection of
stories and the man responsible for depleting his wife's capital. The first
paragraph of the opening chapter contains the following sentence: 'When the
ship started to move, Ernest did not look out the window of the sitting
room.' This, in a the failure of Griffin's biographical method for three
reasons. The statement overwhelms by its dullness; it cannot possibly be
proved one way or the other; it fails to animate the narrative. This trick
of presentation - to treat Hemingway and his circle as if they were hand
puppets to be manipulated in such a way as to suggest that they are
characters in a work of fiction - is the height of absurdity. The tableaux
prove lifeless, the details wooden. Each one remains a ghostly, impalpable
presence - and Hemingway is the most impalpable of all. We recognise this
fact when Peter Griffin quotes Hemingway's actual words. This gritty,
pugnacious statement jumps out at us from amidst all the bland
fictionalising on page 122, for example: 'the diseased oyster shits the
finest pearl, as the palmist says'. That is the true spirit of Hemingway.
Instead, we have to make do with such statements as this: 'the cathedral
looks a sheer cliff, with spires domed like churches in the pagan East'. The
speaker is standing in the Place Ste. Sulpice when he makes this statement,
staring at - what? The sentence would suggest that it might be the Cathedral
of Notre Dame - but the cathedral is not visible from that square. A second
possibility might be the Eglise Sainte Sulpice, the great 18th-century
church which dominates the square. But a church, no matter how pompous, is
not a cathedral; and this one has twin towers, not spires. And as for doming
anything with a spire . . .
At the end of this stream of seemingly endless, tasteless hors d'oeuvre, we
long to chew on the meat of Carlos Baker. When Griffin has learnt to write
biography, I would suggest he spends a month or two in Paris in order to
establish whether, amongst other things, Montmartre is on the left or on the
right bank of the Seine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8748</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Books: Running riot through history
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AC GRAYLING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEMANDING THE IMPOSSIBLE: A HISTORY OF ANARCHISM by Peter Marshall
HarperCollins Pounds 25, 767 pages
IMAGINE the day when advance copies of a volume nearly 800 pages long, its
cover handsomely illustrated and its price clearly marked, is delivered to
its author fresh off the presses. As he delightedly riffles its pages and
dreams of splendid reviews, he forgets the laborious process which has
brought this dawn. In particular, he forgets those parts of the process
which rest on a fabric of civil laws.
His contract with his publisher was honoured, and if it had not been it
could have been enforced - in court if necessary. The same contractual
discipline kept together a whole army of printers and delivery firms and
paper-makers and bookbinders and designers and ink-manufacturers and the
entire complex which comes together in transforming an author's ideas into
neatly bound pages. Indeed. the author may dream not just of splendid
reviews but of royalties: and if these are not paid he will know what to do.
But the author will forget all this only because society, in general, works
so smoothly within its constitutional framework. This triumphant achievement
of civilised democracy, in giving, through a system of laws, peace and
assurance to most people in the conduct of most of their lives, is forgotten
by the author, as by most of us, because of the very success of its
operation.
The author in this case is Peter Marshall, and he has written a book about
anarchism, apparently without recognising the inconsistency between what his
book advocates and the system which ensured its production. If the anarchy
which Marshall advocates were to prevail, what would have protected the
passage of his book, in the absence of enforceable agreements, from the
inside of his head to the bookshop shelf? Marshall would reply: the general
good-heartedness which prevails in true anarchies. On this profoundly
plausible thesis, more below.
Marshall claims that his book is a critical history of anarchist theory,
which implies that he sets out to give an impartial assessment both of the
arguments in its favour and its achievements. But in fact the book is a
sustained polemic on behalf of anarchism, which Marshall presents not by
argument but by transcribing an endless number of encyclopaedia articles on
any person or group of people in history who found a law irksome or who
argued for greater individual liberty.
It therefore turns out, according to Marshall, that everyone from the
Taoists of ancient China to Mrs Thatcher are really would-be anarchists or
their close relatives, libertarians; from which we are further somehow to
conclude that anarchism must be right.
Only the opening pages, and a few near the end, touch on the theoretical
case for anarchism. Most of the rest of the book is devoted to giving a few
pages each to a vast array of persons and historical periods. John Stuart
Mill gets two pages, Oscar Wilde five, the Marquis de Sade six, half a dozen
pages gives us the history of Italian anarchism; and so on. Major figures
like Godwin and Bakunin get whole chapters each, but three quarters of the
book consists of vignettes, whose brevity makes for superficiality and
unacceptable generalisation.
Anarchism, on Marshall's definition, is a rejection of the state, conceived
as a body which exists to maintain a compulsory legal order.
In its place anarchists wish to see society constituted by a 'sum of
voluntary associations' unconstrained and unregulated by anything beyond
goodwill between individuals.
The central weakness in anarchism, thus characterised, is notorious, and
Marshall signally fails to address it. It is this: individuals are to some
degree self-interested, and not all self-interest is indefensible or
irrational. The same applies to groups, such as families or tribes.
Sympathies are limited, and so are resources; competition between
individuals and groups is therefore inevitable.  Competition can, and often
does, lead to conflict.
Therefore unless there are rules, enforceable and carrying sanctions, to
ensure the regulation of competition and a just resolution of conflicts
should they arise, the outcome will be that the strong will trample the weak
and injustice will be general.
The anarchists' belief that people can live in unregulated mutual harmony is
touching but naive. To this inadequate moral psychology they add
generalisations about 'freedom', failing to see that the freedoms worth
having require protection because of their vulnerability, and that it is
precisely in pursuit of genuine liberties that humans congregate into civil
society and agree laws.
The anarchist's mistake is to think that because tyranny is hateful the
state should be abolished. A more rational idea is to abolish not the state
but tyranny, by making the state fairer and freer, thus protecting its
members from the depredations of the greedy and the vile, who are too
numerous among us to make anarchism even a remotely serious option.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8749</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Food: A taste of Ireland in Mayfair - Two Emerald Isle gems
in London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOT SO many years ago London could boast among the many oddities of the
capital, an excellent Irish restaurant in Minogues, named after one of its
proprietors, Ethel Minogue, who renounced an academic career in favour of
cookery. The success of the tiny Islington restaurant was so great that
Ethel and her partners decided to acquire a local pub and christen it
Minogues Bar.
Irish food was served in the pub and that too became an overnight success.
Sadly, however, disputes among the owners led to the closure of the
restaurant and ultimately to pub's sale to an Irish chain. Fortunately, the
company had the vision to retain Ethel's services as a consultant and
Minogues bar still serves good Irish food to anyone who can put up with the
pub's other speciality: heavily over-amplified folk music.
In their heyday, the two Minogues establishments were breaking new ground. I
recall taking an Irish friend to the restaurant and him exclaiming: 'Is
there nowhere like this in Dublin?'
I have travelled as far afield as the Dingle Peninsula to find such an
authentic Irish dish of boiled bacon and cabbage.
There is good news, however, for those who regret the passing of Minogues.
Since June 1991 there has been a new London Irish restaurant in Mulligans of
Mayfair.
Taking full advantage of its Cork Street location to lure in lingering art
dealers; Mulligans combines an upstairs pub with a downstairs restaurant.
The chef, Richard Corrigan, describes himself of the non-romantic school
which treats the Irish culinary vocabulary with realism: after all, bacon
and cabbage might be considered a little infra dig in Mayfair.
If the Irish peasant tradition is to be used it has to be used inventively.
First courses include some Irish standbys in Rossmore oysters from Cork Bay
and Ballycotton smoked salmon.
Some Crubbeens (pigs' trotters) had been pickled and deep fried; an idea
which should make them more acceptable to the squeamish general public.
Slices of black pudding had also been deep fried. His black pudding has
earned him a considerable reputation and Irish chefs are not beyond
attempting to steal his recipes.
Mulligans' menu changes daily. This is particularly useful when it comes to
fish, as the chef can choose from the best the market has to offer. On the
night I was in there was John Dory (grilled), lemon sole (poached), haddock
(smoked), and Irish salmon (roast).
At this time of the year game is a big thing with wood pigeon and pheasant
on offer. Among the more rustic dishes there was caramelised calves' liver
with cabbage and boxty (potato cakes) and corned beef and ox tongue. Irish
stew came with big pieces of lean meat rather than the usual scrag end or
neck; a casserole of beef, Guinness and oysters came with the oysters
quickly poached in the stock. Colcannon (a sort of Irish bubble-and-squeak)
is served as a side dish.
Another flexible feature of the menu is the Irish cheeses. The current
revival of cheese making in Ireland makes it easy for Corrigan to serve an
all Irish cheeseboard with some of the present stars such as Milleens,
Cashel Blue and St Killian. It also allows him to make room for some new
cheeses like the Ardrahan from Nanturk I tried that evening.
Irish puddings tend to be wholesome and filling; these are no exception:
treacle tart and clotted cream; rice pudding with homemade jam; lemon tart
and fruit compotes. Suitably robust was the soda bread and butter pudding;
very buttery with raisins few and far between.
With the pub upstairs you may drink beer or stout with your meal and there
is a full range of whiskeys from Irish distillers. One feature of the
wine-list which will appeal to the sentimental Hibernian, is a selection of
Irish wines from Bordeaux; those chateaux created by emigre Irish traders in
the 18th century and which still bear the names of their first owners:
Lynch, Boyd, MacCarthy, Kirwan and Barton.
Mulligans of Mayfair, 13-14 Cork Street, London W1.
Tel: 071-409-1370. Restaurant open Mon to Fri 12-2pm and 6.15pm to 11pm.
Sunday brunch from 12 noon.
Minogues Bar and Grill, 80 Liverpool Road, London N1.
Tel: 071-354-4440.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8750</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Gardening: Scotland's green Heaven
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NIGHT after night, artificially-keen weathermen have been telling us that it
will be warmer and wetter in the north. Down here in the south, frosts have
been sharper than we thought at first, and not every good plant has come
through unscathed. But what, I had been wondering, was the state of gardens
north of the border? To find out, I have been on a northern mission, not
expecting tropical forests but unsure whether snowdrops, for instance, would
yet be in flower.
I had intended this report to be controlled rigorously: aconites in
Motherwell, the first sign of bluebells in Dundee. It has gone off the
straight and narrow because I have been seduced. It might be the air or the
bottled water but, whenever I go to the Royal Botanic Gardens in Edinburgh,
I lose my wits. I walk round in aimless circles for hours, like a spaniel
let out from a hot car.
Leave Kew to run its admission charges: in Edinburgh, entrance is still
free. It will soon be cheaper to take a coach pass up there to see what are
far-better gardens, anyway.
Signs of quality confront you immediately. Up the tarmac path to the main
entrance, there are two new beds of pernettyas, showing those dusky pink and
white berries which develop so prettily on lime-free soil. Inside, the light
falls magically on the pure white trunks of the eastern birches. Winter is
an excellent guide: its highlights are fewer and so it sets its own trail,
leading you from one to the next.
I could dwell on the many types of snowdrop, with names like Mighty Atom, in
bloom on Britain's finest rock garden. Pink and white flowers have declared
that the rhododendron season is open, not only on the mauve-pink praecox but
on the superior mucronolatum.
Below the new greenhouses, dozens of single pink flowers are already open on
a fine camellia called Bow Bells. Inside, there are clouds of pale-yellow
mimosa and some huge violet-blue flowers on the tibouchina, that lovely
Brazilian plant for a conservatory. The show of the month is called the Rain
Forest Experience, in which a thatched straw hut asks visitors to try to
forget they are under glass in Scotland. Prince Charles has written a letter
of support, but Rain Foresters will have to forgive me: the Alpine
Experience is very much better.
Beyond the Tropical Rock glasshouse, you can find a magical corner. Perhaps,
this weekend, there is a better one somewhere in an unknown garden but I
think I refuse to believe it. In my local botanic garden in Oxford, I have
been smiling contentedly at one good witch hazel and its gold-yellow
flowers. We are growing old together, but only one of us is improving with
age.
In Edinburgh, there is not one but a whole hamamelis corner, ranging from
the pale-yellow pallida to the dusky flavopurpurascens, which I have never
seen anywhere else. Their companions are as charming as their scent: half a
dozen varieties of winter-flowering viburnum in full beauty all over their
bare stems.
I have already decided on a swathe of viburnums under trees beside my house.
In Edinburgh, the sweetest form was unexpected to me: not Farreri or Dawn
but Charles Lamont. Naturally, it would not have been unexpected to Arthur
Hellyer, who has been writing about the forgotten importance of the Lamont
blood-line and the value of this variety. Naturally, too, he is right. The
Charles branch of the Lamont family is a generous performer with an aversion
to shady corners. He covers himself in the sweetest pink-white flowers.
Below the nearby wall, there are clumps of the palest Algerian iris, the
form called Walter Butt. A few yards away, there is another world in the
gardens' famous Alpine House. The mood changes with the season, but this
weekend it takes you to far finer worlds than a steamy rain forest. There
are pans of exceptional crocus, the big lilac-blue veluchensis and the
exquisite corsicus, the flowers of which are feathered with yellow and dark
streaks of a pale lavender.
Sub-species of wild cyclamen proliferate, from pink and white to rare
Turkish varieties. Special forms of corydalis are out in force; one of the
dionysias is covered with pale mauve flowers; you forget that it is still
winter as the entire corner around you seems to have jumped into spring.
Its leap has been helped by the usual scattering of plants which I have
never seen anywhere in the past 30 years. If you think that aconites are all
yellow, go and look at a rare Japanese variety, flowering its grey-lavender
head off in a pan in Edinburgh. Best of all, admire the small narcissi,
where the brightest is a lemon-yellow form in the Hooped Petticoat class
called Jenny Jane. The prettiest use for a cold greenhouse is to fill it
with alpine plants and bulbs which need no heating: Edinburgh will show you
how to do it.
For me, it is simply a visit to Heaven. The Edinburgh gardens could bemuse
you for half a lifetime, not least because there is one thing which the rest
of us have in plenty but, somehow, they seem to exclude. That something is
weeds - but it is hard to catch sight of any lying undisturbed among this
extraordinary collection of every sort of plant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8751</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Gardening: Plant of the week - Brunfelsia pauciflora
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This small evergreen shrub from Brazil is difficult to find in nurseries but
sometimes turns up in the house plant section of garden centres. It has
blue-purple flowers rather like those of the big periwinkle and they come
more or less continuously from winter until summer. Not a great many are
produced at any one time, which possibly is why botanists call it
'pauciflora', which means 'with few flowers,' but its long season and its
good foliage make ample amends for this lack of a big display.
This is an easy-going plant which will grow in any good peat or soil compost
in large pots, tubs, or a bed of soil and with a minimum temperature of 13`C
(55`F) if winter flowers are required. The plant will survive so long as it
does not freeze. It used to be called Brunfelsia calycina and may still be
found under this name.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8752</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Wine: Bordeaux faces a difficult time - A look into the vats
that hold the 1991 vintage
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDMUND PENNING-ROWSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BEHIND closed doors, the chateau owners of Bordeaux and their senior staff
are making up the assemblage: the blend from the best vats of wine from the
three or four grape varieties in their vineyards. In a month or so, they
will present the grand vins 1991, which will bear the chateau labels.
These days, up to 200 of the better-known properties also will be assembling
a second-wine blend. This year, though, there are special problems because
of last April's late frost and heavy September rain. Production has had to
be reduced heavily, particularly the generic bordeaux rouge and blanc,
Entre-Deux-Mers, Medoc and Graves, as well as St Emilion and Pomerol beyond
the Dordogne. Bourg and Blaye were spared largely because they sit on the
Gironde right bank which was affected less.
In the Medoc, the vineyards near the river came off best. At Latour, the
main vineyard has produced 40-50 per cent of its normal crop; inland,
however, the vines for its second wine, Les Forts de Latour, suffered badly.
Next-door Pichon-Lalande has only 20 per cent of its normal crop while
Ducru-Beaucaillou and Grand-Puy-Lacoste produced only a third of the
average. Palmer has estimated a similar proportion. Yet, St-Estephe Montrose
and Meyney, on the hillside overlooking the Gironde, were not touched at
all, although Cos d'Estournel behind was struck severely. In the Graves the
output also was very small, and one classed-growth owner expects to produce
no grand vin.
The vintage is not to be dismissed, though. The enforced small yields could
lead to higher quality. At a very prominent Medoc chateau recently, the
just-assembled '91 grand vin (not yet in cask) had a deep colour, fine nose
and full, fruity flavour. I agreed with the regisseur that it was better
than the excellent '90, tasted at the same time.
Moreover, a new report by Vintex, the British-run Bordeaux merchants, states
that 'any first-generation bunches that survived the frost produced a
well-built, dark-coloured Merlot-dominated wine, quite similar in style to
1985 or even better . . . In the Medoc the general reaction is of
satisfaction and relative surprise at the colour, body and flesh of the
Merlots, which compensate the weaker, less ripe Cabernets.' But those made
from the second-flower grapes were 'extremely variable'.
Should there, then, be en primeur offers of '91 clarets from April onwards?
Those chateaux that made a reasonable quantity of good wines obviously would
like this, and they will be essential for the cash-short small growers. But,
influenced no doubt by the poor results in St Emilion and Pomerol, Christian
Moueix of Petrus, an owner or merchant of other right-bank properties, is
against offering still-doubtful wines that have only had a few months in
cask. 'Wait until they are in bottle and their quality can be seen,' is his
view. Yet, those with limited cellar storage might face problems in
accommodating an additional unsold vintage.
The Bordeaux trade, starved of cash flow since the '90s were offered last
year, certainly would like an en primeur offer as well. But would they find
immediate buyers? In the recession-hit UK and US, this is unlikely on any
scale and, even after three good vintages, at least doubtful within France,
Switzerland, Germany and Belgium.
Bordeaux is going through a difficult time. Two small merchants went
bankrupt and one large, old-established merchant house is said to be in
distress. Several important chateaux are on the market, including
Gruaud-Larose and Talbot. Cordier, Talbot's owner, has been trying to sell
these properties in a package together with others in and outside the
Gironde. Rausan-Segla, owned by a trust belonging to George Walker, formerly
of Brent Walker, is reported to be for sale at between FFr40m-50m.
On top of this, there is a two-way traffic across the Atlantic in fine
Bordeaux wines, including the return in a single consignment from a leading
American importer of no fewer than 40 containers of 1,200 cases apiece.
The position will be clarified in April when the Union des Grands Crus holds
its annual series of tastings of the new red and white wines, at which their
quality can be assessed.
In a difficult year, British merchants would like to make an opening offer -
but only very attractive prices could provide an excuse. While the '88s sold
as 'classic,' the '89s as 'outstanding' and the '90s as 'rich, more
regular,' it is difficult to think of any reason why their customers should
invest in '91s in the near future.
Christian Moueix could be right. After all, in-bottle is how we used to buy
even the best vintages before the investment-in-wine boom started over 20
years ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8753</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Food: Come in for a ceili - Kieran Cooke recounts his
experiences up a boreen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KIERAN COOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Ceili House cafe and restaurant is not one of the world's busiest. Far
from it. In two of the winter months last year, it only had three customers.
But this is no reflection on the culinary skills of its owners, Willie and
Jutta Kirrkamm. Rather, it is a matter of location.
The Ceili is on a wild hillside, up a boreen - a small road - at Killadoon,
on the coast of County Mayo in the west of Ireland. Willie and Jutta could
have made life marginally more difficult for themselves by opening a
takeaway on an iceberg or an oyster bar in the middle of the Sahara. 'The
locals thought we were nuts when we started a cafe here a few years ago.
Sometimes, we think they were right,' she says.
To some, Jutta and Willie might appear slightly eccentric. Jutta is German
with a distinct overlay of Irish. Willie was born in Germany of Irish
parentage. Apart from the odd guttural, you would swear he was as Irish as
the bog outside.
The easiest way to the Ceili House would be to board a London/New York
flight and, after about an hour, ask the pilot to drop you into the
Atlantic, to be picked up by Willie in his boat. A more pedestrian route
would be a flight to Knock, Mayo's international airport. You then drive two
hours west, taking as a reference point the top of the Empire State building
(distinctly visible from Ireland on a clear day). Just when you think you
are going to encounter US immigration officials, you will see signs for the
Ceili.
Inside, you will sit next to a blazing fire or warm your toes beside the
Modern Mistress - a Heath Robinson version of the Aga and a miracle of
Victorian design. As the Ceili has no licence, you will then take a bottle
of 1955 (wrapped carefully in your underwear) from your overnight bag,
settle back and examine the menu.
It might be fun to start with lamb dolmades or, in preparation for your
onward journey to the Americas, some blinis. Or, perhaps, the
locally-gathered wild oysters. The cock-a-leekie soup is recommended
heartily, an excellent antidote to the Atlantic chill.
Then you can move effortlessly, and rather dreamily, on to the Pheasant
Foggy Dew or the Venison Chieftain or perhaps the Salmon and Silver Hake
Granuaille. Granuaille (pronounced Gran-ya-wail-ah) was once the queen of
the pirates in these parts: old men will tell you of a mighty slanging match
between her and Elizabeth I. 'Sure, didn't I hear it myself?' they will say.
Jutta and Willie are both gifted musicians and you suspect it would not take
too much encouragement to have them spring into action. They have other
interests. Both are involved in local environmental issues. She runs a craft
shop. He worked for years as a cook on the Irish fishing boats but has now
set up a homeopathy practice in the area.
On the cooking side, he does the main dishes, she the starters and
side-splitting desserts. Home-made halva served with 'tipsy figs' is as good
a way to end as any. All food is produced organically.
The Ceili started life as a cafe. Then, tourists visiting the nearby beaches
 -some of the finest stretches of white sand in Europe and the setting of
the famous horse race sequence in The Quiet Man film - hankered after more
substantial fare. Jutta and Willie now do lunches and dinners year-round.
They realise that they are just a little off the beaten track.
'Some people are afraid to come up the boreen for fear they would never see
the real world again,' he says. One winter's night, an English honeymoon
couple knocked on the door. 'They didn't seem to know whether they were in
Dublin or Galway but they seemed to enjoy being lost.' Other visitors are
more difficult. An American couple arrived, took considerable time examining
the menu and then ordered one tea - with two cups.
'We really don't mind as long as people come and see what we have to offer,'
says Jutta. 'One time, we had eight people for dinner and there was a power
cut. We had only one torch. We'd be struggling to cook on the gas and
someone would want it to go to the toilet outside. It took hours to get the
meal ready. But, afterwards, people sent us letters saying, 'Thanks for the
black-out.'
You can go to the Ceili (Gaelic for a song and dance) in summer and, if the
mists have not closed in, sample as spectacular view as you will find
anywhere. Or, in winter you can feel the warmth of the fire and stare into
the pitch blackness outside as you let the cock-a-leekie warm your insides.
Either way, one of life's enduring experiences.
The Ceili House cafe and restaurant, Killadoon, County Mayo, Ireland. Tel:
098-68656.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8754</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Gardening: Fisons' peat bogs gift
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FISONS has donated all its freehold peatland in England to English Nature,
which will become responsible for its proper use ecologically.
The gift includes key sites such as Thorne Moor, Crowle Moor and Hatfield in
Yorkshire and South Humberside, all of which have planning consent for peat
extraction, and Wedholm Flow and Glasson Moss, in Cumbria, which do not yet
have such consent. Further commercial use of any of these peat bogs will be
by agreement with English Nature. Part of that agreement is that 2,800 acres
of peatland has been identified for immediate protection as nature reserves.
This is the largest single donation of peatland for conservation yet made.
All Fisons peatland in the Somerset level is included. The company is
carrying out research to discover the best method of managing peatland in
whatever state it is found; pristine, partly-extracted or at the end of its
commercial use.
In those areas to be managed for conservation, Fisons will initiate, under
English Nature supervision, the blocking of drains, and other measures to
ensure the retention of moisture in nature reserve areas.
English Nature is a government agency set up in an attempt to limit the
damage done to ecologicially-valuable sites. It has no statutory powers to
enforce restrictions; it used to be part of the Nature Conservancy Council
(NCC) which, among other activities, was responsible for designating Sites
of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI). The NCC has been split into national
sections and English Nature deals with these matters in England.
Within 24 hours of signing the agreement with Fisons, English Nature's
employees were in the peat bogs blocking drains to prevent the loss of
water, the life-blood of mires.
Dr Derek Langslow, chief executive of English Nature, says the agreement
immediately lifts the threat of any development from the areas, most of
which have planning permission for peat extraction. They will be managed for
the nature conservancy interest.
The operation intends to ensure that there will be no loss of irreplaceable
sites and that rare plants and animals will not be destroyed, while enabling
Fisons to go on extracting sufficient peat for horticultural requirements.
Where peat has been removed and the operation has ended, land will be
restored to make it ecologically useful.
There are many different types of peat. For example, it is not widely known
that a lot of the peat worked commercially is not from actively regenerating
wetland bog but is from secondary bog resulting from drainage, in some cases
carried out hundreds of years ago.
This has its own special flora and fauna, depending on the environment it
provides, and research must take account of what best to do with used or
partly used peatland, as well as how best to preserve the pristine bogs
which are the conservationists' pride and joy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8755</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Bill for poll tax defaulters
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I RECALL that, in answer to a question about whether people were legally
required to pay the amounts added to the poll tax to cover defaulters, you
said that they were. I have been asking my local authority since last August
if it would quote the legal/statutory provision by which I am required to
pay, but it has yet to quote exactly the relevant provision. Just how does
this law deal with the subject of making good defaulters' bills?
There is no specific provision relating to defaulters' liability being
brought into account as such. The local authority has to raise revenue to
meet its expenditure, and the budgeted expenditure has to include
outstanding liabilities. If the current, or previous, year's revenue has
fallen short because of failure of some chargepayers (or ratepayers) to meet
their obligations, the next demand for community charge (poll tax) needs to
be sufficiently large to recoup that shortfall. In the same way, income tax
payers would find themselves paying for those who successfully evade income
tax.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8756</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Tax puzzle for pensioner
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I SHALL soon have to make a tax return for my 89-year-old mother, who moved
to an old people's home early in 1991. While her flat was being sold, my
mother received the full entitlement of Pounds 171.40 income support and old
age pension as she had no other income apart from Pounds 2,000 in her
building society.
At the beginning of 1991 we arranged for her building society to pay
interest gross. Last October the sale of her property went through and the
proceeds went into a gross monthly income account. At this time income
support ceased. Is my mother liable for tax on the income support she
received, plus her pension and building society interest?
Income support is exempt from tax, by virtue of section 617(2)(a) of the
Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988. (There is a limited exception to that
rule, in section 151 of the Act, but that does not apply to your mother.)
Your mother will be exempt from tax for 1991/92 provided that her pension
and building society interest do not exceed Pounds 4,180.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8757</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Dividend evidence
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IF A non-taxpayer buys an ordinary share holding before the stock goes
ex-dividend, but not in time to get registered at the company's registers,
the dividend has to be claimed from the seller via one's stockbroker.
However, there is no tax certificate to send to the Inland Revenue. What
evidence does the Inland Revenue require in order for the tax credit to be
reclaimed by the non-taxpayer?
There is no problem: the stockbroker will provide a tax voucher, showing the
day on which you bought the shares cum div and giving details of the
dividend collected from the seller.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8758</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: A loan for a struggling son
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY SON recently qualified as a medical practitioner. Like many students he
ran up bank debts while studying, and is still struggling to meet them.
His grandmother wishes to help by paying off these debts and replacing them
with a family loan, to be repaid at a low rate of interest. How would the
tax office view such an arrangement? Is there a better way of helping him?
The sum in question is Pounds 4,000.
Your mother (or mother-in-law) will be assessable on the interest, subject
to the oddities of the preceding-year basis if the loan lasts for more than
about four years. Your son will get no tax relief for the interest. The
terms of the loan (including the fact that it is repayable on demand) should
be set out in a letter in duplicate, one copy of which your son should sign
and return to his grandmother for safe keeping with her personal papers (so
her executors will be aware of the loan if it is still outstanding at the
time of her death). She may wish to have a formal loan agreement drawn up by
her solicitor.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8759</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Sisters who aim to collar a mail
market in shirts - Two women who work successfully from home
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK GARNETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SO YOU want to work from home? Perhaps you have young children to watch
over? You do not want to slave away over a 50-hour week, but you do want a
business that makes money.
Back in 1986, Lexi Douglas and Henrietta Nettlefold embarked on a route that
an increasing number of budding entrepreneurs are now taking in the hope of
having their cake and eating it. The mail order business in women's shirts
run by the two sisters now has a turnover of more than Pounds 300,000 and is
making a healthy return on turnover of just over 19 per cent.
Last year, the pair also bought the small, family-owned garment-maker in
Folkestone, Kent, which supplies all the shirts for their company,
Sparklers, as well as a range of other clothing on contract. It cost them
between Pounds 5,000 and Pounds 10,000 but has yearly sales of Pounds
120,000 on which it makes a return of more than 10 per cent.
'We love the business, even if it can be nerve-wracking at times,' says
Douglas. 'It's nice when we have a new brochure out, the telephone is
ringing, the mail is coming in and people are buying shirts in the fabrics
we chose. Of course, when you have between you six children, two ponies,
chickens and dogs, who needs a factory? But we are absolutely glad that we
bought it.'
Both women recognise that the injection of household income from spouses
removes much of the pressure when new businesses are started. Douglas is
married to opera singer Nigel Douglas, and Nettlefold to an investment
banker.
Starting with capital of just Pounds 3,000, the sisters looked first for
fabric suppliers. They used information supplied by the Cotton Institute and
attended suppliers' fairs, including Fabrex at London's Olympia. For the
first two years they bought just British fabrics, but now more than half
comes from abroad, mainly Austria, France and Germany. 'Small British mills
tend to be very traditional with their patterns,' says Nettlefold. 'There is
not enough variation in fabrics from them and some are prone to delays with
deliveries.'
In its first year, Sparklers, using the Folkestone garment-maker to supply
shirts in designs provided mainly by the two women, managed a turnover of
Pounds 48,500 on which it made a pre-tax return of Pounds 12,000. Its sales
last year were Pounds 320,000, although with a fall in return. The mailing
list has grown to 30,000 through word of mouth, advertising in the national
press and Good Housekeeping magazine (every month), charity sales and stands
at sporting events.
Sparklers' sales pitch is that it sells shirts designed for women but in
best-quality men's shirting material rather than the usual non-breathing,
synthetic fabric offered by most women's blouse-makers. The company uses
two-fold cotton at Pounds 4 a metre rather than Pounds 1.50 for cheaper
material, and mixes of cotton and wool. Most of the shirts, in five basic
patterns with nine fabrics, retail at between Pounds 31 and Pounds 36.
The business is run from the Douglas's seven-bedroom, 18th-century home near
Dover and from Nettlefold's house in London. Other than the tiny garment
'factory' - which is a separate company - they have no business premises.
The only staff member is a woman who works in the Douglas house despatching
order forms and shirts. 'I would say we work on average about three and a
half days a week,' says Douglas.
Selling about 10,000 shirts a year, Sparklers produces a new brochure, with
fabric swatches, twice a year for winter and summer and changes most of the
fabrics every 12 months. Each brochure costs about 45p to produce and 18,000
or so are mailed every six months. The biggest headache has been financing
fabric purchases and manufacturing costs. This can involve a layout twice a
year of about Pounds 30,000 for the fabrics alone, although suppliers give
60 days credit.
It takes just over eight weeks from fabric delivery to producing enough
shirts for mail orders to be taken. One shirt usually requires about two
metres of material. 'It is worrying when you've got Pounds 50,000 worth of
shirts on your hands and you are wondering if anyone is going to buy them,'
Douglas says. 'We make about 2,500 shirts prior to mailing - and that is
before we have a clear impression of which colours and styles are really
going to sell.'
This pressure is compounded by Sparklers' policy of despatching shirts to
customers the day it receives an order.
Most of the company's profits have been ploughed back, says Douglas, so its
healthy bank balance now covers the cost of laying-in fabric. It has also
coped with the odd howler. 'I have to say that we have had some amazingly
unsuccessful shirts, some real lulus,' she admits.
Telephone sales account for a fifth of turnover, as do sales at charity
functions - Sparklers pays a table fee and 10 to 15 per cent of its takings
during the day to that charity.
From her home, Douglas despatches up to 100 shirts a day, taken in bundles
to the local village post office. Costs are covered by a Pounds 1 post and
packaging fee.
Each of the women takes out between Pounds 10,000 and Pounds 15,000 in
salaries. But the recession has reduced growth to a standstill and lowered
the 'conversion rate' of sales from mail shots from an exceptionally
bounteous 21 per cent to 13 per cent - although that still is good.
The 2,500 sq ft factory the sisters bought last year had been teetering on
the edge of closure. The previous owner is now its manager, overseeing six
machinists earning between Pounds 3 and Pounds 4 an hour and 10 out-workers.
The sisters seem determined to expand their mail-order business and are
considering, for the first time, buying some mailing lists. The thought of
selling Sparklers when it has been built-up a little further has also
crossed their minds.
Douglas knows that mail order is growing and that up-market products
increasingly are filling the pages of catalogues and brochures. She also
knows she might face more competitors but says she is not worried. 'I think
the growth of mail order is a good thing because it is changing buying
habits,' Douglas adds. 'I think a lot of people are getting fed up with
shopping.'
Sparklers Shirts, Eythorne House, Eythorne, near Dover, Kent CT15 4BE. Tel.
0304-830-424.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII Photograph Shirt-makers at work . . . Lexi Douglas (left)
and sister Henrietta Nettlefold at their Folkestone factory (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8760</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Minding Your Own Business: When it's time to call for help -
Computers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CARTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS I explained in a recent article, the prices of retail software packages
(word processing, spreadsheets, databases) remain unreasonably high because
of the influence of corporate buyers. But when it comes to business software
packages (accounting, invoicing, stock control, etc) the problem is the
opposite: in this area of the market, prices are becoming too low.
By far the most common application of computers is for accounting; a recent
survey found that 52 per cent of small companies with a computer had bought
it for this purpose. But when the black art of accounting is combined with
the black art of computing, a brew is created that spells disaster. Into it
strides the small-business buyer. Supremely ignorant on both subjects, but
primed by the latest issue of his computer magazine, he is determined to get
the best deal and the biggest possible discount.
Experienced dealers have learned to recognise this character from a mile
off. They do not have time or resources to give him free consultancy and
education (which he wouldn't want, anyway). So, they sell him a machine at a
discount, together with a copy of Sage Financial Controller, and make sure
they do not get entangled in after-sales support. ('If you want technical
support, sir, it is available free of charge from Sage over the 'phone for
the first 90 days, or we can put you in touch with a training company').
When our friend gets home with his computer, he becomes acquainted with
reality at last. It is not some magic box which, once unpacked, will
automatically 'do the accounts' for him. Nor does accounting allow
half-measures. If you make a mess of running a word-processing package, you
simply revert to the typewriter; but with accounts packages you have burned
your bridges because, after going on computer, you stop writing-up the
previous manual books.
Find out after six months that the new system is not working and there is
nothing on which to fall back. The damage can be lethal if the company does
not know how much it owes, or is owed, or what orders are outstanding, not
to mention the auditor's fees at year-end as he clears-up the mess.
When it comes to accounting packages, you must pay for professional help. At
an absolute minimum, you should budget for one half-day's support to set up
each module on the computer, and another half-day to run through the
period-end procedures at the end of the first month. At present rates, that
is Pounds 300 a module. So, if you want to run invoicing, sales, purchase
and nominal ledgers, you should budget to spend Pounds 1,200 for training
and support.
This is where software pricing is important. A company buying top-range
Tetra 2000 will pay Pounds 2,400 for the four software modules; a company
buying Sage will pay as little as Pounds 349. Set against a purchase price
of Pounds 2,400, Pounds 1,200 for training and support looks reasonable; but
few people can bring themselves to accept they should pay this sort of money
for a package that itself only cost Pounds 349. Yet, both companies will
need an equal level of support (the Sage user will probably need more
because his staff are less likely to be well-qualified).
Most small-business users are not prepared to pay for the level of training
and support they need to make a successful transition from manual system to
computer. As business packages become cheaper and better, this problem
becomes more acute. Recently, I tested two newly-released packages -
Business Manager from Pegasus, and TAS Books from Megatech. Both are
first-rate and offer state-of-the-art software design.
The only problem is the price; to compete with mighty Sage, the suppliers
have had to set them at Pounds 299 and Pounds 399. At this level users will
not be willing to pay for support, so experienced dealers will not want to
know. Both suppliers offer direct support over the telephone, but that is
quite inadequate for products of this sophistication. There must be an
expert on-site.
Retail packages such as spreadsheets and word processing are essentially for
personal use: if they do not work, a lot of someone's time has been wasted
but not too much harm is done. However, applications like accounts and stock
control implicate the entire company. If they go wrong, the potential
damange is too great.
Unfortunately, when all the talk in the computer magazines is about cheaper
and cheaper prices, it is an enormous up-hill task to try to educate users
into paying proper money for support and training. If you are a new
computer-purchaser, look at this way. Take all the money you have saved by
cutting prices of hardware and software and plough it back into buying
better training and support from a good dealer. The result will be a much
more successful installation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8761</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Reports - the undercover story / Diary
of a Private Investor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN GOLDSTEIN-JACKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   I LIKED the company report so much
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
I bought the shares. In October last year, while browsing through the FT's
share price pages, I noticed that Treatt had a capitalisation of Pounds
7.34m with a share price of 78p. But what did the company do?
I reached for my copy of The Corporate Register (published by Hemmington
Scott every six months for Pounds 135 per annum - but many public reference
libraries have a copy). It said that Treatt's main business was supplying
and lending essential oils and aromatic chemicals used as flavourings and
fragrances. It also provided the names of the company's directors - plus the
company's address.
I wrote to Treatt's company secretary requesting a copy of Treatt's latest
published annual report to shareholders. The secretary sent the report by
return of post. It had a lovely colour photo on the inside front cover. Two
men and a woman - each in white coats - were standing on top of a giant
orange, from which was spurting a fine spray of orange juice. The photo had
formed part of Treatt's trade advertising campaign.
That was the only photo in the report - no boring pictures of directors
sitting behind desks. The report was clear, concise and provided the sort of
information I like to see - such as the market value of freehold property
being 'considerably in excess' of the value given in the balance sheets.
The directors had a large shareholding in the company. Therefore, they had a
vested interest in seeing that the company's share price performed well.
None of the directors received a grossly inflated salary and staff costs and
staff numbers seemed to be under control. The company was not overloaded
with debt.
Treatt also had considerable export sales and more than half its turnover
was achieved outside the UK. Profits seemed reasonable and the chairman's
statement was encouraging. The company 'continued to invest' in
'sophisticated production' equipment. A new company, Florida Treatt, had
been established in the UK - its products being 'used to improve the aroma
of concentrated orange juice which loses some important flavour components
during production.'
I thought of all the other products that could do with aroma enhancement.
The market is vast. Why does mass-produced bread not only taste like
cardboard but sometimes smell more like vinegar than bread? Grapefruit juice
in cartons rarely has the tangy smell of grapefruit. Strawberries seldom
smell like strawberries.
Treatt was in an ideal niche industry for growth. The company's shares have
now risen to 110p and its capitalisation to Pounds 10.4m.
Thinking about Treatt made me look back over the past 12 months at all the
companies I had written to asking for a copy of their latest published
annual report. I was rather amazed to discover that I had contacted 207
companies. In each case, wherever possible, I had written to the company
secretary by name, having gained this information from the Corporate
Register.
Most companies responded within a week - some by return of post. Whereas
Treatt's report had cost 41p for them to post, the average postage cost had
been 49p. Among the lowest postage charges had been Radiant Metal (18p)
while Electra Investment Trust's report cost Pounds 1.35 second-class.
Not every company responded immediately. For example, I wrote to JS
Pathology's secretary on July 15, but received no reply. I wrote again on
October 24, mentioning my earlier letter and again requesting a copy of the
annual report. Instead, on December 11, I was sent a copy of the company's
interim statement which revealed profits after tax down from Pounds 1.137m
to Pounds 488,000. I was not surprised. I have not invested in JS Pathology.
While most companies accompanied their reports with a compliments slip some,
such as Hartstone Group, and United Biscuits, sent a personal letter,
accompanied by additional information.
The style of the reports varied considerably. A sentence such as: 'A
solution to the Zakharov equations describes the electric field intensity in
the ionosphere due to electro-magnetic driving by the Arecibo antenna' (in
Logica's report) is hardly as enticing as 'When a customer speaks, Safeway
listens' (Argyll's report), but allowances have to be made for the
differences in products - computer systems and consultancy and supermarkets
 -and the type of investor the reports seemed to be aimed at.
It is also interesting, having piled up all 207 reports and skimmed through
them again, to see how they have changed. Some companies which used to
highlight increased profits over the previous year now highlight increased
turnover instead, or a five-year track record, or pointedly state that
'gearing is controlled.' The message has got home that many investors are
concerned about company indebtedness.
Why had I requested 207 company reports? Partly out of curiosity and partly
for possible investment purposes - although the actual number of companies I
will invest in is very small. Sometimes I was just checking to see if
certain big shareholders had increased their stake in the company. There are
some institutional investors who are worth following if they have acquired 3
per cent or more of the company, while others indicate that the company is
best avoided.
Here are some of the reports I will put in my 'further consideration if the
market drops' file: the companies are soundly managed, have good assets,
acceptable debt levels and reasonable prospects - but present political and
general economic uncertainties make me reluctant to invest too much in
equities.
One activity that ought to be a growth area is automatic postage franking
machines, where letters are weighed and franked with the correct postage. A
number of the reports arrived franked with too high a postage rate for their
weight. In these difficult economic times, perhaps more companies should
consider using lighter paper for their reports. One report of only 42 pages
cost 75p to post, simply because of heavy paper. Some longer reports cost
far less.
My wife has devised a new game with the reports. We look at the photos of
company chairmen and directors and try to guess their ages. It is startling
how many look much older than their years - is this what corporate life in
Britain does to them?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8762</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Pensions fervour cools off - What
could happen to personal plans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBBIE HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FEBRUARY marks the start of the personal pensions season as life offices
gear up for a marketing onslaught to persuade millions of employees to opt
out of the state earnings related pension scheme and into a private plan by
the end of the tax year.
The success of personal pensions has been remarkable. Providers have notched
up 4.5m new clients - a very favourable response to the government's bid to
switch the burden of individual pension provision to the private sector.
This year the revolutionary zeal seems to have cooled and providers are
talking of consolidation and even retreat. Gone are the heady promises of
'something for nothing' which marked the advertising campaigns of 1988.
The reasons for the uncertainty are threefold. First, the amount of rebate
paid by the government to those who take out personal pensions will be cut
from April. Providers are making contingency plans to cope with reduced
business.
Second, if Labour is elected there is evidence that the personal pensions
market as we know it, would cease to exist. Third, the personal pension
promise of portability without penalty is proving false.
This does not mean that personal pensions have ceased to be attractive.
There are considerable gains to be made for those who opt out of Serps and
invest in a plan for the 1991/92 and 1992/93 tax years.
But those opting for a personal pension should do so with their eyes open.
If you opt out of Serps for the current tax year by April 5, the Department
of Social Security (DSS) will pay up to Pounds 1,500 into a personal pension
of your choice. This rebate of National Insurance Contributions is
calculated at 8.47 per cent of 'band earnings' - that is earnings between
Pounds 52 and Pounds 390 per week.
The rebate will drop from April 1993. The actual figure is expected to
published by the end of March but it is likely to be in the order of 5 per
cent plus an element of tax relief. The effect of this cut will be to reduce
the value of the rebate by one third. At this rate it is estimated that
between 1m to 1.5m would be better off if they returned to Serps.
It is doubtful if even a cut of this size would be sufficient to make
personal pensions cost effective. The net cost of personal pensions to the
National Insurance Fund for the period to 1993 is Pounds 6.7bn according to
the National Audit Office (NAO) and the Public Accounts Committee. This
figure was based on 4m people in personal pensions and was expressed in
April 1988 cash terms so the real cost in today's terms would be
substantially higher.
Even after the proposed cut in the rebate, which is still being discussed,
there would still be a net cost to the national insurance fund. Bryn Davies,
executive director and actuary at UPS, who calculated the NAO figures,
estimates that the net cost for the 1993-98 period would be Pounds 2.4bn in
April 1992 cash terms.
One of the prime intentions of personal pensions was to reduce the cost of
Serps in the next century but, at this rate, it could create a substantial
deficit in the NI fund. Further rebate cuts or restrictions on re-entry to
Serps cannot be ruled out if the Government intends to balance the books.
The other option is to make the rebate age-related - a measure proposed by
the NAO.
Labour intends to re-establish Serps and good (ie final salary) occupational
pension schemes as the primary source of UK pensions. Personal pensions -
and indeed any money purchase pension where the value of the fund is linked
to investment performance - will be relegated to the role of top-up
provision.
Under Labour, personal pensions also would have to provide a guaranteed
minimum pension (GMP) to match the benefit given up in Serps and providers
will be forced to make direct comparisons between the benefits of their plan
and the benefits of the enhanced state earnings related scheme. On the
whole, Labour would not provide a friendly environment for current products.
But even without the charges which Labour proposes there is evidence that
some plans contain the seeds of their own destruction. Where the plan is
simply used to contract out of Serps and no extra contributions are paid,
the overheads for life office charges and commission to salesmen are quite
modest.
But many providers insist on minimum extra contributions of up to Pounds 50
per month. These regular premium plans are subject to more substantial
charges and due to early termination penalties the employee may have little
to show for his or her investment after three or four years.
A marketing feature of personal pensions is portability without penalty  -
in other words you can take your pension from job to job without suffering
any of the transfer problems associated with final salary pensions.
This works - but only to a point. If the employee wants to join the new
employer's pension scheme he or she would probably be forced to give up the
personal pension. Even if the provider offered to convert the personal
pension into a free standing additional voluntary contribution plan (FSAVC)
few people saddled with a mortgage can afford to keep up two pension
payments.
In most cases the personal pension would be stopped, incurring a hefty
penalty. One leading company said someone who contributed Pounds 100 monthly
for 18 months would receive only Pounds 1,000 on transfer - 40 per cent less
than the Pounds 1,800 invested. That highlights the attractions of single
premium contributions which carry low overheads and pay commission to
advisers of just 4 per cent.
If you prefer monthly arrangements ask your adviser to select a plan which
is genuinely flexible so that there are no high charges on regular
contributions and no penalties if the contribution is reduced.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8763</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: More societies cut savings rates -
News in Brief
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WOOLWICH has cut the gross interest rates on its accounts by about 0.6 of a
percentage point. The exception is balances below Pounds 500, where rates
are unaltered. Rates on the Prime Gold account are now 8.25 per cent gross
(6.19 per cent net) for balances between Pounds 500 and Pounds 9,999. The
current account pays 3.75 per cent gross (2.81 per cent net) on balances of
between Pounds 500 and Pounds 4,999. Tessa rates are 10 per cent between
Pounds 25 and Pounds 2,999, 11 per cent between Pounds 3,000 and Pounds
4,799 and 11.1 per cent on balances of Pounds 4,800 plus.
Leeds Permanent has reduced the gross rates on its accounts by between 0.5
and 0.6 of a percentage point. Liquid Gold now pays 8.2 per cent gross (6.15
per cent net) on balances of Pounds 500 to Pounds 1,999 and 8.35 per cent
gross (6.26 per cent net) on balances of Pounds 2,000 to Pounds 4,999. Solid
Gold pays 8.9 per cent gross (6.68 per cent net) on between Pounds 5,000 and
Pounds 9,999. Rates on the Tessas vary between 10.55 per cent and 10.7 per
cent.
* * *
Kleinwort Benson has launched an offshore Emerging Markets fund, based in
Guernsey. The fund aims to take advantage of the high economic growth rates,
and relatively undeveloped stock markets, in areas such as Latin America,
Asia and parts of Europe. These markets are individually risky, but the hope
is that the spread will reduce volatility; however, a prolonged world
recession would adversely affect most of these markets.
Although the fund is open-ended, it is not an authorised unit trust and
investors can only apply for a holding through an authorised adviser. The
minimum investment is Pounds 1,000; the initial charge is 5 per cent and the
annual charge is 1 per cent.
* * *
The Aegis IPS Paragon Trust is a unit trust aiming for steady capital growth
by investing internationally. The initial charge is 6 per cent and the
management charge is 1.75 per cent; the expected yield on the fund is 1 per
cent and the minimum investment is Pounds 1,000.
* * *
Skandia Life is launching a new 'Ethical Selection' fund, for use with its
range of life and pensions products. Jupiter Tyndall will manage it. The
fund will keep a minimum of 25 per cent in appropriate 'ethical' or
'environmental' unit trusts. Between 5 and 10 per cent will be in cash, and
the remainder will be invested in equities which meet the managers'
criteria.
These will be devised in accordance to investors' answers to a questionnaire
 -depending on the answers, the fund could avoid companies involved with
armaments and nuclear weapons, animal experimentation, South Africa,
alcohol, tobacco, environmentally damaging practices, poor employment
practices, gambling, pornography and factory farming or meat processing.
There is a fixed offer price of 100p, available from now until the end of
the offer period on Friday March 13.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8764</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Which bank do you say 'yes' to? - How
to . . . pick a current account / Why customers can afford to be choosy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE was a time when you did not have much choice of bank accounts. But
competition now means there is a wide range of them, with different rates
and charges.
Most offer similar services: free banking if you are in credit,
interest-bearing current accounts, cheque guarantee and credit cards, and
cashpoints. But there is a tendency for those banks that offer better
interest rates to charge more if you overdraw. This could have a large
bearing on the current account you choose.
So, how do you go about choosing an account? Here are some points to
consider:IN CREDIT?
Mr Black has a monthly salary of Pounds 1,500 paid into his account every
month. He has a series of standing orders and direct debits which are paid
from the account three working days after his salary is received.
He always has savings so there is no need for his current account ever to go
into the red. Thus, the overdraft rate that the bank or building society
charges does not concern him. He would much rather have a current account
which pays good interest and provides the usual services and cards.
Almost all banks and building societies give tiered rates of interest, but
some offer better returns than others on larger deposits. Best rates on
Pounds 1-Pounds 499 can be found on Caledonian Bank's High Interest cheque
account, paying 7.5 per cent net, and Beneficial Bank's Classic Visa (6 per
cent). But there are no cheque or credit cards with the Caledonian account,
although Beneficial runs a Visa account with a cheque book and the Visa card
doubles as a Pounds 100 cheque guarantee card.
The downside with Beneficial is the paucity of national branches (only 53 in
the UK) and the fact that it charges 1.5 per cent on every withdrawal made
from a cashpoint subject to a Pounds 1.50 minimum.
Mr Black often has Pounds 1,000 or more in his account, so he wants good
rates on higher deposits. Cater Allen offers 6.75 per cent net on Pounds
1,000 but does not have a cash or cheque guarantee card and will not pay
interest if the account falls below that amount. Robert Fleming/Save and
Prosper's Classic account pays 5.25 per cent net on Pounds 1,000; Bank of
Scotland's Banksave Plus account (requiring a minimum Pounds 500 deposit,
which can drop to Pounds 1) offers 4.5 per cent; Northern Rock's current
account, 3.77 per cent (this also requires an opening deposit of Pounds
500); Britannia BS's React 365, 4.33 per cent; and Firstdirect Cheque, 3.56
per cent.
On larger amounts - for example, Pounds 2,500 - Moneyfacts, the monthly
newsletter, suggests the Chelsea Classic account paying 7.13 per cent net;
the Portman Prestige Cheque account, 6.38 per cent; Caledonian, with 7.5 per
cent on all balances above Pounds 1; and UDT, with an interest rate of 7.43
per cent on deposits of Pounds 1,000 and over.
UDT requires minimum withdrawals of Pounds 200 and has no cash or cheque
card. The Chelsea Classic requires an opening deposit of Pounds 2,500 and
pays 1.68 per cent net on amounts below this. Mr Black would need Pounds
1,000 to open its Capital account and, again, Chelsea would pay only 1.68
per cent on smaller deposits.
OVERDRAWN?
Some of these accounts would be no good at all to Mr White - the downside of
the ones cited by Moneyfacts is that they do not have an overdraft facility.
Since Mr White errs occasionally on the wrong side of credit, he sometimes
needs to negotiate an overdraft of more than a couple of hundred pounds.
Moneyfacts recommends Firstdirect for having one of the best overdraft
facilities on the market - Mr White would be allowed an automatic
interest-free facility of Pounds 250. If he needed more, the rate would be
20.7 per cent APR and an annual arrangement fee of 1 per cent, subject to a
minimum of Pounds 15.
The Co-operative Bank's Ultra account allows Mr White to become overdrawn by
Pounds 250 for three days; Lloyds Bank has an automatic overdraft of Pounds
100; National Westminster Bank would let him be overdrawn by Pounds 50
before imposing charges; and Girobank's Keyway would give him Pounds 20
leeway (you have to deposit Pounds 400 a month into this account, though) as
would Northern Bank. Britannia might waive charges on a Pounds 250 overdraft
for three days at the manager's discretion.
Mr White would be extremely foolish not to negotiate an overdraft facility
for amounts greater than these. Unauthorised overdraft rates are usually at
least 10 percentage points higher than rates already agreed with the bank -
Firstdirect has one of the most draconian.
The Investors Chronicle calculated recently which banks or building
societies offered the best deal for someone who was usually in credit but
overdrew for short periods. The example is of a basic-rate taxpayer who
normally maintains about Pounds 500 but goes into the red without
authorisation by Pounds 300 for two weeks at Christmas and by Pounds 80 for
two weeks in July (during the sales).
He would still be left with a net credit in his current account if he banked
with Abbey National; Nationwide; Royal Bank of Scotland's interest-paying
current account; Robert Fleming/Save and Prosper; and Woolwich. He would be
Pounds 25 worse off at Bank of Scotland's Banksave Plus; Barclays Interest
and Flexible; Britannia BS; Co-operative Bank; Firstdirect; Girobank Keyway;
Halifax; Lloyds Classic; Midland's Orchard; and Northern Rock BS.
Mr White would have to pay between Pounds 25-Pounds 50 with Bank of
Scotland's Chequeplus account; Girobank's Current; Royal Bank of Scotland's
Personal Current; TSB's Cheque and Interest Cheque; and Yorkshire Bank's
Paymaster Plus. But the costs mount to Pounds 50 or more at AIB; Bank of
Scotland Current; Lloyds Gold; Midland Current and Meridian; NatWest Current
and Current-plus; Norwich &amp; Peterborough; and Yorkshire Bank's Paymaster.
It is the fees and transaction charges which hurt the most. Mr White is
likely to end up paying more in overdraft rates and charges to the Big Four
banks which, unlike the largest building societies and Abbey National,
charge a standard overdraft fee.
The overdraft fees at Barclays and Lloyds are Pounds 8 a month, Pounds 5 at
Midland and Pounds 20 a quarter at National Westminster compared with
nothing at the Halifax, Abbey National, Nationwide and Woolwich. NatWest
charges Pounds 20 for an overdraft letter while Abbey National, Nationwide
and Woolwich do not (surprisingly, for a Big Four bank, Barclays does not
charge for this but Halifax BS charges Pounds 10).
Mr White should, therefore, avoid accounts with overdraft fees and high
overdraft service charges by finding out which institution charges what and
how often.
EASE OF ACCESS
Once you know whether you are a Mr Black or a Mr White, the fine-tuning can
begin. The points for which to look out are:
Accessibility. Must you have a branch near you? Girobank, which is available
in every post office, has the advantage here as do the larger banks and
building societies which maintain a presence on every high street. But those
with a regional bias usually have reciprocal arrangements with other banks
and building societies or are part of a national electronic network of cash
machines such as LINK. Check however, to see if there are transaction
charges.
Home banking. Do you really need to go into a branch? Firstdirect, Robert
Fleming/Save &amp; Prosper and NatWest's Primeline are all telephone banking
services that operate independently of a branch network. Customers of these
accounts appear very happy with them but telephone bills are a potential
expense.
Plastic cards. The Pounds 50 limit on a cheque guarantee card was set in
1977 and has not been re-valued to keep pace with inflation. However, some
banks and building societies offer cards up to Pounds 250 (see table).
Other useful plastic includes credit cards and a direct debit facility,
which usually is linked to the guarantee card. Many of the building
societies do not issue credit cards, which might be a big drawback for some
potential customers.
Sending money abroad. If you need to do this regularly, check the expense
and the ease of transfers. Some banks or building societies stipulate large
minimum sums. Which?, the Consumers' Association's monthly magazine, points
out that Girobank account-holders can transfer money free of charge to
overseas Giro accounts, while customers with the Bank of Scotland can use
the low-cost 'TAPS' payment system. On the high street, Which? found that
NatWest was the cheapest and Abbey National the most expensive for sending
FFr1,000 to France.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V Illustration (Omitted). Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8765</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Warrants trust launched
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CROWDED unit trust industry is gaining a new family member, with the
launch of the first trust to be based on the warrants market.
The company behind the launch is Exeter Fund Managers, which already runs
unit trusts based on the main classes of investment trust shares.
A warrant is simply a piece of paper entitling the holder to buy shares at a
certain price. It pays no income and could expire, worthless, if the share
price moves in the wrong direction. A warrant to buy shares at 100p would
expire valueless if the share price never rose above 80p. Conversely, the
same warrant would be very valuable if the share price rose to 200p.
Investing in warrants is thus highly risky. But Exeter is reducing this
danger by holding about 40 per cent of the initial portfolio in zero coupon
shares. These have first claim on the assets of investment trusts and so are
relatively less risky (although far from completely risk-free). The manager
will also be able to select warrants on overseas trusts, so his fortunes
will not be tied to the health of the UK stock market.
This trust is not for the cautious or the first-time investor. Warrants will
fall more quickly than other investment trust shares in a bear market. The
current market capitalisation of all the investment trust warrants is only
Pounds 200m and some issues may be relatively illiquid. So this should only
be considered by better off investors for the small, 'risk' element of their
portfolios.
The minimum investment is Pounds 1,000; the initial charge is 6 per cent
(with a 2 per cent discount till March 20). The annual charge is 1 per cent.
Aegon Financial Services is launching the Select Portfolio, a fund of funds
based on unit trusts managed by Perpetual. The minimum investment is Pounds
5,000, initial charge 5.5 per cent, annual charge 1.5 per cent. During a
launch period, investments of under Pounds 10,000 attract a bonus of 0.5 per
cent and those above Pounds 10,000, 1 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8766</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Aerospace will report on Wednesday its preliminary results for the
year to December 1991, which the City expects will show a pre-tax loss of
about Pounds 85m against a pre-tax profit of Pounds 376m a year earlier. The
loss will include heavy exceptional costs to cover the defence, commercial
aircraft, motor vehicles and property group's restructuring programme.
The company said at the time of its flopped Pounds 432m rights issue last
Autumn that it expected pre-tax profits before exceptional items of at least
Pounds 150m.
The exceptional items which will lead to an overall loss include a charge of
about Pounds 250m to cover rationalisation costs, a Pounds 45m extraordinary
charge to cover the withdrawal of its Rover car subsidiary from the US last
year, and a gain of Pounds 15m on the sale of the company's shareholding of
SD-Scicon.
The company is also expected to maintain its final dividend.
Dalgety kicks off on Monday the reporting season in food manufacturing. The
sector's results will be scrutinised particularly closely this time for
signs of how far weaker demand and price-cutting at retail level are being
passed through to suppliers.
Extensive rationalisation and cost-cutting in the past two years have done
much to improve Dalgety's competitive position. However, this week's interim
figures are expected to show only a modest increase.
Analysts are looking to between Pounds 52m and Pounds 55m at the pre-tax
level, compared with Pounds 51.7m last time.
Glaxo's interim results on Thursday will also be watched closely. They are
the first to include sales of several new drugs that will determine whether
the company's phenomenal growth during the 1980s is to continue.
The potential blockbusters are Zofran, to control sickness during cancer
chemotherapy, and Imigran, a migraine drug. If first half sales of Imigran
are close to the Pounds 50m predicted by BZW, it is well on the way to
becoming one of the world's handful of Pounds 1bn-a-year megadrugs.
BZW is forecasting a top-of-the-range Pounds 730m pre-tax profit for the
first half, against Pounds 617m last year. Smith New Court is among the
lowest with Pounds 680m.
Owners Abroad, the UK's second largest package holiday company, is expected
to report on Wednesday full-year pre-tax profits of Pounds 30m, compared
with Pounds 15.3m in 1990.
Of particular interest will be any statement on the current year's trading
and whether February bookings for the summer are maintaining January's high
volumes, despite pre-election jitters and the recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8767</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Home rescues begin
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANDREW Longhurst, chief executive of the Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester Building
Society, declared this week: 'Our aim is to ensure that our customers don't
get into a position where they have to be rescued.'
When the government and building societies met to discuss the housing
repossessions crisis just before Christmas, Longhurst was the only building
society chief with the nerve to resist the pressures from the politicians
for mortgage-lenders to come up with rescue schemes.
The lenders, mostly building societies, pledged more than Pounds 800m. In
return, the government has arranged that, when borrowers are on social
security, mortgage interest will be paid direct to lenders.
Now, the lenders are getting under way with their rescue schemes.
Nationwide Building Society led the way, followed by the Halifax, Bradford &amp;
Bingley, Leeds Permanent and the National Westminster Bank. Woolwich is
expected to start in the next few days.
Only one centralised lender has a rescue scheme so far: the Mortgage
Corporation, which has a Pounds 15m business expansion scheme to convert 150
homes into assured tenancies.
Most of the schemes launched so far are trials that will operate on a
relatively modest scale. Halifax's Pounds 18m, for example, is expected to
rescue about 350 home-owners, and Nationwide's pilot scheme about 100.
A variety of techniques is being used in the schemes. They include:
Mortgage to rent. The borrower sells his home to either a housing
association or the lender and becomes its tenant at an affordable rent.
Equity sharing. This is the route favoured by the Leeds Permanent. It is
spending Pounds 100m on injections of cash that will, in effect, buy a
part-share in a house and so reduce a customer's debt burden.
Advice and counselling. This costs little and could be the most effective
rescue technique of all.
More schemes are on the way from other lenders. But how many people will
they save? The lenders seem to think about 20,000.
On Desert Island Discs, prime minister John Major gave the impression that
the government thinks it has solved the repossessions' problem. This is not
quite the case.
Last year, there were 75,500 repossessions and, on present trends, there
will be around 80,000 this year. A much larger number of people - around
275,000 - have mortgage arrears of more than six months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8768</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: BES year-end flurry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BUSINESS Expansion Scheme is diversifying again. The end of the tax year
has produced a flurry of issues and some show a return to the scheme's
original philosophy of encouraging 'risk capital' for small companies.
Meanwhile, another established City firm is expected to enter the market for
low-risk covenanted 'buy-back' BES companies next week. But Steven Rowe,
chief executive of BES Monitoring, has doused some of the optimism. He said:
'Many assured tenancy issues will turn out well - but there has already been
one 'guaranteed' issue, sponsored by Raphael Zorn Hemsley, where the
'guarantor', Fairbriar, has since entered administrative receivership - and
one does not have to go back too far in the BES's history to find 'secured'
contracting schemes - which were anything but secure.
You might still consider the following new issues:
Airways Assured Growth has a buy-back agreement to pay Pounds 1.40 back in
five years' time for every Pounds 1 spent now. It will build accommodation
for the British Airways Housing Association in Berkshire, and is backed by a
deposit.
The Black Sheep Brewery, sponsored by Wise Speke, will invest in a brewery
in Masham, north Yorkshire, which will make 'traditional' draught ales.
Ridings Assured Growth, sponsored by Capital for Companies, is raising
Pounds 10m to buy properties from Tay and Persimmon - buy-back covenantof
Pounds 1.38 for every Pounds 1.
The Mercedes-Benz Dealer Fund, sponsored by Capital Ventures, is a rarity
these days - a series of trading companies which will invest in
Mercedes-Benz dealerships.
WISH (Worthy Investment In Social Housing) is raising Pounds 10m for the
South London Family and South Wight housing associations - covenant Pounds
1.35.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8769</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN A reverse of the trend since the beginning of the year director sales
outweighed purchases during the week.
The largest single transaction was at Nu-Swift, which provides fire
protection and office cleaning services in Britain and the US. Having bought
20,000 shares at 490p in December last year, J G Murray, the non-executive
chairman, has now sold 1.5m shares at 459p, while I C Dorr, another
director, has sold 60,000. Nevertheless, J G Murray retains a majority
shareholding in the company through European Fire Protection.
Three directors sold stock in Electronic Data Processing at 420.5p. This
company has performed exceptionally well over the past 18 months with its
share price increasing six fold since R Jowitt, the managing director and
chief executive, bought stock at 65p. The computer related service group
said that the sales by directors had been made in order to widen the
shareholder base.
Kunick, which operates and distributes amusement machines, announced good
year end results in January. Following this, five directors have bought a
total of 570,000 ordinary shares at 9p. In November last year five directors
acquired a total of 140,000 preference shares at 58p.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                              No of
Company                   Shares      Value   directors
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Air London                750,000       825       1
Amersham                   20,000        91       1*
Body Shop                   3,110        11       1
Dunhill Holdings           25,201       107       1*
Elec Data Processg        440,000     1,850       2
Hoskyns Group             300,000     1,218       3
Nu-Swift                1,560,000     7,156       2
Storehouse                 25,000        28       1
Greenhalls Grp              2,583        10       1
Ulster TV                   9,130        16       1
Usher Walker               16,000        25       2
VTR                       100,000        51       1
Warburg (SG)               50,000       294       1
Watson &amp; Philip         1,457,000     4,692       1
Whitbread                  40,000       185       1*
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Aviva Petroleum         1,000,000        50       1
Beckman (A)               190,000       127       1
Clarke Foods nilpd         50,709        12       1
Glenchewton                91,321        10       1
Hewetson inc convpf        35,000        19       1
Kunick                    570,000        51       5
Mountleigh              2,100,000       145       2
North Sea Assets           75,000        25       2
Osprey Comm.               50,000        10       1
Stratton IT                15,000        23       1
Usher Walker               10,000        16       1
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all transactions, including the exercise of options (*) if 100%
subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000. Information released
by the Stock Exchange 3-7 February 1992.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8770</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Why my bank thought I was dead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ADELE TOBE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'THE REASON that your bank have not paid the direct debit is because they
say you are dead'. That is enough to turn anyone's hair white - but when you
are in your mid-twenties and feeling healthy . . .
My 'death' arose from a simple household mishap. It began when the pull-out
clothes line over my bath became twisted.
I took it off the wall to untangle it and put it back - securely, I thought,
but when I loaded it with clothes it fell off and smashed a hole in the
bath.
I told the story to a cousin, who advised me to claim on my insurance. I
filled in several forms and two weeks later a recorded delivery envelope
arrived from the Well Known Insurance Company (WKIC).
Hooray, I thought - a cheque] Not likely - I should have known that the
course of true claims would not run smooth.
The WKIC informed me that I had not paid my last two direct debits;
therefore I had defaulted, and therefore it would not be paying out. There
was a footnote: ' . . . if you wish to discuss this matter further please
contact the writer.'
I phoned the writer, who told me that I had not filled in a form the WKIC
had sent me, and said that if I did not reply within 14 days my policy would
be cancelled. I was mystified. I told him that I had not received any forms
and that I wanted a better explanation. An hour later he phoned back to say
that I had not been sent the form that I had not filled in.
He was also sorry to tell me that the reason the direct debits had not been
honoured by my bank - the Well-Known Bank - was because according to them, I
was dead]
The bank manager was very apologetic and diplomatic - after all, he was
speaking to a deceased person - and promised to look into the matter. I
stewed over the weekend and on Monday he rang to tell me that I had been
killed off by a computer error. The WKIC had mis-spelt my surname and given
the wrong account number to the WKB. The WKB, instead of pressing the
'Account does not exist' key, pressed the 'Account holder deceased' key by
mistake.
It turned out to be a combination of errors - the bank had changed all the
account numbers two months earlier and said that it would inform all direct
debits and standing order holders. I demanded a letter of apology from the
WKB (which arrived by return of post) and that the WKIC honoured the claim -
which it will.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8771</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Cash points - the next generation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW generation of machines, called TouchBank, has begun to appear in
branches of Barclays Bank. They look like cash machines, but the one thing
they cannot do is dish out money.
Instead, by touching their colour screens, customers can obtain services
including: ordering statements; printing an on-the-spot list of standing
orders and direct debits; paying bills, or transferring money between a
savings account and a current account.
TouchBank can also be used to buy immediate travel insurance. The machine
guides the customer through a series of questions and offers a printed
quote. If the customer accepts, it then debits the money from his or her
current account and sells the policy.
It can also perform the same service for a mortgage, asking the customer
whether he or she wants an repayment, endowment, or pension mortgage and
other details about their age and income, finally coming up with a printed
quote.
At this point the person using the machine - who need not be a Barclays
customer - will probably want to make contact with branch staff before
taking the deal further. The quote can be used as a benchmark against which
other mortgage offers are assessed.
Quotations for home insurance can also be issued straight away and foreign
currency and travellers' cheques can be ordered and paid for directly out of
your account.
To activate the machine, a Barclays' customer inserts his or her Connect
card, types in their PIN number, and then touches the screen at appropriate
points as images appear. The bank has installed the first nine experimental
TouchBanks at branches including Cheapside and Victoria, London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8772</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: How investors can beat the cowboys -
Ways to spot fund fraud
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS easy to spot the criminal now. Peter Clowes, the disgraced managing
director of the Barlow Clowes fund management company, which crashed in
1988, was jailed for 10 years this week. But when Clowes' career was in its
prime, and he walked without handcuffs on his wrists, he was much harder to
spot - as the painful experiences of his investors attest.
He was not the first financial con-man to get away with it for a while and
he will not be the last. The important point now is: how do you spot the
next Peter Clowes before entrusting him with your money?
Last year, the Securities and Investments Board (SIB), created by the
Financial Services Act (FSA) to co-ordinate financial regulation, published
a pamphlet called How to Spot the Investment Cowboys. It provides a useful
series of checks to make when someone - either an intermediary or a
product-provider - is asking you for money. Some are listed below. Would
they have stopped you investing with Barlow Clowes?
Your adviser offers a rate of return which seems higher than anyone else. If
it seems too good to be true, it probably is.
Unfortunately, Barlow Clowes would have passed this test narrowly. The rates
on offer were good but did not stretch credulity. They were also perfectly
in accord with what the company said it was going to do with the money -
manoeuvre holdings of government bonds adroitly in offshore accounts. The
Barlow Clowes Portfolio offered a high guaranteed tax-free annual return of
9 per cent - very good, but not stratospheric. Perhaps these rates should
have been enough to prompt further questions.
He invites you to put money into a special scheme run by him, which he
cannot explain in detail.
This comes closer to the nub, and SIB goes into details on the kind of
questions you should ask to discover how your money really is being spent.
It was through a test similar to this that David Kauders, a Taunton
fee-based adviser specialising in gilts, spotted that Barlow Clowes was not
to be trusted.
Kauders said: 'I asked them to confirm that they were holding gilts and
stock in clients' own names. They replied that their stock was held by a
branch of Midland Bank. I was to contact the branch to find out details.
When I contacted the branch directly, they said they could give me no
details and I should contact Barlow Clowes. That was one of the classic
danger signs.'
As a result, Kauders advised any clients who came to him with Barlow Clowes
investments to get out while the going was good. He now insists, partly in
reaction to the Clowes experience, that clients hold all certificates
themselves.
Another point he makes is that if you use a fee-charging adviser, you can
pay solely for the advice and then do the transactions yourself. This
short-circuits the problem neatly.
He advises you to put all your money in one investment.
Diversification must always be a good idea. The Barlow Clowes 'portfolios'
were supposed to be invested long-term in gilts, making them appropriate for
wide-scale 'widows and orphans' investing. The pain so many investors
suffered would have been that much less had all of their money had not gone
into one investment.
Your prospective adviser has an expensive lifestyle that seems out of scale
with his business.
Bulls-eye] As a quick look at this week's tabloid press will show, this test
would have revealed Clowes as a suspect cowboy. You might not have been able
to tell this from the intermediary who sold you the Barlow Clowes policy,
but it still helps.
Perhaps most important:
Your adviser is not authorised.
The definition of this word has changed since the introduction of the
Financial Services Act. At that time, authorisation and regulation were the
direct responsibility of the Department of Trade and Industry.
Barlow Clowes' authorisation was itself a vexed issue. From 1975 to 1981,
the company was able to trade unlicenced due to what the ombudsman's report
 -published at the end of 1989 - described as 'licencing errors.' This made
it easier to avoid awkward questions as the licencing regime was tightened,
and Barlow Clowes was to gain a licence for the last few years in which it
traded.
It is fair to say that this mess would be much less likely to occur now.
Also, investing with an authorised company now at least opens the door to
the Investors Compensation Scheme if things go awry. The register of all
authorised companies is available via Prestel, or by writing or telephoning
SIB.
In addition, company advertisements, notepaper and business cards should
carry the logo of the relevant regulator - such as SIB (the overall
co-ordinating body), Fimbra (for independent intermediaries), Lautro (life
assurance and unit trusts), Imro (investment managers), or the SFA (for
securities and futures brokers). The absence of such a logo is a very bad
sign.
The FSA regime has its faults, many of which have been well-aired in these
pages. But it has made it easier for small investors to protect themselves.
There is little that can be done about outright liars - had Clowes done with
the money what he said he was going to do, his portfolio might have been a
sensible choice. But look out for the signs and you should be able to keep
your life savings in your own safe hands without invoking the authorities.
How to Spot the Investment Cowboys, published by the Securities and
Investments Board, Gavrelle House, 2-14 Bunhill Row, London EC1Y 8RA.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8773</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Compensation - What's on offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF YOU are caught out by a cowboy, you will need to rely on compensation,
writes John Authers. But the rules are complicated and vary from investment
to investment.
They have also changed totally since the Barlow Clowes affair. On that
occasion, compensation was funded directly by the Department of Trade and
Industry, and was announced in December 1989 after the ombudsman's scathing
report into the handling of the affair.
That compensation, totalling Pounds 150m, was somewhat more generous than
the arrangements now available - investors who lost Pounds 50,000 or less
received 90 per cent of their money. For sums between Pounds 50,000 and
Pounds 100,000, 80 per cent was paid, and for sums above this the proportion
dropped to 60 per cent.
As Barry Riley points out in The Long View, the new arrangements have rather
less than their fair share of logic. For example, pensioners reliant on
defrauded pension schemes seem to have no defence. But the rules still
dictate the compensation you will receive.
If you go to a licensed Independent Financial Adviser (who will be a member
of Fimbra) or an appointed representative of a fund manager or life office
(in which case the company will be a member of Lautro), then you are
protected by the Investors Compensation Scheme.
This ran into funding problems last year, due to the heavy burden of claims
on Fimbra members, and investors had to wait for pay-outs. Its rules are
complicated - the first Pounds 30,000 of the initial value of an investment
are covered completely. You then receive 90 per cent of the next Pounds
20,000, so that the maximum compensation is Pounds 48,000.
Those investing in guaranteed income bonds have the security of the
Policyholders Protection Act will pay out 90 per cent of the sum invested,
without limit.
What about 'safer' forms of investment? Even banks, as we all now know
following BCCI, can go bust. In the UK they are covered by compensation
which will pay you 75 per cent of your investment with the bank, up to a
maximum of Pounds 20,000. Thus the greatest compensation you can receive is
Pounds 15,000, and deposits above Pounds 20,000 are effectively uncovered.
Building societies are marginally safer, covering 90 per cent of investments
up to Pounds 20,000. The maximum compensation you could receive is Pounds
18,000.
Legislation means that societies have to be much more cautious than banks in
their lending, so a crash is extremely unlikely. However, the US experience
with 'Savings and Loans' institutions, and some recent building society
mergers, show that a building society crash is conceivable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Photograph Clowes, left, handcuffed to co-defendant Peter
Naylor. Both were jailed this week (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8774</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Peps are safe says Labour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARE YOU investing your hard-earned cash in personal equity plans (Peps)
simply out of fear of a Labour government? It might be time to think again.
Labour has until now suggested a number of possibilities for changing or
improving the scheme, while retaining the option to abolish Peps altogether.
The party's pronouncements have become steadily warmer over the past year.
Chris Smith, Labour's Treasury spokesman, declared this week in the most
definite statement yet: 'We believe Peps do have a role to play within the
savings and investment market. We don't necessarily share the present
government's view that they are the best thing since sliced bread but,
nonetheless, they have their uses and we don't have any intention of
sweeping them away.'
Much present financial marketing is, however, based on the premise that the
next tax year could be the last for Peps. The attitude is: 'Buy now while
stocks last]'
The validity of this approach is already in question following a successful
complaint to Lautro by Marjorie Mowlam, Labour's City spokeswoman. She
claimed a letter from an Abbey Life sales representative to clients was
misleading because it said: 'It is no secret that a Labour government would
abolish a number of tax-planning opportunities.'
Some Pep advertisements have used arguably stronger language. An article
Smith wrote in the trade newspaper Money Marketing on January 30 said: 'We
do  .. believe that Peps can be of some value as a savings and investment
vehicle  .. Where a Pep-linked mortgage has been established, we would seek
to ensure that the mortgage would continue to be linked to a Pep.'
This appeared on the same page as an advertisement for the Henderson
Election Pep which featured the slogan: 'Will the First Election Pep Be Your
Last?' Neil Kinnnock is pictured saying 'Yes]'
Smith described this as 'wholly misleading.' He said: 'We would simply ask
organisations like Henderson to stop engaging in advertising which misleads
the public.' But Robin Berrill, managing director of Henderson Investment
Management, defended the advertisement strongly, saying Smith had made no
categoric promises to maintain Peps untouched.
He pointed to one phrase: 'What role, therefore, should Peps have? They
probably do have a role to play in the overall patchwork of savings
provision, but the Labour party is not entirely convinced that they merit
their high relative status in the tax system.' To which Berrill retorted:
'If he says that clearly states their position, I would say he needs a
dictionary.'
He said the advertisement had been based on a comment by Mowlam, to Money
Marketing last year, that 'we would not continue the tax relief to Peps.'
But Henderson is prepared to review the advertisement if Smith provides a
categorical written assurance that Labour will not abolish Peps in their
present form.
Mowlam said this week that Smith's statements reflected the party's position
and superseded her earlier comments.
Labour certainly intends making significant changes to Peps. The proposals
Smith is considering are similar to the 'XPep' (or extended Pep) advocated
by the Institute of Fiscal Studies. This would include cash deposits, bonds,
or collective funds on an equal footing with equities. Such a scheme would
convert Peps into a vehicle aimed directly at encouraging saving.
Introducing such an XPep would also go some way towards alleviating any pain
caused by the proposal to levy National Insurance contributions on
investment income above Pounds 3,000 a year.
There is no reason not to commit money to a Pep if you think it makes sound
investment sense. In the next tax year, however, you could well have a
broader choice of Peps. Once the election is over, it should also be clearer
how much money you are able to commit to this long-term investment vehicle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8775</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): Quiet week for smaller
companies
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There was little sign this week of the long-awaited revival of small company
shares. The Hoare Govett Small Companies Index (capital gains version) fell
0.2 per cent to 1197.69 over the week to February 13; the County Smaller
Companies Index fell 0.1 per cent to 952.23 over the same period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8776</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): Lloyds relaunches
private service
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lloyds Bank has relaunched its UK private banking after refurbishing its 31
regional offices. Front and back office operations have been separated,
enabling account executives to devote more time to each customer. Lloyds,
which has 22,000 UK private banking customers and more than Pounds 3.3bn in
funds under management, says that it can now offer its private banking
customers an enhanced service. Lloyds private banking is available to
customers with more than Pounds 75,000 in disposable assets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8777</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): With-profits bond from
CU
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Commercial Union Life is launching a new with-profits bond, which will
initially offer an annual bonus of 9.5 per cent. Minimum investment is
Pounds 1,000, with a front end charge of 5 per cent. CU has maintained the
right to make 'market value adjustments', which means that there could be
penalties for early surrender.
CU is making the second highest pay-outs on 25-year endowments of those
offices which have so far announced their bonuses, and hopes to profit from
the current popularity of the bonds - for example, Norwich Union's
with-profits bond, now largely withdrawn from the market because the office
was suffering capital strain, raised Pounds 700m last year alone.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8778</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): New share service set up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Granville Davies has set up a execution-only share dealing service called
Transact, with a minimum commission of Pounds 15 for postal dealings and
Pounds 17 for telephone transactions. The percentage rate is 0.75 per cent,
which will effectively start to apply on deals above Pounds 2,000. Telephone
clients will have to pay an annual registration fee of Pounds 10 and sign a
customer agreement letter (the number is 071-338-0350). The London-based
Granville Davies is a member of the Stock Exchange and the Securities and
Futures Authority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8779</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): Wellcome shrugs off
criticism
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wellcome shares were barely dented this week by a Channel 4 programme
critical of its anti-Aids drug, AZT. The stock was one of the best
performers of last year and is now one of the highest rated companies on the
stock market, with a price-earnings ratio in the high 30s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8780</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (At a Glance): An aversion to debt
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
British consumers in December made the biggest monthly net repayment of debt
since 1976, a further blow to hopes of a consumer-led recovery. The Pounds
196m net repayment was the fifth successive month that consumers paid back
more than they borrowed, and followed November's net repayment of Pounds
34m. The figures suggest that most consumers, chastened by rising
unemployment and high interest rates, are behaving prudently and paying off
expensive debts accrued in the 1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8781</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Can the Recovery theory recover? -
Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN investment trusts start being advertised on television, cynics could
reasonably assume that we had reached the height of a bull market.
The traditional time to float a specialist trust has been when that sector
is top of the performance tables. All too often, private investors are lured
in to buy at the peak of the market.
M&amp;G's Recovery investment trust certainly cannot be criticised on such
grounds. It is being launched in the middle of a recession and at a time
when its sister vehicle, the Recovery unit trust, has lagged badly in the
short term performance tables.
Instead, the launch owes much to the end of tax year Personal Equity Plan
season and to the imminent general election. As John Authers writes on Page
III, Labour now says it will not abolish PEPs, which effectively negates
much recent marketing hype. Investors must assess the trust for its
investment potential and see the tax break as a bonus.
So how should one view the trust? Many readers will already have received
the M&amp;G mailshot, citing the impressive long term record of the Recovery
unit trust - Pounds 1,000 invested at launch in 1969 grew to Pounds 65,280
(with income reinvested) by the end of January 1992. However, two eagle-eyed
readers have pointed out that of the 105 funds M&amp;G lists, only three have
beaten the All-Share over the last five years.
None of the 11 M&amp;G trusts in the list beat the All-Share over a five year
period, and nine, including Recovery, failed to beat the building societies.
So one has to decide whether the recent years have been a aberration in
M&amp;G's otherwise excellent long term record, or whether the company has lost
its touch.
There is a case for arguing the latter. Richard Hughes took over as manager
of the Recovery trust in 1987, replacing the highly successful David Tucker.
The unlucky Hughes came in at the peak of the bull market, only to face the
Crash, and then a long recession. Nevertheless, it could be that the
departure of Tucker has weakened the trust.
A second question, which we raised last month, was whether the recovery
philosophy has as much mileage as it used to. The core idea is that
companies get into difficulties which cause their share prices to slump. A
point is reached where these difficulties are overestimated, and at that
point shares in such companies are cheap.
It has been those companies that are affected by the economic cycle which
have tended to offer the greatest rewards to recovery fund managers. But
analyst Bill Smith of BZW argues that such cyclical stocks have previously
benefited from the devaluation of sterling as the UK comes out of recession
 -a process that is unlikely to be repeated within the Exchange Rate
Mechanism.
Having said all that, the long term performance of the Recovery unit trust,
and its strong growth at the end of previous recessions, cannot be ignored.
If you have not already got a PEP for the current year, then this is a prime
candidate for consideration.
Whether one needs to use up next year's PEP allowance as well - by investing
Pounds 12,000 - is much less certain. One can now turn the marketing men's
anti-Labour crusade on its head. If Labour is elected, then most City folk
believe it will be bad for shares, at least in the short term. So why take
the risk of committing a substantial sum to the stock market before the
polls, particularly as Pounds 12,000 would be a large chunk of most people's
portfolios.
The structure of the trust is similar to that of M&amp;G Income. There are three
classes of shares - zero dividend, income and capital - but most investors
will probably want to apply for the package. To those investors, the split
structure will be irrelevant, save that it should stop the trust from
falling to a discount.
There are two important caveats. Investment trusts new issues are not like
privatisations; there will be no opportunity for short term profit. And the
PEP attractions should not be over-emphasised. The trust will yield 5 per
cent, so the maximum income tax gain to a higher rate taxpayer who invests
Pounds 6,000 in the trust is just Pounds 120. A moderately bad stock market
could wipe out that saving in one day.
However, the good news is that the initial charges, at 3.99 per cent, are
lower than on other recent investment trust issues. And some of those costs
could be saved by applying through a execution-only adviser such as
Baronworth Investment Services (081-518-1218), Boyton Financial Services
(0787-61919) or Chamberlain de Broe (071-235-5999).
Under the tender offer, investors have to bid a fixed price for the
individual classes of shares. Here the vast majority of investors will need
advice, which must be paid for.
It will be a tricky calculation; if the assets of the trust grow at 5 per
cent per annum, then at 40p, the gross redemption yield on the zeroes will
be 14.1 per cent. If the assets do not grow at all, then the investor who
pays 45p will get a yield of just 7.4 per cent.
Those who want the advantage of a PEP will have to switch the shares into a
general PEP when they know their tender has been successful.
The obvious candidate for PEP inclusion is the income shares, which get all
the income of the trust but have virtually no redemption value. They are
thus rather like a ten year annuity, and in early years should carry a high
yield. At 35p, the running yield will be 14.3 per cent.
But beware. If the income on the trust grows at only 2.5 per cent per annum,
an investor who bids 40p will get a gross redemption yield of just 6.4 per
cent. As you can see, good advice is essential.
Further details: Page 8, Section One.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8782</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The encore that's a long time coming -
Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE problem facing many US equity investors is that having discounted a US
economic recovery and sent the Dow Jones industrial average to record
levels, it is hard to come up with an encore.
Wall Street has been pretty much treading water for the past two weeks; the
Dow Jones index has stayed comfortably above the 3,200 mark and trading
volume has been moderately heavy at an average of 200m shares a day.
But the big shift to equities from money market funds, certificates of
deposit and bonds appears to have abated. There seem little fuel left to
drive the December-January rally.
Since last Monday the Dow Jones index gained a net 17 points - it stood at
3,242.40 yesterday.
The gain could have been much higher, since the market was up by 51.43
points by Wednesday. But on Thursday the Dow Jones index dropped by 30.18
points on the back of a sharp decline in bond prices and fears that monetary
policy will not be eased in the near term.
Yesterday's decline of 4.25 points suggested a market that is slightly
weary, and increasingly uncertain.
Uncertainty is the by-word for most top US bankers and economists. Although
scattered statistics such as the 0.6 per cent jump in January retail sales
and stronger US car sales in the first ten days of February suggest a
glimmery of recovery, few forecasters expect much of a turnaround before
mid-year.
Add to this equation continued market uncertainty over the plans of the
Federal Reserve Board on the interest rate front, plus uncertainty over the
fate of President Bush's budget package and election year tax gimmicks, and
the result is a growing malaise among investors.
One is tempted to say that the lemmings should have known better, having
begun the Wall Street rally with typically overdone fervour about the
macro-economy's prospects.
Now it is back to the day-to-day shift in sentiment that is conditioned
largely by the flow of data from Reuters screens.
Few are claiming a grand vision of the US economy's prospects, including
some members of the Fed's own board. As one member said recently: 'I think
prospects for the economy are probably more uncertain now than in the past.'
A rough consensus is emerging that if growth in the second half of 1992 can
notch up to the three per cent level, the current year will end with an
average growth rate of around two per cent. But even that is something of an
if.
Art Ryan, president of Chase Manhattan, said this week he feels pretty sure
of little or no growth for the first six months of 1992 and is 'not even
sure' there will be much growth in the second half of the year.
Both the American business community and federal officials are in an
impatient mood, wondering why last December's full-point cut in the discount
rate has not already produced an upturn in consumer confidence and capital
investment.
A partial answer may be that many potential consumers, as well as borrowers
and lenders, are still feeling traumatised by the recession. Sentiment is at
best equivocal for most.
Alan Greenspan, chairman of the Federal Reserve, was also equivocal this
week. He repeated his earlier view that 'we believe that the monetary ease
now in the pipeline is adequate to turn the economy on to the path of
sustained recovery.' But he allowed that the Fed would, 'if necessary, move
toward an increased degree of monetary ease.'
In coming weeks Wall Street will probably be moved by the fortunes of
President Bush's budget package, which this week was partly sandbagged by
Congressional Democrats, who are keen to replace it with their own election
year gimmicks.
The slow-motion dismantling of the President's proposals led some in the US
media to quip that when Bush said in his State of the Union message that the
US recession 'will not stand' what he really meant to say was that his own
proposals would not stand.
This week's statistics may indicate that car sales improved in early
February, but the dire state of Detroit looks unlikely to improve in a
substantial way. Witness, for example, the Dollars 2.6bn after-tax loss
revealed by Ford this week, with the company's fourth quarter loss alone
totalling Dollars 476m.
The upcoming fourth quarter results from General Motors are likely to show
an even larger loss, in the order of Dollars 600m to Dollars 750m.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Monday      3245.08   +  19.68
Tuesday     3251.57   +   6.49
Wednesday   3276.83   +  25.26
Thursday    3246.65   -  30.18
Friday      3245.97   -   0.68
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8783</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Up and away for celebratory BA - The
Bottom Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS celebrated the fifth anniversary of its privatisation in
style this week.
At a time when most other international airlines are continuing to report
heavy losses, BA surprised the market by announcing a fivefold increase in
third quarter pre-tax profits of Pounds 100m. Buoyed by this impressive
performance, its continuing merger negotiations with KLM Royal Dutch
Airlines and talk of a possible investment in the French regional carrier
TAT, BA shares hit their all time high.
Anybody who had bought the airline's shares at their original offer price of
125p in February 1987 would have more than doubled their money. The shares
ended the week at 254p.
All the signs point to further gains. After outperforming the competition,
BA is strongly placed to take advantage of an eventual recovery in the
airline business, although the timing of a sustained traffic upturn remains
uncertain.
'They have managed to maintain a good increase in passenger and cargo yields
despite the lack of full fare paying traffic in a very difficult period,'
says James Halstead, airline analyst at Hoare Govett. 'They also managed to
pull through their cost reduction programme last year and they will clearly
be in a good position when the industry finally comes out of recession,' he
added.
Although the company benefited from lower jet fuel prices and favourable
currency exchange fluctuations, its profits also reflected the cost cutting
drive launched by the airline well before the outbreak of the Gulf crisis
which sent the industry in a tail spin last year.
The airline reduced its staff by 10.9 per cent last year from 54,665 to
48,728 employees worldwide. Productivity was increased by 11.4 per cent. And
the company is continuing to maintain a tight handle on costs. 'In these
uncertain conditions, it is essential to seek further cost savings,' Lord
King, BA's chairman, said this week.
The other important factor, which contributed to the better than expected
performance, was the company's ability to improve its yields. This was the
fruit of BA's sophisticated yield management system designed to get the
optimum return out of its aircraft and its refusal to engage in suicidal
price discounting.
Apart from the general air travel slump, BA also faced last year the arrival
of stronger American competition on its important transatlantic routes with
the start-up of services by United Airlines and American Airlines to
Heathrow, BA's London home base. BA has so far managed to fend off the
initial attack from the US megacarriers, maintaining its 40 per cent share
of the UK-US market. But the UK airline is bracing itself for a new
onslaught from its American competitors.
BA's financial performance in a particularly tough year (pre-tax profits are
likely to total around Pounds 280m-Pounds 285m for the year ending March
1992 compared with Pounds 130m the year before) is expected to strengthen
the company's hand in its current merger negotiations with KLM.
The negotiations have entered a critical stage as the two parties continue
to argue over the precise degree of ownership and control for the combined
airline operations which would create a giant new carrier. BA is understood
to be seeking 80 per cent ownership but would perhaps settle for 70 per
cent, while KLM is currently insisting on 60 per cent for BA and 40 per cent
for the smaller Dutch carrier.
'As long as BA is not greedy, the deal has strong chances of going ahead,'
one City analyst said. Failure to deliver the deal is likely to disappoint
the market and impact BA's shares. But if the merger succeeds, it would give
the shares a big boost. The City sees substantial benefits for both BA and
KLM. Rationalisation could provide up to Pounds 500m in annual cost savings.
It would give BA a new European hub in Amsterdam.
The new combination would become a strong competitor not only against other
big carriers but also against smaller, more cost efficient airlines. It
would also accelerate the overall consolidation of the industry around a few
large airline groups.
For Lord King it would complete his ambition to transform BA into a truly
global airline. It could also be his swan song. At 74, he may decide to step
down at the end of this year when his current mandate runs out. He would
have successfully piloted the company through its initial restructuring
leading to privatisation and then, during the last two years, through the
worst period in modern aviation history. There are already strong
indications that Sir Colin Marshall, BA's chief executive and deputy
chairman, will succeed him.
But BA has always been idiosyncratic. It also has a habit of springing
surprises, like this week's bumper third quarter profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Chart (Omitted). Chart
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8784</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The high roller who died by the sword: The life and savage
death of baccarat addict Akio Kashiwagi
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER and STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HE WAS a small, dapper man, wearing a blue-striped shirt and bank clerk's
grey suit. His manner was so unassuming you would hardly know he was there,
were it not for the circle of attendants hovering around him, watching his
every move. In front of him, stacked on the green baccarat table, were piles
of brightly-coloured counters. They represented gaming chips worth Dollars
4m (Pounds 2.2m). The table was separated from the others in the baccarat
pit by a red rope, as if reserved for royalty.
The little man seemed oblivious of the attention he aroused. He bet the same
amount - Dollars 200,000 (Pounds 110,500) - on each successive hand, dealing
the cards from the shoe precisely and noting the outcome on a score-card.
Winning or losing, his stake never varied. He played for 14 hours, through
the night.
A small crowd gathered, at a respectful distance, to peer over the rope. The
management tried to shoo them away. An executive explained in an awed
whisper: 'That's the Warrior. Look how he pushes his piles of chips forward,
like a battalion of soldiers going into battle.'
His real name was Akio Kashiwagi and he was one of the world's five biggest
gamblers, a man capable of winning or losing Dollars 10m in a single night.
But the casino operators around the world who knew him as the Warrior had
yet another private name for him: the Whale.
A whale is a very large, powerful creature. It takes some beaching. But now,
the Whale is dead - slashed to death with a samurai sword in his Japanese
fortress home. Akio Kashiwagi, the ice-cool high-roller, has played his last
hand.
***
Kashiwagi's arrival in a casino ignited a heady mixture of fear, excitement
and greed in gaming managers. They were like field animals caught in the
glare of car headlights. They were dazzled by his action, which they craved
 -but terrified that, in the rush, he might run them over. That is what the
Warrior did in Darwin, north Australia. That is what he threatened in
Atlantic City, New Jersey. That is what he was trying to do in London. He
was superstitious, but was without fear: a gambler like no other.
Last month, 54-year-old Kashiwagi was found hacked to death. He had been
slashed 10 times and died from loss of blood. Police arrested a 44-year-old
Japanese yakuza (gangster) named Kodo Saiki and Emi Miyashita, a 23-year-old
nurse. It is alleged that Kashiwagi was alone on the night of January 3 when
Saiki broke into his home and stabbed him, and that Miyashita helped to
clean the getaway car.
The police believe that Kashiwagi died for an absurdly low stake. They think
he was killed after an argument over the ownership of a car which the
Warrior bought from Saiki for Y3.5m (Pounds 15,700), but - according to
Saiki - had failed to pay for. If the police are right, the Warrior lost his
life for a sum he would have regarded as beneath notice on the baccarat
table.
***
If Kashiwagi's death was bizarre, so was much of his life. The son of a
carpenter, he was born into a poor family near Mount Fuji just before the
Second World War and left school at around 16 determined to escape poverty
through hard work. He took a back-breaking job as a bearer carrying supplies
to the hut at the top of the mountain. When he had saved enough money,
Kashiwagi began investing in property. He was helped by his wife, Mieko, a
one-time geisha who introduced her husband to her former clients. But he
earned a reputation for ruthlessness; it was said that he hired yakuza thugs
to persuade reluctant sitting tenants to vacate property which he wanted to
develop. Usually, however, he speculated in short-term trades, and once
said: 'All the money I have, I made myself. I don't care how I earn it, even
if it's through gambling.'
He claimed eventually to own Dollars 1bn in assets with an income of about
Dollars 100m a year. Yet, he was not listed among the top taxpayers in his
district and exactly how he could have built up such a large fortune remains
a mystery. He was the only principal of his company, Kashiwagi Shoji, which
in 1988 had sales of only Dollars 15m and five employees, according to a
report in the Wall Street Journal.
From the profits he built a handsome, well-fortified house, known locally as
Kashiwagi's Palace, on the shores of Lake Kawaguchiko at the foot of Mount
Fuji. But the main use for his wealth was to indulge his obsessive desire to
become the man who broke the bank in Monte Carlo - or anywhere else.
There is no skill in baccarat. Every move is laid down according to fixed
rules. The only decision is the side on which to bet - Bank or Player. The
object is to get closer to a total of nine (face cards and tens counting as
zero). Two cards are dealt to each side, with the possibility of drawing a
third. The edge in favour of the house, in return for running and
bankrolling the game, is 1.2 per cent. This is one of the lowest margins in
casino gambling although it is enough, in the long run, to be highly
profitable. But over a limited session, such as a weekend's play, a player
can enjoy swings of luck that spell disaster for the casino.
Sir Edward Clarke, a former Solicitor-General of England, observed of
baccarat at the start of a trial in 1891: 'It seems to me to be about the
most unintelligent mode of losing your own money, or getting somebody
else's, I ever heard of.' And, indeed, it is very hard to explain its
obsessive quality without playing the game. But very rich men who like to
gamble are fascinated by it and its stomach-churning suspense - even though
they know, as did Kashiwagi, that the house edge, small as it seems, must
finally prevail over the player and destroy him.
***
Besides his spectacular gaming habits, little is known about Akio
Kashiwagi's private life. He ran his real-estate business from a shabby,
two-storey building in downtown Tokyo. And, apart from his 'palace,' he
lived simply. In American casinos, where he could have had anything he
wanted, his favourite food was BLT (bacon, lettuce and tomato) sandwiches
and a dish described as marinated monkey meat, prepared by a private chef.
He became known as a high roller about four years ago. His routine was to
travel to different casinos around the world and play night and day. The
casinos welcomed him with open arms although the risks, at the level the
Warrior played, were very high. The biggest Las Vegas casinos have a limit
of Dollars 200,000 a hand and such establishments do not normally run
scared. But given that a hand takes about 45 seconds to play, it does not
take very long for a player to win a million - or, indeed, several.
One famous night, at the Diamond Beach casino in Darwin, Kashiwagi achieved
his ambition to break the bank. At one point, he was Dollars 10m in the
hole. He was down to his last Dollars 200,000 bet when his luck changed. In
four hours, he won back his losses and went on to beat the casino out of
Dollars 19m - equivalent to its average profits for an entire year. But
Kashiwagi's most celebrated encounter was at Donald Trump's hotel, the Trump
Plaza, in Atlantic City in 1990.
The casino was struggling, like most of Atlantic City, and saw his high
action as a chance to get out of trouble. Great efforts were made to lure
him to the hotel. The Warrior was given the best suite, a split-level
apartment with hot tubs, a grand piano, butler service and a long view of
the Atlantic ocean. Security was co-ordinated round the clock. An elevator
was on standby to take him to the casino floor.
Trump was nervous. 'Wow] Two hundred thousand a hand]' he exclaimed. His
casino chief, John O'Donnell, tried to reassure him: 'Just be prepared.
There are going to be tremendous swings between now and the time he stops
playing . . . I've got a real good feeling about this guy.'
Kashiwagi brought Dollars 6m in cash (in bank drafts) and was granted a
further Dollars 6m credit; a frighteningly large sum, O'Donnell conceded.
But he was determined that the Plaza would go for it.
The Warrior went down to play on the first evening. His only concern was to
avoid publicity and maintain his privacy. He went ahead Dollars 2m. Half an
hour later, he was down Dollars 2m. And so it went. He played for eight
hours. At 2 am, two hours before the baccarat pit shut, he was still losing
Dollars 2m. Then, his luck changed. In the final hour, he won a stupendous
23 hands in a row - which was like calling heads or tails correctly 23
times. At closing time, Kashiwagi had beaten the house for Dollars 4m.
Trump, on the telephone, sounded agitated: 'How could that happen?' he
demanded. 'What do you mean, Donald? That's the game,' O'Donnell replied.
'But do we keep playing to this guy? Should we throw him out?' asked Trump.
'Absolutely not]' said O'Donnell.
Kashiwagi's streak continued. That night, he won another Dollars 2m. By
then, the local press had word that one of the world's highest rollers was
in town. But Kashiwagi took exception to a remark at the table, about how
many hands he was up, and left Atlantic City - a Dollars 6m winner. The
Trump Plaza, hell-bent on a return match, gave him a farewell gift and
provided a limousine to the airport.
***
O'Donnell, who recorded this experience in his memoirs, Trumped], was proved
right. Kashiwagi returned in the spring and dropped nearly Dollars 10m over
four days of solid play. The Whale had been landed - almost. But Trump,
sweating over the action, could not bear the strain any longer. While
Kashiwagi still had Dollars 2m in credit, Trump ordered the game closed. The
Warrior was furious. He did not have to wait long, though: a rival casino
rushed a car over to the Plaza to pick him up.
Kashiwagi also played in London, following the same routine of betting
Dollars 50,000 a hand at punto banco, as the British version of baccarat is
called. 'He played all day and all night, and never gave us any trouble,'
one casino manager recalled.
Confidants of Kashiwagi believe that the fall of the Japanese property
market in 1980 hit him very hard. He had borrowed large sums of money on
property investments, which in the good times he could service easily. When
the market collapsed, the demands on him became severe. Speculation that he
was in debt to the yakuza adds a sinister note. Such organisations know only
one way of calling-in bad debts.
One Las Vegas manager recalled that Kashiwagi himself could be very tough
when it came to settling his gaming losses. 'He had won every battle in his
life. The only place he could be denied was the baccarat table.'
In his macabre death, he was also a samurai. And, whatever the truth of his
passing, casinos around the world are going to miss him. The Warrior is no
more.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8785</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / White names his successor at Hanson: Decision to nominate
David Clarke as heir apparent at US arm surprises City
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD WHITE, one of the twin architects of the growth of Hanson, yesterday
surprised the City by announcing that Mr David Clarke would succeed him as
chairman of Hanson Industries, the industrial conglomerate's US subsidiary.
Mr Clarke, president of Hanson Industries since 1978, was introduced by Lord
White as his successor at a meeting of fund managers and analysts in London.
But Lord White later told the Financial Times he still had no plans to
resign before 1996. At the 1991 annual meeting, both he and Lord Hanson,
chairman of the UK parent company, said they would carry on for a further
five years.
Yet his decision to name a successor, after some fund managers and
commentators had called for the group to name successors to Lord Hanson,
aged 70, and Lord White, aged 69, surprised the group's own advisers.
Lord Hanson told shareholders at last month's annual meeting that a
successor would not be named on the grounds that the heir apparent would
come under undue pressure. The group's financial advisers had confidently
predicted that no successor would be named at yesterday's meeting. Lord
White, however, said that Lord Hanson had only been referring to Hanson Plc
in London.
He added: 'I have said it many times before that David Clarke is my natural
successor in the US. Our meeting with institutional shareholders was
designed to de-emphasise James (Hanson) and myself. We wanted people to
understand that we are not a one-man band.'
Many fund managers at the meeting had not realised the significance of Lord
White's casual remark that Mr Clarke, who is 50, was to succeed him, but
some of them said it reflected poorly on the way Hanson planned its
presentation.
The company made it clear that Lord White's decision was a personal choice
and would not affect Lord Hanson's decision not to name his own successor.
Unlike Lord White, Mr Clarke is also a member of the Hanson board. His
eventual appointment as chairman of Hanson Industries would end the anomaly
of having one of the most senior executives unaccountable to shareholders.
Mr Clarke, outlining his strategy for the nineties, said it would be
misleading to think that Hanson could only grow through hostile deals.
'It would be a mistake to say we have to do a mega-deal,' he said. 'A great
deal of our profits will come from organic growth and bolt-on acquisitions
to existing businesses.'
He also believes that the group will have to be better at explaining itself
in light of the criticism levelled at it after it bought a 2.8 per cent
stake in Imperial Chemical Industries.
Background story and picture Page 8
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8786</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Lex Column: Hanson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lord White's nomination of his successor is to be welcomed as the first
movement in the log-jam blocking Hanson's development. Mr David Clarke is on
record as holding sensible views about the management of the company's
organic growth in the 1990s. Hanson will be deprived of Lord White's
deal-making flair. But not only has it outgrown that stage of its history:
there is no obvious scope for the big deal in today's markets anyway.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8787</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Lex Column: Oil price
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It is a matter of debate whether the market was more unnerved yesterday by
the length of the Opec negotiations or by the unpleasant implications for
the sector of BP's annual results the day before. On balance, the former was
less relevant to the weakness of oil shares, if only because the haggling in
Geneva was always likely to be long-winded. The stakes for individual
members were too high. In the absence of agreement on whether the production
cuts needed to lift the oil price should be shared according to past output,
countries like Algeria and Venezuela had little to lose by sticking to
demands for special treatment.
In any case, a realistic interpretation might be that in getting even close
to an agreement by late yesterday, Opec had made good progress. The odds are
that it will keep up its history of pulling off a deal when it really
matters. The obvious precedent is the meeting after the price collapse to
Dollars 12 per barrel in November 1988. By the next quarter, the price was
stable at Dollars 18.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8788</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Lex Column: M&amp;G
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
This week's commitment by the Labour party not to abolish personal equity
plans (Peps) if it wins the election might be seen as taking wind out of
M&amp;G's ample sails. There have been more than a few nods and winks from
financial advisers, after all, that the fund management group's heavily
promoted Recovery Investment Trust is ideal if you have Pounds 12,000 to
spare and are worried about Mr Kinnock's intentions towards Peps when he
gets inside Number 10.
All the same, Labour's apparent U-turn must eventually be good news for M&amp;G
Group's own shares, as distinct from the products. While there is room to
ponder just how sharp investors' appetite for Peps will continue to be,
there is no doubting the stimulus which this Tory tax shelter has given to
the retail market for equities. Labour's stay of execution may encourage
some to hold on to their money this time, but others will find it hard to
resist the unprecedented level of TV advertising, the power of the
sponsoring bank SG Warburg and the enthusiasm for M&amp;G to be found among
independent financial advisers. If this month's launch meets expectations,
the two new Pep trusts could contribute as much as Pounds 5m to net profits
in the year to September and more than Pounds 4m in 1993. Not only is there
a guaranteed income flow over the 10-year life of the closed-end fund; the
lifting of the Labour cloud means the trick can be repeated.
In the circumstances, shareholders need not be unduly concerned that M&amp;G's
legendary investment record has recently lost a little of its shine. High
income unit trusts - to which M&amp;G is particularly exposed - were all in
difficulty last year, despite the efforts of Mr Paddy Linaker, M&amp;G's
chairman, to get companies to pay their dividends. His own company's shares,
which have outperformed the market four-fold over the last 10 years and
eight-fold over the last 15, continue to look an excellent bet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8789</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / The Lex Column: Pricking the asset bubble
</HEADLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FT-SE Index: 2,513.9 (
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
8.7)
One of the gloomier theories gaining ground in the financial markets these
days is that of asset deflation. In the 1980s, runs the argument, retail
price inflation of the previous decade gave way to similarly rampant
inflation in assets such as shares, houses and commercial property. Nomura
calculates that in the 1960s and 1970s the value of purely financial assets
in the developed economies grew at broadly the same rate as nominal GDP. In
the 1980s it grew between one and a half and two times as fast. On the
reasonable assumption that the earlier trend represents normality, how are
we to get back to it?
The answer, plainly, is through a combination of asset price deflation and
general inflation: the more of one, the less of the other. Asset inflation
in the 1980s was at its sharpest in Japan, producing a sixfold rise in
equity prices. Since Japanese general inflation is negligible, the result
has been a collapse of 46 per cent in the market's nominal value from its
end-1989 peak. In the UK, general inflation has played a much greater part
in the process of adjustment. Thus, though the FT-SE is now 3 per cent
higher in nominal terms than at its pre-crash peak in 1987, in real terms it
is down by 23 per cent.
Considering that house prices in London and the south-east are down by
around a quarter in nominal terms since their peak in 1989, this is only
reassuring up to a point. But when it comes to Wall Street, the thesis
becomes positively worrying. In the course of the 1980s the price of US
equities more than trebled, with yields almost halving in the process. But
still the market reaches into new territory. In nominal terms it is up by 19
per cent from its 1987 peak. Even adjusted for general inflation, it is down
only 1 per cent since then.
The past week has shown the resulting divergence to perfection. The Dow
reached yet another record on Wednesday. On Friday, Tokyo dipped again below
its danger level of 21,000. It is conceivable that the general theory is
missing something, and that the level of US equities is somehow justified.
It may be that the US economy can shrug off the debt which helped the asset
inflation in the first place. It may also be that US consumers, despite
their high gearing and reportedly low confidence, will continue responding
to lower interest rates by punting on Wall Street rather than paying down
their mortgages.
It is also possible that Tokyo will hold above the level which becomes
critical to the Japanese financial structure, despite a growing air of
nervousness among domestic investors. The trouble is that for either Tokyo
or Wall Street to go wrong would do further damage to confidence in markets
worldwide. It is asking a good deal for both to go right.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8790</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets: Amsterdam consolidates after strong
January rally - But the trend is positive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After getting off to a flying start in January, the Amsterdam stock exchange
has paused for breath in February to consolidate the gains which emerged so
unexpectedly, and so spectacularly in the first few weeks of the year.
Analysts are confident that the market will move higher again later this
year, helped by a further drop in long-term interest rates which, along with
the strong lead given by Wall Street, was the main factor fueling January's
sharp rises.
Forecasts for the timing of the next round of interest rate cuts vary from
early spring to mid-summer. As usual, however, tracking the prospects of the
internationally-orientated Amsterdam bourse is complicated by its heavy
reliance on events outside the Netherlands. A prolonged dip in the dollar,
for example, could affect the outlook for Amsterdam.
Although the market's overall direction will hinge on interest rates,
individual shares could well see significant movement over the next few
weeks due to two domestic factors - the start of the 1991 reporting season
and this month's introduction of a new law requiring investors to disclose
their stakes in Dutch companies.
Bond yields have steadied in February after a drop of 30 basis points in
January which touched off a rally in share prices, heavy trading in equities
and a series of 12 - month highs for a number of stocks.
'We've now entered a period of consolidation,' says Mr Jacques Potuijt, head
of investment research at H. Albert de Bary, a subsidiary of Deutsche Bank.
'But 1992 could turn out to be an excellent year for the bourse.' He
believes that Amsterdam could show a total return, including dividends, of
between 15 and 20 per cent for the year, but adds that a good part of this
return has already been produced by January's rally.
Although the bourse has managed to hold on to most of these gains in
February, the CBS Tendency Index has hardly moved since January 31. On
Friday, it stood at 121.9 compared with 121.7 at the end of last month. This
is a far cry from its 7.3 per cent jump in January.
The January rally focused at first on 'defensive' stocks. These included
Elsevier, the scientific publisher, which has risen by 8 per cent to Fl
107.80 since the beginning of 1992, and Wolters-Kluwer, the legal publisher,
as well as most of the food and beverages sector.
Heineken hit a succession of highs, peaking at Fl 174 on February 6 before
falling back to Fl 169.30 by Friday. Its popularity was due partly to the
re-emergence of the perennial bourse rumour that the company may be ripe for
a takeover. But with slightly more than half of the brewer's capital
controlled by the Heineken family, the likelihood of a hostile bid is
remote.
The rally later expanded to include several cyclical stocks, particularly
the chemicals groups Akzo and DSM.
With the rises so far this year spread across the board, analysts recommend
'stock-picking' rather than concentrating on any one sector.
Except for Royal Dutch/Shell, which publishes its 1991 results next week,
the annual reporting season for major companies will occur in the final week
of February or during March. Besides unveiling 1991 figures, companies will
also be releasing first-time forecasts for 1992.
In the case of Philips, whose 1991 results will be revealed on February 27,
the two main issues will be the extent to which Mr Jan Timmer has managed to
turn the company around in his first full year as president, and whether the
electricals group is ready to resume dividend payments. Compared with
Philips' last pay-out of Fl 2 per share on 1989 results, any dividend is
expected to be limited to Fl 0.50.
At the chemicals group, DSM, the question is whether management will decide
to cut the dividend, following the example of Akzo which lowered its pay-out
in 1990 from Fl 8 to Fl 6.50. Akzo, by contrast, has taken the unusual step
of already saying that it will maintain its 1991 dividend.
By coincidence, the stream of company results is timed to coincide with the
bulk of new shareholding disclosures demanded by Dutch law since February 1.
Investors who own stakes of more than 5 per cent in bourse-listed companies
have until March 3 to make their holdings known to the businesses concerned.
They, in turn, have a duty to publish the news 'forthwith' through
advertisements in the Netherlands' national newspapers.
Relatively few stakes were disclosed by mid-February, but the pace should
pick up as the deadline approaches.
'We've been told to expect 1,200 disclosure registrations, of which only a
couple of dozen have emerged so far,' says Mr Roel Gooskens, an analyst at
Van Meer James Capel.
So far, the handful of disclosures has hardly been startling, mainly because
they have involved institutional investors. For example, news that the
insurer Amev has sold its 5 per cent stake in Grolsch, the brewer, as part
of its normal investment activities came as little surprise. But
inter-company holdings are far more interesting. One example this past week
was the revelation that Aldi, the German supermarket group, owns a 5.58 per
cent stake in its smaller Dutch counterpart De Boer Winkelbedrijven.
Similar disclosures between now and early March are expected to bring
greater transparency to the Amsterdam bourse, boding well for its reputation
in the long term.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8791</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Nikkei falls on decline
in futures prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WORRIES over a possible political scandal shrouded the market yesterday. The
Nikkei average plunged on a decline in futures prices, falling through the
21,000 level for the first time since January 21, writes Emiko Terazono in
Tokyo.
The Nikkei average closed down 507.16 at the day's low of 20,883.86, after a
high of 21,405.85. The index extended its losing streak to four days,
falling 5.9 per cent on the week. Volume fell to 180m shares from 200m.
Reports that public prosecutors arrested four figures linked to an alleged
bribery scandal shook investor confidence. Losers overwhelmed gainers by 890
to 96 with 127 issues remaining unchanged. The Topix index of all first
section stocks declined 30.77 to 1,555.31. In London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index
fell 2.87 to 1,182.10.
Proposals by the Big Four brokerages to invigorate the market, announced on
Thursday, failed to affect share prices. The move was seen as another
attempt by regulators and leading brokerage leaders to 'talk up' share
prices. Last week, the ruling Liberal Democratic Party called for measures
to increase the attractiveness of stock investments, temporarily propping up
the market.
'The regulators and political leaders are in disarray, and the market is
disturbed by the uncoordinated comments and proposals,' said Mr Craig
Chudler, strategist at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew. This week, a leading LDP
politician called for a cut in the official discount rate, and the foreign
minister suggested denomination of the yen to boost economic activity.
'There is no instant cure for current conditions, and attempting to revive
the market by announcing such proposals and measures will only have adverse
effects,' said a fund manager at Dai-Ichi Mutual Life. He added that lower
interest rates and higher dividends were the only effective ways to bring
individual investors back.
Concerns over corporate earnings for the current fiscal year depressed some
issues. Brokers, which are expected to suffer from the low trading volumes
lost ground. Nomura Securities fell Y30 to Y1,520 and Daiwa Securities
declined by Y50 to Y990.
A total of 65 issues hit new lows since last year's start, including
high-technology issues, which were weaker on expectation of poor business
results. Fujitsu fell Y13 to Y755 and Hitachi lost Y12 to Y870.
The continuing investigation of the financial scandal involving officials of
a parcel delivery company drove speculative issues lower. Clarion fell Y60
to Y1,080 and Nippon Carbon plunged Y210 to Y1,730.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 391.53 to 22,711.65 in volume of 59.6m
shares. Market action centred on active cross trading for book closing
purposes.
Roundup
Pacific Rim markets were generally mixed with Hong Kong's rally continuing.
HONG KONG hit its fifth record high in seven sessions after selective
afternoon buying helped erase initial declines. The Hang Seng index closed
8.82 higher at 4,772.32, up 1.3 per cent on the week as turnover contracted
to HKDollars 2.33bn.
KUALA LUMPUR enjoyed a late rebound on last-minute orders from institutional
and corporate investors. The composite index ended up 1.12 at 595.75, 1 per
cent better on the week. SINGAPORE's further consolidation took the Straits
Times Industrial Index down 8.21 to 1,503.91, a fall on the week of 1.5 per
cent.
BANGKOK's turnover fell from a record Bt14.83bn to Bt10.21bn, three property
stocks accounting for half of that as the SET index ended 2.58 higher at
805.78, a gain of 3.3 per cent on the week.
AUSTRALIA eased in cautious trading, with the All Ordinaries index closing
down 4.0 at 1,618.9, 1.8 per cent higher on the week.
MANILA tumbled after selling of the food combine, San Miguel, and a
technical correction in Philippine Long Distance Telephone, the composite
index dropping 17.57 to 1,201.75 4.1 per cent lower on the week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8792</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG drifted lower in quiet trading. The JSE share index fell 25 to
3,672, while the industrial index shed 51 to 4,462. The all-gold index
weakened 18 to 1,308. Vaal Reefs fell R1.50 to R228.50 as the gold price
slipped to Dollars 353 an ounce.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8793</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Bourses unsettled by weakness
in New York
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES seemed unsettled yesterday by declines in New York and Tokyo
overnight, and late closers took no consolation from Wall Street's weak
opening yesterday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT maintained its sideways gait, particularly hesitant in advance of
US price and output data, due after German market hours, and Monday's Wall
Street holiday.
The FAZ and DAX indices each ended a mere fraction lower on the week as they
fell 0.53 to 686.71, and 4.91 to 1,676.48 respectively. Volume fell from
DM6bn to DM4.4bn.
There were ripples of activity. AMB, the financial holding company, ended
DM15 higher at DM875 on speculation that the insurance company
Volksfursorge, in which it has a holding, would decide to buy a reciprocal
stake in AMB. Volksfursorge said later that it had made no decision on this.
Degussa saw two-way pressure, adding DM6.50 at one point before closing
DM1.30 higher at DM348.10. The chemicals, metals and pharmaceuticals group
has support from Bank Julius Bar in Frankfurt, which sees earnings nearly
doubling over the next two years, but BZW Deutschland said this week that
there were better ways to play the economic cycle.
Among blue chips, Volkswagen lost DM3 to DM335.80 on its forecast of flat
1991 net profits.
PARIS added gentle profit-taking, and bourse talk of higher German interest
rates to Wall Street's weakness as the CAC-40 index ended 11.36 lower at
1,865.11, up 0.2 per cent on the week, in moderate turnover of FFr1.9bn.
Poor profit and turnover reports weighed on some stocks, with Cie Bancaire
falling FFr15 to FFr490 on the drop in 1991 net profits from FFr998m to
FFr866. Lafarge fell FFr3.90 to FFr313.50 with 126,260 shares traded on 1991
turnover down from FFr32.54bn to FFr31.65bn.
The industrial gases company L'Air Liquide, a recent favourite with
institutional investors, rose FFr8 to FFr732 in unusually active turnover of
196,650 shares.
MILAN saw profit-taking in active trading as the monthly trading account
closed. Turnover was estimated to be a little higher than Thursday's L110bn.
Blue chips showed declines, with Fiat down L108, or 2.2 per cent, to L4,757,
Olivetti L59, or 2.1 per cent, to L2,759 and Pirelli, which has a rights
issue on Monday, falling L15, or 1.3 per cent, to L1,110. The Comit index
fell 2.74 to 531.21, down 2.9 per cent on the week.
Sip savings shares closed down L65, or 3.6 per cent, to L1,360 following
Thursday's announcement of the closure of the L400bn bond issue by Stet, the
parent group, which has Sip savings warrants attached. The exercise price of
the warrants on Sip savings shares is L1,550.
The banking sector was generally strong, with Credito Italiano up L35 to
L2,150 and Banco Ambroveneto gaining L35 to L4,155.
ZURICH ended weaker in low volume on Wall Street and steady to slightly
higher Swiss money market rates. Interest rate-sensitive financials lost
ground, UBS bearers falling SFr40 to SFr3,760 in banks and Winterthur by
SFr60 to SFr3,630 among insurers.
BRUSSELS was led down by Petrofina which dropped BFr225, or 2.1 per cent to
BFr10,325 as the Bel-20 index closed 7.66 lower at 1,158.37, 1.1 per cent
lower on the week.
Belgium's leading glass-maker, Glaverbel, slipped BFr85, or 2.3 per cent to
BFr3,550. After the market closed, it said that 1991 estimated group net
profit plunged from BFr2.27bn to BFr700m.
STOCKHOLM was dragged down by the banking sector, which fell 3.8 per cent on
further evidence of the impact of loan losses on the financial sector. The
Affarsvarlden General index fell 9.6 to 938.9, 2.9 per cent lower on the
week.
The rating agency, Standard and Poor's, downgraded some debt of
Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken, whose A shares fell SKr3.5 to SKr45, and
Svenska Handelsbanken, which fell SKr3 to SKr81.5.
VIENNA's climb continued for the fourth consecutive day, the 18-share ATX
index closing up 18.59 at 1,066.85, a rise of 4.3 per cent on the week.
AMSTERDAM was generally mixed, with Fokker active after announcing the sale
of seven F - 100 aircraft to a Chinese regional airline. It gained Fl 0.30
to Fl 29.20. The CBS Tendency Index declined by 0.3 to 121.8, closing little
changed on the week.
A government decision to refuse a licence for the export of four submarines
to Taiwan was partly behind the decline in shares in Begemann, the
engineering group, parent of the company that was to have manufactured the
vessels. It came off Fl 4.50 to Fl 100.50.
HELSINKI closed at its highest level since last September, the HEX gaining
6.00 to 901.9, a rise of 1.4 per cent on the week.
MADRID closed marginally ahead, the general index rising 0.2 to 258.77, up
1.03 per cent on the week. The construction sector was generally strong.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - FEB 14
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm    1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     close
1133.56  1133.05  1132.08  1131.02  1131.80  1131.09  1130.29  1130.78
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Day's High  1133.71    Day's Low  1129.28
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Feb 13    Feb 12    Feb 11    Feb 10    Feb 7
1136.68   1136.12   1137.74   1137.68   1137.10
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8794</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Appointments: Constructive careers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Eric Frondigoun has been appointed chairman of MYTON following the
retirement of Dennis Rogers.
*****
Michael Walker has been appointed md of BOVIS ENGINEERING following the
retirement of Ron Mead.
*****
Glyn Cartwright is appointed sales director of IG LINTELS.
*****
Stuart Doughty has been appointed chairman of ALFRED McALPINE International
and Construction Services.
*****
Michael Lindsay, formerly of Guinness Mahon, is appointed md of MARSTON
HOUSE.
*****
Phil Cleaver is promoted to be md of Rosser &amp; Russell, NORWEST HOLST's
building services company.
*****
AMEC has appointed Joe Lock as md of Watson Steel and Robert Redgate as
financial director.
*****
David Kay, president of the Sheffield Association of the Building Employers'
Confederation, is promoted to the board of M J GLEESON.
*****
Brian Devenish has been appointed md of TRAFALGAR HOUSE Construction (Major
Projects).
*****
Stewart Maudsley has been appointed md of BM TIMBER PRODUCTS; he was
formerly commercial director of D Wickham, another BM group company. Pat
Moore is appointed deputy md of Birchwood Concrete Products.
*****
Bernard Noyes is appointed md of Trent Jetfloor, a subsidiary of MARSHALLS.
*****
Tony Lucas, until recently chief executive of Monk, has been appointed md of
AMEY CONSTRUCTION.
*****
Richard Huxster is promoted to md of TROLLOPE &amp; COLLS CONSTRUCTION; he
succeeds Mike Allen who becomes chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8795</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Pressure on BP renewed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE, PETER JOHN, COLIN MILLHAM, JOEL KIBAZO and STEVE
THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACTIVITY in BP again dominated the market with shares in the oil company
plummeting as the board met City analysts to discuss the fourth quarter
figures announced on Thursday. The meeting failed to assuage worries in the
UK market about the group's dividend paying ability.
BP shares slumped to 253p at their lowest point - immediately news began to
filter out from the analysts meeting - but later stabilised and moved up
strongly as American support appeared. At the close the stock price was 6
off at 268p.
Turnover reached a massive 62m shares, exceeding even the 40m traded on
Thursday following the disappointing profits and dividend statement.
The market hit BP shares even before analysts attended the usual post
figures breakfast meeting. Analysts left the meeting in sombre mood, some
pointing out that the market would be wrong to underestimate the strength of
the Horton-Simon-Browne-Seal management team at BP.
But most remained gloomy about prospects. One said it looked as if
shareholders were set to take the pain after the BP management's attempts to
reduce costs had failed - 'I got the feeling they're quite prepared to cut
the dividend,' said one. Another said he had gone to the meeting looking for
reassurance and 'come away with none.'
Reuters advance
News and information organisation Reuters Holdings recovered nearly all the
ground lost in its pre-results dip as investors reacted to a positive
presentation in the US on Thursday afternoon.
The shares hit 1140p at one stage before easing to close 20 better at 1135p
on heavier than normal turnover of 2.7m. A number of US analysts are
believed to have increased their forecasts for the company's 1992 profits as
hopes are pinned on an imminent announcement about the launch of Reuters'
new Dealing 2000-2 automated trading system.
Advertising agency WPP Group picked up 25 to 83p reacting to heavy US buying
overnight. WPP ended 46 per cent higher in New York on Thursday, with just
over 1m shares traded.
Arjo Wiggins Appleton fell fell 16 to 233p following a 1992 profits forecast
cut by securities house Williams de Broe.
Pearson eased a penny to 769p after announcing that it had sold its stake in
Pickwick Group to Carlton Communications for Pounds 13.06m.
Pharmaceuticals firm SmithKline Beecham fell 18 to 937p on the back of heavy
selling in New York. However, Glaxo gained 7 to 815p on expectations that it
will report healthy profits of Pounds 700 to Pounds 725m next Thursday in
first-half results that will be flattered by US dollar strength.
Nervousness ahead of full-year results on February 27 affected ICI which
fell 17 to 1265p despite positive comment.
A presentation to analysts by Hanson which was described as 'on the positive
side of neutral', and which included confirmation of Lord White's successor,
helped the shares to remain firm at 199 1/2 p. Lonrho firmed 2 to 127p on
heavy turnover of 13m.
Shell retreated 11 to 467p, after 462p, as the market turned its eyes to
Shell's figures next week. Turnover in Shell reached 14m, the highest single
day's activity since the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait triggered a surge in oil
prices. But specialists pointed out that the slide in Shell shares was
unwarranted 'Most of the problems at BP are purely BP specific,' said one.
British Gas, on the other hand, attracted strong support, closing 1 1/2
firmer at 240 1/2 p on turnoverof 6.7m as a number of institutions balked at
the prospect of a dividend cut at BP and switched into Gas.
Bass was the leading feature of the brewing sector, rising 12 to 531p on
turnover of 3.7m shares. This followed the apparent success of the company's
presentations to institutions in Scotland.
Cider producers gained some relief from a decision, by the European
Parliament, after a period of uncertainty about the drink's tax position. HP
Bulmer rose 11 to 274p and unlisted stock Merrydown gained 5 to 380p after
the European Parliament recommended that cider be given a duty category of
its own, rather than being classified with wine.
In the food manufacturing sector, brokers Panmure Gordon and Salomon
Brothers were fairly bullish about Dalgety, but the shares rose only 1 to
367p, on suggestions that growth in the consumer foods division is likely to
be tempered by poor conditions in the flour milling market. Profits for the
half-year to December 31 will be announced on Monday, and are expected to be
around Dollars 52-55.5m, compared with Pounds 51.7m previously. A half-year
dividend of 7.3p, against 7.15p has been forecast and earnings per share of
around 17.6p compared with 16.9p.
Hillsdown Holdings fell 2 to 157p after its subsidiary Towers and Co, bought
Tendercut Meats, a Southampton based meat products company, for an
undisclosed sum. Earlier this week it was announced that Unigate had sold
its chicken operation to Buxted Poultry, another Hillsdown subsidiary. Tate
&amp; Lyle gained 3 to 416p, recovering part of Thursday's losses resulting from
profit downgrades by brokers.
Leisure group Ladbroke continued to attract attention ahead of its results
next month. County NatWest is recommending a switch out of Rank Organisation
prior to it going ex-dividend on February 24 for holders who have benefited
from the rise in the shares since the results. The broker forecasts a 6 per
cent dividend increase at Ladbroke and believes the group offers better
short-term value. Rank lost a penny to 692p, while Ladbroke gained 1 1/2 to
222 1/2 p.
Holiday groups Owners Abroad and Airtours rallied as the effect of
Thursday's large placing in the latter receded. Traders also drew attention
to growing optmism over Owners' figures due next week. Airtours rose 8 to
253p, while Owners added 5 to 114p.
A buyer of 1m shares in British Aerospace helped to swell the day's turnover
to 5.4m as the shares hardened 3 to 271p. Nerves about the 1991 dividend
have, however, surfaced in some quarters ahead of next week's results.
Dividend worries at Rolls-Royce sent the shares falling 3 to 137p late in
the session. Securities house Smith New Court, believes, however, that
'Rolls will hold the dividend.'
Smiths Industries bounced from recent weakness to add 2 to 263p. The stock
is the top buy in the aerospace sector for agency broker, Panmure Gordon,
and is included in its engineering quarterly review received by investors
yesterday.
P&amp;O gave up another 13 to 378p as fears over the dividend and worries about
Chelsfield, its joint venture partner in Pall Mall Properties continued.
Volume reached 1.7m.
BAA recovred from from Thursday's falls, which followed a Kleinwort Benson
profit downgrading. The shares firmed 4 to 565p with Kleinwort and County
NatWest reported to be positive on the stock.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (68).
BRITISH FUNDS (3) Tr. 3pc 1992, Tr. 2pc IL 1994, Tr. 2pc IL 1996, AMERICANS
(6) Dial Corp., Echlin Inc., Honeywell, Lowe's, Waste Management, Whirlpool,
BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Holt (J), BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Epwin,
CONGLOMERATES (2) Jardine Hldgs., Sime Darby, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (1)
Maunders (J), ELECTRONICS (2) Hewlett-Packard, Macro 4, ENGINEERING GENERAL
(4) Black &amp; Decker, Halma, Powerscreen, Rotork, FOOD MANUFACTURING (4)
Clarke, Dalepak, Taveners, Wessanen, FOOD RETAILING (2) Argyll, Park, HEALTH
&amp; HOUSEHOLD (3) Amersham, Paterson Zoch. A N/V, UniChem, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE
(2) Courtyard Leis., Tanjong, INSURANCE BROKERS (1) Berry Birch &amp; Noble,
INVESTMENT TRUSTS (7) Abtrust Prfd. Zero Prf., Brit. Assets 6pc Cv. 1995,
Latin Amer. Extra Yield, Scot. Natl. Stppd. Prf., Scot. Value, Sphere Zero
Prf., TR Tech. Zero Prf., MEDIA (6) Central ITV, Daily Mail A, Grampian TVA,
Headline Book, News Corp., Scottish TV, MISCELLANEOUS (3) Headlam,
Lionheart, Platignum, MOTORS (2) ABI Leis., European Motors, OIL &amp; GAS (1)
Evergreen Res., OTHER FINANCIAL (4) Edinburgh Fund Mangrs., S &amp; U Stores,
Secure Trust, Swire Pacific A, OTHER PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (2) CMB
Packaging, De La Rue, PROPERTY (1) HK Land, STORES (4) Betterware Cons.
Prods., Hampden Homecare, Marks &amp; Spencer, Oriflame, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (3)
Securicor, Do. A N/V, Security Servs., TRANSPORT (2) Brit. Airways, TNT,
MINES (1) MIM.
NEW LOWS (51).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Tr. 9pc 2012, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Hoskins, BUILDING
MATERIALS (2) Blockleys, Latham (J), CHEMICALS (1) Sutcliffe Speakman,
CONGLOMERATES (2) Ensor, Reece, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (3) Howard,
Lawrence (W), Miskin, ELECTRONICS (3) Harland Simon, Radius, Standard
Platform, ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (2) UMECO, Westland, ENGINEERING GENERAL (2)
Jones &amp; Shipman, Silvermines, FOOD MANUFACTURING (1) Hazlewood, HEALTH &amp;
HOUSEHOLD (1) Kynoch (G&amp;G), HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (2) Allied Leis., Sunleigh,
INSURANCE BROKERS (3) Archer (AJ), JIB, Sturge, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) Gen.
Accident, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (9) CST Emrg. Asia Wrrnts., City of Oxford Inc.,
Drayton Eng. &amp; Inc., JF Pacific Wrrnts., M &amp; G Inc., Murray Split Cap.,
River &amp; Merc. Extra Inc. Wrrnts., River Plate Cap., Scot. Natl. Cap.,
MISCELLANEOUS (3) Eurocopy, Fitzwilton, RPS, OIL &amp; GAS (4) Aviva Petrlm.,
BP, Calor, Enterprise, PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (1) Wentworth, PROPERTY
(5) Anglo St. James, Derwent Valley, Hammerson A, London Securities, MEPC,
STORES (1) Mallett, TEXTILES (1) Alex. Workwear, TRANSPORT (1) P &amp; O Defd.,
MINES (1) Cluff Res.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8796</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Commodities Prices: Russia remains focus for metals -
Week in the Markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ATTENTION of London Metal Exchange aluminium and nickel traders remained
focused on Russia this week as concern over production problems in the
newly-independent republic lifted prices of both metals.
The LME cash aluminium price closed yesterday at a seven-month high of
Dollars 1,287.50 a tonne, up Dollars 38 on the week, while the cash nickel
price recovered from an early fall to end Dollars 135 up on the week at
Dollars 8,030 a tonne.
Aluminium prices had risen late last week in response to a Moscow diplomat's
statement that the flood Russian metal that had been depressing the market
was over. And late this week the market was given a fresh boost by a threat
to Russian exports because of the impact of new export regulations.
The management at Krasnoyarsk, the world's second largest aluminium smelter,
warned this week that it would start to shut down the plant's export sector
 -accounting for about a third of its 800,000 tonnes annual output - from
February 25 unless the government revised regulations increasing export
duties and enforcing the conversion into roubles of half the plant's
hard-currency earnings.
Few LME traders saw much prospect of the threat being carried out, however.
In view of the country's hunger for hard currency, most were confident that
the regulations would be relaxed.
Russia's Norilsk, the world's biggest nickel producer, has also complained
about the regulations, but this had nothing to do with a decision, announced
yesterday, to cut production and exports, the plant's first deputy chairman
said yesterday. 'We decided to reduce the amount of nickel we export because
world prices are very low. . . This means we can afford to reduce production
levels as well,' said Mr Boris Kazakhov.
Norilsk's annual output is estimated by western experts at about 250,000
tonnes a year.
LME nickel prices, which had already recovered most of their earlier falls,
responded to yesterday's announcement with big rises, the cash and three
months positions closing respectively Dollars 180 and Dollars 162.50 a tonne
up on the day.
The copper market also put in a creditable performance, cash metal ending
Pounds 64 higher on the week at Pounds 1,254 a tonne. But traders were not
convinced that the advance, which they attributed to technical factors, was
sustainable. They suggested that fresh consumer interest would be needed to
maintain the rally, which ran into stiff resistance at the equivalent of
Dollars 2,230 a tonne for three months metal.
Tin prices built on last week's strength as good demand for high quality
metal combined with concern over Brazilian and Malaysian shipment delays to
push cash metal up Dollars 150 a tonne on Monday and Tuesday. But the
resulting six-month high seems to have been the signal for widespread
profit-taking, and by yesterday's close the gained had been trimmed to
Dollars 70 on the week, at Dollars 5,640 a tonne. Traders noted, however,
that sentiment continued to be supported by fears of supply tightness for
April delivery.
The only LME metal to lose ground was zinc, which continued to suffer from
the build-up in LME warehouse stocks.
It was confirmed yesterday that there had been no production this year at
the lead/zinc plant in Trepca, Yugoslavia, because of production and labour
problems. But an official said full production would be resumed in March.
The plant has capacity to produce 70,000 tonnes of zinc and 110,000 tonnes
of lead annually. In the zinc market the response was a modest Dollars 4.50
price rise for cash metal to Dollars 1,125.50 a tonne, down Dollars 15.50 on
the week, while cash lead lost half an earlier technical rise to end Pounds
3 up on the week at Pounds 282 a tonne.
At the London Futures and Options Exchange sentiment became increasingly
bearish as traders suggested the projected 1991-92 production deficit might
be smaller than expected and noted that deliveries to ports in the Ivory
Coast, the biggest producer, continued to be higher than expected. A Pounds
4 rally yesterday lifted the May delivery price from a six-month low but
still left it Pounds 10 down on the week, at Pounds 698 a tonne.
Coffee prices were steadier until fund selling pushed the London robusta May
futures price through a key support area at Dollars 880 a tonne yesterday
morning to touch Dollars 876 a tonne. But roaster buying was attracted at
that level and the price ended at Dollars 888 a tonne, up Dollars 2 on the
week.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
(As at Thursday's close)
tonnes
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Aluminium  +4,725  to  1,076,875
Copper     -1,750  to    305,950
Lead          +50  to    131,700
Nickel         -6  to     18,744
Zinc       +2,425  to    177,575
Tin          +135  to     13,100
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8797</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equities sustain their trading range
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FLOOD of bad news on the corporate and economic fronts was stemmed
yesterday by satisfactory inflation data and the UK stock market bounced
convincingly after testing the lower end of its current trading range. The
market fell heavily in early trading when BP came under renewed selling
pressure, after a breakfast meeting with the board had done little or
nothing to change the bearish views of analysts in the City of London;
however, BP shares rallied later when the new session on Wall Street brought
US buyers for stock in Britain's premier oil group.
Unsettled from the outset by the falls in US and Tokyo equity sectors, the
London market followed the lead of the BP share price and a loss of 22
points brought the FT-SE Index to 2,500.6. Traders held their breath as this
important support level was tested but, with an equally significant 2,520
mark on the FT-SE March futures contract successfully held, the stock market
began to rally. BP bottomed out at the same time but continued to dominate
the market by virtue of its very heavy turnover.
The latest retail price statistics, announced at mid-morning, indicated an
annualised inflation rate of only 4.1 per cent in January, significantly
better than most City expectations. The inflation statistics helped offset
the announcement of a further fall in manufacturing and industrial
production in December.
However, the market's losses were only partially recovered and the more
convincing rally did not come until after Wall Steet opened the new session
with a minor fall, and displayed support for BP shares. With Wall Street
closed on Monday, London remained wary of the New York market, in spite of
its 30.18 Dow fall on Thursday.
Trading volume in UK equities picked up significantly in the afternoon, when
BP shares were no longer playing a leading role. The final reading put the
FT-SE Index at 2,513.9, a net loss of 8.7 on the day and of 3.3 on the first
week of the equity account.
Although unconvinced that this week's flow of economic distress will prompt
a cut in base rates, equity strategists regained confidence after
yesterday's rally in the Footsie from the 2,500 area. Long-dated UK
government bonds lost half a point yesterday, but trading volume was not on
any great scale.
'UK equities are good value at these levels from a purely domestic view,'
commented Mr Ian Harnett at Strauss Turnbull. But there is still concern
over the outlook for Wall Street and also for Tokyo in the wake of its
latest political scandals.
Retail volume in equities has fallen heavily as political and economic
worries proliferate and is now below last year's average daily levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8798</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Appointments: Edwards flies in to Lucas
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lucas Industries, the automotive and aerospace group, has broken with its
past by picking a non-automotive man and a relative newcomer to the group,
Tony Edwards, to be group managing director.
The promotion of Edwards, 47, to be heir-apparent to Sir Anthony Gill, who
has headed the group since 1987, will be seen in the City as a signal that
Lucas intends to shake up its rather inbred and conservative management
team. Edwards, managing director of Lucas's aerospace side, has been with
the group less than two and a half years and has leap-frogged Bob Dale, a
Lucas veteran who heads the much bigger automotive side.
Sir Anthony, aged 61, plans to stay on as chairman until the end of 1994 but
will hand over the chief executive role earlier at a date to be agreed.
Meanwhile, another Lucas veteran, Bryan Mason, 52, the personnel director,
has been appointed to the board.
Edwards, who started as a university apprentice with Rolls-Royce before
spending 14 years with General Electric of the US, is a well regarded figure
in the international aerospace industry. He has transformed Lucas Aerospace
from three separate nationally-based companies into a leading player in
Europe's aerospace components sector. Analysts are now hoping that he will
be able to work the same sort of magic on the group's traditional automative
side where progress has been slower.
In common with many Midlands-based companies, Lucas Industries has been hit
by the recession; pre-tax profits fell from a peak of Pounds 191.2m in 1990
to Pounds 83.6m last year. However, Edwards is being seen as the man who can
make the most of Lucas's undoubted recovery potential.
*****
Jennie Emerson, one of the few women to reach board level in the UK oil
industry, has joined the government's Offshore Industry Exports Advisory
Group. Emerson, 36, is director of international operations at Tristar
Oilfield Services in Dundee where she has established new business ventures
in Singapore and Nigeria.
She becomes the first woman to be appointed to the OIEAG which is headed by
Colin Moynihan, oil minister, and which promotes the export of UK oil
services equipment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8799</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Appointments: To Bristol, with ice
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Harveys of Bristol, the world's largest sherry company, is to have, from
March, a new managing director who comes from Hiram Walker, the Canadian
wines and spirits group acquired by Allied-Lyons, Harvey's parent, six years
ago.
Ian Hannah, 45, brand manager of Croft sherry back in the 1970s, is
delighted to be looking after the brand-leader Bristol Cream rather than
'the pretender'. He replaces Antonio Filipe, who is retiring after just a
year in the job.
A man who thinks Bristol Cream 'chilled with ice is a very nice drink',
Hannah says that Harveys, which had been allowed to operate very
independently within Allied Lyons, is now being progressively integrated
into the Hiram Walker division.
Hannah's main concern is with sherry's old-fashioned image: 'It is a very
attractive taste, and if only people didn't know it was sherry they would
think it a sensational new drink.' Closely involved with Smirnoff's 'the
effect is shattering' campaign in the 1970s, he plans to 'rejuvenate the
category, make it more contemporary'.
For the past four years he has been managing director of European Cellars
International, the French and German wine interests of Hiram Walker.
'Frankfurt and Bordeaux were a much easier commute than Jerez will be,' he
says, anticipating the difficulty of shuttling between Spain, the
production, blending and storage location, and Bristol, seat of Harvey's
worldwide sales and marketing effort.
Although not a Spanish-speaker yet, Hannah is 'going into deep immersion
soon'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8800</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar shrugs off the bears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE dollar turned in another rousing performance against the D-Mark
yesterday as it bounced back from weak economic data to close almost 6
pfennigs up since Monday, writes Peggy Hollinger.
The US unit suffered only a brief stumble after weak producer price and
industrial production statistics, falling from DM1.6225 to DM1.6150. Almost
immediately, however, the buyers moved in and the currency shot up to
DM1.6350 'without touching the sides', said Mr Steven Barrow of Chemical
Bank.
By the close, however, fears of central bank intervention had put a damper
on dollar enthusiasm. The US unit bounced off strong resistance at the
DM1.6350 level - a touch below the year's European high of DM1.6355.
The dollar finished in London at DM1.6285, compared with Thursday's
DM1.6230.
Traders suggested that some of the dollar's moves had been exaggerated by
the thin market in advance of the US holiday on Monday. However, most agreed
that market sentiment had become bullish on the US currency this week, and
was likely to remain so in the immediate future.
The dollar/yen rate moved in a fairly narrow range as rumours of
intervention circulated the market. One trader pointed out that the last
time the Bank of Japan had intervened had been on the Friday before a US
holiday. The dollar closed in London at Y127.90, near the expected
intervention level of Y128.
The dollar's rise had an adverse effect on the Swiss franc, which weakened
from SFr1.4575 to SFr1.4675. However, the franc's most notable weakness was
against the D-Mark, which rose to a two-year high against the Swiss
currency. The D-Mark closed at 90.14 centimes, compared with 89.71 on
Thursday.
'There is a feeling that Swiss rates could come down a hell of a lot faster
than the German rates,' said Mr Barrow.
Against other currencies, the D-Mark continued to feel the adverse effects
of the strong dollar. Within the exchange rate mechanism, the D-Mark fell
against the French franc from FFr3.4052 to FFr3.4039. At the Paris fix, the
German unit hit a five-month low of FFr3.4037.
Sterling enjoyed a respectable rise from DM2.8725 to DM2.8800, despite soft
economic data. Although the UK currency is still at the bottom of the ERM
grid, it was showing a divergence indicator of just minus 31 at the close
yesterday. The UK currency is allowed a swing of minus 75 before central
bank intervention.
Nevertheless, traders expected that sterling's weakness in the ERM would
still hinder an imminent rate cut in the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8801</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Money Markets: Bank holds UK rate
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK money markets ended the week on a more sober note, with rates
indicating no change in monetary policy for at least the next month.
Speculation had been rife earlier in the week that the Bank of England would
indicate an interest rate cut when it announced the retail price index
yesterday. In the event, the Bank disappointed the optimists, keeping its
assistance near the current interest rate level of 10 1/2 per cent.
The Bank had 'brought the market around to their way of thinking,' said a
senior trader. 'There are a lot of tired bulls out there,' he added. As a
result, the futures market had fallen, with the March short sterling
contract closing lower than in recent days at 89.76.
The one-week interbank rate was firmer at 10- 9/16 per cent. Even one-month
money was pessimistic about a rate cut, closing at 10 5/8 - 1/2 per cent.
Further out, things were looking a little brighter with the key-three month
interbank rate holding steady at 10 7/16 - 5/16 per cent.
Overnight rates were extremely volatile yesterday, trading between 9 and 11
1/2 per cent. The rate closed higher at 11 1/4 per cent.
During the day, the Bank twice revised the forecast market shortage, with
the final figure pitched at Pounds 1.15bn. Treasury bills and maturing
assistance accounted for Pounds 1.103bn of the shortfall, the rise in note
circulation a further Pounds 530m, and bankers' balances below target were
expected to take out about Pounds 100m. Exchequer transactions were
initially forecast to add Pounds 415m back in.
By lunchtime, the Bank had stepped in with assistance of Pounds 830m. The
injection was comprised of Pounds 115m in band one bank bills at 10 3/8 per
cent, with the rest in repurchase agreements at 10 7/16 per cent for resale
on March 4,5 and 6.
In the afternoon, the Bank bought Pounds 215m worth of band one bank bills
at 10 3/8 per cent and gave late assistance of Pounds 50m. This left the
market Pounds 55m short.
Tax payments flowing out of the system forced up call rates in Germany to
9.60/65 per cent, compared with Thursday's 9.50/60 per cent. Liquidity was
also being squeezed by payments due on the DM1.22bn four-year notes launched
this week by the German railroad authority.
In the US, the Federal Reserve did not operate in the market. Funds were
trading at 3 15/16 per cent, close to the presumed target of 4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8802</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Arab bank buys stake in Perrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARAB Banking Corporation, the Bahrain-based bank, yesterday disclosed it had
acquired a 1.4 per cent holding in Perrier, the French mineral water company
being fought over by the Agnelli family of Italy and Nestle, the Swiss food
group.
Arab Banking acquired more than 130,000 Perrier shares over three days and
emerged with a stake of 1.4 per cent.
The disclosure of the holding fuelled speculation in Paris that it had been
buying Perrier stock on behalf of one of the protagonists in the
Agnelli/Nestle fracas. However, Arab Banking said it had bought the shares
for its own account. In spite of this, Perrier's shares rose from FFr1,569
to FFr1,575 yesterday. Its shares resumed trading in Paris last Monday
having been suspended since mid-December in the wake of the Agnellis'
FFr5.6bn (USDollars 1.01bn) bid for Exor, the mineral water company's
controlling shareholder.
The shares gained 13 per cent during the week - having begun at the
suspension price of FFr1,396 - on rumours of a counter-offer to the
FFr13.42bn bid by Nestle and Indosuez, the French bank. Perrier ended the
week trading far higher than the FFr1,475 offered by Nestle and Indosuez.
Next week the Perrier battle moves into the legal arena. The critical
question is whether the French commercial courts will decide in favour of
Nestle's application to annul the purchase of 13.8 per cent of Perrier by
Saint Louis, the French sugar company allied to the Agnellis.
On Wednesday, the Nimes commercial court is due to announce its ruling on
the legality of the Saint Louis share purchase. The first of the Paris court
rulings is expected next Friday with the final judgment to be delivered on
February 25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8803</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Top Swedish banks downgraded
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S two leading commercial banks had their long-term debt ratings
lowered yesterday by Standard &amp; Poor's, the US credit rating agency. Both
Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken (SEB) and Svenska Handelsbanken were rated at
AA and will now be AA-.
S &amp; P said about Dollars 30bn of SEB's debt and Dollars 802m of
Handelsbanken's debt would be affected. It said the changes reflect the
deterioration of the banks' asset quality, caused by the continuing
recession.
The credit losses in 1991 largely stem from the banks' significant exposure
to the troubled Swedish commercial real estate market.
S &amp; P added that Sweden's lingering economic downturn was likely to 'cause
further weakness in the property sector and elsewhere, prolonging the asset
quality dilemmas of both banks until 1994, and perhaps beyond'.
However, S &amp; P pointed out that the core earnings of the two banks before
loan losses and provisions continued to be strong, primarily driven by
healthy and increasing net interest margins.
It acknowledges that decreasing competition has allowed the banks to show
'more flexibility in pricing loans while the rising domestic savings rate
and a flight to quality by depositors have caused an inflow of retail
deposits'.
The agency added that continued improvement in core results was expected to
limit overall deterioration, created by asset-quality problems.
Two weeks ago both banks warned that their 1991 results had been hit badly
by credit losses. Handelsbanken reports its figures on February 18 and SEB
on February 25.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8804</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
India abolished export cess (3.5 per cent) on hard currency sales of cassia
and cinnamon, reports Man-producten. Demand evident for spot and nearby,
especially for better grades. Cloves: Madagascar resellers USDollars
1,425-Dollars 1,400 a tonne for afloat and Feb/Mar shipment. Spot cloves
hardly available. Ginger: good demand from North Africa and Europe. Nigerian
split ginger Dollars 950, Cochin ginger Dollars 975. Nutmegs/mace: buyers
looking for offers to cover their needs for positions as far as 1994.
Pimento: Mexico not available until new crop Jul/Aug. Jamaican spot Europe
traded Dollars 2,500, shipment Dollars 2,425 cif.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8805</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Placer Pacific improves in spite
of higher tax charge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BRUCE JACQUES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PLACER Pacific, the Australia and Papua New Guinea gold mining group, has
shrugged off a substantially higher tax charge to record a modest rise in
earnings in 1991, writes Bruce Jacques in Sydney.
The company yesterday announced a 5 per cent improvement in net profits to
ADollars 67.3m (USDollars 50.7m) from ADollars 63.9m following a 20 per cent
advance in sales revenue to ADollars 579.8m from ADollars 485.0m. This came
in spite of a big turnround in the company's tax position from a ADollars
3.5m credit to a ADollars 56.5m charge. This reflected the introduction of
tax on gold earnings in Australia and higher tax in Papua New Guinea.
The important element in the rise in earnings was record gold production
from Placer's five managed mines - Porgera and Misima in Papua New Guinea,
and Kidston, Granny Smith and Big Bell in Australia.
Gold production from the mines almost doubled to 2.07m oz from 1.15m oz,
with Placer's share rising to 946,611 oz from 687,936 oz.
The directors said the average cash gold production cost for the period was
ADollars 227 per oz against an average selling price of ADollars 521 per oz,
but higher production brought a steep rise in costs.
The company's total cost of sales rose 32 per cent to ADollars 271.5m from
ADollars 205.6m. Depreciation was up to ADollars 133.8m from ADollars
102.4m, but interest expenses eased to ADollars 18.9m from ADollars 27.8m.
Kidston Gold Mines, Placer's listed offshoot, announced a 72 per cent fall
in earnings to ADollars 16.3m from ADollars 58.9m in 1991, reflecting higher
costs and a 19 per cent slide in sales revenue to ADollars 104.8m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8806</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Toyota profits plunge 30% in
first half
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRE-TAX profits at Toyota Motor, Japan's biggest vehicle manufacturer,
plunged by 30 per cent to Y208.9bn (Dollars 1.6bn) in the first half to the
end of December.
The poor results for one of Japan's strongest manufacturing companies is a
reflection of difficult conditions facing a broad range of companies.
Sluggish domestic demand has led to increased competition, rising marketing
costs and slimmer profits, while the rise in the value of the yen against
foreign currencies has bitten deeply into the value of exports.
Toyota said that the stronger yen cost the company Y50bn during the period,
while increased wages accounted for another Y20bn of increased expenses.
The company was also hit by rising depreciation, accounting for Y40bn and
increased marketing and administrative costs.
Sales during the period rose by 1.6 per cent to Y4,434.6bn on an
unconsolidated basis in spite of a 1.2 per cent decline in unit vehicle
sales to 2.06m.
At the operating level, profits plummeted by 61.6 per cent to Y77bn, with
increased non-operating financial income and extraordinary items lifting
profits at the pre-tax level.
Japan was plainly Toyota's most difficult market during the period, with
sales off by 4.6 per cent to 1.2m units.
Exports none the less rose from 825,229 vehicles to 857,538. The buoyancy of
exports was accounted for by strong demand from South America and the Middle
East, while sales to the US declined.
Sales of industrial vehicles fell by 6.9 per cent to 29,683 units.
Toyota said that the recent declines in interest rates, which it expected to
continue, were likely to lead to a recovery of demand in Japan in the second
half of the year, although it was pessimistic about the global market.
Exchange rate movements would continue to cost the company money.
Earnings after tax came to Y103.6bn, a decline of 33.7 per cent.
Toyota said it expected net earnings for the full fiscal year to reach
Y200bn, compared with Y329.6 last year.
Capital spending in the current fiscal year, including plant construction in
Hokkaido and Kyushu, was budgeted at Y565bn, compared with Y641.9bn last
year.
The company said this level of capital spending would not be maintained as
plants under construction were nearing completion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8807</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: Daihatsu pulls out of US car
market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US recession yesterday claimed its first victim in the Japanese
automobile industry when Daihatsu, the Japanese vehicle maker, decided to
stop selling cars in the US.
Daihatsu, in which Toyota holds a minority stake, said it would halt
production of two vehicles made for the US market - the Charade subcompact
and the Rocky, a four-wheel-drive sports utility vehicle - in order to stem
mounting losses.
The withdrawal by Daihatsu from the US follows similar moves last year by
Rover Group of the UK and Peugeot of France, which decided to abandon the
American car market in the face of continuing heavy losses and dwindling
sales in the US.
Although Daihatsu has only a small presence in the US, its withdrawal will
no doubt be welcomed by US makers concerned about their steady loss of
market share to Japanese competitors.
Daihatsu's move illustrates the financial pressure affecting some of Japan's
smaller vehicle makers and their increased vulnerability to swings in the US
market.
With the Japanese vehicle market stagnating, and profits under pressure due
to intense competition, Japanese car makers no longer have a safe profitable
haven at home that allows them to support difficult operations overseas.
Daihatsu is Japan's second biggest manufacturer of mini-cars for the
domestic market. Total Daihatsu domestic vehicle sales last year declined by
1.7 per cent to 484,475 units, although a sharp 16 per cent decline in
mini-car sales in December is indicative of troubles facing the company.
The sales have been undermined both by the sluggishness of vehicle demand
and by changes in parking regulations that removed advantages formally
afforded to mini-car owners. Profits are expected to decline sharply in the
current year.
In the US, Daihatsu had hoped to achieve an annual volume of 50,000 vehicles
a year when it launched operations in 1987, but sales in the current fiscal
year ending in March are expected to total only 10,300 units.
Daihatsu said that it decided to terminate sales after concluding that it
would be impossible to nurse the operation to profitability. The company
said it would continue to honour warranty commitments to vehicle owners and
would maintain a service and parts supply network. It had no immediate plans
to reduce US employment.
Nissan, Japan's second biggest vehicle maker, last week decided to shut down
its loss-making Australian plant.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8808</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: VW expects to repeat 1990
earnings level
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLKSWAGEN, the German motor group, said its group net profits for 1991
would only be around the level of the previous year and those of its parent
company would be lower as a result of new model and production costs.
The group's net profits in 1990 were DM1.1bn (Dollars 679m), a rise of 4.6
per cent.
In the first nine months of last year, earnings rose by 1 per cent to
DM628m, but pre-tax profits were 6 per cent lower at DM1.6bn. Like other
German companies, VW has been trying to cut its high costs and produce more
abroad.
VW, which has just brought out its latest Golf family car, said total
turnover was about DM77bn (Dollars 48bn) last year, a rise of 13 per cent.
Deliveries of VW, Audi, and Seat cars increased by 2.5 per cent to 3.13m
units. Including Skoda, the Czech concern in which VW owns 31 per cent and
has management control, the figure was 3.3m.
Czechoslovakia is one of the main areas in which VW plans to invest in the
1990s. Out of planned capital spending of DM51bn over the next five years,
Skoda will account for DM6.1bn. VW has added to its Czech involvement with
an assembly venture in Bratislava.
VW's investment plans span Mexico, Portugal, China, and Taiwan. It plans to
supply the US and Canada with favourably priced models, including the Golf,
from low-cost Mexico, where it will invest DM1.5bn.
VW benefited considerably from the sharp increase in car demand caused by
German reunification. Its domestic deliveries went up by 27.5 per cent to
nearly 1.2m vehicles, with sales of its Seat models nearly doubling.
Other markets were less positive. Hit by the recession, VW group deliveries
in the US slumped by 31 per cent to 109,000 cars. In South America, where VW
is a partner in the Autolatina joint venture with Ford of the US, sales in
Brazil and Argentina improved. Autolatina's sales were 3.6 per cent higher
at 285,000 units.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8809</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / International Company News: LTV revises reshape plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LTV, the large US steel company which has been living under bankruptcy
protection for the past five years, yesterday filed a revised reorganisation
plan which, it claimed, has the support of key creditors' groups, writes
Nikki Tait in New York.
Under the terms of the modified plan, the bulk of LTV's cash would still go
to its under-funded pension plans, and unsecured creditors would generally
get stock in the ongoing company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8810</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Rumours fuel share rise as banks support
WPP
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES of WPP, the world's largest advertising agency, jumped 25p to close
at 83p yesterday after a meeting between the troubled company and its
bankers produced 'no surprises'.
The stock has doubled from 42p a week ago. Support has come from heavy US
buying and rumours about positive developoments for WPP.
WPP and auditors from Price Waterhouse are understood to have presented the
group's 1992 budget yesterday to its bankers. The company did not request
additional funds from the banks which last January refinanced Dollars 1bn of
debt. Bankers said, however, that WPP could require another Dollars 75m
either in April or in the autumn.
The main rumour during the week was that Interpublic, the US agency, was
looking at Ogilvy &amp; Mather, the agency which Mr Martin Sorrell, WPP's
chairman, bought in 1989. Interpublic denied any knowledge of such interest.
A further rumour that bankers had sewn up a Dollars 200m financing package
was also denied, and a story that Mr Ross Perot, the Texan billionaire,
would back WPP, was also believed to lack any basis in fact.
Bankers at the meetings said WPP had performed well enough since its
restructuring last January not to have breached its new covenants, an
achievement one banker said, was 'not a common occurrence in
restructurings.'
The banks were being supportive and while WPP had not done particularly well
it was 'hanging in there' while waiting for an upturn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8811</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Chelsfield rekindles interest in the City -
A look at the mystery property group's finances
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ELLIOTT Bernerd, head of the private Chelsfield group, is one of the
best-known deal makers in the property industry.
But since April 1990, when Chelsfield teamed up with P&amp;O to buy Laing
Properties for Pounds 492m, he has been out of the public eye.
Not for much longer, perhaps. Mr Bernerd says that he is poised to do a deal
that 'will give us an important critical mass to move forward'.
At the same time, the City's interest in Chelsfield's finances has been
rekindled. P&amp;O's share price dropped on Wednesday on rumours that its joint
venture with the company was in difficulties.
Separately on Wednesday, the High Court gave Chelsfield 28 days to pay an
outstanding sum of Pounds 2.9m, which should have been paid last October.
The dispute concerns Bishops Move Group, a removal company that owns a
40,000 sq ft warehouse near Victoria. It says that Chelsfield had defaulted
on its Pounds 3.6m purchase of the property, agreed in December 1990.
Mr Bernerd said Chelsfield had not paid the money because it was pursuing
legal action against the vendors concerning assurances allegedly given about
the property. However, this is hotly denied by Bishops Move Group.
P&amp;O's share price fell after it emerged that Chelsfield was attempting to
raise Pounds 150m, in what the market assumed was an effort to shore up its
balance sheet.
However, Mr Bernerd later said the funds were required to fund the demerger
of Pall Mall, Chelsfield's joint venture with P&amp;O that acquired the Laing
portfolio.
The fund-raising was not, in itself, surprising. The demerger of Pall Mall
had been been expected for over six months.
But the plans for Pall Mall, its structure and the relationship between P&amp;O
and Chelsfield still cause considerable confusion in the City.
'Chelsfield has remained a complete mystery to people,' says one analyst who
researches P&amp;O.
It is perhaps an exaggeration to say that nothing is known about Mr Elliott
Bernerd, who has an almost legendary reputation in the property industry.
He started as an estate agent, joining forces in the early 1970s with Town &amp;
City, which was later merged with Sir Jeffrey Sterling's company. In the
1980s, he developed Stockley Park, built up and sold his estate agency to
Morgan Grenfell, and set up Chelsfield, which masterminded some high profile
deals, such as the acquisition of the Wentworth golf club in 1989.
But, like all private companies, financial details about Chelsfield are
scarce. In the year to July 1990, the company made a pre-tax profit of
Pounds 22.3m, down from Pounds 23.1m a year earlier. Its net assets at that
date were Pounds 35.3m, down from Pounds 55.5m. Its gearing was 138 per
cent.
How far the picture has deteriorated is unclear. Even though Chelsfield has
no development properties, its rental income does not cover its interest
costs.
One factor in its favour is that it has no City offices - the worst
performing sector in the market.
Pall Mall's position is also unclear. Even though P&amp;O and Chelsfield bought
Laing at a 20 per cent discount to its net asset value many analysts thought
they overpaid. That disquiet has intensified as property values in the UK,
the US and Canada have plummeted.
Analysts are concerned because Pall Mall is a highly-geared vehicle. Their
back-of-the-envelope calculations suggest that Pall Mall has debt of some
Pounds 800m (Pounds 300m of which was injected at the time of the takeover)
and assets which were worth roughly Pounds 1bn at the time of the takeover.
Undoubtedly, those assets have fallen steeply in value. P&amp;O and Chelsfield
wrote them down by 20 per cent to their acquisition cost six months of
acquiring them. If they have fallen further, they may wipe out the Pounds
150m of equity in the company and some of the debt.
The debt that would be affected is probably the Pounds 300m loan from Lloyds
Bank that funded the takeover. This was a 'non-recourse' loan, meaning that
the bank would have no claim over the parent company if the loan turned
sour.
Mr Bernerd is clear that Chelsfield would have no compunction about walking
away from the Pall Mall debt if it could not be paid. However, he emphasises
that there is 'absolutely no risk at all' that this will happen. Far from
fretting about the ability to repay Lloyds, Mr Bernerd describes the
demerger of Pall Mall as 'a prelude to a major move.' He explains that the
delay in dismantling Pall Mall was due to tax complexities, 'heavy dialogue'
about how the portfolio should be split and the need to raise funds.
Mr Bernerd says his efforts to raise Pounds 150m should be successful in a
matter of weeks. He is less forthcoming about how he expects to raise the
remainder of the Pounds 250m that he has agreed to inject into Pall Mall to
acquire his share of the Laing portfolio. He hints, however, that it is part
of a larger deal.
Mr Bernerd claims to be sanguine about his acquisition of Laing.
But its long-term success cannot yet be judged as its depends, he implies,
on his plans for a major corporate move. 'Watch this space,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8812</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Headlam in Pounds 5.4m floor coverings buy
from Hickson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In the latest in a string of moves going back over 5 months, Headlam, the
footwear and fabrics group, is proposing to buy three businesses - HFD
(South) - from Hickson Flooring Distributors, part of Hickson International,
the Yorkshire-based chemicals group, for Pounds 5.36m cash.
To fund the acquisition, Headlam is placing up to 11.6m new ordinary shares
on a 7-for-6 basis at 58p each to raise Pounds 6.1m net. The price
represents a 2.5 per cent discount to Thursday's closing price.
Since September Headlam has been in discussions with Hickson with a view to
buying the latter's UK floor coverings interests and indeed assumed
responsibility for the day-to-day management of HFD. Terms could not be
agreed for the whole of HFD, but in January Headlam bought two floor
covering distribution businesses - in Stockport and Newcastle-upon-Tyne and
called HFD (North) - for Pounds 742,000 cash.
Mr Graham Waldron, Headlam chairman, said that his group had considerable
experience of the floor coverings distribution industry - he himself had
been involved for nearly 30 years - and that to confine the group's core
distribution activities to the gradually shrinking UK footwear manufacturing
market would weaken the group's performance and financial position.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8813</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Godfrey Bradman resigns from Rosehaugh
board
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR GODFREY Bradman yesterday resigned from the board of Rosehaugh, which he
built into one of the UK's best-known property development companies before
it plunged into severe financial difficulties at the end of the 1980s.
Mr Bradman's resignation has been expected since he announced plans to step
down from chairman to vice-chairman last December.
At the same time, Rosehaugh announced pre-tax losses of Pounds 227m for the
year to end-June and said it had breached its covenants.
The company has extended its standstill agreement with its banks and is
trying to renegotiate a medium-term facility, the directors said.
Mr Bradman will receive slightly less than his annual salary of Pounds
100,000 as a severance payment.
Mr Bradman said that following the appointment of Leonard Kingshott as
chairman and the reorganisation of the board and various divisions of the
group, he believed it was no longer necessary for him to continue as vice
chairman and a member of the board.
He said he wished the board well in guiding the company 'in what will
hopefully be a new chapter in its history.'
Mr Bradman is continuing as a director of London Regeneration Consortium,
which is planning a development at King's Cross.
He will also be available to advise Rosehaugh on other matters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8814</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: M&amp;G sets up largest investment trust issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
M&amp;G, the fund management group, is launching what is likely to be the
largest investment trust new issue ever.
Up to 995m package units in the Recovery investment trust are on offer at
100p each - although M&amp;G does not expect to raise anything like as much as
Pounds 1bn.
The offer has been set at a level which ensures that it will be enough to
meet applications.
The trust will follow the same investment philosophy as M&amp;G's Recovery unit
trust, which has a very good long term record, but has failed to beat the
returns available from a building society over the past five years.
The recovery philosophy does badly in recessions but M&amp;G says it provides
opportunities to buy shares cheaply which will subsequently perform well
when the economy grows once more.
Like many other recent investment trust issues, the trust is linked to a
Personal Equity Plan (PEP) and is timed so that applicants can place a full
Pounds 6,000 of shares into PEPs for each of the 1991-92 and 1992-93 tax
years. The incentive to use next year's PEP allowance may have been reduced,
however, by the Labour party's statement this week that it will not abolish
PEPs.
M&amp;G has mounted an intense marketing campaign for the new trust, including
television adverts, after the flotation of the Income Investment Trust last
year raised Pounds 246m.
The trust has a split capital structure, with three classes of shares. Zero
dividend preference shares will pay no income but will have first claim on
the trust's assets when it is wound up in 2002.
The planned redemption value of the zeroes will be 150p, but that will
require a 5.01 per cent per annum growth in the assets of the trust.
Income shares will be entitled to all the income of the trust but will have
a guaranteed repayment value of 0.1p per share. They will also be entitled
to the revenue reserves (if any) when the trust is wound up. The forecast
gross dividend is 5p per share.
The capital shares will be entitled to the assets of the trust after the
zeroes and the income shares have been repaid. The initial net asset value
per capital share will be 50.9p.
There will also be a geared ordinary unit, comprising one income and one
capital unit.
The individual classes of shares and the geared unit can only be purchased
through a tender offer via financial intermediaries.
Through an offer for subscription, individuals can buy a packaged unit of
all three shares at 100p.
The tender offer closes on March 20 and the offer for subscription closes on
March 27. Dealings are expected to start on April 3.
For comment, see Serious Money, Weekend page II
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8815</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / UK Company News: BP shares fall on worries over future
dividends
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN British Petroleum, one of the UK's leading stocks, plunged early
yesterday in a belated reaction to the previous day's poor 1991 results.
Although they recovered later in the day, they closed close to their lowest
point in more than a year.
At the worst moment the shares were trading at 253p, a fall of 19p. The
closing price was 268p, down 6p. Turnover was an exceptionally heavy 61m
shares.
The fall was triggered by a breakfast meeting which Mr Robert Horton, the
chairman, held with stock analysts to brief them on the results. While the
meeting did not yield any fresh information, analysts said that Mr Horton
failed to provide any guarantees that BP's dividend might not be cut at some
future date.
BP has maintained a staunch policy in the past of rewarding shareholders
with a steady increase in real terms. But on Thursday it left its final
quarter dividend unchanged, giving shareholders an overall increase for the
year of 4.7 per cent, barely more than the 4.5 per cent rate of inflation.
The company said it was 'an appropriate moment to pause for breath'.
Mr Paul Spedding, oil analyst with Kleinwort Benson, said the meeting 'was
looking for reassurance on the dividend and didn't get as much as it had
hoped for.' The results had also driven home to analysts that external
factors had become more important for BP's performance than before.
Although he did not believe that BP would cut its dividend, it was now
possible to construct a scenario where the dividend was under threat.
BP's shares began to recover in the middle of yesterday thanks to some
buying from US institutional investors. But traders said that UK holders
were still selling.
Some analysts said they expected BP's shares to lose more ground before they
recovered. The fall was reflected in other oil stocks yesterday, including
Shell, which closed at 467p, down 11p.
The sell-off came despite the fact that many analysts found BP's results
slightly better than they had expected. The company reported a fourth
quarter profit on a replacement basis of Pounds 72m, down from Pounds 456m
in the previous year's final quarter. This gave it a full-year result of
Pounds 1.04bn, down from Pounds 1.2bn. Mr Horton blamed the result on the
recession, while stressing that BP had taken steps to ensure that it could
live with a weak oil price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8816</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter (2): Women, child care and a tax anomaly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms FIONA JOHNSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As evidenced by your series of articles on nursery provision in the UK,
it is clear that the current level of provision is inadequate to meet the
needs of potential women returners and employers who wish to take advantage
of their skills. Local authority nurseries have limited capacity, while the
expense and scarcity of private provision precludes many families from using
these facilities.
The answer must be a more lenient taxation regime. Currently employers are
required to play an active role in the management of nurseries in order for
the relevant employees to qualify for tax relief. The majority of businesses
are situated in urban areas where it is unrealistic to operate workplace
nurseries; the number of employees benefiting from this measure is minimal
and small and medium sized enterprises are particularly disadvantaged. The
introduction of tax-free benefits in kind for employees for whom provision
is bought by the employer from a third-party provider is a necessary step to
encourage the establishment of adequate facilities.
There are a number of Chambers of Commerce, and potentially many more, which
operate nursery facilities on behalf of employers in their membership.
Employees using these facilities are not eligible for tax relief. This
anomaly must be removed.
Fiona Johnson,
policy executive,
Association of
British Chambers
of Commerce,
9 Tufton Street,
London SW1P 3QB
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8817</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter (1): Women, child care and a tax anomaly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms MAUREEN GORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Mrs Johnson's letter (February 13) regarding work (or the lack of it)
for women over 40 misses the point. Better childcare provision now will
ensure that more of the managers of the future are women, who are less
likely than their male counterparts to discriminate against older women. It
is in the interests of everyone to ensure that education and training are
not wasted in women - whatever their age]
Maureen Gore,
5 Elms Farm Road,
Hornchurch, Essex RM12 5RH
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8818</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter: Absence of nuclear levy focused attention on costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JAMES HANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In your article 'Big power users fight electricity price rises'
(February 4) you refer to 'the element in their bills that goes towards the
annual subsidy for the UK's nuclear generation sector'.
The fact is that what you are describing only applies in England and Wales.
In Scotland, we do not receive the 'so-called' nuclear levy - an important
distinction to make.
In this company we are trying very hard to reduce our cost base and last
year's published results will indicate that our operating costs were lower
than those of fossil fuel generators, PowerGen and National Power.
Currently, we are engaged in significant negotiations with the government
and British Nuclear Fuels to reduce the cost of our fuel cycle services - as
you reported ('Scottish Nuclear to cut fuel reprocessing needs', February
11) - all in an attempt to reduce the cost of electricity generated by
nuclear power.
It could even be said that the absence of the nuclear levy in this company
has really focused our attention on the urgent need to reduce costs as soon
as possible, and preferably before the 1994 review.
James Hann,
chairman,
Scottish Nuclear,
Minto Building,
6 Inverlair Avenue,
Glasgow G44 4AD
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8819</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter: A management elephant trap
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr P A DAVIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Mr Akio Morita is better at making Walkmans (or should that be
Walkmen?) than avoiding elephant traps ('Sony chief says accountants should
not lead industry', February 7). The one he has fallen into concerns the
different requirements for leadership and success in British and Japanese
manufacturing companies. Britain's commercial history is different from his
in Japan. The success of competing manufacturing industries within different
cultures therefore rests on a number of different factors, such as training,
long-term investment, planning, working practices, automation, age of
infrastructure, philosophy of industrial life and, of course, the quality of
those leading the business.
If those currently leading many of the most successful businesses in the UK
are chartered accountants, this is surely attributable to the fact that,
historically, chartered accountants were the only fully trained business
professionals in this country. It has not been the practice of enough UK
companies to train their engineers and technologists in the broader range of
skills received to lead their companies, although there is evidence that
that is now changing. Meanwhile, Bibby, British Steel, GKN, Glaxo, Racal and
Arjo Wiggins Appleton are just a few of the major UK manufacturing
businesses of world class with chartered accountants leading their boards.
P A Davis,
chairman,
Board for Chartered Accountants in Business,
Institute of Chartered Accountants,
Moorgate Place,
London EC2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8820</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter: Customer service the key factor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ALAN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, British Rail's director of public affairs uses your columns to list the
achievements of his organisation over recent years (Letters, February 13).
There is a striking absence in this list of any mention of tangible
achievement in the area of customer service. This is, of course, because, by
any objective measure, service has fallen substantially. Until BR
understands that success in this area is the most important measure, it
should desist from blowing its own trumpet.
All the customer seeks is satisfaction in the three basic areas of
cleanliness, comfort and - most important - reliability.
Alan Burton,
1 Wealden View,
Burwash,
Sussex TN19 7BW
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8821</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter: Elderly would be bigger NHS burden if private health
tax relief removed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRISTOPHER JOHNSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Labour's announced intention to withdraw tax relief on private medical
insurance for the elderly ('Cook seeks end to tax relief on private
treatment', February 11) may well prove to be short-sighted and ill-advised.
The 600,000 persons estimated by the Treasury to be benefiting from the tax
relief are already facing significant premium increases because of rapidly
rising claims costs. If tax relief were withdrawn by a future Labour
government, the elderly would face an immediate further substantial price
increase of several hundred pounds. This could well be followed by
additional increases because of the extra marketing and administration costs
which insurers would be forced to carry in reversing the recent tax relief
concession. Implementation of the tax relief has itself already cost medical
insurers several million pounds.
The result of all this could easily be that many elderly people will no
longer be able to afford medical insurance and will be forced once again to
rely solely on the NHS for treatment. As well as lengthening the waiting
list, this would result in a quite considerable extra financial burden on
the NHS.
Medical insurers pay out more than Pounds 1bn a year in claims to all
subscribers. Even if only some of the 600,000 elderly people who currently
have tax relief were forced to cancel their cover, the extra cost to the NHS
for treating them could dwarf the Pounds 50m 'saved' revenue anticipated by
Labour.
Christopher Johnson,
general manager,
strategic communications,
Private Patients Plan,
Tavistock House South,
Tavistock Square,
London WC1H 9LJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8822</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter (2): Pensions: resolving surpluses problem through
RPI link and collateral question through the law
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From H R WYNNE-GRIFFITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It would appear that the collateral used by Mr Maxwell in raising bank
loans did not belong to him; it belonged to the trustees of the pension
funds that have apparently been plundered.
It is appalling that the pensioners of those funds should suffer whereas the
banks appear to have title to that collateral.
The law should be changed so that the onus is put upon the lender to satisfy
himself that the collateral used on a loan does in fact belong to the
borrower. Had such a law been in place much of the agony suffered by Maxwell
pensioners would have been avoided.
H R Wynne-Griffith,
Barnett Waddington &amp; Co,
11 Tufton Street, London SW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8823</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Letter (1): Pensions: resolving surpluses problem through
RPI link and collateral question through the law
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ALAN SMALLBONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Mr Richard Malone (Letters, February 11) expresses concern about
identifying the rights of schemes' members to surpluses, but the solution is
simple; just link all pensions to the Retail Prices Index.
As Bacon and Woodrow stated in their pamphlet, 'A fair deal for early
leavers', in 1983: '. . . if inflation were eliminated, rendering increases
to pensioners and deferred pensioners unnecessary, this would have the same
effect on costs as the provision of increases to counteract inflation . . .'
Employers, confident that their workers will not understand the truths of
actuarial maths, pretend that they cannot afford 'more', pocketing the
windfalls of inflation (in the form of contribution holidays and claims to
surpluses), at staffs' expense.
Alan Smallbone,
30 Temple Fortune Lane,
London NW11 7UD
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8824</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Man in the News: Solicitor with a pressing case to present -
Robert Winstanley
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT RICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If you are driving along London's Westway in the dead of night and something
black streaks past too fast for you to read Yamaha XJ900 on its side, the
chances are that it is Mr Robert Winstanley, duty solicitor.
He will be on his way from his home in west London to help someone locked up
in police cells across town.
For Mr Winstanley and many other legal aid lawyers like him, this week has
been a watershed. On Wednesday more than 2,000 solicitors gathered at
Central Hall, Westminster, to protest at the government's plans to introduce
standard fees for criminal legal aid work in magistrates' court.
They came from all over England and Wales to try to explain to Lord Mackay,
the Lord Chancellor, why his proposals had brought many of them to the brink
of strike action - a course which would have been unthinkable to many in the
profession just six months ago.
Coming on the heels of the collapse of the second Guinness trial and as the
year-long Blue Arrow trial drew to a close, the angry meeting added to the
growing feeling that Britain's criminal justice system was in crisis.
As chairman of the Law Society's remuneration and practice development
committee, Mr Winstanley was instrumental in organising the protest. At
first glance, it appears an unlikely role for the Cambridge-educated
43-year-old. Married with two children, he looks as though he would be more
at home in the corporate finance department of a large City law firm than
running a legal aid practice from a terraced house at the unfashionable end
of the City Road.
There is no doubting his commitment to his colleagues, however. He is
incensed by Lord Mackay's proposal to introduce fixed fees for criminal
legal aid.
The Lord Chancellor, anxious to stem the inexorable rise in legal aid
expenditure, wants to cap the fees paid to lawyers for criminal legal aid
work to encourage them to be more efficient and provide better value for
money.
Mr Winstanley says: 'The Lord Chancellor says his proposal is not a
cost-cutting measure and the profession won't lose out. But some cases you
put less work into and get overpaid for. Others, where you have to put in a
lot of work, you get underpaid for.'
Mr Winstanley and his colleagues accept that there is no bottomless pit of
money to pay legal aid solicitors. But they believe there is scope within
the present system to cut waste. For example, a simple paper procedure for
transferring cases from the magistrates' court to the Crown Court would save
thousands of court appearances a year, he claims.
Clearly, legal aid solicitors would like to earn more. The government's
offer of a 3 per cent increase in overall legal aid pay rates this year is
'totally unacceptable', Mr Winstanley says. But did he approve of the
barracking and hissing of Lord Mackay on Wednesday? It could have been
worse, he replies. He feels uncomfortable about attacks on the man himself;
it is the government they should be aimed at, he says.
Mr Winstanley welcomed the appointment of Lord Mackay, but his term in
office has been rather disappointing, he says. 'I suppose my real
disappointment was the way he caved in over ending the barristers' monopoly
on advocacy in the higher courts.'
Despite his misgivings about Lord Mackay's proposal to introduce standard
fees, Mr Winstanley does not favour strike action by withdrawing from the
duty solicitor scheme. But he understands the feelings of those solicitors
in Southampton who have taken industrial action, and those in Devon and
Cornwall who have threatened to.
In defending their actions, he says that although solicitors have a
professional duty to existing clients, they do not represent such clients
when working under the duty solicitor scheme. Under the scheme, he argues,
they perform more of a social service for someone who needs legal advice on
a single occasion. These cases may never yield permanent clients.
To understand his own reservations about strike action, it is necessary to
refer to the period before 1984 when the Police and Criminal Evidence Act
which established duty solicitor schemes was introduced. 'If it's your view,
as it is mine, that it is desirable that people under arrest at police
stations should have legal representation, then, morally, I don't see how
you can call for solicitors to withdraw from that service,' he says.
Before the act, Mr Winstanley says, and the introduction of tape-recording
of interviews with suspects, there were several miscarriages of justice
which resulted from suspects being what he calls 'verballed' - having
statements wrongly attributed to them by the police.
'But if Lord Mackay persists with his standard fees scheme and his proposed
increase in legal aid pay, solicitors won't be able to stay in business,' he
maintains.
To the public, all this may look like solicitors' self interest and the
issues may appear somewhat arcane. 'Well, I'm not going to pretend to you
that the issue has captured the imagination of the country at large,' he
says.
Mr Winstanley argues that it is not the lawyers who are the problem; it is
the waste in the system. Look at the costs incurred in the second Guinness
trial, he says, and the enormous cost of staging the year-long Blue Arrow
trial. There has to be a way of narrowing down the issues in these trials.
'Someone has got to take these cases by the scruff of the neck and reduce
the number of charges to bring the case within manageable limits. No fraud
case, however complex, should take more than three months at the absolute
outside, and I really think they ought to aim at two months. On that basis I
would stick with jury trial for complex frauds.'
He views it as ironic that part of the reason for the failure of the second
Guinness trial was the strain put on the health of Mr Roger Seelig after he
decided to represent himself. Mr Seelig's wealth meant he did not qualify
for legal aid and yet he felt he could not afford to hire a lawyer, Mr
Winstanley adds.
The court had the power to grant Mr Seelig legal aid, whether or not he
applied for it. Mr Winstanley feels that, with the benefit of hindsight, it
might have saved money to have granted him legal aid at the outset.
What next in the solicitors' campaign? The first priority will be a meeting,
to be held within a fortnight, between Lord Mackay and the president of the
Law Society, for whom Mr Winstanley will provide back-up. He says that after
watching Lord Mackay's performance at Wednesday's meeting he is worried that
the Lord Chancellor still has not grasped solicitors' concerns about
criminal justice.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8825</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Leading Article: The wheel of fortune
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A NERVOUS frisson passed through the City of London yesterday when news
emerged of convictions in the Blue Arrow trial. It was not simply that the
convictions were unexpected in the light of Mr Justice McKinnon's summing up
and his decision to have most of the indictments struck out. This was the
first time, in the spate of recent financial cases, where scandal penetrated
to the heart of the banking and securities community.
While the judge had admittedly ordered the corporate defendants in the case
to be acquitted, the four convicted individuals were former senior
executives in subsidiaries of mainstream City institutions: National
Westminster Bank and UBS Phillips &amp; Drew. The same was not the case in the
first Guinness trial, where three of those convicted, Mr Ernest Saunders, Mr
Gerald Ronson and Sir Jack Lyons, came from outside the City, while the
fourth, Mr Anthony Parnes, was remote from the City establishment.
Few in the City had even heard of Mr Peter Clowes, who on Monday was found
guilty on 18 charges of theft and fraud, before the collapse of his Pounds
150m investment group. And unlike Mr Roger Seelig, late of Morgan Grenfell,
who ended up defending himself in the second Guinness trial which collapsed
earlier this week, the men from NatWest and UBS Phillips &amp; Drew were not
abandoned by their former employers. Their legal fees were underwritten.
At the end of it all, it is hard to escape the feeling that the wheels of
justice have ground slowly, messily, expensively and indeed randomly in a
financial community that is no longer ruled by the club ethic. Different
defendants in the Guinness and Blue Arrow trials, for example, enjoyed
wholly different degrees of legal support depending on their private means,
a worrying inequity that calls to mind the words of the learned judge who
remarked that the law in Britain is open to all, like the doors of the Ritz
hotel.
Arbitrary compensation
The extent of compensation for the victims of recent crimes looks even more
arbitrary. Those investors who voluntarily handed their spare cash to Mr
Peter Clowes to invest in an off-shore tax haven have been baled out by the
government because the Department of Trade and Industry behaved negligently
in its handling of the affair. In contrast, the pensioners in the late Mr
Robert Maxwell's empire, many of whom were obliged to contribute to the
pension fund as a condition of employment, are being promised no
compensation at all, despite the government's dismal and repeated failure to
heed warnings about the vulnerability of such funds to both criminal and
legally permitted forms of rape.
And there is, of course, no escape from randomness where the law operates in
volatile markets. The Blue Arrow rights issue was overtaken by the 1987
stock market crash. If the crash had taken place in November rather than
October, executives at County NatWest and UBS Phillips &amp; Drew might never
have found themselves in the dock.
Overhauled structures
Practitioners in the City in the 1980s were operating in a period of
transition, as the nature of regulation and the structure of financial
markets were simultaneously overhauled. They were as prone to swings of
fortune as any Elizabethan courtier. It took the present raft of criminal
trials to persuade them to minimise the risk by seeking legal advice at
every step.
Yet there is another sense in which these trials have not been random. They
are the inevitable coda that follows a period of monetary excess.
De-regulation in banking, the removal of the old stock exchange cartel and
the internationalisation of financial activity have contributed since the
mid-1980s to an immense increase in competitive pressure, which in turn has
increased the temptation to cut corners to preserve profits.
Against that background, it may appear arbitrary that a handful of
individuals carry the can, when the leaders of the banking community made
such grave errors of judgment, notably in throwing huge sums of money at
Blue Arrow, Maxwell Communication Corporation and the rest. If there is a
justification for such justice, it is that huge takeovers involve important
decisions on matters of industrial structure and employment. In the absence
of the club ethic, the rigour of the law must be implemented pour encourager
les autres.
But the framework remains flawed. In retail financial services, recent
legislation failed to put adequate obstacles in Mr Maxwell's way as he
looted pensioners' money; it failed to prevent yet more complaints about
Lloyd's of London, or to crack down on the sale at fat commissions of
inappropriate insurance products. In predominantly wholesale markets the
administrative processes of the law failed dismally, most notably in the
Guinness trial. There has to be a better way.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8826</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / A song and dance on CDs: The current debate over prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The high price of compact discs ranks lower in the litany of British gripes
than the weather or late trains. Nevertheless, the idea that the music
companies are engaged in shameless profiteering at the expense of CD buyers
is widely held.
Late last month aggrieved consumers received backing from a surprising
quarter. Sir Malcolm Field, group managing director of retailer WH Smith,
called on the music companies to provide a wider range of lower-priced CDs.
The appeal was timely. At the beginning of the year, WH Smith had announced
that it would stop selling long-playing vinyl records. With music companies
and retailers reducing the number of releases available on vinyl, consumers
would welcome a reduction in compact disc prices.
Many compact discs sold in the UK are expensive, compared with both other
musical formats and with prices in the US. The CD of Luciano Pavarotti's
1991 concert in London's Hyde Park sells for Pounds 12.99, compared with
Pounds 8.49 for either the cassette or the LP. Mr Mark Kingston, spokesman
for the International Federation of the Phonographic Industry (IFPI), which
represents the music companies, says that the average full-priced CD sold
for Pounds 11.99 in the UK last year. In the US, CDs sell for Dollars 12 or
Dollars 13 (Pounds 6.60-Pounds 7.10).
Sir Malcolm's appeal for lower prices, which came after his announcement of
a difficult year for the group's music retailing business, elicited a frosty
response from the music companies. 'I didn't know what he was talking
about,' says Mr Rupert Perry, UK managing director of EMI Records. 'They had
a difficult year so they had to blame someone.' Music companies such as EMI,
Virgin and PolyGram say there has been a large increase in the number of CDs
selling for Pounds 5-Pounds 7.
London's large record stores do sell CDs at a wide variety of prices. Some
are undoubtedly expensive. At the HMV store on Oxford Street, pop group
Queen's greatest hits are selling for Pounds 14.99. Leonard Bernstein
conducting Beethoven's Ninth Symphony in newly united Berlin costs Pounds
14.29, as does the CD of Pavarotti, Placido Domingo and Jose Carreras
performing in Rome during the 1990 World Cup.
On the other hand, Herbert von Karajan taking the Berlin Philharmonic
through Beethoven's Fifth and Eighth Symphonies is on sale for just Pounds
7.99. With the Mozart bicentennial over, HMV has devoted an entire rack to
the composer, with CDs at Pounds 2.49 each.
Mr Jeremy Silver, spokesman for the British Phonographic Industry (BPI), the
IFPI's UK arm, says that 30 per cent of all CDs sold in the UK are priced at
Pounds 9 or less. Mr Will Whitehorn, corporate affairs director at the
Virgin Group, says his company's central London store is selling 35,000
medium-priced titles. Although WH Smith has a 50 per cent stake in Virgin's
retailing operation, Mr Whitehorn claims to be mystified by Sir Malcolm's
comments.
But there are still two anomalies that the music companies need to explain:
that US retailers sell the same products so much more cheaply, and that the
price of CDs seems high relative to production costs. Both charges elicit an
angry response from music industry managers.
Mr Whitehorn says: 'I bought myself a pair of jeans in the States for
Dollars 34. Most products in the States sell for the same price in dollars
as they do in pounds here.'
He adds that one reason why compact discs are more expensive in the UK than
in the US is that vinyl record sales have proved more durable in Britain,
where CDs have had a more exclusive image. In the US, LP records have almost
disappeared.
In any event, says Mr Whitehorn, 'I do not believe CDs are expensive. When I
was 17, in 1977, an LP cost between Pounds 4.50 and Pounds 5.50. In 1991,
you can get a CD with more music and infinitely higher quality for Pounds
10.99 to Pounds 11.99.'
The music companies deny, too, that CDs are expensive relative to
manufacturing costs of about Pounds 1 a disc. They point to the cost of the
recording, performer's and composer's royalties, packaging and its design,
distribution and the expense of signing well-known artists. The IFPI put the
total average production cost of a CD in 1990 at Pounds 6.34.
Mr Silver at BPI argues, moreover, that the idea of an average production
cost is misleading. He says that the more stable classical music market is
used to subsidise the higher-risk pop industry. 'Companies have to balance
their books by offsetting their high-risk product with sure-fire product.'
The strongest argument the music companies have is that the appropriate
price of a CD is what consumers are prepared to pay. And, whatever the
price, British consumers are buying them in increasing quantities. Last
year, the number sold in the UK rose by 23.4 per cent to 62.8m. The
cumulative increase over the past two years has been 50.6 per cent. Over the
same period, the number of LPs sold fell by 66 per cent to 12.9m, in spite
of their lower selling price.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8827</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Casualty of Vietnam: The trials of Bill Clinton and the US
Democrats
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LIONEL BARBER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Here we go again. An articulate, young(ish) Democratic presidential
candidate promising new ideas and a new direction for America is on the
brink of self-destruction.
All is not lost; but unless Governor Bill Clinton of Arkansas manages a
reasonable showing in the New Hampshire primary election next Tuesday, he
faces the prospect of a fall from grace no less stunning than the collapse
of Senator Gary Hart's campaign in 1987.
Allegations of infidelity have hurt Mr Clinton, but they are less clear-cut
than those which ruined Mr Hart, whose philandering was captured in a
photograph of him with a pin-up girl aboard a boat, appropriately named
Monkey Business. Far more damaging to Mr Clinton are the charges of
draft-dodging during the Vietnam war, which now threaten to reawaken the
conflicts which polarised the country more than 25 years ago.
In some ways, the furore mirrors the controversy that erupted in the 1988
presidential campaign after it emerged that then-Senator Dan Quayle had
avoided combat duty in Vietnam by obtaining a much-coveted place in the
Indiana National Guard. Then, as now, many Americans asked themselves
whether anyone could run for president or vice-president who belonged to the
Vietnam generation and sought, however briefly, to avoid military service.
Mr Todd Gitlin, a sociologist at the University of California, Berkeley,
believes that the next two or three presidential campaigns will be haunted
by these conflicts. 'A whole generation of middle-class guys faced a moral
anguish and resolved it in a variety of ways. I'm not so sure there were any
clean outcomes, not with this sort of morality play.'
Even some of Mr Clinton's supporters voiced concern about his character.
Campaigning alongside the governor in Portsmouth, New Hampshire, last
Tuesday, Mr Don Mitchell, a former local mayor, said: 'It's not just
Vietnam. It was the sex, the drugs, the mini-revolution we had in 1968.
Anyone who steps up to run for president from this generation has this
problem.'
Just four weeks ago, Mr Clinton looked as if he had the nomination within
his grasp. Influential US newspapers wrote gushing profiles about the bright
young man who was ready to reform the 20-year-old liberal Democratic
orthodoxy which has led the party to five defeats in the last six
presidential elections.
Mr Clinton is not easily typecast. He talks about civil rights, such as the
right of women to choose an abortion, but stresses responsibilities, too. He
supports tighter work requirements for welfare recipients and sanctions
against high-school drop-outs such as the withdrawal of a driving licence.
He is without doubt the candidate who has thought most about the issues. He
is blessed with boyish good looks and an infectious charm, without the
brooding, loner instincts of Mr Hart.
Even the Democratic party establishment in Washington laid aside its doubts
about his pedigree. Sensing that President Bush might be vulnerable in
November, the elders embraced the outsider from the south who could appeal
across liberal/conservative lines. In a word, he possessed 'electability'.
This electability is now in grave doubt.
Mr Clinton's slide began when two New York City tabloids gave front-page
treatment to old allegations about an extra-marital affair put forward by a
cabaret singer in Little Rock, Ms Gennifer Flowers. These stories had been
checked and dismissed by the Arkansas press, according to Mr Ernie Dumas, a
columnist at the Arkansas Gazette.
At first, the mainstream US press was reluctant to run the adultery story,
knowing that Mr Clinton had sought to inoculate himself by admitting
publicly to unspecified marital difficulties.
More seriously, many in the media were wary of being accused of doing the
Republicans' dirty work. Memories of the shallow 1988 campaign - when
symbols such as pledging allegiance to the flag became more important than
the future of the US economy - remain fresh.
Thus, when Mr Clinton's strategists urged reporters to stick to issues, many
reporters were willing to accommodate them (even though the resulting
coverage favoured Mr Clinton, who carries five-point plans in his hip
pocket).
In the past fortnight, as the New Hampshire primary drew closer, all leading
news organisations lost their squeamishness. This shift in mood stems partly
from a realisation that the market in Clinton futures had skyrocketed in
December and January, without any real press scrutiny of the product. More
important was Mr Clinton's own inability to lay the rumours about his
extra-marital conduct to rest just at the time when he became the
media-crowned front-runner.
In an effort to salvage his campaign, Mr Clinton went on national television
with his wife, Hillary, and admitted to 'wrongdoing'. But the confession
raised more questions which the tabloid press eagerly followed.
Enter the Wall Street Journal. Ten days ago, the Journal reported that Mr
Clinton, when a Rhodes scholar at Oxford, gained a place in the Reserve
Officer Training Corps (ROTC) after pledging to attend the University of
Arkansas Law School - a ruse which allowed him to defer military service for
four years.
Again, the story was old, but there was a new twist: a disgruntled Arkansas
reserve officer, now retired, supplied ABC News with a letter in which Mr
Clinton expresses thanks for 'saving me from the draft'. He also
acknowledges misleading the ROTC about his opposition to the war and his
intention to serve in the programme.
Mr Clinton was forced to make public the whole letter, which makes poignant
reading. Here is a 23-year-old, a gifted student, from a troubled, poor
family, wrestling with his conscience. He is anxious to avoid any action
which could harm his future political career ('I do not think our system of
government is by definition corrupt') - a clear sign he wants to remain in
the political mainstream.
Consumed by guilt about his efforts to evade military service, he ended up
submitting himself to the draft. However tortured, this enabled him to argue
that he was, in fact, willing to serve his country (he drew a high lottery
number and was therefore not required to serve).
Mr Clinton's stand on Vietnam contrasts favourably with thousands of
middle-class Americans who were content to let less privileged minority
groups, notably black Americans, fight the Vietcong while they embarked on
their professional careers. Others, such as Mr Quayle and Mr Dick Cheney,
the defence secretary, secured deferments by dint of their college careers.
Vietnam was indeed a class war.
Yet these subtleties may not be so easy to convey in a modern US
presidential campaign, when television forces politicians to deliver their
messages inside 15 seconds, and TV demeanour is often viewed as the most
reliable gauge of personal trustworthiness.
Mr Clinton, nicknamed 'Slick Willy' in his home state, may come across as
just a little too smooth; the fact that he has admitted to personal mistakes
on two significant issues - marriage and the Vietnam war - at this juncture
in the campaign may cost him dear.
Senator Tom Harkin of Iowa pronounced, perhaps prematurely, that the Clinton
candidacy was doomed. Senator Bob Kerrey, himself a Vietnam war hero who
lost half a leg and ought to benefit from Mr Clinton's troubles, has
vacillated, as so often in this campaign. 'I do not want to re-open the
wounds of Vietnam,' he said.
Congressional Democrats such as Senator Lloyd Bentsen and Congressman
Richard Gephardt are taking a second look at the risks of entering the race
at this late stage. Governor Mario Cuomo of New York refuses to disown a
'draft Cuomo' movement in New Hampshire aimed at showing that voters are
unhappy with the current crop of candidates and want an outsider to enter
the race.
Any late-entering Democrat faces huge obstacles. When the polls close in New
Hampshire, primary filing deadlines will have passed for states that account
for almost 60 per cent of the delegates who select the presidential nominee
at the July Democratic Convention in New York.
Yet the party hungers for a winner. Mr Clinton's contribution to date has
been to push the party in a direction in which it can recapture the middle
class which deserted the Democrats in droves in the 1970s and 1980s. But he
is still dispensable. 'Remember,' said a southern supporter on Capitol Hill:
'It is the message, not the messenger, that matters.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8828</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Spending on training 'to be cut by Pounds 170m'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART and CATHERINE MILTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SPENDING PLANS for the Department of Employment for the next three financial
years, published yesterday, confirm that cuts in spending on training in
real terms will be about Pounds 170m next year.
Overall spending for the department next year will rise nearly Pounds 0.5bn
to Pounds 3.8bn for England and Wales.
The department will spend Pounds 2.7bn on training and vocational education
and nearly Pounds 1bn on the Employment Service next year.
Mr Tony Blair, shadow employment secretary, said that in real terms Youth
Training (YT) would be cut by Pounds 50m next year and Employment Training,
for the adult unemployed, would be cut by Pounds 60m.
The department did not question those figures but said the reduction in YT
budgets reflected reduced demand as a result of a slight increase to 61 per
cent in the school stay-on rate for 16-year-olds next year.
The reduction in ET is the result of studies by the department which show
that not all unemployed people require training.
The department and Labour also clashed over the interpretation of figures
relating to the Employment Action programme, the emergency make-work scheme
for the un-employed, which should provide 60,000 places in 1992-93 at a cost
of Pounds 170m.
Mr Blair said the scheme was a dismal failure and had attracted only 8,200
people. The department said the figure at the end of January was 8,500,
which represented a large rise on the figure of 5,130 at the end of
December. The department confirmed yesterday that some jobs are likely to be
cut as a result of the Styles review of the Employment Service, which
employs nearly 50,000 people at Jobcentres and benefit offices. However, it
described union fears of 1,000 job cuts as 'speculation'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8829</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / BNFL to reduce its workforce by 750
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRIS TIGHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH NUCLEAR Fuels is to cut 750 jobs at its head office and design
centre at Risley, near Warrington, Cheshire, the company said yesterday.
The cuts, which affect engineering and design staff, are due to the rundown
of construction at BNFL's Sellafield nuclear waste reprocessing plant in
Cumbria.
BNFL has been spending Pounds 1.5m a day on construction work at Sellafield,
mainly on the development of the Pounds 1.85bn thermal oxide reprocessing
plant (Thorp) which will come into operation later this year.
BNFL said the job losses, which would reduce its engineering division from
1,750 to 1,000 by the mid-1990s, were necessary for it to become more
competitive. The division is being restructured to focus on core technical
and engineering skills, including project management, with greater use of
external contractors for other work.
Mr Peter Roberts, BNFL group director of engineering, said: 'The
restructuring will allow us to cope with the peaks and troughs of business
demands.' BNFL said it was seeking business internationally on engineering
projects.
The company said the cuts would be achieved through natural wastage,
non-renewal of fixed-term contracts and voluntary severance. In addition, an
unspecified number of contract agency staff would be phased out.
The company said many of those affected were nearing retirement age, and
that it was too soon to speculate about compulsory redundancies.
Mr Dai Hudd, national officer of the IPMS white-collar union, said: 'We are
bitterly disappointed that the company should need to cut so many jobs. It
is not a company with its back to the wall.'
The rundown of Sellafield construction will also result in about 5,000 job
losses by spring 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8830</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / ELS receivership puts 550 jobs under threat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABOUT 550 jobs were put at risk yesterday at 40 ELS stores throughout
England and Wales as administrative receivers were called in at the troubled
furniture chain.
ELS, which is wholly-owned by the Greater Nottingham Co-operative Society
(GNCS), had been particularly badly hit by the collapse of the housing
market.
According to KPMG Peat Marwick, the receiver, it had suffered 'continuing
significant losses'.
ELS had turnover of Pounds 50m last year. The company employed 423 full-time
workers and 123 part-time staff.
KPMG said it would seek to sell the business, or parts of it, as going
concerns. It added that the first priority was to ensure that cus-tomer
orders were ful-filled.
All the stores have been closed to allow stock-taking to be completed.
Customers who have paid deposits are advised to telephone the stores from
Monday onwards.
GNCS, which runs several other businesses, is unaffected by the receivership
at ELS. For some weeks, however, the society has been in merger talks with
Co-operative Wholesale Society.
GNCS's members have approved the merger which is expected to be confirmed by
mid-March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8831</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Bristol link road
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT has given the go-ahead for a Pounds 47m dual carriageway
linking the M32 and Bath Road in Bristol. The road is at the heart of plans
for regeneration of the city centre.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8832</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Glynwed jobs go
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GLYNWED International, the engineering group, is to combine its two West
Midlands copper tube businesses on one site with the loss of about 200 jobs.
The Continental Tube plant at Great Bridge will be transferred to Wednesday
Tube at Bilston.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8833</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Hydro to raise prices by 4.9%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HOUSEHOLDS in northern Scotland face a 4.9 per cent rise in charges in April
from Scottish Hydro-Electric, the first electricity company to announce
increases for the coming year. Hydro's rise last year was 9 per cent.
Hydro said it had undercharged last year and was entitled to recover its
costs from customers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8834</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Japanese lose their aversion to western-style profligacy:
Traditionally stern savers, people in Japan have discovered the credit card
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RECENT box office hit in Japan depicts debtors beating debt collectors
helped by a Robin Hood-like agency. In real life, such agencies do not
exist, but the release of the film, Yonigeya-Honpo - which literally means
Moonlight Flit Agency - comes as Japan's rising consumer debts are becoming
an increasing problem.
After the years of loose money and lavish spending of the late 1980s, the
image of the Japanese being keen savers is in dire need of review.
'Consumer behaviour in Japan has changed from saving and spending to
borrowing and spending,' says Mr Kunji Okue, economist at County NatWest,
the UK brokerage firm. According to government figures, consumer debt per
household totalled Y4.9m (Pounds 22,000) in 1990, a 67 per cent rise from
1985.
In the film, Moonlight Flit Agency, a young man wearing an Italian suit
deftly shuffles his deck of credit cards. 'I only want the best for myself,
and I can get it,' he says. Many Japanese, especially the young generation,
share the feeling. If they cannot afford it, they can always use credit. To
them, the traditional sense of guilt associated with borrowing money is
alien.
Many older Japanese are appalled by the change in values, but on the other
hand, many of the older generation too have been driven by materialism as
frugal habits gave way to the stock and real estate market boom of the
1980s.
The sinful image of 'debt' written out in kanji - Japanese characters - was
eliminated by the use of the English 'rohn' (loan) or 'kurejitto' (credit).
The current labour shortage also gave the younger generation a sense of job
and wage security, and reduced the urgency to save.
However, a lack of education about the dangers of credit and a rise in
interest rates have pushed up the number of bad debts. According to Japan's
supreme court, personal bankruptcies last year totalled 23,287, double that
of five years ago, and the underlying rate of debt problems is increasing
even more rapidly.
Banks, which competed to lend to retail clients in the late 1980s also face
problems. According to the Federation of Bankers Associations of Japan, the
number of defaults by consumers at banks rose a year-on-year 54 per cent in
1991 to 171,320.
Credit cards, which have become popular over the past seven or eight years,
are causing problems. Aggressive marketing by consumer credit companies
pushed up the circulation of cards to 166m by last March, doubling the
figure five years before.
Eager to increase market share, credit card issuers, which range from
retailers to leasing companies, are now regretting that they didn't bother
with stringent credit checks on new cardholders.
'There has been no systematic introduction of credit cards in Japan, and
credit information on the individual is virtually unavailable,' says Mr Greg
Kaufman of Consumer Credit Clearance, a debt collection agency.
Worried authorities have started to establish a centralised data base on
borrowers, by accumulating existing information held by the credit
companies. But calls by the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of
International Trade and Industry to contribute client information, have been
met with cool response by the credit card issuers.
Authorities also have trouble regulating some consumer finance companies,
which charge rates as high as 40 per cent a year on loans, and are known for
their strongarm approach to delinquent debtors.
Meanwhile, the rising consumer leverage may have adverse effects on the
Japanese economy. Mr Okue at County NatWest says that as the amount of
household debt rises, consumer spending will be directly affected by
interest rate and wage movements, making fluctuations in the economy more
volatile.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8835</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Many more companies go bankrupt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CORPORATE bankruptcies in Japan rose 46.9 per cent in January compared to a
year ago, the Teikoku Data Bank said yesterday, as the decline in property
and share prices continued to put pressure on businesses.
It was the 16th consecutive month to register year-on-year increases in
bankruptcies, with 949 cases. Although this was a decline from 1,204
bankruptcies registered in December, Teikoku said that adjusting for
seasonal factors, levels were continuing to increase.
The high level of business failures reflects the slowing of the economy and
government policies aimed at curbing rampant asset price inflation of the
last decade. The liabilities of bankrupt companies reached Y448.2bn, (Pounds
2bn) down from Y642.3bn a year ago.
Although the Finance Ministry lifted restrictions on property-related
lending in January, Teikoku said that continuing bank reluctance to lend to
the sector had caused a number of companies to go under. The gradual decline
in interest rates since the summer has also failed to bring relief to the
sector.
Property companies again headed the list of bankrupt companies, with 86
cases recorded.
In spite of the continuing slowdown in the economy, inability to hire
sufficient labour was cited as a cause of 46 bankruptcies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8836</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Zambia asks UK to write off debts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN, Africa Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Frederick Chiluba yesterday stressed his government's commitment
to economic reform and sought British backing for Zambia's appeal to
creditors to reschedule or write off its Dollars 8bn (Pounds 4.4bn) external
debt.
Mr Chiluba, on a two-day official visit to London, put Zambia's case for
debt relief and new aid in a meeting at Downing Street yesterday with Mr
John Major, the British prime minister.
Mr Major told President Chiluba, who came to power last October in Zambia's
first multi-party elections for 22 years, that Zambia would be eligible for
debt relief under the Trinidad terms, set out in 1990 by Mr Major when he
was chancellor.
The prime minister told the Commonwealth conference in Harare last October
that Britain was prepared unilaterally to implement the terms, which
envisage writing off two-thirds of the export credits owed by the world's
poorest countries.
The two men signed agreements, negotiated after Mr Chiluba's election
victory, rescheduling Zambia's 1992 debt obligations to Britain, and
releasing Pounds 10m balance of payments support from Britain which had been
frozen pending the economic reforms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8837</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Libya to put bomb suspects before judge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TUNIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE two Libyans accused of the 1988 Lockerbie bombing will appear at a
public hearing before the Libyan judge investigating the case, the official
Libyan news agency JANA said yesterday, Reuter reports from Tunis.
The Libyan announcement follows moves by Britain, France and the US to
prepare a UN Security Council resolution imposing an air and arms embargo on
Libya until it hands over the suspects.
A British lawyer who interviewed the suspects says they are eager to go on
trial to prove their innocence.
The US and Britain allege the two men were Libyan intelligence agents and
were involved in bombing the Pan Am airliner over Scotland which killed 270
people. Four other Libyans are suspected of blowing up a French UTA airliner
over Niger in 1989 in which 271 died.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8838</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / China and Vietnam to end rivalry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA and Vietnam, whose rivalry fuelled the Cambodia conflict, agreed
yesterday to boost economic co-operation and help ensure the success of the
UN peace plan in Cambodia, Reuter reports.
Vietnamese Foreign Minister Nguyen Manh Cam told a joint news conference
with Chinese Foreign Minister Qian Qichen in Hanoi that Chinese Premier Li
Peng had accepted an invitation to visit Vietnam in the second half of the
year.
Cam signed an agreement with Qian yesterday covering economic co-operation
between Vietnam and China and another lifting visa requirements for
diplomats and those travelling on official business between the two
countries.
Qian's trip was the highest level visit from Beijing since China launched a
border war against Vietnam in 1979, when the Beijing-backed Khmer Rouge
government in Cambodia was defeated by an invading Vietnamese army.
China and Vietnam promised to help ensure the implementation of the
Cambodian peace plan signed in Paris last October by their warring proteges.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8839</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Cuba doubles vegetable prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HAVANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Cuba's government doubled the official prices of several vegetables
yesterday, moving to cut heavy state farming subsidies and offset the rising
cost of fertiliser, pesticide, herbicide and seed imports, Reuter reports
from Havana. The official Communist party newspaper Granma announced the
price increases to consumers who are already squeezed by tight rationing and
shortages of some food products and practically all consumer goods.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8840</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Japan closes nuclear chapter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Japan's sole nuclear-powered vessel, the Mutsu, was taken out of commission
yesterday, closing its 23-year history as an experimental ship, writes Emiko
Terazono in Tokyo.
The end of the controversial Mutsu project symbolises the failure by the
Japanese government to reach consensus on nuclear energy within the country.
The 8,242 ton Mutsu was launched in 1969. The vessel's maiden voyage, in
1974, was a disaster. Within minutes of the first test, a radiation leak was
detected and the voyage was abandoned, amid damning publicity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8841</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Police probe rumours over health of Collor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRASILIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZIL'S police chief has opened an investigation into the spreading of
rumours about President Fernando Collor's health.
Stock markets fell 7 per cent following a report, circulated on Thursday by
Faxpaper, an agency which sends bulletins to companies, that the president
was to undergo major surgery.
Not even strong denials from the presidency and a public appearance by Mr
Collor stopped the market fall.
This is the latest in a series of rumours about the president's well-being
and the second time in a week that the bourse has been affected.
Mr Collor has lost a considerable amount of weight since taking office
nearly two years ago and has recently given up exercising in public.
His appearance has deteriorated so much that at a recent news conference a
Brazilian reporter asked him if he was suffering from Aids.
Mr Collor's spokesman said yesterday he believed the rumours had been leaked
for speculation reasons, adding that he had asked the police to investigate.
Under Brazilian law, spreading rumours against the interests of the economy
is a criminal offence. Yesterday, the federal police asked the National
Securities Commission for details of unusual movements in the market.
Brazilian press reports suggest that the source of the rumours is among Mr
Collor's own staff. However, as one diplomat commented: 'It would be very
easy for Collor to end these rumours by re-starting his beloved jogging. The
fact that he doesn't leaves a question mark.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8842</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Polish government gives top priority to mass privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
POLAND'S new centre-right government confirmed yesterday that it was
pressing ahead with a mass privatisation scheme involving western-managed
investment funds. The scheme will be a key element in its policy of reducing
the share of state ownership throughout the economy.
A policy document accepted by the government's economic steering committee
puts mass privatisation, and a scheme for compensating former owners, at the
top of a list of actions designed to transfer half of Polish industry to the
private sector within two years.
Last year, a start was made on privatising 12 per cent of the nearly 8,500
companies in state hands. This year, the government expects to privatise at
least 200 companies through mass privatisation. A further 10 companies will
be sold through conventional public share offers, doubling the number of
quoted companies on Warsaw's stock exchange, while another 30-40 factories
will be sold to foreign investors compared to eight last year.
Revenues from disposals are expected to more than double last year's Zl
3,500bn (Pounds 168m) contribution to the budget and Mr Tomasz Gruszecki,
privatisation minister, wants to retain half of privatisation proceeds to
restructure companies before they are put on sale.
Under the mass privatisation scheme, 200 concerns will initially be handed
to western-managed investment funds in which shares will be sold to the
population at a nominal charge. This will be doubled as soon as possible.
The privatisation ministry is being advised by S G Warburg, the London
merchant bank. Fund managers will be chosen by June and the scheme will be
financed in part through a Dollars 240m World Bank loan. Parliament will
soon be asked to decide whether the entire population, or just adults,
should be involved, as well as the price of shares in the funds.
Former owners of nationalised property worth Zl 100,000 will also be
partially compensated through the mass privatisation programme
The government is also planning a privatisation agency run on commercial
lines to handle sales of state property. Mr Gruszecki suggested that 49 per
of the shares in it could be sold to institutions like the World Bank or
European Bank for Reconstruction and Development.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8843</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / US Democrats target high earners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEMOCRATIC leaders in the US Congress are taking aim at excessive executive
pay packets with a proposal to apply stiffer tax disincentives to companies
which pay their managers more than Dollars 1m a year.
Their proposal raises the stakes in a debate that has sharpened recently,
and caps a move earlier this week by the Securities and Exchange Commission
(SEC) to allow shareholders to exert more pressure over the pay scales of
company executives.
The pay curb is expected to provide ammunition for the Democrats in their
battle with President George Bush over what package of tax measures would be
most helpful to the weak US economy.
Democrats are seeking to pull him into a debate on tax fairness, contrasting
their efforts to cut taxes on middle income families with the limited tax
bill he supports. The principal measure of that Republican bill is a capital
gains tax cut the benefits of which would go mainly to the wealthy, and
which excludes the middle income tax break Mr Bush suggested in last month's
State of the Union speech.
The Democrats' argument won support yesterday from Mr Pat Buchanan, Mr
Bush's right-wing challenger in next week's Republican primary in New
Hampshire. 'In retrospect, Mr Bush's State of the Union address appears to
have been a giant political scam to hoodwink New Hampshire voters into
believing George Bush favours tax cuts for working people,' he said.
The President's advisers yesterday implicitly acknowledged that they may
have positioned themselves badly on the tax issue. Mr Marlin Fitzwater, the
White House spokesman, dubbed as 'weasels' the Democratic members of the
House of Representatives' ways and means committee, which plays the key role
in tax legislation, and complained that Mr Dan Rostenkowski, the committee's
chairman, had 'set us up'.
The Democrats' pay proposal would rule that executive pay above Dollars 1m
would no longer be an allowable expense, so companies could not deduct it
from taxable income.
This is expected to raise Dollars 1.9bn of extra revenue over the next six
years, contributing to Dollars 71bn of new revenue measures - principally a
new top personal income tax rate of 35 per cent. These would finance several
tax cuts, including a Dollars 200 per person social security tax credit and
a one percentage point reduction in the corporate income tax rate to 33 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8844</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / Museum sets the Basques ablaze
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BILBAO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PLANS to build a giant new Guggenheim Museum in Bilbao, the industrially
blighted centre of commerce in Spain's Basque country, have led to a revolt
against the local government by some of the region's most famous artists,
including two renowned sculptors, Jorge Oteiza and Eduardo Chillida.
The site chosen for the museum is home to a disused factory and shipyard on
the banks of the Rio Nervion in the city centre. The museum will be bigger
than the Guggenheim in New York and the first European branch in Venice.
Construction is due to begin early next year.
It will cost between Dollars 100m (Pounds 55.2m) and Dollars 200m and will,
say angry Basque cultural groups, drain public subsidies away from Basque
art. The province of Vizcaya, of which Bilbao is the capital, is donating
the site and the building to the Guggenheim Foundation.
More than 400 Basque painters, sculptors, actors and writers have joined
Kultur Kezka (Cultural Complaint), created to oppose the financing of the
project. The organisation says it plans to mount a determined campaign to
force the local authorities to back down.
Local officials say there is no turning back. 'Industry is losing importance
here,' says Mr Juan Ignacio Vidarte, director of fiscal policy for the
province. 'We cannot bet on it indefinitely.'
The deal has been signed and work on the plans for the building - a
'constructivist' or sculptured design - is already under way at the Los
Angeles studios of the current hero of American architecture, Frank Gehry.
Mr Gehry, a maverick addict of form and materials, has called the Bilbao
project 'my idea of heaven'. The building is at a bend in the river, next to
a large modern iron bridge. 'Its got to be one of the most extraordinary
sites for a piece of architecture in any city,' says Mr Thomas Krens,
director of the Guggenheim in New York.
But architecture is not what worries the project's Basque critics. 'It is
not the museum that bothers us,' says a spokesperson for Kultur Kezka. 'A
museum like that is needed in this region but not at that price. The money
is being taken away from us.'
Earlier this month Jorge Oteiza, 84, called the plans to build the museum
for Guggenheim 'an anti-Basque soap opera' and called on Basques to make
criminal charges against the leaders of the region's conservative
nationalist party, the PNV, presumably for maladministration of public
funds. Disgusted with the PNVs cultural budget, he has given his collected
works to neighbouring Navarra.
For the local government, Mr Vidarte makes no attempt to hide the fact that
Bilbao selected the Guggenheim Foundation because the treasury was looking
for an investment that would generate tax revenues. Just over a year ago,
Guggenheim was about to sign a deal to build a new museum in Salzburg,
Austria.
'They were looking for a unique building, a container, and a site that could
show it off and we gave it to them,' he says.
The impact on the local economy of new visitors to the city will, he
calculates, generate some Pta600m (Pounds 3.3m) in new taxes every year. The
PNV is quite unsympathetic to charges that the museum represents a form of
American cultural imperialism.
The Guggenheim foundation will run it and make most of the decisions about
what is shown in it, but, says Mr Vidarte, 'it was never meant to be a
Basque museum. We will be showing international art and, anyway, about 90
per cent of the Guggenheim collection is European'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8845</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Irish meeting likely
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
New Irish premier Albert Reynolds could meet prime minister John Major
within weeks for talks on Northern Ireland, government sources in Dublin
indicated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8846</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBOAPAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920215
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  15 FEB 92 / World News in Brief: Robber kills himself
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An armed robber cornered by police in the street shot himself through the
head as bystanders looked on. The man, who had fled after a Pounds 6,000
wages snatch in Birmingham, died later in hospital.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8847</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Dividend concern hurts BP
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE, PETER JOHN, COLIN MILLHAM, JOEL KIBAZO and STEVE
THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DISAPPOINTMENT with the fourth-quarter dividend, and results below the most
pessimistic forecasts, triggered a fresh slide in BP shares, which fell to
their lowest closing level since April 1989. The stock ended its busiest
trading session since mid-1990 a net 10 lower at 274p, after touching 268p.
Turnover topped 40m shares.
Oil sector specialists said the market had taken the dividend news very
badly. The payment was held at 4.2p and most analysts had expected it to be
increased to 4.3p.
Observers were busy preparing earnings downgrades after the figures. Mr John
Toalster, at Strauss Turnbull, adopted an extremely bearish stance: 'It is
no longer a question of whether BP will cut the dividend, simply a question
of when and by how much; we think they will hold the payment for the first
two quarters and then cut the payment to 2.8p in the third. The shares are
going down to 220p.'
Dismay over BP's numbers triggered a predictable flurry of switching into
Shell, which rose 4 to 478p on heavy turnover of 6.8m.
Hanson active
First-quarter results from Hanson yesterday prompted volatile and heavy
two-way trading. The shares closed 2 off at 197 3/4 p after being more than
5 up at one stage. The recorded turnover was 24m shares. Hanson was also the
most active stock option in the Traded Options Market.
The profits were in the middle of the range of forecasts and many investors
liked the yield and the earnings per share. There was also support from a
45-page strategy review published by securities house Hoare Govett. However,
a decision to change the dividend policy led to wide confusion and there was
concern over the lower than expected tax charge.
Airtours placing
A successful placing of new and existing shares in Airtours left the holiday
group down 15 at 245p. US buyers were again in evidence as Hoare Govett, the
broker, placed the 5.1m package with institutions from both sides of the
Atlantic.
The shares consisted of 1.3m ordinary, and 3.8m in warrants on behalf of the
directors which are due for exercising on February 28. The stock was bought
at 250p and placed, or conditionally placed in the case of the warrants, at
252p. Owners Abroad lost 2 1/2 to 109p in sympathy with Airtours.
Securicor busy
The two classes of shares in Securicor and those of its 51 per cent owned
subsidiary Security Services gave another outstanding performance yesterday,
responding to increasing hopes that the two companies may be on the verge of
selling their minority interests in Cellnet to BT. Cellnet is one of the
UK's two cellular radio networks.
Securicor has a direct 13.3 per cent stake in Cellnet, and Security Services
a further 27 per cent. Analysts said the Securicor/Security Services
holdings in Cellnet are among the cheapest cellular stocks in the world. BT
holds the rest of Cellnet.
Telecoms specialists said BT would be a willing buyer of the
Securicor/Security Services holdings and that Oftel, the telecoms regulator,
would allow such a move. It was also pointed out that a sale would be most
likely to take place before the general election.
US institutions were said to be chasing Securicor stock yesterday after good
results from McCaw, the US cellular group. Smith Barney, the US brokerage,
has been a keen supporter of cellular issues recently. Securicor ordinary
shares added 15 at 765p and the 'A' rose 25 more to 605p. Security Services
jumped 21 to 486p.
BT came in for strong support, still responding to a series of broker buy
notes, with the 'old' closing 4 1/2 higher at 335p and the 'new' 2 3/4
better at 123 3/4 p.
Harland Simon plunged 332p to 253p after the group warned on big write-offs
and the effect of the failure of the late Mr Robert Maxwell's businesses.
Worries that London Electricity had lodged a complaint with Offer, the
electricity regulator, regarding supplies from National Power left the
latter 5 1/2 down at 214p. PowerGen declined 7 to 220p. A Daiwa buy
recommendation boosted Severn Trent Water 5 to 249p.
Babcock International put on 2 1/2 to 58p as the market assessed the news
that it is buying CNH &amp; Bulk, of Sweden, for Pounds 21.4m. Babcock also
announced two share placings involving 66.3m shares at 50p each to cover the
purchase and raise Pounds 9.5m for bonding requirements. The placings,
arranged by Babcock's broker Panmure Gordon, were heavily oversubscribed.
Dark clouds continued around British Aerospace, sending the shares to a new
low of 263p. This time, the worries centre on the balance sheet and on
problems over aircraft leasing. However, bargain hunters lifted the shares
and they closed only 2 down at 268p on turnover of 3m.
Currency risk for Tate &amp; Lyle, combined with trading difficulties in the US,
led to widespread forecast downgrades which prompted the shares to fall 14
to 413p. Smith New Court cut its profits forecast for the sugar producer to
Pounds 242m from Pounds 249m, while James Capel reduced its estimate by
Pounds 5m to Pounds 240m.
Financial constraints are likely to lead to a dividend cut and a sharp fall
in the share price of stores group Burton, according to Credit Lyonnais
Laing. It was suggested that the market is looking for a dividend in the
range of 1.5p to 2.7p for the current financial year and 2p to 2.7p for the
year to August 1993.
Laing's profits forecast is Pounds 5m for 1992 and Pounds 15m for 1993 and
it believes the dividend for both years may be cut to 1p from 2.7p for
reasons of financial prudence. The broker thinks this could lead to a share
price of 22p. The stock lost  1/2 to 35 1/2 p yesterday.
Bid speculation pushed Fisons ahead 15 to 388p. Some analysts said the
shares were firmer on rumours that both ICI (off 2 at 1287p) and Hanson were
possible bidders. The talk was that each was holding a 3 per cent stake in
Fisons. Other names mentioned recently include Medeva, Merck and Astra.
Reuters Holdings gained 11 to 1115p as Hoare Govett, the company's broker,
strengthened its stance on the stock from 'undervalued' to 'buy'. Hoare was
said to be poised to raise its 1992 profits forecast by at least Pounds 15m
from its current Pounds 365m. Also, US investment house Goldman Sachs raised
its profits estimate ahead of a presentation by Reuters to US analysts
yesterday afternoon.
Tightly-traded Wellcome opened weaker in reaction to a US medical press
article that said early treatment with its drug AZT, or Retrovir, does not
help Aids virus sufferers to live longer. However, the shares rallied later,
with marketmakers pointing to 'bear closing', and finished a net 14 up at
1117p.
SmithKline Beecham eased 2 to 955p. Nomura lowered its 1992 profits estimate
by Pounds 40m to Pounds 1.17bn and recommended short-term profit-taking.
Chemicals group BOC retreated 15 to 631p, reflecting profit-taking following
its results meeting.
Electronics and entertainment group Thorn EMI was further undermined by
speculation that it could be dragged into a bidding war for Virgin Records,
the music division of Virgin Group. The shares weakened 15 to 810p on busy
turnover of 2.4m. Rank Organisation climbed 11 to 693p as dealers again
reported switching into the leisure group.
Granada Group gained on optimism over BSkyB, in which it is a shareholder,
following positive results from News Corp, BSkyB's main stakeholder. A
series of recent meetings, held by Granada chief executive Mr Gerry Robinson
for analysts, have also helped sentiment. The shares added 7 at 232p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (102).
BRITISH FUNDS (30) Tr. 2pc I-L 1992, Funding 6pc 1993, Ex. 9 3/4 pc 1998,
Tr. 6 3/4 pc 1995-98, Ex. 12pc 1998, Tr. 9 1/2 pc 1999, Ex. 12 1/4 pc 1999,
Tr. 10 1/2 pc 1999, Conv. 10 1/4 pc 1999, Conv. 9pc 2000, Tr. 13pc 2000, Tr.
10pc 2001, Tr. 9 3/4 pc 2002, Do. 'C', Tr. 10pc 2003, Tr. 11 1/2 pc 2001-04,
Conv. 9 1/2 pc 2004, Do. 'A', Conv. 9 1/2 pc 2005, Tr. 12 1/2 pc 2003-05,
Tr. 8pc 2002-06, Tr. 8 1/2 pc 2007, Tr. 13 1/2 pc 2004-08, Tr. 9pc 2012, Tr.
5 1/2 pc 2008-12, Tr. 3pc 1966 Aft., Consols 2 1/2 pc, Tr. 2 1/2 pc, Tr. 2pc
I-L 1994, Tr. 2pc I-L 1996, OTHER FIXED INTEREST (3) Asian Dev. 10 1/4 pc
2009, Hydro Quebec 15pc 2011, Inter-Amer. Dev. 9 3/4 pc 2015, AMERICANS (4)
Honeywell, Ingersoll-Rand, Lowe's, Whirlpool, BANKS (1) Standard Chartered,
BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (3) Foster's Brewing, Young A, Do. Non-Vtg., BUILDING
MATERIALS (2) Epwin, Needler, BUSINESS SERVICES (3) Barbour Index, Hogg
Robinson, Sherwood Computer, CHEMICALS (1) BOC, ELECTRICALS (2)
Menvier-Swain, Motorola, ELECTRONICS (2) Hewlett-Packard, MTL Instruments,
ENGINEERING GENERAL (2) Polymark, Powerscreen, FOOD MANUFACTURING (4)
Cadbury Schweppes, Clarke, Dalepak, Unilever, FOOD RETAILING (1) Park,
HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (2) Paterson Zochonis A N/V, UniChem, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE
(4) Boosey &amp; Hawkes, Granada, Do. 7 1/2 p Pf., Tottenham Hotspur, INVESTMENT
TRUSTS (9) Drayton Blue Chip Zero Pf., Drayton Recovery Pfd Growth, Gartmore
Scot. Zero Div. Pf., Genesis Emerging Mkts., Kleinwort High Inc. Zero Div.
Pf., Latin Amer. Extra Yield, Do. Warrants, Leveraged Opportunity Tst.,
Sphere Zero Div. Pf., MEDIA (8) Abbott Mead V, Central ITV, Grampian TV A,
Headline Book, News Corp., News Intl. Spec. Div., Scottish TV, Trinity,
MISCELLANEOUS (3) Alumasc, FII, Platignum, MOTORS (1) Kwik-Fit, OIL &amp; GAS
(1) Evergreen Res., OTHER FINANCIAL (3) Baring Puma, S &amp; U Stores, Secure
Tst., PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING (2) Boxmore, CMB Pckg., PROPERTY (1) CMW,
STORES (1) Betterware Cons. Prods., TELEPHONE NETWORKS (3) Securicor, Do. A
N/V, Security Srvs., TEXTILES (1) Campari, TRANSPORT (2) Brit. Airways, TNT,
MINES (3) Forsayth, Gwalia Cons., MIM.
NEW LOWS (49).
CANADIANS (1) Granges, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Macallan-Glenlivet, BUSINESS
SERVICES (1) AFP, CHEMICALS (2) Hartons, Sutcliffe Speakman, CONGLOMERATES
(3) Gieves, Porter Chadburn, Reece, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (2) Crest
Nicholson, Graham Wood, ELECTRONICS (3) Forward Tech., Harland Simon, Sema,
ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (2) Brit. Aerospace, Westland, ENGINEERING GENERAL (5)
Dyson (J &amp; J), Jones &amp; Shipman, Ransomes 8 1/4 p Pf., Silvermines, WB Inds.,
HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Sunleigh, INSURANCE BROKERS (2) Archer (AJ), Sturge,
INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) General Accident, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (6) City of
Oxford Inc., Gartmore Value Invs., Geared Inc. Inv., M &amp; G Inc. Cap., River
&amp; Merc. Extra Inc. Warrants, River Plate, MISCELLANEOUS (4) Cresta, Hawtal
Whiting, Novalal, RPS, OIL &amp; GAS (5) Aviva Petlm., Brit. Borneo, Cairn
Energy., Globe Petlm., Triton Europe, OTHER FINANCIAL (2) Burlington, Natl.
Home Ln. 7 1/2 pc Pf., PROPERTY (4) Asda Prop., Derwent Valley, Hammerson A,
MEPC, STORES (1) Mallett, TEXTILES (1) Alex. Workwear, MINES (2) Caledonia
Mining, Young Group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8848</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Market stands up well to bad news
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A SERIES of hammer blows from leading UK companies failed to depress London
equities yesterday, and an erratic performance left share prices little
changed across the broad range of the market. Share trading remained very
selective, although trading volume was boosted by heavy turnover in BP and
Hanson after their respective quarterly results.
Equities opened in good form, with the new record on the Dow Average
overnight helping to offset continuing nervousness over the valuation of the
US equity markets. The FT-SE Index gained 8.5 points in spite of news of a
sharp increase in UK unemployment last month, a development seen as likely
to hinder the re-election chances of Mr Major's Conservative government.
However, the market was abruptly turned back by BP's announcement of a heavy
fall in income and an unchanged dividend for the fourth quarter.
Market analysts had taken divided views on BP, and the trading statement
from the global oil company brought some turmoil on the dealing screens. No
sooner had the market settled down again than Lord Hanson disclosed his
group's first recorded fall in quarterly profits, adding that he saw 'no
signs of recovery in the market'.
The Footsie was soon down by nearly 10 points, although the activity was
largely focused around Hanson and BP. Some other leading internationals,
including ICI, replaced gains with losses, but trading died down as Wall
Street opened the new session 13 Dow points off.
The absence of selling pressure across the full range of equities enabled
share prices to rally successfully, and the final quotation on the FT-SE
Index of 2,522.6 showed a net decline of only 1.1 points. This fall
reflected little more than the setback in both Hanson and BP shares, leaving
the rest of the UK stock market effectively firmer on the day.
Market turnover was also distorted by heavy trade in the two blue chip
stocks, which between them were responsible for nearly 12 per cent of the
day's Seaq volume total of 527.7m shares. On Wednesday, 448.1m shares
through the Seaq network were worth only Pounds 811.9m in terms of genuine
retail business in equities.
Traders pointed to the low volume figure as the reason behind the market's
apparently calm reception of yesterday's flow of bad news, as well as the
persistent worries over the outlook for equities both in Tokyo and New York.
The London market appears to have set into a pre-election mode, and traders
do not expect much significant development on the UK side.
Signs this week of renewed political scandals in Tokyo are now casting
shadows in the UK market, and the successive peak performances on Wall
Street have not removed deep-seated worries among some UK analysts that the
US market may be seriously over-valued in terms of underlying corporate
earnings prospects. However, London remains under the spell of the daily
performances of the Dow and Nikkei indices.
This uncertain backcloth has caused UK investors to remain highly selective
and often willing to respond to somewhat long-whiskered takeover stories.
Both Fisons and Cadbury Schweppes were active on such tales yesterday,
although neither stock attracted any convincing level of genuine investment
business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8849</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOEL KIBAZO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WORRIES over the economy continued to drive futures lower in spite of a
squeeze seen early in the session, writes Joel Kibazo.
Having opened at 2,538, the March contract's rise was strengthened as
independent traders, taking their cue from the good overnight performance on
Wall Street, moved to fill short positions.
That advance only lasted until mid-morning, when a more downbeat mood
returned. The release of worse than expected UK jobless figures caused
further downward pressure, as did the Wall Street early decline.
March closed at 2,535, down 4 on the previous session and around 5 points
above its estimated fair value premium to cash of about 10. Turnover, at
4,880 contracts, was again poor. The dealers reported increased activity in
March in after-hours' trading as the underlying cash market recovered from
earlier lows.
Traded options business was dull, with turnover of 21,207 contracts
enlivened by two features. There was good two-way business in Hanson, which
announced reduced first-quarter profits. It traded 4,168 contracts, with the
May 200 calls and May 200 puts particularly busy. BP, which also reported
poor figures, traded 1,061 lots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 34
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8850</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow weakens as investors
react to rising bond yields
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
IN SPITE of some rare good economic news, share prices retreated sharply
yesterday as investors reacted negatively to a big rise in bond yields,
writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average ended 30.18 down at 3,246.65 after
Wednesday's record high close. The Standard &amp; Poor's 500 fell 3.44 to
413.69, while the Nasdaq composite of over-the-counter stocks receded 5.82
to 639.10.
Turnover on the New York SE totalled 231m shares, and declines outdistanced
rises by around two-to-one.
The release of positive US economic news - a bigger than expected 0.6 per
cent rise in January retail sales and a surprise 13,000 decline in weekly
unemployment claims - would normally have cheered the market.
The key influence on equities yesterday, however, was bond prices. The fact
that the positive economic data reduced the chances of another cut in
interest rates depressed the bond market, which was already suffering under
the pressure of Dollars 36bn in new securities issued this week. Heavy
selling sent the price of the benchmark 30-year bond tumbling more than one
point, in the process pushing the yield back up towards 8 per cent.
Among individual stocks, the focus was again on corporate profits and the
earnings outlook. Although Ford Motor announced a Dollars 2.3bn loss for the
full 1991 year (a big deterioration from the Dollars 860m profit earned in
1990), the bad results had been widely expected and investors chose instead
to concentrate on the improvement in fourth-quarter results and the
company's emphasis on cost control. Consequently, Ford rose Dollars  5/8 to
Dollars 35 1/4 in turnover of 2.5m shares.
Pfizer fell Dollars 2 5/8 to Dollars 72 5/8 in heavy trading on the heels of
a meeting between the company and analysts at which Pfizer's chief financial
officer said first-half performance this year would be affected by increased
costs associated with new drug launches. The Pfizer weakness afflicted the
rest of the sector.
Computer shares were in the news. After an early gain, IBM slipped Dollars 1
1/2 to Dollars 90 5/8 when it announced it would go ahead with plans to open
a laboratory to develop supercomputers. In contrast, Digital Equipment
jumped Dollars 2 to Dollars 61 1/8 on reports that it has developed a more
powerful computer chip.
The ADRs of British Petroleum dropped Dollars 3 1/4 to Dollars 59 1/4 on
news of disappointing fourth-quarter earnings.
Canada
TORONTO lost ground after a disappointing final phase to the US Treasury's
refunding weakened US bonds. Cigarette company shares fell after the
Canadian government said that it will tax exports to cut smuggling.
Imasco, which owns Imperial Tobacco Ltd, finished CDollars 1 1/4 off at
CDollars 37 1/2 . Imperial said the tax will cause Canadian tobacco products
to cost nearly double those of comparable American products.
The composite index declined 14 points to 3,581.8 and volume came to 28.9m
shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8851</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar jumps on US sales data
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR steamed ahead on the foreign exchanges yesterday, using the
excuse of better than expected US retail sales figures for its 1 1/2
 pfennig gain on the D-Mark, writes Peggy Hollinger.
The US unit ended in London near its high for the day of DM1.6270 at
DM1.6230. Economists said the dollar was now approaching a new psychological
barrier of DM1.6350, the level reached in its first rally earlier this year.
It closed still at DM1.6230 in New York.
Strong underlying demand fuelled the dollar's rise, as well as retail
figures which showed sales up 0.6 per cent in January, compared with a
forecast 0.2 per cent.
In the short term, economists expect the dollar to continue its upward path.
'It would be a brave man to stand in the way of the dollar at the moment,'
said Mr Mark Austin, an economist with Hongkong Bank.
However, he warned that the retail figures should be treated with caution.
'Nothing fundamental has changed,' he said. The foreign exchanges appear to
have forgotten the threat of a rate cut in the US.
The dollar's strength was most notable against the D-Mark and the Swiss
franc. The Swiss unit continued to suffer from rumours earlier in the week
that the central bank would not halt a drop in the franc. Although that
speculation was refuted by the Swiss National Bank, the denial had not been
'as vehement' as usual, said Mr Austin.
The Swiss currency closed weaker at SFr1.4575, compared with SFr1.4385. Mr
Nigel Newman, senior economist at Barclays, suggested that the Swiss central
bank could 'be staging a managed depreciation'.
Against the yen, the US unit was still hampered by fears of central bank
intervention. However, the dollar firmed from Y127.55 to Y127.70.
The D-Mark's weakness was noticeable against most European currencies, but
traders said the problem lay with a strong dollar rather than an inherently
weak D-Mark.
The German unit fell against the peseta, from Pta 62.96 per D-Mark to Pta
62.92. Contrary to some expectations, the Bank of Spain did not cut rates
upon publication of figures showing core inflation for January up 1.5 per
cent.
The Spanish currency's strength put extra pressure on sterling, which
remained at the bottom of the exchange rate mechanism grid.
Sterling was still fairly resilient against the D-Mark, in spite of
disappointing UK jobless figures. These showed unemployment up 53,000 to 9.2
per cent of the workforce in January - the highest level since October 1987.
Forecasts had been pitched at a 30,000 rise. The pound closed steady at
DM2.8725.
Traders suggested that the pound's performance in recent days could offer
the government a window of opportunity to reduce interest rates. However,
sterling would have to strengthen further against the D-Mark, to allow a
buffer in the ERM grid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8852</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Money Markets: Rate cut hope fades
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS an expensive day in the UK money markets yesterday, as dealers became
increasingly pessimistic about an imminent cut in interest rates.
However, the betting is still on for a reduction before the forthcoming
general election.
Furthermore, the relatively small size of the Bank of England's recent
repurchase agreements - which have been running until the beginning of March
 -has been fanning the market's hopes of a rate cut in the near future.
There was a certain amount of speculation that the Bank of England could cut
rates by less than the traditional  1/2 point.
The March short sterling contract firmed just one basis point to 89.80,
implying an interest rate of 10.2 per cent by the middle of March.
The short end of the money market was tight, as the Bank offered assistance
in small tranches until the afternoon.
Overnight rates jumped as high as 12 per cent during the day, although they
fell back to close at 10 5/8 - 9/16 per cent. One week money held steady at
10- 9/16 per cent.
The key three months interbank rate was a touch below current 10 1/2 per
cent interest rates at 10 7/16 - 5/16 per cent.
The Bank of England forecast a shortage of Pounds 1.3bn, with bills falling
due accounting for Pounds 921m. Treasury paper and maturing assistance
accounted for a further Pounds 713m of the shortfall, while exchequer
transactions fed Pounds 610m back into the market. Bankers' balances below
target and note circulation drained Pounds 115m.
The Bank gave early indications that it expected no changes in UK interest
rates, with a mere Pounds 171m in assistance at a cost of 10 7/16 per cent,
in the morning. The rate hovered around that mark for the rest of the day,
with a further Pounds 578m in assistance at 10 3/8 and 10 7/16 per cent. The
injections included bills for resale on March 3, 4 and 5, and band one bank
and treasury paper. Late assistance totalled Pounds 505m, leaving the market
only Pounds 46m short.
Call money was unchanged in Germany at 9.50/60 per cent, still benefiting
from the generous Bundesbank injection on Wednesday. However, the rate could
rise in the next few days, said dealers, as a DM1.22bn four-year note falls
due.
The US Federal Reserve signalled no change in the funds rate with a matched
sale-purchase agreement at 3 15/16 per cent. The presumed Fed target is 4
per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8853</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Saudis resist pressure for deep
cuts at Opec talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   GENEVA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MINISTERS FROM the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries were in
intense talks last night as Saudi Arabia resisted pressure for deep
production cuts. The kingdom was being pressed to accept a production level
of 7.7m to 7.8m barrels a day as part of an overall ceiling of between 22.5m
and 22.8m b/d.
Mr Jibril Aminu, Nigeria's oil minister and current Opec president, said
ministers remained 300,000 b/d apart in on the ceiling. And they are still
uncertain as to how the cut will be shared. Mr Hisham Nazer, Saudi Arabia's
oil minister is reluctant to trim output below 8m b/d.
Saudi Arabia has been coming under mounting pressure from its more
impoverished colleagues inside the producers' club to agree to a cut in
overall production that would give a boost to world oil prices. But the
kingdom wants to shave little more than 1.2m b/d from output, leaving an
overall ceiling of 23m b/d.
Mr Nazer kept a low profile at yesterday's talks and was often absent from
meetings of the fractious organisation. But he was quietly insisting on a
ceiling higher than most other ministers would like.
Saudi Arabia is confident that a ceiling of 23m b/d will be low enough to
underpin world prices. But the market is looking for more decisive action to
put a floor under the price in the second quarter.
One delegate stressed that the Saudi's more optimistic view of demand was
close to other international forecasts and was not far from the estimate, by
the Opec secretariat, that the call on Opec oil would be 22.77m b/d by
April.
'Saudi Arabia will agree to share out production cuts if we all decide on
23m b/d as a ceiling,' one Gulf source said, 'but below that we have no
proposals.'
The brunt of the production cuts would be shared by Saudi Arabia, Iran,
United Arab Emirates, Venezuela, Nigeria and Libya, which have all raised
output to compensate for the absence of Iraqi and Kuwaiti oil from the
market. Ministers from 12 countries appear to be united behind a cut of at
least 1.5m b/d, but Saudi Arabia is holding out.
The kingdom is still pushing for production levels to be distributed
according to capacity. But ministers have debated long and hard over their
capacity levels.
In the run-up to fixing individual production levels, there is a tendency by
some artificially to inflate their figures in order eventually to gain a
higher share of the overall ceiling.
One delegate said that if all of these claims were added up, they come to an
overall output of 25.3m b/d, at least 1m b/d higher than outside estimates
for Opec capacity. It is way above the secretariat's estimate of December
production, 24.4m b/d, which was when producers were believed to be pumping
flat out. 'These numbers are all purely fictitious,' the delegate said,
'nevertheless, we've been debating them all morning.'
At the same time, the agreement must make some allowance for Iraq and
Kuwait. Mr Aminu said that any final deal would include a clause calling on
members to institute immediate cuts if Iraq returned to the market, although
Baghdad is unlikely to do so oil before the next meeting in May. Kuwait will
be allowed to produce freely. The emirate has said it could pump 900,000 b/d
by June.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8854</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Government Bonds: Treasuries slide as hopes of interest rate
cut recede
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A LARGER-than-forecast rise in monthly retail sales, an unexpected fall in
weekly jobless claims, and poor retail demand for new 30-year bonds
unsettled fixed income investors yesterday and sent Treasury prices
tumbling.
In late trading, the benchmark 30-year government bond was down 1 1/16 at
101 1/16 , yielding 7.900 per cent. The two-year note was also sharply
lower, down  3/16 at 99 15/32 , yielding 5.128 per cent.
The day's economic news was good for the economy but bad for the bond
market. The Commerce Department said retail sales had risen 0.6 per cent in
January, a modest increase but bigger than forecast. An upward revision in
the December numbers - from an originally reported 0.4 per cent decline to a
0.1 per cent gain - was also a surprise.
The sales data, allied to a 13,000 drop in weekly state unemployment
insurance claims, poured more cold water on hopes for another cut in
interest rates. JAPANESE government bond prices surged after a leading
politician in the ruling Liberal Democratic Party called for an immediate
cut in the official discount rate.
Mr Shin Kanemaru, vice-president of the Liberal Democratic Party, said
interest rates should be cut by half a percentage point to 4.0 per cent in
order to stimulate the economy. His comments immediately raised hopes that
the Bank of Japan would lower the official discount rate, and prompted a
rally in government bond prices and a fall in short-term interest rates.
The yield on the benchmark No 129 issue moved from its opening of 5.51 to
close at 5.395 per cent on short-covering of positions by dealers.
Short-term money market rates eased as a result of a larger-than-expected
funds injection by the Bank of Japan. The unsecured overnight call rate
traded mainly at 5 per cent, down  3/32 a day earlier.
UK government bond prices started on a firm note, helped by the release of
unemployment and average earnings figures. However, weakness in the US
Treasury bond market later pulled gilt prices down to close unchanged or
slightly lower on the day.
Underlying average earnings rose 7.25 per cent in the year to December on a
seasonally adjusted basis, after rising 7.5 per cent in November, and
provided good news on inflation for the gilt market. UK unemployment rose a
provisional, seasonally adjusted 53,000 in January to 2.6m, or 9.2 per cent
of the workforce, up from 9.0 per cent in December.
The rally in gilt prices enabled the Bank of England to sell more of its new
gilt issue, the 9 per cent Treasury stock due 2012. Traders estimate about
Pounds 750m of the new issue has been sold so far this week. But the
combination of new supply and the fall in the US market pulled prices down.
Trading volume in the Liffe gilt futures contract was higher than usual at
over 33,000 contracts. The contract, which opened at 98.06, reached a high
of 98.10 before falling back to 97.30. The benchmark 11 3/4 per cent gilt
due 2003/07 slipped from 116 15/32 to 116 13/32 .
WEAKNESS in the US Treasury bond market pulled German government bond prices
slightly lower in a dull day. The Liffe bund futures contract opened at
88.17 and traded at around 88.13 by late afternoon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21 Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8855</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Royal Trustco returns to
profitability
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ROYAL Trustco, one of Canada's two biggest trust companies, has reported a
CDollars 8m (USDollars 6.8m) loss for the final quarter of 1991, equal to 17
cents a share, writes Robert Gibbens in Montreal.
But the company, which blamed the North American and UK recessions and heavy
loan loss provisions for the setback, returned to profitability for the full
year.
RT took the unusual step last December 24 of releasing preliminary results
for the final quarter, indicating that Canadian and US loan losses would be
stable, but a further CDollars 70m provision would be made in the UK. The
actual loss reported yesterday was higher than most analysts had expected.
For the whole of 1991, RT reported net income of CDollars 107m, or 25 cents,
after a CDollars 224m loan loss provision, against a loss of CDollars 65m in
1990 after a CDollars 220m provision. Operating income before provisions and
taxes was CDollars 346m, against CDollars 200m, helped by lower interest
rates, higher fee income and a 2 per cent drop in operating expenses. The
dividend is being maintained at 74 cents.
RT said it had tightened credit policies and was cutting costs across the
board. Royal Trust Bank London is now solely in private banking, asset
management and specialised corporate lending, but has a heavy burden of
non-performing loans. The UK unit was badly hit by the drop in property
values in 1990 and 1991.
RT's total assets at December 31 last were CDollars 37.6bn, against CDollars
40.9bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8856</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: IBM plans computers based on MPP
technology
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INTERNATIONAL Business Machines (IBM) is developing powerful supercomputers
based upon massively parallel processing (MPP) technology.
The company said yesterday it had established a new laboratory dedicated to
bringing the new technology to market.
Cray Research, the leading supercomputer manufacturer, also revealed this
week it was developing MPP computers, based upon a powerful new
microprocessor chip designed by Digital Equipment.
Unlike traditional supercomputers, which are based on one or a few
custom-designed powerful processors, MPP computers share complex computing
tasks among hundreds or even thousands of the same microprocessor chips used
in computer workstations.
Until recently, this approach to achieving very high speed computing was
largely experimental. Worldwide sales of MPP supercomputers were only about
Dollars 100m last year, less than one-tenth of the total supercomputers
market, according to industry estimates.
However, massively parallel machines are widely expected to eventually
achieve speeds of almost 1,000bn calculations per second, outpacing
traditional 'vector' supercomputers.
The endorsement of IBM and Cray Research will bring MPP into the mainstream
of computing. Some industry analysts predict MPP sales could reach 50 per
cent of the total supercomputer market by the late 1990s.
IBM will base its MMP systems on the reduced instruction set computing
(Risc) microprocessors it uses in desktop workstations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8857</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Bergesen pessimistic after peak
results
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN FOSSLI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BERGESEN, Norway's leading shipowner, yesterday revealed record profits but
warned that 1992 figures would be substantially reduced due to higher taxes
and lower tanker rates.
Group net profits rose to NKr952m (Dollars 151.6m) in 1991 from NKr925m, but
the increase was helped by better performing shipping operations, unlike
1990 when profits were improved by a NKr424m gain on the sale of securities.
The dividend is to be increased to NKr1 a share from NKr0.85.
Group operating revenue rose by NKr673m to NKr3.12bn, while operating profit
was 66 per cent higher at NKr857m. Net financial income dropped to NKr40m
from NKr433.
Based on tanker developments so far in 1992, Bergesen expects operating
profit for tankers to decline.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8858</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: RH Macy wins access to Dollars
600m financing facility
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
R. H. MACY, the large US department store group which filed for Chapter 11
bankruptcy protection last month, yesterday won access to a Dollars 600m
financing facility.
The debtor-in-possession facility, being led by Chemical Bank and Bankers
Trust Company, was approved by Judge Burton Lifland in the bankruptcy courts
in New York after an 80-minute hearing, despite a handful of objections. DIP
financing is a common feature in bankruptcy situations and lenders rank at
the forefront of the repayment queue.
The most significant dissent came from the Macy bondholders, whose lawyer
questioned one of the covenants in the DIP financing. He noted that it
required Macy's to perform better during the next Christmas season than it
had in the one just past. 'If Macy's does as it did last Christmas, it would
default,' he suggested.
However, after some jostling between the lawyers and firm assertions that
the DIP financing package was the product of hard negotiations, Judge
Lifland overruled the objections.
Macy's takes in 144 department stores and 11 furniture and clearance stores
in 18 states, employing nearly 70,000. Like some other retailers, the
privately-owned company has struggled with debts taken on in the 1980s and
the depressed retail climate of the 1990s. When it filed for bankruptcy, it
had assets of Dollars 4.95bn and liabilities of Dollars 5.32bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8859</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: McCaw Cellular cuts deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
McCAW CELLULAR, the leading US company in the fast-growing US cellular
telephone market and owner of a 52 per cent stake in LIN Broadcasting,
yesterday turned in a fourth-quarter net loss of Dollars 125.3m, or 71 cents
a share, against a loss of Dollars 148.8m, or 86 cents, in the same period
of the previous year.
Although the company posted income from operations in both years, the cost
of servicing its extraordinarily high debt has kept McCaw firmly mired in
the red. Analysts do not expect McCaw to post profits before 1994.
In the 1991 quarter, McCaw had income from operations of Dollars 35.5m,
while its interest expense was Dollars 132.8m. A year earlier, income from
operations stood at Dollars 17.5m, while interest expense was Dollars
155.7m.
Revenues in the quarter attributed to McCaw's proportionate interest in
cellular operations increased 33 per cent to Dollars 266.2m from Dollars
200.1m. The company said its proportionate cash-flow increased 46 per cent
to Dollars 104m, while proportionate subscribes grew by 94,000.
For the year, McCaw had a net loss of Dollars 351.1m, or Dollars 2.04,
against income of Dollars 562.3m, or Dollars 2.97 a share. The 1990 results
included a gain of Dollars 1.17bn from the sale of assets. There was a
one-time gain of about Dollars 243m in 1991. Revenues rose to Dollars 1.37bn
in the year from Dollars 1.04bn.
The company had operating income of Dollars 116m in 1991 against Dollars
48.4m previously. Interest costs rose to Dollars 578m from Dollars 496.6m.
On Wall Street, shares in McCaw fell Dollars 1 1/2 to Dollars 34. Shares in
LIN dropped Dollars 4 to Dollars 76.
LIN, which holds interest in the cellular systems in New York, Los Angeles,
Philadelphia, Dallas and Houston, turned in a fourth-quarter loss of Dollars
37.4m, or 73 cents, against a loss of Dollars 54.4m, or Dollars 1.06, a year
earlier. Revenues rose to Dollars 133.5m from Dollars 106m.
LIN had a full-year net loss of Dollars 170.2m, or Dollars 3.31, on revenues
of Dollars 468.1m, against a deficit of Dollars 222.8m, or Dollars 4.33, on
revenues of Dollars 378.1m in 1990.
McCaw said the number of cellular subscribers in McCaw and LIN's markets
increased 42 per cent to 1.64m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8860</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Pfizer slips on growth warning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES in Pfizer, one of the biggest US drugs companies, tumblwed Dollars 2
5/8 to Dollars 72 5/8 yesterday in heavy trading after the company outlined
only moderate first-half profit growth at a meeting with analysts.
The company expects full-year earnings to meet analysts' expectations, but
it warned that the cost of launching new drugs would probably cut into its
first-half results.
Pfizer is scheduled to introduce its new Zoloft anti-depressant later this
month, followed by the launch of its Zithromax antibiotic in early March.
The company may launch three other new drugs by the end of the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8861</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Domtar in note and equity issues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DOMTAR, a big building Canadian materials, pulp and paper and packaging
group, has renegotiated a CDollars 500m (USDollars 431m) credit facility
with its banks and plans a CDollars 150m equity issue and a USDollars 150m
seven-year note issue in the US.
In addition, a CDollars 150m interest-free loan from a Quebec government
agency will be converted into preferred shares, retractable in the year 2000
in cash or common shares.
The equity issue in Canada will be 42 per cent taken up by two Quebec
government agencies which together hold that percentage of Domtar's common
shares. The company has just over 100m common shares outstanding.
The total financing package will be completed by late March, and the company
said it would meet expected capital needs over the next several years.
The company, with the rest of the North American forest products industry,
has been severely hit by the long recession and poor markets. Also, the
strong Canadian dollarhit performance in 1991 despite restructuring, asset
sales and a severe pruning in costs.
The company incurred a fourth-quarter loss of CDollars 44m, or 46 cents a
share, against a loss of CDollars 263m, or CDollars 2.99, a share a year
earlier, including special charges of CDollars 237m.
For all 1991, the loss was CDollars 148m, or CDollars 1.69 a share, against
a loss of CDollars 294m, or CDollars 3.44 a share, including special
charges.
On an operating basis, Domtar had a 1991 loss of CDollars 215m against an
operating loss of CDollars 45m in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8862</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Northrop to cut 2,000 jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NORTHROP, the US defence contractor, is to cut 2,000 jobs from its aircraft
division this year, reducing the total number of employees to below 10,000,
writes Karen Zagor.
THe California-based company said about half of the jobs would be lost
through normal attrition and retirements.
Northrop, has been heavily dependent on the B-2 Stealth bomber programme,
which is to be scaled back.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8863</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Banc One plan on assets approved
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US REGULATORS yesterday granted permission for Banc One, the Ohio-based
super-regional banking group, to take over Dollars 1bn of assets from seven
failed banks in the state of New Hampshire.
The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), the agency which insures
deposits in US banks, agreed to a proposal from Banc One that its management
and consulting subsidiary administer and liquidate two separate asset pools.
The pools are made up primarily of the banks' classified assets, repossessed
real estate, subsidiaries and unwanted premises. The FDIC has acted as
receiver since the banks failed in October last year.
Under the terms of the agreement, the Banc One unit will attempt to recover
as much as possible from the pool over five years while minimising costs.
During that period, the FDIC will pay the expenses of managing and servicing
the assets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8864</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Cigna records lower net of
Dollars 108m in final quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CIGNA, the big Philadelphia-based insurer, yesterday reported after-tax
profits of Dollars 108m for the final three months of 1991, down from
Dollars 119m in the same period a year earlier.
The fourth-quarter results were charged after net realised investment gains
of Dollars 1m, compared with a Dollars 25m loss in the year-earlier quarter.
The company said that the numbers reflected some reserve increases for
investment assets following 'the company's current assessment of
unfavourable economic and real estate market conditions'.
As a result, Cigna's net earnings for the full year stand at Dollars 449m,
against Dollars 330m, after realised investment gains of Dollars 52m,
against loss of Dollars 15m the previous year.
The results, however, seemed to disappoint the market, and Cigna shares
slipped Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars 54 1/8 .
Mr Wilson Taylor, chief executive, said the employee benefits, pension and
individual life insurance businesses all reported profits increases for the
year, and should contribute to improved overall results in 1992.
Premiums for the group overall were Dollars 14.3bn in 1991 against Dollars
14bn, while net investment income totalled Dollars 3.86m compared with
Dollars 3.77bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8865</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Fermenta share trade halted
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TRADING in shares of Fermenta, the Swedish industrial group, and its finance
company subsidiary, Independent, was halted yesterday on the Stockholm
bourse. Fermenta said the suspension was due to the heavier-than-expected
losses suffered by Independent in the last four months of 1991. The losses
halved its share capital.
Independent said it was in talks with a Swedish bank consortium and its
chief shareholders. These include Bilspedition, the Swedish transport group,
and the holding company, Industrivarden.
The talks are aimed at how best to restore Independent to financial balance.
A further statement will be made next Tuesday.
Last September, share trading was suspended in Fermenta and Independent
because of the financial deterioration of the companies. The chairman and
chief executive of Fermenta subsequently resigned. A consortium of five
banks agreed to extend a SKr4bn (Dollars 688.5m) credit line to Independent.
For the first eight months of last year, Fermenta made a pre-tax loss
SKr357m. It was just over two years ago that Fermenta announced plans to
create a large finance company by merging Independent with Infina, another
Swedish finance company, in a SKr1.8bn deal.
The share price suspension represents another chapter in the crisis-strewn
history of Fermenta. In 1986, the company, founded by Mr Refaat El-Sayed,
found itself at he centre of Sweden's largest financial scandal.
Mr Hans Dahlberg, the chief executive of Folksam, one of Sweden's largest
insurance groups, resigned yesterday in the face of credit losses totalling
SKr1bn last year.
Forenings, the commercial bank, yesterday announced a financial loss of
SKr935m due to credit losses of SKr2.8bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8866</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / International Company News: Compagnie Bancaire net tumbles
23%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COMPAGNIE Bancaire yesterday highlighted the problems of the French
financial services sector by announcing a 23 per cent fall in group net
profit, to FFr1.15bn (Dollars 210m) in 1991 compared with 1990.
The company, the largest part of the Paribas investment bank - with
interests in leasing, consumer credit and direct mail insurance - attributed
the fall to the difficult economic climate in France and the UK. It was also
affected by a poor performance from its Sinvim business, which was hit by
the sharp fall in the Paris property market.
The news of Compagnie Bancaire's slide follows a warning from Paribas that
it had made its first-ever loss in 1991. The two main US credit rating
agencies, Moody's and Standard &amp; Poor's, have since put Paribas under
surveillance.
Compagnie Bancaire said the value of credit distributed by its businesses
last year fell by 6 per cent to FFr76bn. One reason was the economic
slowdown in France, which sapped confidence and drained demand for loans.
Another was a strategic shift into higher margin business. The recession in
the UK, its main market outside France, was chiefly responsible for the 21
per cent fall - to FFr16.4bn - in credit distributed to other countries.
By contrast, the company benefited from strong growth in life insurance and
savings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8867</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: In the firing line for brickbats whatever
is decided - Peter Lilley's dilemma over referring Tarmac, Steetley and
Redland to the MMC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR PETER Lilley, Britain's trade and industry secretary, won a small
historic victory on Wednesday when he persuaded the European Commission to
give up its right to consider the proposed merger of the UK brick, clay tile
and concrete product businesses of Tarmac and Steetley.
It is the first time the EC has given up its rights to investigate a
proposed large merger since new competition rules came into force in 1990.
Mr Lilley - having won the argument that British regulatory authorities
should deal with what is a domestic merger with no continental European
impact - must now determine how he will exercise his new won authority.
Crucially he must decide whether to refer for investigation to the
Monopolies and Merger Commission (MMC) two rival proposals affecting the
ownership of Steetley, a large British brick and clay tile manufacturer and
France's biggest aggregates producer.
The UK Office of Fair Trading is already considering whether to recommend an
MMC investigation of a rival hostile Pounds 600m bid for the whole of
Steetley by Redland, another large British building materials group.
The Tarmac deal, by comparison, would leave Steetley retaining its UK and
French aggregate and ready-mix concrete businesses.
The outcome of the Redland and Tarmac proposals will affect future
ownership, structure and employment within a UK brick industry still
suffering massive over-capacity despite previous job cuts and plant
closures. Both Redland and Tarmac/Steetley have said they would axe
significant capacity if their plans are allowed to go ahead.
An argument against a full scale MMC investigation is that it might delay
plans for a rationalisation of the companies brick plants.
On the hand it might be politically embarrassing if Mr Lilley were simply to
clear both 'bids' after having gone to the trouble of persuading Brussels to
give up its right to consider the Tarmac/Steetley joint venture.
It is thought unlikely that Mr Lilley would want to treat the rival
proposals differently on the grounds that it might be unfair to leave the
field clear for one side to pursue merger plans while the other was bogged
down by an MMC investigation.
An alternative would be for the trade secretary to seek undertakings which
would require the merged companies to dispose of selected businesses in
markets where it was deemed they had a dominant market position.
The option to seek an undertaking on disposals, rather than trigger a
full-scale MMC inquiry lasting several months, was included in the 1989
Companies Act. The option has been exercised five times since August 1990 on
bids involving Rank for Mecca; Hillsdown for Strong &amp; Fisher; International
Marine for Benjamin Priest; Williams Holdings for Racal and Trafalgar House
for Davey.
Over the same period the trade secretary has launched full MMC inquiries
into another 16 takeover offers. A bid automatically lapses when an inquiry
takes place.
Mr Lilley in his approach to the EC regulatory authorities identified both
brick and clay roof tiles as markets where UK competition problems could
arise as a result of merger plans.
A takeover of Steetley by Redland would leave the combined companies
controlling about 46 per cent of the clay tile market; a Tarmac/Steetley
joint venture would have a 39 per cent share.
Both ventures may be able to offer undertakings on clay tiles which would
circumvent a monopolies probe. Bricks, however, may provide a more difficult
problem. Any undertakings must involve disposals rather than closures.
Potential purchaser of unwanted brick plants are few and far between in this
market.
On the basis of national market shares it is difficult to see why bricks
should be included in any monopoly considerations. Tarmac and Steetley
between them control about 17 per cent of the UK brick market. Redland and
Steetley would have about 16 per cent.
Mr Lilley, however, has indicated that he will be looking at production
capacity in regional markets - despite protests by Redland, Steetley and
Tarmac that they sell into a single national market determined by price and
not where bricks were made. Low haulage costs in Britain mean that bricks
can be easily transported, and manufacturers say that sales are a better
measure of regional market share than local production capacity.
Sir Leon Brittan, EC competition commissioner, nonetheless noted this week
that a Tarmac/Steetley joint venture would control a high percentage of
production capacity in north-east and south-west England. He said that there
was danger that 'the merger would create a dominant position' in those
markets.
On current figures Tarmac and Steetley control almost 80 per cent of local
capacity in the north-east and approaching 50 per cent in the south-west.
Redland argues that a monopolies probe on the basis of brick manufacturing
capacity would not be justified in its case, even on regional grounds. A
merger with Steetley it says would leave it with only 23 per cent of brick
capacity in south-east England, its biggest market. Steetley has few plants
in south-east England but 'exports' a large number of bricks to the region.
Combined brick sales of Redland and Steetley in the south-east, therefore,
will be much higher than local production capacity would indicate.
Nonetheless, Redland might find it easier to give undertakings on brick and
clay tile disposals than Tarmac and Steetley. The success of the
Tarmac/Steetley joint venture is wholly dependent upon their ability to
rationalise these UK businesses. Redland wants Steetley's French aggregates
business and its UK building materials.
Who gets what could depend upon what Mr Lilley decides.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17 Photograph Collapse of construction demand has resulted in a
brick mountain (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8868</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Carpenter gives Maxwell pensioners fresh
hope
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRESH HOPE may be on the way for pensioners of the private Maxwell companies
because of an Italian carpenter whose company went bust.
The carpenter and his colleagues successfully sued the Italian government in
the European Court for compensation under a little known European Community
directive which became binding on member states in 1983.
Mr Robin Ellison, a pension law specialist who has been advising the Maxwell
Private Companies Pension Fund Members' Association, found the Italian case
by chance when flicking through European Court reports.
It led Mr Ellison, of Ellison Westhorpe, to the directive which obliges
governments to ensure that arrangements are made to compensate the workers
of companies which become insolvent.
'It's there in words of one syllable. Provision has to be made for the
protection of pension benefits of employees and former employees,' said Mr
Ellison who has already got a preliminary counsel's opinion on the issue.
Mr Ellison believes that the directive should give members of the private
Maxwell companies' pension funds the right to sue the government for
compensation if the companies become insolvent.
Last month it was announced that four pension funds representing more than
4,000 pensioners and employees of AGB Research were being wound up. Little
money is likely to be left for those who are not already pensioners.
While operating AGB businesses are being sold off by the administrator the
main company, which retains the pension fund liabilities, is likely to
become insolvent.
The British government argues that the directive which protects three months
redundancy pay only applies to the last three months pension contributions.
Mr Ellison argues that the directive says nothing of the sort and is
advising his clients to test the issue in the High court.
'Some cases are iffy. I think this is a strong case,' Mr Ellison said last
night.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8869</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Chrysalis chief calls off talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BOLGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR CHRIS Wright, chairman of Chrysalis Group, the records, communications
and media company, has ended talks on his plan to buy the 47 per cent of the
equity which he does not already own and take the group private.
He said he was disappointed that one sizeable shareholder had refused to
accept his offer of 95p a share, since it had won the support of the
remaining shareholders, his bankers and financial advisers. Chrysalis shares
were unchanged at 72p.
Mr Wright, who founded Chrysalis, announced his intention to take the group
private in November, after he sold the group's 50 per cent stake in the
Chrysalis Records joint venture to its partner, Thorn EMI, the music and
rentals group, for Dollars 30m (Pounds 16.9m).
Chrysalis incurred a loss of Pounds 7.85m in the year to August, but Pounds
5m of that was attributable to the record division.
The group has net cash of Pounds 16m and Mr Wright intends to develop a
records business again some time after December of this year, when he will
no longer be tied by Thorn.
Chrysalis has been investing recently in televising horse racing for betting
shops and its juke box and fruit machines division, which has been hit by
recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8870</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Sharp decline at Crest Nicholson to Pounds
59.4m loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREST NICHOLSON, the south-east of England-based housebuilder and property
developer which ran into trouble last year following the collapse in the
housing market, incurred pre-tax losses of Pounds 59.4m during the year to
October 31.
This compares with pre-tax profits of Pounds 8.06m in the previous 12
months.
The losses were struck after exceptional provisions of Pounds 39.8m due to
the write-down of the group's residential and commercial land and
developments to take account of falling property prices.
Resulting losses per share were 55.67p, against earnings of 3.86p. The group
announced a nominal dividend of 0.01p to preserve its share status under the
Trustee Investments Act 1961. Last time the final dividend was 4.65p for a
total of 7.65p.
The figures, however, were in line with expectations and the stock market
was encouraged by the announcement of a further reduction in group
borrowings from Pounds 117.6m in May to Pounds 54.7m at the year-end -
equivalent to 51 per cent of shareholders' funds. Crest's shares yesterday
rose by 6p to 37p.
Mr John Callcutt, chief executive, also revealed that house sales had
increased last month. Net reservations by house buyers were currently
averaging 33 a week, compared with 15 a week in December.
Mr Callcutt said the improvement was encouraging but that it was too early
to say whether the rise would mark the beginning of a recovery in the UK
housing market.
Last year the group made an operating loss of Pounds 6.9m on house sales
before write-downs of Pounds 28m. There was a further Pounds 11.1m
write-down in the commercial property division which made a pre-tax loss of
Pounds 10.9m. The group's contracting business however turned in a small
profit.
The big improvement, said Mr Callcutt, had been a big reduction in group
borrowings as a result of commercial property sales and a decision to reduce
house prices and increase sales to generate more cash.
During the year Crest sold a record 1,435 homes. Average prices however fell
from Pounds 90,000 to Pounds 78,000.
The group's aim was to halve last year's interest charge of Pounds 12.6m
(Pounds 6.68m).
COMMENT
The market was right to be pleased with the news of a further reduction in
Crest's borrowings. The company has survived a difficult 12 months intact.
Bank facilities of Pounds 167m are more than adequate to meet foreseeable
requirements, say the directors. Pre-tax profits, given the severity of the
write-downs should also recover this year. Some market forecasts suggest
that Pounds 5m might even be achievable. A more cautious view is that
profits will be between Pounds 2m and Pounds 3m. The share price does not
yet fully take account of the improvement Crest has made, but the upside
remains limited. There are better quality housing recovery stocks around.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8871</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Maxwell stake in Hungarian paper sold
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROBERT Maxwell's 40 per cent stake in the Hungarian evening newspaper
Esti Hirlap has been bought by the Hungarian state-owned Newspaper
Publishing Company.
The government has repeatedly blamed negative media coverage for its poor
showing in polls since the Hungarian Democratic Forum party ousted the
Communists in free elections in 1990.
The publishing house exercised pre-emption rights to buy the stake, taking
its holding to 80 per cent.
A few hours after the deal was concluded, Mr Denes Maros, the paper's
editor-in-chief, resigned.
Arthur Andersen, the administrators of the late Mr Maxwell's web of 400
private companies, declined to disclose the price received.
Arthur Andersen is also negotiating to sell Mr Maxwell's 50.01 per cent
stake in the morning newspaper Magyar Hirlap, and Mr Maxwell's Hungarian
printing interests.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8872</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: BAT investment expected to boost Souza Cruz
exports
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRASILIA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH American Tobacco is to more than triple its annual investment in
Brazil this year because of increased confidence in the Brazilian economy.
As a result it expected Souza Cruz, its Brazilian subsidiary, to raise its
1992 tobacco and cigarette exports by more than Dollars 100m (Pounds 56m).
Sir Patrick Sheehy, chairman of BAT, said he decided to step up investment
from Dollars 30m to Dollars 110m because he had been encouraged by 'the
government's resoluteness in dealing with inflation and more market-oriented
policies'.
The money would be used to modernise the company's plants and increase
tobacco purchases, giving work to 16,000 extra farmers.
Sir Patrick, who is currently visiting Brazil, expected the investment to
produce a Dollars 70m increase in leaf exports on last year's Dollars 270m
and for cigarette exports to reach Dollars 50m from Dollars 10m just five
years ago.
The company recently started exporting cigarettes to eastern Europe and was
currently negotiating with Russia. It had stepped up exports to other Latin
American countries and hoped to benefit from the creation of Mercosul, the
tariff-free common market between Brazil, Argentina, Uruguay and Paraguay.
Brazil has been starved of direct investment in recent years and BAT's
decision will be seen as a welcome vote of confidence, coming shortly after
a Dollars 2.1bn loan secured from the IMF last month.
Cigarettes are one of the few items in Brazil which still have their prices
set by the government and although Souza Cruz has a 90 per cent share of the
Brazilian market, its cigarettes division was losing money until mid-1991
because of the low prices.
Sir Patrick said he was confident that these controls would be dropped. He
added: 'In the last six months the government has adopted a much more
liberal pricing policy'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8873</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: Harland shares take a tumble as company
issues profits warning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARES IN Harland Simon, the control systems specialist, yesterday lost more
than half their value after the company issued a profits warning and
released details of exposure to companies controlled by the late Mr Robert
Maxwell.
The shares slumped to 253p, their lowest since 1988, after opening at 585p.
The company said pre-tax profits for the year to end-March would show 'a
significant fall' from last time's Pounds 10.5m. Hoare Govett, the company's
broker, cut its forecast from Pounds 13m to Pounds 4m.
The company said contracts expected to be placed by Maxwell Communication
Corporation and Mirror Group Newspapers had fallen through following the
publisher's death and this would reduce profits by Pounds 2m. It has also
made provisions of Pounds 750,000 to cover disputed debts due from the two
Maxwell companies.
Mr John Redshaw, group managing director, said he was 'very saddened' by the
announcement. 'Its a short-term problem which has hit us at the end of the
year. But we are stronger than before because we have taken out our
dependence on newspapers and optical storage equipment,' he said. Newspapers
are expected to account for about 20 per cent of turnover in 1992, down from
85 per cent in 1987.
Profits will also be affected by delays at Perfect Information, the on-line
library service. The delays, and start-up problems, will reduce profits due
to the company by Pounds 3m.
But directors said they would recommend an unchanged final dividend of 5.5p
and turnover is expected to be higher than last year.
The company has spent Pounds 1m trying to lift overseas sales and has
incurred costs of Pounds 1m on rationalisation. Staff numbers have been
reduced by about 15 per cent and further redundancies are likely. Cost
cutting will reduce overheads by Pounds 5.5m from next year.
It said all established divisions were profitable except for NEF, a Swedish
subsidiary, and Pro Aqua, involved in water control. These are expected to
announce losses of Pounds 700,000 for the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8874</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UK Company News: BP down 14% to Pounds 1.04bn in year -
Final quarter sees 'extremely disappointing' fall of Pounds 384m to Pounds
72m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH PETROLEUM saw a sharp fall in profits in the final quarter of last
year as the recession took its toll on many parts of the business.
On a replacement cost basis, the group made Pounds 72m, down sharply from
the Pounds 456m earned in the previous year's final quarter. This brought
total profits for the year to Pounds 1.04bn, down 14 per cent from Pounds
1.2bn in 1990.
The lower result prompted BP to hold its final dividend at 4.2p, the level
of the previous three quarterly pay-outs. The resulting full-year dividend
of 16.8p represents an increase of 4.7 per cent on 1990.
The profit figure was much in line with market expectations. Investors,
however, had been hoping for a small boost to the final dividend, and BP's
shares lost ground as a result, closing 10p lower at 274p.
BP described the fourth quarter result as 'extremely disappointing'. Mr
Steve Ahearne, chief financial officer, stressed that the main cause was
recession rather than a weaker oil market. 'The overall picture is not of a
company bleeding because of the low oil price,' he said, 'but of a company
hit by recession in its key markets.'
To illustrate this he pointed to the strong result from exploration and
production which produced an operating profit on a replacement cost basis
for the year of Pounds 1.8bn (Pounds 1.69bn), including Pounds 149m of
divestment profits. Although the average oil price was down about Dollars 3
a barrel, production levels were maintained and cost structures were
improved.
The refining and marketing side made a full-year operating profit of Pounds
945m, up from Pounds 853m. Margins started high but declined as the year
progressed, reflecting weak product demand especially in the US.
BP's chemicals business, suffering from the deep cyclical downturn, incurred
an operating loss of Pounds 7m against a profit of Pounds 129m in 1990. The
loss was concentrated in the fourth quarter as prices weakened against a
background of steady costs. Profit from the nutrition business, recently
re-designated a 'non-core' activity, was Pounds 37m, down from Pounds 48m.
Adding to the company's difficulties was a high effective tax rate of 68 per
cent on the historical cost result because stock holding losses are not
recognised for tax in countries like the US. In the final quarter BP's tax
rate was 114 per cent because of asset write-downs which were not
tax-relievable.
Mr Robert Horton, chairman, said that the present low level of world oil
prices was unsustainable in the long run because it gave producers no
incentive to invest in new production. He forecast a 20m barrel a day
supply-demand gap by 2000. Nonetheless, he stressed that BP had tested all
its businesses on the basis of an oil price of Dollars 18 per barrel and had
found them 'robust'.
In the short term, the outlook was not encouraging, with conditions in the
first half of this year expected to be 'broadly similar to those in the
previous six months'. Every part of the group 'is pursuing a demanding cost
and profitability improvement programme', BP said.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16 Photograph Robert Horton, a 20m b/d supply-demand gap by 2000
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8875</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Unilever to shed five business units
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GUY DE JONQUIERES, Consumer Industries Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNILEVER, the Anglo-Dutch food and consumer products company, has put up for
sale most of its agribusiness interests. The decision will result in an
extraordinary charge of about Pounds 60m after tax against 1991
fourth-quarter profits.
The disposal plans cover five business units with 4,000 employees and total
annual sales of about Pounds 500m.
Unilever said the planned disposals were in line with its policy of focusing
on core activities. It was in talks with prospective buyers for several of
the businesses and was actively seeking other bidders. The businesses to be
sold are:
BOCM Silcock, the UK's leading animal feeds supplier, with about 18 per cent
of the market. The business, which includes Paul &amp; Vincent, an Irish animal
feeds company, and several smaller interests, had sales of Pounds 320m in
1990. Industry analysts estimate its operating profits at about Pounds 20m
in 1990.
Marine Harvest International, Scotland's largest salmon producer, accounting
for about a quarter of total production. The company also has fisheries in
Chile and prawn farming operations. It had 1990 sales of Pounds 50m and is
estimated to have lost about Pounds 15m that year because of falling
Scottish salmon prices.
Marine Harvest, which employs 600 people, said its performance in Scotland
improved sharply last year, and it expected to benefit from better salmon
prices this year. Barenbrug, a geographically diversified group of 10
grass-breeding companies. Unilever has a 60 per cent stake in the group,
which it has offered to the other shareholder, Barbelle of the Netherlands.
The group has annual sales of about Pounds 50m.
The other interests on sale are Malta Clayton, a Mexican animal feeds
operation, with annual sales of Pounds 80m, and a 76 per cent stake in AMI,
a small Italian corn hybrid breeder.
The Pounds 60m charge, arising from the write-off of goodwill and expected
losses on some of the assets to be sold, will almost exactly offset a Pounds
63m extraordinary fourth-quarter gain from Unilever's disposal of the 4P
packaging group last year.
Unilever, which had agribusiness sales of Pounds 797m in 1990, plans to
retain its Cambridge-based plant breeding operation and its tea and palm
plantations.
Lex, Page 14
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8876</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / BP dividend increase barely matches inflation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID LASCELLES, Resources Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Petroleum, one of the UK's top blue-chip companies, decided to hold
its final dividend yesterday, leaving shareholders with a dividend increase
for the whole year which barely matched the rate of inflation.
Mr Robert Horton, the chairman, blamed the move on BP's poor fourth-quarter
result which saw profits plunge to Pounds 72m from Pounds 456m on a
replacement cost basis. He described the result as 'extremely
disappointing', and added to the gloom by predicting that the next six
months would be no better than the last.
Investors had been hoping that BP - which has not raised its quarterly
dividend since the first quarter - would boost its final payout to give them
an increase in real terms in line with its recent policy. But yesterday's
final dividend of 4.2p makes a full-year total of 16.8p. This is an increase
of 4.7 per cent against inflation last year of 4.5 per cent.
The stock market reacted with disappointment, marking BP shares down by 16p
to 268p, though they later recovered to close at 274p.
BP took the opportunity to restate its dividend policy yesterday. This is to
offer real growth 'over a run of years' based on an operating strategy
designed to enlarge the corporation in real terms. But BP also said: 'You
can't pretend that difficult years aren't difficult. Given that our
quarterly declaration of dividends is a very flexible signalling process,
now seems an appropriate moment to pause for breath and take stock of the
general economic environment.'
BP's announcement followed weeks of rumours of tensions within the company
as it grappled with the effects of recession, weak oil prices and a higher
level of debt than its main competitors.
Mr Horton said yesterday he wanted to 'knock firmly on the head' any
suggestion there was a board split over the dividend decision. There was
certainly debate, he said, but not a division.
While BP was clearly suffering from the effects of recession, it had taken
firm steps to adjust to the weaker oil price, around Dollars 18 for North
Sea crude, down from Dollars 24 last year.
All BP's businesses had been tested against Dollars 18 oil, he said, and had
proved robust. But he warned that in the longer run the oil price would have
to rise significantly to create the incentive for the oil industry to invest
in new production.
In a comment clearly aimed at the OPEC meeting taking place in Geneva, he
predicted a worldwide shortfall of 20m barrels a day by the end of the
decade at current price levels.
BP's replacement cost profit for the whole year was Pounds 1.035bn, down 14
per cent from Pounds 1.2bn.
Lex, Page 14
Details, Page 16
Markets, Page 34
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8877</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Horton's dual role to be questioned by shareholders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN, Investments Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BP's institutional shareholders plan to question Mr Robert Horton, its
chairman and chief executive, over his dual role.
The shareholders said that company's poor fourth-quarter results announced
yesterday, and its forecast of tough trading conditions ahead, had forced
them to focus on a corporate governance question that up until now had
remained a background issue for the company.
Mr Horton and other senior BP board officials typically conduct a series of
shareholder meetings in the weeks following release of year-end figures.
The Bank of England-backed Institutional Shareholders Committee and the
Association of British Insurers urge the functions of chairman and chief
executive be filled by different people. 'It's obvious that (Mr) Horton is a
strong personality and he might need a different chairman to counterbalance
that,' one shareholder said. While the dual nature of his role would have
caused no more than a passing comment at other times, concern is mounting
about BP's long-term strategy and its dividend policy, shareholders said.
Mr Horton had earlier promised that dividends would maintain their value in
real terms and failure to increase it signals a change in policy.
'We want to know exactly what the dividend policy is,' one shareholder said.
Institutional shareholders expressed concern that the dividend may have to
be cut in nominal terms later this year.
Meanwhile, Mr Horton has responded to shareholder unease by agreeing to
appear at a breakfast meeting for oil industry analysts that is usually
headed by Mr David Simon, managing director.
Observer, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8878</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / Hanson alters payout policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HANSON, the Anglo-US con-glomerate, yesterday announced a new dividend
policy to minimise its tax charge as it reported a 6 per cent fall in
pre-tax profits in the first quarter to the end of December 1991.
Lord Hanson, chairman, blamed the recession in the UK and the US for the
fall in taxable profits to Pounds 226m compared with Pounds 241m a year ago,
its first-ever quarter-on-quarter fall. Sales rose to Pounds 2bn against
Pounds 1.9bn, while diluted earnings per share were unchanged at 3.9p
because of the change in dividend which has resulted in a lower tax charge
for the first quarter.
To minimise its advanced corporation tax liability for the year to September
30, 1992, Hanson will pay its dividend quarterly from July. There will be
three further payments in October, January and April.
The quarterly dividends will not be less than 2.75p totalling at least 11p
by April - the same as last year's full dividend.
Last year shareholders received 3.15p in July and 7.85p in February enabling
Mr Martin Taylor, vice chairman, to argue they would be better off since
they would receive 75 per cent of the dividend by January - earlier than
last year.
However, Mr Charles Pick, conglomerate analyst at Nomura, said: 'Hanson will
be affected by the dividend move since it is tantamount to a cut in the
dividend payment for 1991-2 although it equates to a maintained dividend on
a tax year basis.'
Hanson's shares yesterday fell 2p to close at 197 3/4 , reflecting market
unease at the change of dividend policy.
Some institutional shareholders yesterday put the move down to Hanson's
'financial wizardry' while others said the group was being 'too clever by
half'.
Analysts estimated that the move was worth up to Pounds 50m in tax benefit
because Hanson would only declare two dividends this financial year. This
will boost group earnings per share and allow Lord Hanson to announce record
earnings per share for the financial year.
Mr Taylor said the quarterly dividend payment was in response to growing
international interest in Hanson and its US ADRs. Most US companies pay
quarterly dividends.
Shareholders are likely to ask for a detailed explanation Lord Hanson and
Lord White in London today.
Lex, Page 14
Waiting in the Wings, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-8879</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CBNB3AFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920214
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  14 FEB 92 / UN likely to intervene in Yugoslavia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE FIRST United Nations peacekeeping operation in continental Europe could
begin in a few weeks.
The despatch of troops to Yugoslavia became highly likely after Mr Boutros
Boutros Ghali, the UN secretary-general, announced last night that he would
recommend such a move to the Security Council.
The peacekeepers are expected to number at least 10,000 and the total
deployed may reach 13,000, including civilians, according to UN officials.
The first contingent could be in place within 15 days of the formal decision
by the Council - which may be taken as soon as the end of next week.
Mr Boutros Ghali's recommendation, after weeks of hesitation during which he
repeatedly insisted the time was not ripe for UN military intervention,
virtually assures Council agreement. He discussed the matter yesterday with
representatives of the US, Britain, France, Russia and China, the Council's
permanent members, before making the statement.
The force, expected to be largely made up of European contingents, would be
the largest such UN operation since the intervention in the Congo in the
1960s. It would probably cost Dollars 400m (Pounds 223m) for the first year
of operations.
In a statement issued last night, Mr Boutros Ghali mentioned 'a number of
unanswered questions concerning this operation'. He said he felt strongly
that its success was 'predicated upon the full co-operation and support of
all the parties in Yugoslavia'. He agreed, however, with Mr Cyrus Vance, his
special envoy, that the risks of not intervening were greater.
A UN spokesman said: 'There is certainly concern about this operation but
there is also the judgment that at this point a decision to deploy is the
best possible decision in view of the dangers on the ground if that decision
is not taken.'
Only last week, Mr Boutros Ghali advised the Security Council that quick
action was needed to prevent an unravelling of the truce. But at the time he
said it still was not possible to recommend deployment of a large UN force.
Mr Franjo Tudjman, president of Croatia, has subsequently assured Mr Vance
that he 'fully accepts all the terms of reference of the peace plan'
prepared by the secretary-general. Mr Milan Babic, head of the
self-proclaimed Serb Republic of Krajina in south-ern Croatia, who earlier
re-fused to permit the deployment of UN peacekeepers there, is said to have
now been brought into line under pressure from other Serbian leaders.
Under the UN plan the Serb-dominated Federal Army would be withdrawn from
Croatian territory and all paramilitary forces, including Serbian units,
would be disarmed.
Mr Marrack Goulding, the UN undersecretary-general in charge of
peacekeeping, last night met the ambassadors of some 30 countries that might
contribute troops.
Conflicting views, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
